



Alcibiades I

by Plato (see Appendix I)

Translated by Benjamin Jowett






APPENDIX I.



It seems impossible to separate by any exact line the genuine writings of

Plato from the spurious.  The only external evidence to them which is of

much value is that of Aristotle; for the Alexandrian catalogues of a

century later include manifest forgeries.  Even the value of the

Aristotelian authority is a good deal impaired by the uncertainty

concerning the date and authorship of the writings which are ascribed to

him.  And several of the citations of Aristotle omit the name of Plato, and

some of them omit the name of the dialogue from which they are taken. 

Prior, however, to the enquiry about the writings of a particular author,

general considerations which equally affect all evidence to the genuineness

of ancient writings are the following:  Shorter works are more likely to

have been forged, or to have received an erroneous designation, than longer

ones; and some kinds of composition, such as epistles or panegyrical

orations, are more liable to suspicion than others; those, again, which

have a taste of sophistry in them, or the ring of a later age, or the

slighter character of a rhetorical exercise, or in which a motive or some

affinity to spurious writings can be detected, or which seem to have

originated in a name or statement really occurring in some classical

author, are also of doubtful credit; while there is no instance of any

ancient writing proved to be a forgery, which combines excellence with

length.  A really great and original writer would have no object in

fathering his works on Plato; and to the forger or imitator, the 'literary

hack' of Alexandria and Athens, the Gods did not grant originality or

genius.  Further, in attempting to balance the evidence for and against a

Platonic dialogue, we must not forget that the form of the Platonic writing

was common to several of his contemporaries.  Aeschines, Euclid, Phaedo,

Antisthenes, and in the next generation Aristotle, are all said to have

composed dialogues; and mistakes of names are very likely to have occurred. 

Greek literature in the third century before Christ was almost as

voluminous as our own, and without the safeguards of regular publication,

or printing, or binding, or even of distinct titles.  An unknown writing

was naturally attributed to a known writer whose works bore the same

character; and the name once appended easily obtained authority.  A

tendency may also be observed to blend the works and opinions of the master

with those of his scholars.  To a later Platonist, the difference between

Plato and his imitators was not so perceptible as to ourselves.  The

Memorabilia of Xenophon and the Dialogues of Plato are but a part of a

considerable Socratic literature which has passed away.  And we must

consider how we should regard the question of the genuineness of a

particular writing, if this lost literature had been preserved to us.



These considerations lead us to adopt the following criteria of

genuineness:  (1) That is most certainly Plato's which Aristotle attributes

to him by name, which (2) is of considerable length, of (3) great

excellence, and also (4) in harmony with the general spirit of the Platonic

writings.  But the testimony of Aristotle cannot always be distinguished

from that of a later age (see above); and has various degrees of

importance.  Those writings which he cites without mentioning Plato, under

their own names, e.g. the Hippias, the Funeral Oration, the Phaedo, etc.,

have an inferior degree of evidence in their favour.  They may have been

supposed by him to be the writings of another, although in the case of

really great works, e.g. the Phaedo, this is not credible; those again

which are quoted but not named, are still more defective in their external

credentials.  There may be also a possibility that Aristotle was mistaken,

or may have confused the master and his scholars in the case of a short

writing; but this is inconceivable about a more important work, e.g. the

Laws, especially when we remember that he was living at Athens, and a

frequenter of the groves of the Academy, during the last twenty years of

Plato's life.  Nor must we forget that in all his numerous citations from

the Platonic writings he never attributes any passage found in the extant

dialogues to any one but Plato.  And lastly, we may remark that one or two

great writings, such as the Parmenides and the Politicus, which are wholly

devoid of Aristotelian (1) credentials may be fairly attributed to Plato,

on the ground of (2) length, (3) excellence, and (4) accordance with the

general spirit of his writings.  Indeed the greater part of the evidence

for the genuineness of ancient Greek authors may be summed up under two

heads only:  (1) excellence; and (2) uniformity of tradition--a kind of

evidence, which though in many cases sufficient, is of inferior value.



Proceeding upon these principles we appear to arrive at the conclusion that

nineteen-twentieths of all the writings which have ever been ascribed to

Plato, are undoubtedly genuine.  There is another portion of them,

including the Epistles, the Epinomis, the dialogues rejected by the

ancients themselves, namely, the Axiochus, De justo, De virtute, Demodocus,

Sisyphus, Eryxias, which on grounds, both of internal and external

evidence, we are able with equal certainty to reject.  But there still

remains a small portion of which we are unable to affirm either that they

are genuine or spurious.  They may have been written in youth, or possibly

like the works of some painters, may be partly or wholly the compositions

of pupils; or they may have been the writings of some contemporary

transferred by accident to the more celebrated name of Plato, or of some

Platonist in the next generation who aspired to imitate his master.  Not

that on grounds either of language or philosophy we should lightly reject

them.  Some difference of style, or inferiority of execution, or

inconsistency of thought, can hardly be considered decisive of their

spurious character.  For who always does justice to himself, or who writes

with equal care at all times?  Certainly not Plato, who exhibits the

greatest differences in dramatic power, in the formation of sentences, and

in the use of words, if his earlier writings are compared with his later

ones, say the Protagoras or Phaedrus with the Laws.  Or who can be expected

to think in the same manner during a period of authorship extending over

above fifty years, in an age of great intellectual activity, as well as of

political and literary transition?  Certainly not Plato, whose earlier

writings are separated from his later ones by as wide an interval of

philosophical speculation as that which separates his later writings from

Aristotle.



The dialogues which have been translated in the first Appendix, and which

appear to have the next claim to genuineness among the Platonic writings,

are the Lesser Hippias, the Menexenus or Funeral Oration, the First

Alcibiades.  Of these, the Lesser Hippias and the Funeral Oration are cited

by Aristotle; the first in the Metaphysics, the latter in the Rhetoric. 

Neither of them are expressly attributed to Plato, but in his citation of

both of them he seems to be referring to passages in the extant dialogues. 

From the mention of 'Hippias' in the singular by Aristotle, we may perhaps

infer that he was unacquainted with a second dialogue bearing the same

name.  Moreover, the mere existence of a Greater and Lesser Hippias, and of

a First and Second Alcibiades, does to a certain extent throw a doubt upon

both of them.  Though a very clever and ingenious work, the Lesser Hippias

does not appear to contain anything beyond the power of an imitator, who

was also a careful student of the earlier Platonic writings, to invent. 

The motive or leading thought of the dialogue may be detected in Xen. Mem.,

and there is no similar instance of a 'motive' which is taken from Xenophon

in an undoubted dialogue of Plato.  On the other hand, the upholders of the

genuineness of the dialogue will find in the Hippias a true Socratic

spirit; they will compare the Ion as being akin both in subject and

treatment; they will urge the authority of Aristotle; and they will detect

in the treatment of the Sophist, in the satirical reasoning upon Homer, in

the reductio ad absurdum of the doctrine that vice is ignorance, traces of

a Platonic authorship.  In reference to the last point we are doubtful, as

in some of the other dialogues, whether the author is asserting or

overthrowing the paradox of Socrates, or merely following the argument

'whither the wind blows.'  That no conclusion is arrived at is also in

accordance with the character of the earlier dialogues.  The resemblances

or imitations of the Gorgias, Protagoras, and Euthydemus, which have been

observed in the Hippias, cannot with certainty be adduced on either side of

the argument.  On the whole, more may be said in favour of the genuineness

of the Hippias than against it.



The Menexenus or Funeral Oration is cited by Aristotle, and is interesting

as supplying an example of the manner in which the orators praised 'the

Athenians among the Athenians,' falsifying persons and dates, and casting a

veil over the gloomier events of Athenian history.  It exhibits an

acquaintance with the funeral oration of Thucydides, and was, perhaps,

intended to rival that great work.  If genuine, the proper place of the

Menexenus would be at the end of the Phaedrus.  The satirical opening and

the concluding words bear a great resemblance to the earlier dialogues; the

oration itself is professedly a mimetic work, like the speeches in the

Phaedrus, and cannot therefore be tested by a comparison of the other

writings of Plato.  The funeral oration of Pericles is expressly mentioned

in the Phaedrus, and this may have suggested the subject, in the same

manner that the Cleitophon appears to be suggested by the slight mention of

Cleitophon and his attachment to Thrasymachus in the Republic; and the

Theages by the mention of Theages in the Apology and Republic; or as the

Second Alcibiades seems to be founded upon the text of Xenophon, Mem.  A

similar taste for parody appears not only in the Phaedrus, but in the

Protagoras, in the Symposium, and to a certain extent in the Parmenides.



To these two doubtful writings of Plato I have added the First Alcibiades,

which, of all the disputed dialogues of Plato, has the greatest merit, and

is somewhat longer than any of them, though not verified by the testimony

of Aristotle, and in many respects at variance with the Symposium in the

description of the relations of Socrates and Alcibiades.  Like the Lesser

Hippias and the Menexenus, it is to be compared to the earlier writings of

Plato.  The motive of the piece may, perhaps, be found in that passage of

the Symposium in which Alcibiades describes himself as self-convicted by

the words of Socrates.  For the disparaging manner in which Schleiermacher

has spoken of this dialogue there seems to be no sufficient foundation.  At

the same time, the lesson imparted is simple, and the irony more

transparent than in the undoubted dialogues of Plato.  We know, too, that

Alcibiades was a favourite thesis, and that at least five or six dialogues

bearing this name passed current in antiquity, and are attributed to

contemporaries of Socrates and Plato.  (1) In the entire absence of real

external evidence (for the catalogues of the Alexandrian librarians cannot

be regarded as trustworthy); and (2) in the absence of the highest marks

either of poetical or philosophical excellence; and (3) considering that we

have express testimony to the existence of contemporary writings bearing

the name of Alcibiades, we are compelled to suspend our judgment on the

genuineness of the extant dialogue.



Neither at this point, nor at any other, do we propose to draw an absolute

line of demarcation between genuine and spurious writings of Plato.  They

fade off imperceptibly from one class to another.  There may have been

degrees of genuineness in the dialogues themselves, as there are certainly

degrees of evidence by which they are supported.  The traditions of the

oral discourses both of Socrates and Plato may have formed the basis of

semi-Platonic writings; some of them may be of the same mixed character

which is apparent in Aristotle and Hippocrates, although the form of them

is different.  But the writings of Plato, unlike the writings of Aristotle,

seem never to have been confused with the writings of his disciples:  this

was probably due to their definite form, and to their inimitable

excellence.  The three dialogues which we have offered in the Appendix to

the criticism of the reader may be partly spurious and partly genuine; they

may be altogether spurious;--that is an alternative which must be frankly

admitted.  Nor can we maintain of some other dialogues, such as the

Parmenides, and the Sophist, and Politicus, that no considerable objection

can be urged against them, though greatly overbalanced by the weight

(chiefly) of internal evidence in their favour.  Nor, on the other hand,

can we exclude a bare possibility that some dialogues which are usually

rejected, such as the Greater Hippias and the Cleitophon, may be genuine. 

The nature and object of these semi-Platonic writings require more careful

study and more comparison of them with one another, and with forged

writings in general, than they have yet received, before we can finally

decide on their character.  We do not consider them all as genuine until

they can be proved to be spurious, as is often maintained and still more

often implied in this and similar discussions; but should say of some of

them, that their genuineness is neither proven nor disproven until further

evidence about them can be adduced.  And we are as confident that the

Epistles are spurious, as that the Republic, the Timaeus, and the Laws are

genuine.



On the whole, not a twentieth part of the writings which pass under the

name of Plato, if we exclude the works rejected by the ancients themselves

and two or three other plausible inventions, can be fairly doubted by those

who are willing to allow that a considerable change and growth may have

taken place in his philosophy (see above).  That twentieth debatable

portion scarcely in any degree affects our judgment of Plato, either as a

thinker or a writer, and though suggesting some interesting questions to

the scholar and critic, is of little importance to the general reader.





ALCIBIADES I



by



Plato (see Appendix I above)



Translated by Benjamin Jowett





INTRODUCTION.



The First Alcibiades is a conversation between Socrates and Alcibiades. 

Socrates is represented in the character which he attributes to himself in

the Apology of a know-nothing who detects the conceit of knowledge in

others.  The two have met already in the Protagoras and in the Symposium;

in the latter dialogue, as in this, the relation between them is that of a

lover and his beloved.  But the narrative of their loves is told

differently in different places; for in the Symposium Alcibiades is

depicted as the impassioned but rejected lover; here, as coldly receiving

the advances of Socrates, who, for the best of purposes, lies in wait for

the aspiring and ambitious youth.



Alcibiades, who is described as a very young man, is about to enter on

public life, having an inordinate opinion of himself, and an extravagant

ambition.  Socrates, 'who knows what is in man,' astonishes him by a

revelation of his designs.  But has he the knowledge which is necessary for

carrying them out?  He is going to persuade the Athenians--about what?  Not

about any particular art, but about politics--when to fight and when to

make peace.  Now, men should fight and make peace on just grounds, and

therefore the question of justice and injustice must enter into peace and

war; and he who advises the Athenians must know the difference between

them.  Does Alcibiades know?  If he does, he must either have been taught

by some master, or he must have discovered the nature of them himself.  If

he has had a master, Socrates would like to be informed who he is, that he

may go and learn of him also.  Alcibiades admits that he has never learned. 

Then has he enquired for himself?  He may have, if he was ever aware of a

time when he was ignorant.  But he never was ignorant; for when he played

with other boys at dice, he charged them with cheating, and this implied a

knowledge of just and unjust.  According to his own explanation, he had

learned of the multitude.  Why, he asks, should he not learn of them the

nature of justice, as he has learned the Greek language of them?  To this

Socrates answers, that they can teach Greek, but they cannot teach justice;

for they are agreed about the one, but they are not agreed about the other: 

and therefore Alcibiades, who has admitted that if he knows he must either

have learned from a master or have discovered for himself the nature of

justice, is convicted out of his own mouth.



Alcibiades rejoins, that the Athenians debate not about what is just, but

about what is expedient; and he asserts that the two principles of justice

and expediency are opposed.  Socrates, by a series of questions, compels

him to admit that the just and the expedient coincide.  Alcibiades is thus

reduced to the humiliating conclusion that he knows nothing of politics,

even if, as he says, they are concerned with the expedient.



However, he is no worse than other Athenian statesmen; and he will not need

training, for others are as ignorant as he is.  He is reminded that he has

to contend, not only with his own countrymen, but with their enemies--with

the Spartan kings and with the great king of Persia; and he can only attain

this higher aim of ambition by the assistance of Socrates.  Not that

Socrates himself professes to have attained the truth, but the questions

which he asks bring others to a knowledge of themselves, and this is the

first step in the practice of virtue.



The dialogue continues:--We wish to become as good as possible.  But to be

good in what?  Alcibiades replies--'Good in transacting business.'  But

what business?  'The business of the most intelligent men at Athens.'  The

cobbler is intelligent in shoemaking, and is therefore good in that; he is

not intelligent, and therefore not good, in weaving.  Is he good in the

sense which Alcibiades means, who is also bad?  'I mean,' replies

Alcibiades, 'the man who is able to command in the city.'  But to command

what--horses or men? and if men, under what circumstances?  'I mean to say,

that he is able to command men living in social and political relations.' 

And what is their aim?  'The better preservation of the city.'  But when is

a city better?  'When there is unanimity, such as exists between husband

and wife.'  Then, when husbands and wives perform their own special duties,

there can be no unanimity between them; nor can a city be well ordered when

each citizen does his own work only.  Alcibiades, having stated first that

goodness consists in the unanimity of the citizens, and then in each of

them doing his own separate work, is brought to the required point of self-

contradiction, leading him to confess his own ignorance.



But he is not too old to learn, and may still arrive at the truth, if he is

willing to be cross-examined by Socrates.  He must know himself; that is to

say, not his body, or the things of the body, but his mind, or truer self.

The physician knows the body, and the tradesman knows his own business, but

they do not necessarily know themselves.  Self-knowledge can be obtained

only by looking into the mind and virtue of the soul, which is the diviner

part of a man, as we see our own image in another's eye.  And if we do not

know ourselves, we cannot know what belongs to ourselves or belongs to

others, and are unfit to take a part in political affairs.  Both for the

sake of the individual and of the state, we ought to aim at justice and

temperance, not at wealth or power.  The evil and unjust should have no

power,--they should be the slaves of better men than themselves.  None but

the virtuous are deserving of freedom.



And are you, Alcibiades, a freeman?  'I feel that I am not; but I hope,

Socrates, that by your aid I may become free, and from this day forward I

will never leave you.'



The Alcibiades has several points of resemblance to the undoubted dialogues

of Plato.  The process of interrogation is of the same kind with that which

Socrates practises upon the youthful Cleinias in the Euthydemus; and he

characteristically attributes to Alcibiades the answers which he has

elicited from him.  The definition of good is narrowed by successive

questions, and virtue is shown to be identical with knowledge.  Here, as

elsewhere, Socrates awakens the consciousness not of sin but of ignorance.

Self-humiliation is the first step to knowledge, even of the commonest

things.  No man knows how ignorant he is, and no man can arrive at virtue

and wisdom who has not once in his life, at least, been convicted of error. 

The process by which the soul is elevated is not unlike that which

religious writers describe under the name of 'conversion,' if we substitute

the sense of ignorance for the consciousness of sin.



In some respects the dialogue differs from any other Platonic composition.

The aim is more directly ethical and hortatory; the process by which the

antagonist is undermined is simpler than in other Platonic writings, and

the conclusion more decided.  There is a good deal of humour in the manner

in which the pride of Alcibiades, and of the Greeks generally, is supposed

to be taken down by the Spartan and Persian queens; and the dialogue has

considerable dialectical merit.  But we have a difficulty in supposing that

the same writer, who has given so profound and complex a notion of the

characters both of Alcibiades and Socrates in the Symposium, should have

treated them in so thin and superficial a manner in the Alcibiades, or that

he would have ascribed to the ironical Socrates the rather unmeaning boast

that Alcibiades could not attain the objects of his ambition without his

help; or that he should have imagined that a mighty nature like his could

have been reformed by a few not very conclusive words of Socrates.  For the

arguments by which Alcibiades is reformed are not convincing; the writer of

the dialogue, whoever he was, arrives at his idealism by crooked and

tortuous paths, in which many pitfalls are concealed.  The anachronism of

making Alcibiades about twenty years old during the life of his uncle,

Pericles, may be noted; and the repetition of the favourite observation,

which occurs also in the Laches and Protagoras, that great Athenian

statesmen, like Pericles, failed in the education of their sons.  There is

none of the undoubted dialogues of Plato in which there is so little

dramatic verisimilitude.





ALCIBIADES I



by



Plato (see Appendix I above)



Translated by Benjamin Jowett





PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE:  Alcibiades, Socrates.





SOCRATES:  I dare say that you may be surprised to find, O son of Cleinias,

that I, who am your first lover, not having spoken to you for many years,

when the rest of the world were wearying you with their attentions, am the

last of your lovers who still speaks to you.  The cause of my silence has

been that I was hindered by a power more than human, of which I will some

day explain to you the nature; this impediment has now been removed; I

therefore here present myself before you, and I greatly hope that no

similar hindrance will again occur.  Meanwhile, I have observed that your

pride has been too much for the pride of your admirers; they were numerous

and high-spirited, but they have all run away, overpowered by your superior

force of character; not one of them remains.  And I want you to understand

the reason why you have been too much for them.  You think that you have no

need of them or of any other man, for you have great possessions and lack

nothing, beginning with the body, and ending with the soul.  In the first

place, you say to yourself that you are the fairest and tallest of the

citizens, and this every one who has eyes may see to be true; in the second

place, that you are among the noblest of them, highly connected both on the

father's and the mother's side, and sprung from one of the most

distinguished families in your own state, which is the greatest in Hellas,

and having many friends and kinsmen of the best sort, who can assist you

when in need; and there is one potent relative, who is more to you than all

the rest, Pericles the son of Xanthippus, whom your father left guardian of

you, and of your brother, and who can do as he pleases not only in this

city, but in all Hellas, and among many and mighty barbarous nations. 

Moreover, you are rich; but I must say that you value yourself least of all

upon your possessions.  And all these things have lifted you up; you have

overcome your lovers, and they have acknowledged that you were too much for

them.  Have you not remarked their absence?  And now I know that you wonder

why I, unlike the rest of them, have not gone away, and what can be my

motive in remaining.



ALCIBIADES:  Perhaps, Socrates, you are not aware that I was just going to

ask you the very same question--What do you want?  And what is your motive

in annoying me, and always, wherever I am, making a point of coming? 

(Compare Symp.)  I do really wonder what you mean, and should greatly like

to know.



SOCRATES:  Then if, as you say, you desire to know, I suppose that you will

be willing to hear, and I may consider myself to be speaking to an auditor

who will remain, and will not run away?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly, let me hear.



SOCRATES:  You had better be careful, for I may very likely be as unwilling

to end as I have hitherto been to begin.



ALCIBIADES:  Proceed, my good man, and I will listen.



SOCRATES:  I will proceed; and, although no lover likes to speak with one

who has no feeling of love in him (compare Symp.), I will make an effort,

and tell you what I meant:  My love, Alcibiades, which I hardly like to

confess, would long ago have passed away, as I flatter myself, if I saw you

loving your good things, or thinking that you ought to pass life in the

enjoyment of them.  But I shall reveal other thoughts of yours, which you

keep to yourself; whereby you will know that I have always had my eye on

you.  Suppose that at this moment some God came to you and said: 

Alcibiades, will you live as you are, or die in an instant if you are

forbidden to make any further acquisition?--I verily believe that you would

choose death.  And I will tell you the hope in which you are at present

living:  Before many days have elapsed, you think that you will come before

the Athenian assembly, and will prove to them that you are more worthy of

honour than Pericles, or any other man that ever lived, and having proved

this, you will have the greatest power in the state.  When you have gained

the greatest power among us, you will go on to other Hellenic states, and

not only to Hellenes, but to all the barbarians who inhabit the same

continent with us.  And if the God were then to say to you again:  Here in

Europe is to be your seat of empire, and you must not cross over into Asia

or meddle with Asiatic affairs, I do not believe that you would choose to

live upon these terms; but the world, as I may say, must be filled with

your power and name--no man less than Cyrus and Xerxes is of any account

with you.  Such I know to be your hopes--I am not guessing only--and very

likely you, who know that I am speaking the truth, will reply, Well,

Socrates, but what have my hopes to do with the explanation which you

promised of your unwillingness to leave me?  And that is what I am now

going to tell you, sweet son of Cleinias and Dinomache.  The explanation

is, that all these designs of yours cannot be accomplished by you without

my help; so great is the power which I believe myself to have over you and

your concerns; and this I conceive to be the reason why the God has

hitherto forbidden me to converse with you, and I have been long expecting

his permission.  For, as you hope to prove your own great value to the

state, and having proved it, to attain at once to absolute power, so do I

indulge a hope that I shall be the supreme power over you, if I am able to

prove my own great value to you, and to show you that neither guardian, nor

kinsman, nor any one is able to deliver into your hands the power which you

desire, but I only, God being my helper.  When you were young (compare

Symp.) and your hopes were not yet matured, I should have wasted my time,

and therefore, as I conceive, the God forbade me to converse with you; but

now, having his permission, I will speak, for now you will listen to me.



ALCIBIADES:  Your silence, Socrates, was always a surprise to me.  I never

could understand why you followed me about, and now that you have begun to

speak again, I am still more amazed.  Whether I think all this or not, is a

matter about which you seem to have already made up your mind, and

therefore my denial will have no effect upon you.  But granting, if I must,

that you have perfectly divined my purposes, why is your assistance

necessary to the attainment of them?  Can you tell me why?



SOCRATES:  You want to know whether I can make a long speech, such as you

are in the habit of hearing; but that is not my way.  I think, however,

that I can prove to you the truth of what I am saying, if you will grant me

one little favour.



ALCIBIADES:  Yes, if the favour which you mean be not a troublesome one.



SOCRATES:  Will you be troubled at having questions to answer?



ALCIBIADES:  Not at all.



SOCRATES:  Then please to answer.



ALCIBIADES:  Ask me.



SOCRATES:  Have you not the intention which I attribute to you?



ALCIBIADES:  I will grant anything you like, in the hope of hearing what

more you have to say.



SOCRATES:  You do, then, mean, as I was saying, to come forward in a little

while in the character of an adviser of the Athenians?  And suppose that

when you are ascending the bema, I pull you by the sleeve and say,

Alcibiades, you are getting up to advise the Athenians--do you know the

matter about which they are going to deliberate, better than they?--How

would you answer?



ALCIBIADES:  I should reply, that I was going to advise them about a matter

which I do know better than they.



SOCRATES:  Then you are a good adviser about the things which you know?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And do you know anything but what you have learned of others, or

found out yourself?



ALCIBIADES:  That is all.



SOCRATES:  And would you have ever learned or discovered anything, if you

had not been willing either to learn of others or to examine yourself?



ALCIBIADES:  I should not.



SOCRATES:  And would you have been willing to learn or to examine what you

supposed that you knew?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  Then there was a time when you thought that you did not know

what you are now supposed to know?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  I think that I know tolerably well the extent of your

acquirements; and you must tell me if I forget any of them:  according to

my recollection, you learned the arts of writing, of playing on the lyre,

and of wrestling; the flute you never would learn; this is the sum of your

accomplishments, unless there were some which you acquired in secret; and I

think that secrecy was hardly possible, as you could not have come out of

your door, either by day or night, without my seeing you.



ALCIBIADES:  Yes, that was the whole of my schooling.



SOCRATES:  And are you going to get up in the Athenian assembly, and give

them advice about writing?



ALCIBIADES:  No, indeed.



SOCRATES:  Or about the touch of the lyre?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  And they are not in the habit of deliberating about wrestling,

in the assembly?



ALCIBIADES:  Hardly.



SOCRATES:  Then what are the deliberations in which you propose to advise

them?  Surely not about building?



ALCIBIADES:  No.



SOCRATES:  For the builder will advise better than you will about that?



ALCIBIADES:  He will.



SOCRATES:  Nor about divination?



ALCIBIADES:  No.



SOCRATES:  About that again the diviner will advise better than you will?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  Whether he be little or great, good or ill-looking, noble or

ignoble--makes no difference.



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  A man is a good adviser about anything, not because he has

riches, but because he has knowledge?



ALCIBIADES:  Assuredly.



SOCRATES:  Whether their counsellor is rich or poor, is not a matter which

will make any difference to the Athenians when they are deliberating about

the health of the citizens; they only require that he should be a

physician.



ALCIBIADES:  Of course.



SOCRATES:  Then what will be the subject of deliberation about which you

will be justified in getting up and advising them?



ALCIBIADES:  About their own concerns, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  You mean about shipbuilding, for example, when the question is

what sort of ships they ought to build?



ALCIBIADES:  No, I should not advise them about that.



SOCRATES:  I suppose, because you do not understand shipbuilding:--is that

the reason?



ALCIBIADES:  It is.



SOCRATES:  Then about what concerns of theirs will you advise them?



ALCIBIADES:  About war, Socrates, or about peace, or about any other

concerns of the state.



SOCRATES:  You mean, when they deliberate with whom they ought to make

peace, and with whom they ought to go to war, and in what manner?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And they ought to go to war with those against whom it is better

to go to war?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And when it is better?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And for as long a time as is better?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  But suppose the Athenians to deliberate with whom they ought to

close in wrestling, and whom they should grasp by the hand, would you, or

the master of gymnastics, be a better adviser of them?



ALCIBIADES:  Clearly, the master of gymnastics.



SOCRATES:  And can you tell me on what grounds the master of gymnastics

would decide, with whom they ought or ought not to close, and when and how?

To take an instance:  Would he not say that they should wrestle with those

against whom it is best to wrestle?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And as much as is best?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And at such times as are best?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Again; you sometimes accompany the lyre with the song and dance?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  When it is well to do so?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And as much as is well?



ALCIBIADES:  Just so.



SOCRATES:  And as you speak of an excellence or art of the best in

wrestling, and of an excellence in playing the lyre, I wish you would tell

me what this latter is;--the excellence of wrestling I call gymnastic, and

I want to know what you call the other.



ALCIBIADES:  I do not understand you.



SOCRATES:  Then try to do as I do; for the answer which I gave is

universally right, and when I say right, I mean according to rule.



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And was not the art of which I spoke gymnastic?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And I called the excellence in wrestling gymnastic?



ALCIBIADES:  You did.



SOCRATES:  And I was right?



ALCIBIADES:  I think that you were.



SOCRATES:  Well, now,--for you should learn to argue prettily--let me ask

you in return to tell me, first, what is that art of which playing and

singing, and stepping properly in the dance, are parts,--what is the name

of the whole?  I think that by this time you must be able to tell.



ALCIBIADES:  Indeed I cannot.



SOCRATES:  Then let me put the matter in another way:  what do you call the

Goddesses who are the patronesses of art?



ALCIBIADES:  The Muses do you mean, Socrates?



SOCRATES:  Yes, I do; and what is the name of the art which is called after

them?



ALCIBIADES:  I suppose that you mean music.



SOCRATES:  Yes, that is my meaning; and what is the excellence of the art

of music, as I told you truly that the excellence of wrestling was

gymnastic--what is the excellence of music--to be what?



ALCIBIADES:  To be musical, I suppose.



SOCRATES:  Very good; and now please to tell me what is the excellence of

war and peace; as the more musical was the more excellent, or the more

gymnastical was the more excellent, tell me, what name do you give to the

more excellent in war and peace?



ALCIBIADES:  But I really cannot tell you.



SOCRATES:  But if you were offering advice to another and said to him--This

food is better than that, at this time and in this quantity, and he said to

you--What do you mean, Alcibiades, by the word 'better'? you would have no

difficulty in replying that you meant 'more wholesome,' although you do not

profess to be a physician:  and when the subject is one of which you

profess to have knowledge, and about which you are ready to get up and

advise as if you knew, are you not ashamed, when you are asked, not to be

able to answer the question?  Is it not disgraceful?



ALCIBIADES:  Very.



SOCRATES:  Well, then, consider and try to explain what is the meaning of

'better,' in the matter of making peace and going to war with those against

whom you ought to go to war?  To what does the word refer?



ALCIBIADES:  I am thinking, and I cannot tell.



SOCRATES:  But you surely know what are the charges which we bring against

one another, when we arrive at the point of making war, and what name we

give them?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes, certainly; we say that deceit or violence has been

employed, or that we have been defrauded.



SOCRATES:  And how does this happen?  Will you tell me how?  For there may

be a difference in the manner.



ALCIBIADES:  Do you mean by 'how,' Socrates, whether we suffered these

things justly or unjustly?



SOCRATES:  Exactly.



ALCIBIADES:  There can be no greater difference than between just and

unjust.



SOCRATES:  And would you advise the Athenians to go to war with the just or

with the unjust?



ALCIBIADES:  That is an awkward question; for certainly, even if a person

did intend to go to war with the just, he would not admit that they were

just.



SOCRATES:  He would not go to war, because it would be unlawful?



ALCIBIADES:  Neither lawful nor honourable.



SOCRATES:  Then you, too, would address them on principles of justice?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  What, then, is justice but that better, of which I spoke, in

going to war or not going to war with those against whom we ought or ought

not, and when we ought or ought not to go to war?



ALCIBIADES:  Clearly.



SOCRATES:  But how is this, friend Alcibiades?  Have you forgotten that you

do not know this, or have you been to the schoolmaster without my

knowledge, and has he taught you to discern the just from the unjust?  Who

is he?  I wish you would tell me, that I may go and learn of him--you shall

introduce me.



ALCIBIADES:  You are mocking, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  No, indeed; I most solemnly declare to you by Zeus, who is the

God of our common friendship, and whom I never will forswear, that I am

not; tell me, then, who this instructor is, if he exists.



ALCIBIADES:  But, perhaps, he does not exist; may I not have acquired the

knowledge of just and unjust in some other way?



SOCRATES:  Yes; if you have discovered them.



ALCIBIADES:  But do you not think that I could discover them?



SOCRATES:  I am sure that you might, if you enquired about them.



ALCIBIADES:  And do you not think that I would enquire?



SOCRATES:  Yes; if you thought that you did not know them.



ALCIBIADES:  And was there not a time when I did so think?



SOCRATES:  Very good; and can you tell me how long it is since you thought

that you did not know the nature of the just and the unjust?  What do you

say to a year ago?  Were you then in a state of conscious ignorance and

enquiry?  Or did you think that you knew?  And please to answer truly, that

our discussion may not be in vain.



ALCIBIADES:  Well, I thought that I knew.



SOCRATES:  And two years ago, and three years ago, and four years ago, you

knew all the same?



ALCIBIADES:  I did.



SOCRATES:  And more than four years ago you were a child--were you not?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And then I am quite sure that you thought you knew.



ALCIBIADES:  Why are you so sure?



SOCRATES:  Because I often heard you when a child, in your teacher's house,

or elsewhere, playing at dice or some other game with the boys, not

hesitating at all about the nature of the just and unjust; but very

confident--crying and shouting that one of the boys was a rogue and a

cheat, and had been cheating.  Is it not true?



ALCIBIADES:  But what was I to do, Socrates, when anybody cheated me?



SOCRATES:  And how can you say, 'What was I to do'? if at the time you did

not know whether you were wronged or not?



ALCIBIADES:  To be sure I knew; I was quite aware that I was being cheated.



SOCRATES:  Then you suppose yourself even when a child to have known the

nature of just and unjust?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly; and I did know then.



SOCRATES:  And when did you discover them--not, surely, at the time when

you thought that you knew them?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  And when did you think that you were ignorant--if you consider,

you will find that there never was such a time?



ALCIBIADES:  Really, Socrates, I cannot say.



SOCRATES:  Then you did not learn them by discovering them?



ALCIBIADES:  Clearly not.



SOCRATES:  But just before you said that you did not know them by learning;

now, if you have neither discovered nor learned them, how and whence do you

come to know them?



ALCIBIADES:  I suppose that I was mistaken in saying that I knew them

through my own discovery of them; whereas, in truth, I learned them in the

same way that other people learn.



SOCRATES:  So you said before, and I must again ask, of whom?  Do tell me.



ALCIBIADES:  Of the many.



SOCRATES:  Do you take refuge in them?  I cannot say much for your

teachers.



ALCIBIADES:  Why, are they not able to teach?



SOCRATES:  They could not teach you how to play at draughts, which you

would acknowledge (would you not) to be a much smaller matter than justice?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And can they teach the better who are unable to teach the worse?



ALCIBIADES:  I think that they can; at any rate, they can teach many far

better things than to play at draughts.



SOCRATES:  What things?



ALCIBIADES:  Why, for example, I learned to speak Greek of them, and I

cannot say who was my teacher, or to whom I am to attribute my knowledge of

Greek, if not to those good-for-nothing teachers, as you call them.



SOCRATES:  Why, yes, my friend; and the many are good enough teachers of

Greek, and some of their instructions in that line may be justly praised.



ALCIBIADES:  Why is that?



SOCRATES:  Why, because they have the qualities which good teachers ought

to have.



ALCIBIADES:  What qualities?



SOCRATES:  Why, you know that knowledge is the first qualification of any

teacher?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And if they know, they must agree together and not differ?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And would you say that they knew the things about which they

differ?



ALCIBIADES:  No.



SOCRATES:  Then how can they teach them?



ALCIBIADES:  They cannot.



SOCRATES:  Well, but do you imagine that the many would differ about the

nature of wood and stone? are they not agreed if you ask them what they

are? and do they not run to fetch the same thing, when they want a piece of

wood or a stone?  And so in similar cases, which I suspect to be pretty

nearly all that you mean by speaking Greek.



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  These, as we were saying, are matters about which they are

agreed with one another and with themselves; both individuals and states

use the same words about them; they do not use some one word and some

another.



ALCIBIADES:  They do not.



SOCRATES:  Then they may be expected to be good teachers of these things?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And if we want to instruct any one in them, we shall be right in

sending him to be taught by our friends the many?



ALCIBIADES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  But if we wanted further to know not only which are men and

which are horses, but which men or horses have powers of running, would the

many still be able to inform us?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  And you have a sufficient proof that they do not know these

things and are not the best teachers of them, inasmuch as they are never

agreed about them?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.  



SOCRATES:  And suppose that we wanted to know not only what men are like,

but what healthy or diseased men are like--would the many be able to teach

us?



ALCIBIADES:  They would not.



SOCRATES:  And you would have a proof that they were bad teachers of these

matters, if you saw them at variance?



ALCIBIADES:  I should.



SOCRATES:  Well, but are the many agreed with themselves, or with one

another, about the justice or injustice of men and things?



ALCIBIADES:  Assuredly not, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  There is no subject about which they are more at variance?



ALCIBIADES:  None.



SOCRATES:  I do not suppose that you ever saw or heard of men quarrelling

over the principles of health and disease to such an extent as to go to war

and kill one another for the sake of them?



ALCIBIADES:  No indeed.



SOCRATES:  But of the quarrels about justice and injustice, even if you

have never seen them, you have certainly heard from many people, including

Homer; for you have heard of the Iliad and Odyssey?



ALCIBIADES:  To be sure, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  A difference of just and unjust is the argument of those poems?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  Which difference caused all the wars and deaths of Trojans and

Achaeans, and the deaths of the suitors of Penelope in their quarrel with

Odysseus.



ALCIBIADES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  And when the Athenians and Lacedaemonians and Boeotians fell at

Tanagra, and afterwards in the battle of Coronea, at which your father

Cleinias met his end, the question was one of justice--this was the sole

cause of the battles, and of their deaths.



ALCIBIADES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  But can they be said to understand that about which they are

quarrelling to the death?



ALCIBIADES:  Clearly not.



SOCRATES:  And yet those whom you thus allow to be ignorant are the

teachers to whom you are appealing.



ALCIBIADES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  But how are you ever likely to know the nature of justice and

injustice, about which you are so perplexed, if you have neither learned

them of others nor discovered them yourself?



ALCIBIADES:  From what you say, I suppose not.



SOCRATES:  See, again, how inaccurately you speak, Alcibiades!



ALCIBIADES:  In what respect?



SOCRATES:  In saying that I say so.



ALCIBIADES:  Why, did you not say that I know nothing of the just and

unjust?



SOCRATES:  No; I did not.



ALCIBIADES:  Did I, then?



SOCRATES:  Yes.



ALCIBIADES:  How was that?



SOCRATES:  Let me explain.  Suppose I were to ask you which is the greater

number, two or one; you would reply 'two'?



ALCIBIADES:  I should.



SOCRATES:  And by how much greater?



ALCIBIADES:  By one.



SOCRATES:  Which of us now says that two is more than one?



ALCIBIADES:  I do.



SOCRATES:  Did not I ask, and you answer the question?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Then who is speaking?  I who put the question, or you who answer

me?



ALCIBIADES:  I am.



SOCRATES:  Or suppose that I ask and you tell me the letters which make up

the name Socrates, which of us is the speaker?



ALCIBIADES:  I am.



SOCRATES:  Now let us put the case generally:  whenever there is a question

and answer, who is the speaker,--the questioner or the answerer?



ALCIBIADES:  I should say, Socrates, that the answerer was the speaker.



SOCRATES:  And have I not been the questioner all through?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And you the answerer?



ALCIBIADES:  Just so.



SOCRATES:  Which of us, then, was the speaker?



ALCIBIADES:  The inference is, Socrates, that I was the speaker.



SOCRATES:  Did not some one say that Alcibiades, the fair son of Cleinias,

not understanding about just and unjust, but thinking that he did

understand, was going to the assembly to advise the Athenians about what he

did not know?  Was not that said?



ALCIBIADES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  Then, Alcibiades, the result may be expressed in the language of

Euripides.  I think that you have heard all this 'from yourself, and not

from me'; nor did I say this, which you erroneously attribute to me, but

you yourself, and what you said was very true.  For indeed, my dear fellow,

the design which you meditate of teaching what you do not know, and have

not taken any pains to learn, is downright insanity.



ALCIBIADES:  But, Socrates, I think that the Athenians and the rest of the

Hellenes do not often advise as to the more just or unjust; for they see no

difficulty in them, and therefore they leave them, and consider which

course of action will be most expedient; for there is a difference between

justice and expediency.  Many persons have done great wrong and profited by

their injustice; others have done rightly and come to no good.



SOCRATES:  Well, but granting that the just and the expedient are ever so

much opposed, you surely do not imagine that you know what is expedient for

mankind, or why a thing is expedient?



ALCIBIADES:  Why not, Socrates?--But I am not going to be asked again from

whom I learned, or when I made the discovery.



SOCRATES:  What a way you have!  When you make a mistake which might be

refuted by a previous argument, you insist on having a new and different

refutation; the old argument is a worn-our garment which you will no longer

put on, but some one must produce another which is clean and new.  Now I

shall disregard this move of yours, and shall ask over again,--Where did

you learn and how do you know the nature of the expedient, and who is your

teacher?  All this I comprehend in a single question, and now you will

manifestly be in the old difficulty, and will not be able to show that you

know the expedient, either because you learned or because you discovered it

yourself.  But, as I perceive that you are dainty, and dislike the taste of

a stale argument, I will enquire no further into your knowledge of what is

expedient or what is not expedient for the Athenian people, and simply

request you to say why you do not explain whether justice and expediency

are the same or different?  And if you like you may examine me as I have

examined you, or, if you would rather, you may carry on the discussion by

yourself.



ALCIBIADES:  But I am not certain, Socrates, whether I shall be able to

discuss the matter with you.



SOCRATES:  Then imagine, my dear fellow, that I am the demus and the

ecclesia; for in the ecclesia, too, you will have to persuade men

individually.



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And is not the same person able to persuade one individual

singly and many individuals of the things which he knows?  The grammarian,

for example, can persuade one and he can persuade many about letters.



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  And about number, will not the same person persuade one and

persuade many?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And this will be he who knows number, or the arithmetician?



ALCIBIADES:  Quite true.



SOCRATES:  And cannot you persuade one man about that of which you can

persuade many?



ALCIBIADES:  I suppose so.



SOCRATES:  And that of which you can persuade either is clearly what you

know?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And the only difference between one who argues as we are doing,

and the orator who is addressing an assembly, is that the one seeks to

persuade a number, and the other an individual, of the same things.



ALCIBIADES:  I suppose so.



SOCRATES:  Well, then, since the same person who can persuade a multitude

can persuade individuals, try conclusions upon me, and prove to me that the

just is not always expedient.



ALCIBIADES:  You take liberties, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  I shall take the liberty of proving to you the opposite of that

which you will not prove to me.



ALCIBIADES:  Proceed.



SOCRATES:  Answer my questions--that is all.



ALCIBIADES:  Nay, I should like you to be the speaker.



SOCRATES:  What, do you not wish to be persuaded?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly I do.



SOCRATES:  And can you be persuaded better than out of your own mouth?



ALCIBIADES:  I think not.



SOCRATES:  Then you shall answer; and if you do not hear the words, that

the just is the expedient, coming from your own lips, never believe another

man again.



ALCIBIADES:  I won't; but answer I will, for I do not see how I can come to

any harm.



SOCRATES:  A true prophecy!  Let me begin then by enquiring of you whether

you allow that the just is sometimes expedient and sometimes not?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And sometimes honourable and sometimes not?



ALCIBIADES:  What do you mean?



SOCRATES:  I am asking if you ever knew any one who did what was

dishonourable and yet just?



ALCIBIADES:  Never.



SOCRATES:  All just things are honourable?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And are honourable things sometimes good and sometimes not good,

or are they always good?



ALCIBIADES:  I rather think, Socrates, that some honourable things are

evil.



SOCRATES:  And are some dishonourable things good?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  You mean in such a case as the following:--In time of war, men

have been wounded or have died in rescuing a companion or kinsman, when

others who have neglected the duty of rescuing them have escaped in safety?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  And to rescue another under such circumstances is honourable, in

respect of the attempt to save those whom we ought to save; and this is

courage?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  But evil in respect of death and wounds?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And the courage which is shown in the rescue is one thing, and

the death another?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  Then the rescue of one's friends is honourable in one point of

view, but evil in another?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  And if honourable, then also good:  Will you consider now

whether I may not be right, for you were acknowledging that the courage

which is shown in the rescue is honourable?  Now is this courage good or

evil?  Look at the matter thus:  which would you rather choose, good or

evil?



ALCIBIADES:  Good.



SOCRATES:  And the greatest goods you would be most ready to choose, and

would least like to be deprived of them?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  What would you say of courage?  At what price would you be

willing to be deprived of courage?



ALCIBIADES:  I would rather die than be a coward.



SOCRATES:  Then you think that cowardice is the worst of evils?



ALCIBIADES:  I do.



SOCRATES:  As bad as death, I suppose?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And life and courage are the extreme opposites of death and

cowardice?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And they are what you would most desire to have, and their

opposites you would least desire?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Is this because you think life and courage the best, and death

and cowardice the worst?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And you would term the rescue of a friend in battle honourable,

in as much as courage does a good work?



ALCIBIADES:  I should.



SOCRATES:  But evil because of the death which ensues?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Might we not describe their different effects as follows:--You

may call either of them evil in respect of the evil which is the result,

and good in respect of the good which is the result of either of them?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And they are honourable in so far as they are good, and

dishonourable in so far as they are evil?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  Then when you say that the rescue of a friend in battle is

honourable and yet evil, that is equivalent to saying that the rescue is

good and yet evil?



ALCIBIADES:  I believe that you are right, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  Nothing honourable, regarded as honourable, is evil; nor

anything base, regarded as base, good.



ALCIBIADES:  Clearly not.



SOCRATES:  Look at the matter yet once more in a further light:  he who

acts honourably acts well?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And he who acts well is happy?



ALCIBIADES:  Of course.



SOCRATES:  And the happy are those who obtain good?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  And they obtain good by acting well and honourably?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Then acting well is a good?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And happiness is a good?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Then the good and the honourable are again identified.



ALCIBIADES:  Manifestly.



SOCRATES:  Then, if the argument holds, what we find to be honourable we

shall also find to be good?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And is the good expedient or not?



ALCIBIADES:  Expedient.



SOCRATES:  Do you remember our admissions about the just?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes; if I am not mistaken, we said that those who acted justly

must also act honourably.



SOCRATES:  And the honourable is the good?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And the good is expedient?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Then, Alcibiades, the just is expedient?



ALCIBIADES:  I should infer so.



SOCRATES:  And all this I prove out of your own mouth, for I ask and you

answer?



ALCIBIADES:  I must acknowledge it to be true.



SOCRATES:  And having acknowledged that the just is the same as the

expedient, are you not (let me ask) prepared to ridicule any one who,

pretending to understand the principles of justice and injustice, gets up

to advise the noble Athenians or the ignoble Peparethians, that the just

may be the evil?



ALCIBIADES:  I solemnly declare, Socrates, that I do not know what I am

saying.  Verily, I am in a strange state, for when you put questions to me

I am of different minds in successive instants.



SOCRATES:  And are you not aware of the nature of this perplexity, my

friend?



ALCIBIADES:  Indeed I am not.



SOCRATES:  Do you suppose that if some one were to ask you whether you have

two eyes or three, or two hands or four, or anything of that sort, you

would then be of different minds in successive instants?



ALCIBIADES:  I begin to distrust myself, but still I do not suppose that I

should.



SOCRATES:  You would feel no doubt; and for this reason--because you would

know?



ALCIBIADES:  I suppose so.



SOCRATES:  And the reason why you involuntarily contradict yourself is

clearly that you are ignorant?



ALCIBIADES:  Very likely.



SOCRATES:  And if you are perplexed in answering about just and unjust,

honourable and dishonourable, good and evil, expedient and inexpedient, the

reason is that you are ignorant of them, and therefore in perplexity.  Is

not that clear?



ALCIBIADES:  I agree.



SOCRATES:  But is this always the case, and is a man necessarily perplexed

about that of which he has no knowledge?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly he is.



SOCRATES:  And do you know how to ascend into heaven?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  And in this case, too, is your judgment perplexed?



ALCIBIADES:  No.



SOCRATES:  Do you see the reason why, or shall I tell you?



ALCIBIADES:  Tell me.



SOCRATES:  The reason is, that you not only do not know, my friend, but you

do not think that you know.



ALCIBIADES:  There again; what do you mean?



SOCRATES:  Ask yourself; are you in any perplexity about things of which

you are ignorant?  You know, for example, that you know nothing about the

preparation of food.



ALCIBIADES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  And do you think and perplex yourself about the preparation of

food:  or do you leave that to some one who understands the art?



ALCIBIADES:  The latter.



SOCRATES:  Or if you were on a voyage, would you bewilder yourself by

considering whether the rudder is to be drawn inwards or outwards, or do

you leave that to the pilot, and do nothing?



ALCIBIADES:  It would be the concern of the pilot.



SOCRATES:  Then you are not perplexed about what you do not know, if you

know that you do not know it?



ALCIBIADES:  I imagine not.



SOCRATES:  Do you not see, then, that mistakes in life and practice are

likewise to be attributed to the ignorance which has conceit of knowledge?



ALCIBIADES:  Once more, what do you mean?



SOCRATES:  I suppose that we begin to act when we think that we know what

we are doing?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  But when people think that they do not know, they entrust their

business to others?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And so there is a class of ignorant persons who do not make

mistakes in life, because they trust others about things of which they are

ignorant?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  Who, then, are the persons who make mistakes?  They cannot, of

course, be those who know?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  But if neither those who know, nor those who know that they do

not know, make mistakes, there remain those only who do not know and think

that they know.



ALCIBIADES:  Yes, only those.



SOCRATES:  Then this is ignorance of the disgraceful sort which is

mischievous?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And most mischievous and most disgraceful when having to do with

the greatest matters?



ALCIBIADES:  By far.



SOCRATES:  And can there be any matters greater than the just, the

honourable, the good, and the expedient?



ALCIBIADES:  There cannot be.



SOCRATES:  And these, as you were saying, are what perplex you?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  But if you are perplexed, then, as the previous argument has

shown, you are not only ignorant of the greatest matters, but being

ignorant you fancy that you know them?



ALCIBIADES:  I fear that you are right.



SOCRATES:  And now see what has happened to you, Alcibiades!  I hardly like

to speak of your evil case, but as we are alone I will:  My good friend,

you are wedded to ignorance of the most disgraceful kind, and of this you

are convicted, not by me, but out of your own mouth and by your own

argument; wherefore also you rush into politics before you are educated. 

Neither is your case to be deemed singular.  For I might say the same of

almost all our statesmen, with the exception, perhaps of your guardian,

Pericles.



ALCIBIADES:  Yes, Socrates; and Pericles is said not to have got his wisdom

by the light of nature, but to have associated with several of the

philosophers; with Pythocleides, for example, and with Anaxagoras, and now

in advanced life with Damon, in the hope of gaining wisdom.



SOCRATES:  Very good; but did you ever know a man wise in anything who was

unable to impart his particular wisdom?  For example, he who taught you

letters was not only wise, but he made you and any others whom he liked

wise.



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And you, whom he taught, can do the same?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  And in like manner the harper and gymnastic-master?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  When a person is enabled to impart knowledge to another, he

thereby gives an excellent proof of his own understanding of any matter.



ALCIBIADES:  I agree.



SOCRATES:  Well, and did Pericles make any one wise; did he begin by making

his sons wise?



ALCIBIADES:  But, Socrates, if the two sons of Pericles were simpletons,

what has that to do with the matter?



SOCRATES:  Well, but did he make your brother, Cleinias, wise?



ALCIBIADES:  Cleinias is a madman; there is no use in talking of him.



SOCRATES:  But if Cleinias is a madman and the two sons of Pericles were

simpletons, what reason can be given why he neglects you, and lets you be

as you are?



ALCIBIADES:  I believe that I am to blame for not listening to him.



SOCRATES:  But did you ever hear of any other Athenian or foreigner, bond

or free, who was deemed to have grown wiser in the society of Pericles,--as

I might cite Pythodorus, the son of Isolochus, and Callias, the son of

Calliades, who have grown wiser in the society of Zeno, for which privilege

they have each of them paid him the sum of a hundred minae (about 406

pounds sterling) to the increase of their wisdom and fame.



ALCIBIADES:  I certainly never did hear of any one.



SOCRATES:  Well, and in reference to your own case, do you mean to remain

as you are, or will you take some pains about yourself?



ALCIBIADES:  With your aid, Socrates, I will.  And indeed, when I hear you

speak, the truth of what you are saying strikes home to me, and I agree

with you, for our statesmen, all but a few, do appear to be quite

uneducated.



SOCRATES:  What is the inference?



ALCIBIADES:  Why, that if they were educated they would be trained

athletes, and he who means to rival them ought to have knowledge and


experience when he attacks them; but now, as they have become politicians

without any special training, why should I have the trouble of learning and

practising?  For I know well that by the light of nature I shall get the

better of them.



SOCRATES:  My dear friend, what a sentiment!  And how unworthy of your

noble form and your high estate!



ALCIBIADES:  What do you mean, Socrates; why do you say so?



SOCRATES:  I am grieved when I think of our mutual love.



ALCIBIADES:  At what?



SOCRATES:  At your fancying that the contest on which you are entering is

with people here.



ALCIBIADES:  Why, what others are there?



SOCRATES:  Is that a question which a magnanimous soul should ask?



ALCIBIADES:  Do you mean to say that the contest is not with these?



SOCRATES:  And suppose that you were going to steer a ship into action,

would you only aim at being the best pilot on board?  Would you not, while

acknowledging that you must possess this degree of excellence, rather look

to your antagonists, and not, as you are now doing, to your fellow

combatants?  You ought to be so far above these latter, that they will not

even dare to be your rivals; and, being regarded by you as inferiors, will

do battle for you against the enemy; this is the kind of superiority which

you must establish over them, if you mean to accomplish any noble action

really worthy of yourself and of the state.



ALCIBIADES:  That would certainly be my aim.



SOCRATES:  Verily, then, you have good reason to be satisfied, if you are

better than the soldiers; and you need not, when you are their superior and

have your thoughts and actions fixed upon them, look away to the generals

of the enemy.



ALCIBIADES:  Of whom are you speaking, Socrates?



SOCRATES:  Why, you surely know that our city goes to war now and then with

the Lacedaemonians and with the great king?



ALCIBIADES:  True enough.



SOCRATES:  And if you meant to be the ruler of this city, would you not be

right in considering that the Lacedaemonian and Persian king were your true

rivals?



ALCIBIADES:  I believe that you are right.



SOCRATES:  Oh no, my friend, I am quite wrong, and I think that you ought

rather to turn your attention to Midias the quail-breeder and others like

him, who manage our politics; in whom, as the women would remark, you may

still see the slaves' cut of hair, cropping out in their minds as well as

on their pates; and they come with their barbarous lingo to flatter us and

not to rule us.  To these, I say, you should look, and then you need not

trouble yourself about your own fitness to contend in such a noble arena: 

there is no reason why you should either learn what has to be learned, or

practise what has to be practised, and only when thoroughly prepared enter

on a political career.



ALCIBIADES:  There, I think, Socrates, that you are right; I do not

suppose, however, that the Spartan generals or the great king are really

different from anybody else.



SOCRATES:  But, my dear friend, do consider what you are saying.



ALCIBIADES:  What am I to consider?



SOCRATES:  In the first place, will you be more likely to take care of

yourself, if you are in a wholesome fear and dread of them, or if you are

not?



ALCIBIADES:  Clearly, if I have such a fear of them.



SOCRATES:  And do you think that you will sustain any injury if you take

care of yourself?



ALCIBIADES:  No, I shall be greatly benefited.



SOCRATES:  And this is one very important respect in which that notion of

yours is bad.



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  In the next place, consider that what you say is probably false.



ALCIBIADES:  How so?



SOCRATES:  Let me ask you whether better natures are likely to be found in

noble races or not in noble races?



ALCIBIADES:  Clearly in noble races.



SOCRATES:  Are not those who are well born and well bred most likely to be

perfect in virtue?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  Then let us compare our antecedents with those of the

Lacedaemonian and Persian kings; are they inferior to us in descent?  Have

we not heard that the former are sprung from Heracles, and the latter from

Achaemenes, and that the race of Heracles and the race of Achaemenes go

back to Perseus, son of Zeus?



ALCIBIADES:  Why, so does mine go back to Eurysaces, and he to Zeus!



SOCRATES:  And mine, noble Alcibiades, to Daedalus, and he to Hephaestus,

son of Zeus.  But, for all that, we are far inferior to them.  For they are

descended 'from Zeus,' through a line of kings--either kings of Argos and

Lacedaemon, or kings of Persia, a country which the descendants of

Achaemenes have always possessed, besides being at various times sovereigns

of Asia, as they now are; whereas, we and our fathers were but private

persons.  How ridiculous would you be thought if you were to make a display

of your ancestors and of Salamis the island of Eurysaces, or of Aegina, the

habitation of the still more ancient Aeacus, before Artaxerxes, son of

Xerxes.  You should consider how inferior we are to them both in the

derivation of our birth and in other particulars.  Did you never observe

how great is the property of the Spartan kings?  And their wives are under

the guardianship of the Ephori, who are public officers and watch over

them, in order to preserve as far as possible the purity of the Heracleid

blood.  Still greater is the difference among the Persians; for no one

entertains a suspicion that the father of a prince of Persia can be any one

but the king.  Such is the awe which invests the person of the queen, that

any other guard is needless.  And when the heir of the kingdom is born, all

the subjects of the king feast; and the day of his birth is for ever

afterwards kept as a holiday and time of sacrifice by all Asia; whereas,

when you and I were born, Alcibiades, as the comic poet says, the

neighbours hardly knew of the important event.  After the birth of the

royal child, he is tended, not by a good-for-nothing woman-nurse, but by

the best of the royal eunuchs, who are charged with the care of him, and

especially with the fashioning and right formation of his limbs, in order

that he may be as shapely as possible; which being their calling, they are

held in great honour.  And when the young prince is seven years old he is

put upon a horse and taken to the riding-masters, and begins to go out

hunting.  And at fourteen years of age he is handed over to the royal

schoolmasters, as they are termed:  these are four chosen men, reputed to

be the best among the Persians of a certain age; and one of them is the

wisest, another the justest, a third the most temperate, and a fourth the

most valiant.  The first instructs him in the magianism of Zoroaster, the

son of Oromasus, which is the worship of the Gods, and teaches him also the

duties of his royal office; the second, who is the justest, teaches him

always to speak the truth; the third, or most temperate, forbids him to

allow any pleasure to be lord over him, that he may be accustomed to be a

freeman and king indeed,--lord of himself first, and not a slave; the most

valiant trains him to be bold and fearless, telling him that if he fears he

is to deem himself a slave; whereas Pericles gave you, Alcibiades, for a

tutor Zopyrus the Thracian, a slave of his who was past all other work.  I

might enlarge on the nurture and education of your rivals, but that would

be tedious; and what I have said is a sufficient sample of what remains to

be said.  I have only to remark, by way of contrast, that no one cares

about your birth or nurture or education, or, I may say, about that of any

other Athenian, unless he has a lover who looks after him.  And if you cast

an eye on the wealth, the luxury, the garments with their flowing trains,

the anointings with myrrh, the multitudes of attendants, and all the other

bravery of the Persians, you will be ashamed when you discern your own

inferiority; or if you look at the temperance and orderliness and ease and

grace and magnanimity and courage and endurance and love of toil and desire

of glory and ambition of the Lacedaemonians--in all these respects you will

see that you are but a child in comparison of them.  Even in the matter of

wealth, if you value yourself upon that, I must reveal to you how you

stand; for if you form an estimate of the wealth of the Lacedaemonians, you

will see that our possessions fall far short of theirs.  For no one here

can compete with them either in the extent and fertility of their own and

the Messenian territory, or in the number of their slaves, and especially

of the Helots, or of their horses, or of the animals which feed on the

Messenian pastures.  But I have said enough of this:  and as to gold and

silver, there is more of them in Lacedaemon than in all the rest of Hellas,

for during many generations gold has been always flowing in to them from

the whole Hellenic world, and often from the barbarian also, and never

going out, as in the fable of Aesop the fox said to the lion, 'The prints

of the feet of those going in are distinct enough;' but who ever saw the

trace of money going out of Lacedaemon?  And therefore you may safely infer

that the inhabitants are the richest of the Hellenes in gold and silver,

and that their kings are the richest of them, for they have a larger share

of these things, and they have also a tribute paid to them which is very

considerable.  Yet the Spartan wealth, though great in comparison of the

wealth of the other Hellenes, is as nothing in comparison of that of the

Persians and their kings.  Why, I have been informed by a credible person

who went up to the king (at Susa), that he passed through a large tract of

excellent land, extending for nearly a day's journey, which the people of

the country called the queen's girdle, and another, which they called her

veil; and several other fair and fertile districts, which were reserved for

the adornment of the queen, and are named after her several habiliments. 

Now, I cannot help thinking to myself, What if some one were to go to

Amestris, the wife of Xerxes and mother of Artaxerxes, and say to her,

There is a certain Dinomache, whose whole wardrobe is not worth fifty

minae--and that will be more than the value--and she has a son who is

possessed of a three-hundred acre patch at Erchiae, and he has a mind to go

to war with your son--would she not wonder to what this Alcibiades trusts

for success in the conflict?  'He must rely,' she would say to herself,

'upon his training and wisdom--these are the things which Hellenes value.' 

And if she heard that this Alcibiades who is making the attempt is not as

yet twenty years old, and is wholly uneducated, and when his lover tells

him that he ought to get education and training first, and then go and

fight the king, he refuses, and says that he is well enough as he is, would

she not be amazed, and ask 'On what, then, does the youth rely?'  And if we

replied:  He relies on his beauty, and stature, and birth, and mental

endowments, she would think that we were mad, Alcibiades, when she compared

the advantages which you possess with those of her own people.  And I

believe that even Lampido, the daughter of Leotychides, the wife of

Archidamus and mother of Agis, all of whom were kings, would have the same

feeling; if, in your present uneducated state, you were to turn your

thoughts against her son, she too would be equally astonished.  But how

disgraceful, that we should not have as high a notion of what is required

in us as our enemies' wives and mothers have of the qualities which are

required in their assailants!  O my friend, be persuaded by me, and hear

the Delphian inscription, 'Know thyself'--not the men whom you think, but

these kings are our rivals, and we can only overcome them by pains and

skill.  And if you fail in the required qualities, you will fail also in

becoming renowned among Hellenes and Barbarians, which you seem to desire

more than any other man ever desired anything.



ALCIBIADES:  I entirely believe you; but what are the sort of pains which

are required, Socrates,--can you tell me?



SOCRATES:  Yes, I can; but we must take counsel together concerning the

manner in which both of us may be most improved.  For what I am telling you

of the necessity of education applies to myself as well as to you; and

there is only one point in which I have an advantage over you.



ALCIBIADES:  What is that?



SOCRATES:  I have a guardian who is better and wiser than your guardian,

Pericles.



ALCIBIADES:  Who is he, Socrates?



SOCRATES:  God, Alcibiades, who up to this day has not allowed me to

converse with you; and he inspires in me the faith that I am especially

designed to bring you to honour.



ALCIBIADES:  You are jesting, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  Perhaps, at any rate, I am right in saying that all men greatly

need pains and care, and you and I above all men.



ALCIBIADES:  You are not far wrong about me.



SOCRATES:  And certainly not about myself.



ALCIBIADES:  But what can we do?



SOCRATES:  There must be no hesitation or cowardice, my friend.



ALCIBIADES:  That would not become us, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  No, indeed, and we ought to take counsel together:  for do we

not wish to be as good as possible?



ALCIBIADES:  We do.



SOCRATES:  In what sort of virtue?



ALCIBIADES:  Plainly, in the virtue of good men.



SOCRATES:  Who are good in what?



ALCIBIADES:  Those, clearly, who are good in the management of affairs.



SOCRATES:  What sort of affairs?  Equestrian affairs?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  You mean that about them we should have recourse to horsemen?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Well, naval affairs?



ALCIBIADES:  No.



SOCRATES:  You mean that we should have recourse to sailors about them?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Then what affairs?  And who do them?



ALCIBIADES:  The affairs which occupy Athenian gentlemen.



SOCRATES:  And when you speak of gentlemen, do you mean the wise or the

unwise?



ALCIBIADES:  The wise.



SOCRATES:  And a man is good in respect of that in which he is wise?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And evil in respect of that in which he is unwise?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  The shoemaker, for example, is wise in respect of the making of

shoes?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Then he is good in that?



ALCIBIADES:  He is.



SOCRATES:  But in respect of the making of garments he is unwise?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Then in that he is bad?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Then upon this view of the matter the same man is good and also

bad?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  But would you say that the good are the same as the bad?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  Then whom do you call the good?



ALCIBIADES:  I mean by the good those who are able to rule in the city.



SOCRATES:  Not, surely, over horses?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  But over men?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  When they are sick?



ALCIBIADES:  No.



SOCRATES:  Or on a voyage?



ALCIBIADES:  No.



SOCRATES:  Or reaping the harvest?



ALCIBIADES:  No.



SOCRATES:  When they are doing something or nothing?



ALCIBIADES:  When they are doing something, I should say.



SOCRATES:  I wish that you would explain to me what this something is.



ALCIBIADES:  When they are having dealings with one another, and using one

another's services, as we citizens do in our daily life.



SOCRATES:  Those of whom you speak are ruling over men who are using the

services of other men?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Are they ruling over the signal-men who give the time to the

rowers?



ALCIBIADES:  No; they are not.



SOCRATES:  That would be the office of the pilot?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  But, perhaps you mean that they rule over flute-players, who

lead the singers and use the services of the dancers?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  That would be the business of the teacher of the chorus?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Then what is the meaning of being able to rule over men who use

other men?



ALCIBIADES:  I mean that they rule over men who have common rights of

citizenship, and dealings with one another.



SOCRATES:  And what sort of an art is this?  Suppose that I ask you again,

as I did just now, What art makes men know how to rule over their fellow-

sailors,--how would you answer?



ALCIBIADES:  The art of the pilot.



SOCRATES:  And, if I may recur to another old instance, what art enables

them to rule over their fellow-singers?



ALCIBIADES:  The art of the teacher of the chorus, which you were just now

mentioning.



SOCRATES:  And what do you call the art of fellow-citizens?



ALCIBIADES:  I should say, good counsel, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  And is the art of the pilot evil counsel?



ALCIBIADES:  No.



SOCRATES:  But good counsel?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes, that is what I should say,--good counsel, of which the

aim is the preservation of the voyagers.



SOCRATES:  True.  And what is the aim of that other good counsel of which

you speak?



ALCIBIADES:  The aim is the better order and preservation of the city.



SOCRATES:  And what is that of which the absence or presence improves and

preserves the order of the city?  Suppose you were to ask me, what is that

of which the presence or absence improves or preserves the order of the

body?  I should reply, the presence of health and the absence of disease. 

You would say the same?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And if you were to ask me the same question about the eyes, I

should reply in the same way, 'the presence of sight and the absence of

blindness;' or about the ears, I should reply, that they were improved and

were in better case, when deafness was absent, and hearing was present in

them.



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  And what would you say of a state?  What is that by the presence

or absence of which the state is improved and better managed and ordered?



ALCIBIADES:  I should say, Socrates:--the presence of friendship and the

absence of hatred and division.



SOCRATES:  And do you mean by friendship agreement or disagreement?



ALCIBIADES:  Agreement.



SOCRATES:  What art makes cities agree about numbers?



ALCIBIADES:  Arithmetic.



SOCRATES:  And private individuals?



ALCIBIADES:  The same.



SOCRATES:  And what art makes each individual agree with himself?



ALCIBIADES:  The same.



SOCRATES:  And what art makes each of us agree with himself about the

comparative length of the span and of the cubit?  Does not the art of

measure?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Individuals are agreed with one another about this; and states,

equally?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And the same holds of the balance?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  But what is the other agreement of which you speak, and about

what? what art can give that agreement?  And does that which gives it to

the state give it also to the individual, so as to make him consistent with

himself and with another?



ALCIBIADES:  I should suppose so.



SOCRATES:  But what is the nature of the agreement?--answer, and faint not.



ALCIBIADES:  I mean to say that there should be such friendship and

agreement as exists between an affectionate father and mother and their

son, or between brothers, or between husband and wife.



SOCRATES:  But can a man, Alcibiades, agree with a woman about the spinning

of wool, which she understands and he does not?



ALCIBIADES:  No, truly.



SOCRATES:  Nor has he any need, for spinning is a female accomplishment.



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And would a woman agree with a man about the science of arms,

which she has never learned?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  I suppose that the use of arms would be regarded by you as a

male accomplishment?



ALCIBIADES:  It would.



SOCRATES:  Then, upon your view, women and men have two sorts of knowledge?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  Then in their knowledge there is no agreement of women and men?



ALCIBIADES:  There is not.



SOCRATES:  Nor can there be friendship, if friendship is agreement?



ALCIBIADES:  Plainly not.



SOCRATES:  Then women are not loved by men when they do their own work?



ALCIBIADES:  I suppose not.



SOCRATES:  Nor men by women when they do their own work?



ALCIBIADES:  No.



SOCRATES:  Nor are states well administered, when individuals do their own

work?



ALCIBIADES:  I should rather think, Socrates, that the reverse is the

truth.  (Compare Republic.)



SOCRATES:  What! do you mean to say that states are well administered when

friendship is absent, the presence of which, as we were saying, alone

secures their good order?



ALCIBIADES:  But I should say that there is friendship among them, for this

very reason, that the two parties respectively do their own work.



SOCRATES:  That was not what you were saying before; and what do you mean

now by affirming that friendship exists when there is no agreement?  How

can there be agreement about matters which the one party knows, and of

which the other is in ignorance?



ALCIBIADES:  Impossible.




SOCRATES:  And when individuals are doing their own work, are they doing

what is just or unjust?



ALCIBIADES:  What is just, certainly.



SOCRATES:  And when individuals do what is just in the state, is there no

friendship among them?



ALCIBIADES:  I suppose that there must be, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  Then what do you mean by this friendship or agreement about

which we must be wise and discreet in order that we may be good men?  I

cannot make out where it exists or among whom; according to you, the same

persons may sometimes have it, and sometimes not.



ALCIBIADES:  But, indeed, Socrates, I do not know what I am saying; and I

have long been, unconsciously to myself, in a most disgraceful state.



SOCRATES:  Nevertheless, cheer up; at fifty, if you had discovered your

deficiency, you would have been too old, and the time for taking care of

yourself would have passed away, but yours is just the age at which the

discovery should be made.



ALCIBIADES:  And what should he do, Socrates, who would make the discovery?



SOCRATES:  Answer questions, Alcibiades; and that is a process which, by

the grace of God, if I may put any faith in my oracle, will be very

improving to both of us.



ALCIBIADES:  If I can be improved by answering, I will answer.



SOCRATES:  And first of all, that we may not peradventure be deceived by

appearances, fancying, perhaps, that we are taking care of ourselves when

we are not, what is the meaning of a man taking care of himself? and when

does he take care?  Does he take care of himself when he takes care of what

belongs to him?



ALCIBIADES:  I should think so.



SOCRATES:  When does a man take care of his feet?  Does he not take care of

them when he takes care of that which belongs to his feet?



ALCIBIADES:  I do not understand.



SOCRATES:  Let me take the hand as an illustration; does not a ring belong

to the finger, and to the finger only?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And the shoe in like manner to the foot?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And when we take care of our shoes, do we not take care of our

feet?



ALCIBIADES:  I do not comprehend, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  But you would admit, Alcibiades, that to take proper care of a

thing is a correct expression?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And taking proper care means improving?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And what is the art which improves our shoes?



ALCIBIADES:  Shoemaking.



SOCRATES:  Then by shoemaking we take care of our shoes?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And do we by shoemaking take care of our feet, or by some other

art which improves the feet?



ALCIBIADES:  By some other art.



SOCRATES:  And the same art improves the feet which improves the rest of

the body?



ALCIBIADES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  Which is gymnastic?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  Then by gymnastic we take care of our feet, and by shoemaking of

that which belongs to our feet?



ALCIBIADES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  And by gymnastic we take care of our hands, and by the art of

graving rings of that which belongs to our hands?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And by gymnastic we take care of the body, and by the art of

weaving and the other arts we take care of the things of the body?



ALCIBIADES:  Clearly.



SOCRATES:  Then the art which takes care of each thing is different from

that which takes care of the belongings of each thing?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  Then in taking care of what belongs to you, you do not take care

of yourself?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  For the art which takes care of our belongings appears not to be

the same as that which takes care of ourselves?



ALCIBIADES:  Clearly not.



SOCRATES:  And now let me ask you what is the art with which we take care

of ourselves?



ALCIBIADES:  I cannot say.



SOCRATES:  At any rate, thus much has been admitted, that the art is not

one which makes any of our possessions, but which makes ourselves better?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  But should we ever have known what art makes a shoe better, if

we did not know a shoe?



ALCIBIADES:  Impossible.



SOCRATES:  Nor should we know what art makes a ring better, if we did not

know a ring?



ALCIBIADES:  That is true.



SOCRATES:  And can we ever know what art makes a man better, if we do not

know what we are ourselves?



ALCIBIADES:  Impossible.



SOCRATES:  And is self-knowledge such an easy thing, and was he to be

lightly esteemed who inscribed the text on the temple at Delphi?  Or is

self-knowledge a difficult thing, which few are able to attain?



ALCIBIADES:  At times I fancy, Socrates, that anybody can know himself; at

other times the task appears to be very difficult.



SOCRATES:  But whether easy or difficult, Alcibiades, still there is no

other way; knowing what we are, we shall know how to take care of

ourselves, and if we are ignorant we shall not know.



ALCIBIADES:  That is true.



SOCRATES:  Well, then, let us see in what way the self-existent can be

discovered by us; that will give us a chance of discovering our own

existence, which otherwise we can never know.



ALCIBIADES:  You say truly.



SOCRATES:  Come, now, I beseech you, tell me with whom you are conversing?

--with whom but with me?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  As I am, with you?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  That is to say, I, Socrates, am talking?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And Alcibiades is my hearer?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And I in talking use words?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And talking and using words have, I suppose, the same meaning?



ALCIBIADES:  To be sure.



SOCRATES:  And the user is not the same as the thing which he uses?



ALCIBIADES:  What do you mean?



SOCRATES:  I will explain; the shoemaker, for example, uses a square tool,

and a circular tool, and other tools for cutting?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  But the tool is not the same as the cutter and user of the tool?



ALCIBIADES:  Of course not.



SOCRATES:  And in the same way the instrument of the harper is to be

distinguished from the harper himself?



ALCIBIADES:  It is.



SOCRATES:  Now the question which I asked was whether you conceive the user

to be always different from that which he uses?



ALCIBIADES:  I do.



SOCRATES:  Then what shall we say of the shoemaker?  Does he cut with his

tools only or with his hands?



ALCIBIADES:  With his hands as well.



SOCRATES:  He uses his hands too?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And does he use his eyes in cutting leather?



ALCIBIADES:  He does.



SOCRATES:  And we admit that the user is not the same with the things which

he uses?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Then the shoemaker and the harper are to be distinguished from

the hands and feet which they use?



ALCIBIADES:  Clearly.



SOCRATES:  And does not a man use the whole body?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And that which uses is different from that which is used?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  Then a man is not the same as his own body?



ALCIBIADES:  That is the inference.



SOCRATES:  What is he, then?



ALCIBIADES:  I cannot say.



SOCRATES:  Nay, you can say that he is the user of the body.



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And the user of the body is the soul?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes, the soul.



SOCRATES:  And the soul rules?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Let me make an assertion which will, I think, be universally

admitted.



ALCIBIADES:  What is it?



SOCRATES:  That man is one of three things.



ALCIBIADES:  What are they?



SOCRATES:  Soul, body, or both together forming a whole.



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  But did we not say that the actual ruling principle of the body

is man?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes, we did.



SOCRATES:  And does the body rule over itself?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  It is subject, as we were saying?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Then that is not the principle which we are seeking?



ALCIBIADES:  It would seem not.



SOCRATES:  But may we say that the union of the two rules over the body,

and consequently that this is man?



ALCIBIADES:  Very likely.



SOCRATES:  The most unlikely of all things; for if one of the members is

subject, the two united cannot possibly rule.



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  But since neither the body, nor the union of the two, is man,

either man has no real existence, or the soul is man?



ALCIBIADES:  Just so.



SOCRATES:  Is anything more required to prove that the soul is man?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not; the proof is, I think, quite sufficient.



SOCRATES:  And if the proof, although not perfect, be sufficient, we shall

be satisfied;--more precise proof will be supplied when we have discovered

that which we were led to omit, from a fear that the enquiry would be too

much protracted.



ALCIBIADES:  What was that?



SOCRATES:  What I meant, when I said that absolute existence must be first

considered; but now, instead of absolute existence, we have been

considering the nature of individual existence, and this may, perhaps, be

sufficient; for surely there is nothing which may be called more properly

ourselves than the soul?



ALCIBIADES:  There is nothing.



SOCRATES:  Then we may truly conceive that you and I are conversing with

one another, soul to soul?



ALCIBIADES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  And that is just what I was saying before--that I, Socrates, am

not arguing or talking with the face of Alcibiades, but with the real

Alcibiades; or in other words, with his soul.



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  Then he who bids a man know himself, would have him know his

soul?



ALCIBIADES:  That appears to be true.



SOCRATES:  He whose knowledge only extends to the body, knows the things of

a man, and not the man himself?



ALCIBIADES:  That is true.



SOCRATES:  Then neither the physician regarded as a physician, nor the

trainer regarded as a trainer, knows himself?



ALCIBIADES:  He does not.



SOCRATES:  The husbandmen and the other craftsmen are very far from knowing

themselves, for they would seem not even to know their own belongings? 

When regarded in relation to the arts which they practise they are even

further removed from self-knowledge, for they only know the belongings of

the body, which minister to the body.



ALCIBIADES:  That is true.



SOCRATES:  Then if temperance is the knowledge of self, in respect of his

art none of them is temperate?



ALCIBIADES:  I agree.



SOCRATES:  And this is the reason why their arts are accounted vulgar, and

are not such as a good man would practise?



ALCIBIADES:  Quite true.



SOCRATES:  Again, he who cherishes his body cherishes not himself, but what

belongs to him?



ALCIBIADES:  That is true.



SOCRATES:  But he who cherishes his money, cherishes neither himself nor

his belongings, but is in a stage yet further removed from himself?



ALCIBIADES:  I agree.



SOCRATES:  Then the money-maker has really ceased to be occupied with his

own concerns?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  And if any one has fallen in love with the person of Alcibiades,

he loves not Alcibiades, but the belongings of Alcibiades?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  But he who loves your soul is the true lover?



ALCIBIADES:  That is the necessary inference.



SOCRATES:  The lover of the body goes away when the flower of youth fades?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  But he who loves the soul goes not away, as long as the soul

follows after virtue?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And I am the lover who goes not away, but remains with you, when

you are no longer young and the rest are gone?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes, Socrates; and therein you do well, and I hope that you

will remain.



SOCRATES:  Then you must try to look your best.



ALCIBIADES:  I will.



SOCRATES:  The fact is, that there is only one lover of Alcibiades the son

of Cleinias; there neither is nor ever has been seemingly any other; and he

is his darling,--Socrates, the son of Sophroniscus and Phaenarete.



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  And did you not say, that if I had not spoken first, you were on

the point of coming to me, and enquiring why I only remained?



ALCIBIADES:  That is true.



SOCRATES:  The reason was that I loved you for your own sake, whereas other

men love what belongs to you; and your beauty, which is not you, is fading

away, just as your true self is beginning to bloom.  And I will never

desert you, if you are not spoiled and deformed by the Athenian people; for

the danger which I most fear is that you will become a lover of the people

and will be spoiled by them.  Many a noble Athenian has been ruined in this

way.  For the demus of the great-hearted Erechteus is of a fair

countenance, but you should see him naked; wherefore observe the caution

which I give you.



ALCIBIADES:  What caution?



SOCRATES:  Practise yourself, sweet friend, in learning what you ought to

know, before you enter on politics; and then you will have an antidote

which will keep you out of harm's way.



ALCIBIADES:  Good advice, Socrates, but I wish that you would explain to me

in what way I am to take care of myself.



SOCRATES:  Have we not made an advance? for we are at any rate tolerably

well agreed as to what we are, and there is no longer any danger, as we

once feared, that we might be taking care not of ourselves, but of

something which is not ourselves.



ALCIBIADES:  That is true.



SOCRATES:  And the next step will be to take care of the soul, and look to

that?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  Leaving the care of our bodies and of our properties to others?



ALCIBIADES:  Very good.



SOCRATES:  But how can we have a perfect knowledge of the things of the

soul?--For if we know them, then I suppose we shall know ourselves.  Can we

really be ignorant of the excellent meaning of the Delphian inscription, of

which we were just now speaking?



ALCIBIADES:  What have you in your thoughts, Socrates?



SOCRATES:  I will tell you what I suspect to be the meaning and lesson of

that inscription.  Let me take an illustration from sight, which I imagine

to be the only one suitable to my purpose.



ALCIBIADES:  What do you mean?



SOCRATES:  Consider; if some one were to say to the eye, 'See thyself,' as

you might say to a man, 'Know thyself,' what is the nature and meaning of

this precept?  Would not his meaning be:--That the eye should look at that

in which it would see itself?



ALCIBIADES:  Clearly.



SOCRATES:  And what are the objects in looking at which we see ourselves?



ALCIBIADES:  Clearly, Socrates, in looking at mirrors and the like.



SOCRATES:  Very true; and is there not something of the nature of a mirror

in our own eyes?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  Did you ever observe that the face of the person looking into

the eye of another is reflected as in a mirror; and in the visual organ

which is over against him, and which is called the pupil, there is a sort

of image of the person looking?



ALCIBIADES:  That is quite true.



SOCRATES:  Then the eye, looking at another eye, and at that in the eye

which is most perfect, and which is the instrument of vision, will there

see itself?



ALCIBIADES:  That is evident.



SOCRATES:  But looking at anything else either in man or in the world, and

not to what resembles this, it will not see itself?



ALCIBIADES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  Then if the eye is to see itself, it must look at the eye, and

at that part of the eye where sight which is the virtue of the eye resides?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  And if the soul, my dear Alcibiades, is ever to know herself,

must she not look at the soul; and especially at that part of the soul in

which her virtue resides, and to any other which is like this?



ALCIBIADES:  I agree, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  And do we know of any part of our souls more divine than that

which has to do with wisdom and knowledge?



ALCIBIADES:  There is none.



SOCRATES:  Then this is that part of the soul which resembles the divine;

and he who looks at this and at the whole class of things divine, will be

most likely to know himself?



ALCIBIADES:  Clearly.



SOCRATES:  And self-knowledge we agree to be wisdom?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  But if we have no self-knowledge and no wisdom, can we ever know

our own good and evil?



ALCIBIADES:  How can we, Socrates?



SOCRATES:  You mean, that if you did not know Alcibiades, there would be no

possibility of your knowing that what belonged to Alcibiades was really

his?



ALCIBIADES:  It would be quite impossible.



SOCRATES:  Nor should we know that we were the persons to whom anything

belonged, if we did not know ourselves?



ALCIBIADES:  How could we?



SOCRATES:  And if we did not know our own belongings, neither should we

know the belongings of our belongings?



ALCIBIADES:  Clearly not.



SOCRATES:  Then we were not altogether right in acknowledging just now that

a man may know what belongs to him and yet not know himself; nay, rather he

cannot even know the belongings of his belongings; for the discernment of

the things of self, and of the things which belong to the things of self,

appear all to be the business of the same man, and of the same art.



ALCIBIADES:  So much may be supposed.



SOCRATES:  And he who knows not the things which belong to himself, will in

like manner be ignorant of the things which belong to others?



ALCIBIADES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  And if he knows not the affairs of others, he will not know the

affairs of states?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  Then such a man can never be a statesman?



ALCIBIADES:  He cannot.



SOCRATES:  Nor an economist?



ALCIBIADES:  He cannot.



SOCRATES:  He will not know what he is doing?



ALCIBIADES:  He will not.



SOCRATES:  And will not he who is ignorant fall into error?



ALCIBIADES:  Assuredly.



SOCRATES:  And if he falls into error will he not fail both in his public

and private capacity?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes, indeed.



SOCRATES:  And failing, will he not be miserable?



ALCIBIADES:  Very.



SOCRATES:  And what will become of those for whom he is acting?



ALCIBIADES:  They will be miserable also.



SOCRATES:  Then he who is not wise and good cannot be happy?



ALCIBIADES:  He cannot.



SOCRATES:  The bad, then, are miserable?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes, very.



SOCRATES:  And if so, not he who has riches, but he who has wisdom, is

delivered from his misery?



ALCIBIADES:  Clearly.



SOCRATES:  Cities, then, if they are to be happy, do not want walls, or

triremes, or docks, or numbers, or size, Alcibiades, without virtue? 

(Compare Arist. Pol.)



ALCIBIADES:  Indeed they do not.



SOCRATES:  And you must give the citizens virtue, if you mean to administer

their affairs rightly or nobly?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  But can a man give that which he has not?



ALCIBIADES:  Impossible.



SOCRATES:  Then you or any one who means to govern and superintend, not

only himself and the things of himself, but the state and the things of the

state, must in the first place acquire virtue.



ALCIBIADES:  That is true.



SOCRATES:  You have not therefore to obtain power or authority, in order to

enable you to do what you wish for yourself and the state, but justice and

wisdom.



ALCIBIADES:  Clearly.



SOCRATES:  You and the state, if you act wisely and justly, will act

according to the will of God?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  As I was saying before, you will look only at what is bright and

divine, and act with a view to them?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  In that mirror you will see and know yourselves and your own

good?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And so you will act rightly and well?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  In which case, I will be security for your happiness.



ALCIBIADES:  I accept the security.



SOCRATES:  But if you act unrighteously, your eye will turn to the dark and

godless, and being in darkness and ignorance of yourselves, you will

probably do deeds of darkness.



ALCIBIADES:  Very possibly.



SOCRATES:  For if a man, my dear Alcibiades, has the power to do what he

likes, but has no understanding, what is likely to be the result, either to

him as an individual or to the state--for example, if he be sick and is

able to do what he likes, not having the mind of a physician--having

moreover tyrannical power, and no one daring to reprove him, what will

happen to him?  Will he not be likely to have his constitution ruined?



ALCIBIADES:  That is true.



SOCRATES:  Or again, in a ship, if a man having the power to do what he

likes, has no intelligence or skill in navigation, do you see what will

happen to him and to his fellow-sailors?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes; I see that they will all perish.



SOCRATES:  And in like manner, in a state, and where there is any power and

authority which is wanting in virtue, will not misfortune, in like manner,

ensue?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  Not tyrannical power, then, my good Alcibiades, should be the

aim either of individuals or states, if they would be happy, but virtue.



ALCIBIADES:  That is true.



SOCRATES:  And before they have virtue, to be commanded by a superior is

better for men as well as for children?  (Compare Arist. Pol.)



ALCIBIADES:  That is evident.



SOCRATES:  And that which is better is also nobler?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  And what is nobler is more becoming?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  Then to the bad man slavery is more becoming, because better?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  Then vice is only suited to a slave?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And virtue to a freeman?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And, O my friend, is not the condition of a slave to be avoided?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  And are you now conscious of your own state?  And do you know

whether you are a freeman or not?



ALCIBIADES:  I think that I am very conscious indeed of my own state.



SOCRATES:  And do you know how to escape out of a state which I do not even

like to name to my beauty?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes, I do.



SOCRATES:  How?



ALCIBIADES:  By your help, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  That is not well said, Alcibiades.



ALCIBIADES:  What ought I to have said?



SOCRATES:  By the help of God.



ALCIBIADES:  I agree; and I further say, that our relations are likely to

be reversed.  From this day forward, I must and will follow you as you have

followed me; I will be the disciple, and you shall be my master.



SOCRATES:  O that is rare!  My love breeds another love:  and so like the

stork I shall be cherished by the bird whom I have hatched.



ALCIBIADES:  Strange, but true; and henceforward I shall begin to think

about justice.



SOCRATES:  And I hope that you will persist; although I have fears, not

because I doubt you; but I see the power of the state, which may be too

much for both of us.








End 




Alcibiades II

by Platonic Imitator

Translated by Benjamin Jowett






APPENDIX II.



The two dialogues which are translated in the second appendix are not

mentioned by Aristotle, or by any early authority, and have no claim to be

ascribed to Plato.  They are examples of Platonic dialogues to be assigned

probably to the second or third generation after Plato, when his writings

were well known at Athens and Alexandria.  They exhibit considerable

originality, and are remarkable for containing several thoughts of the sort

which we suppose to be modern rather than ancient, and which therefore have

a peculiar interest for us.  The Second Alcibiades shows that the

difficulties about prayer which have perplexed Christian theologians were

not unknown among the followers of Plato.  The Eryxias was doubted by the

ancients themselves:  yet it may claim the distinction of being, among all

Greek or Roman writings, the one which anticipates in the most striking

manner the modern science of political economy and gives an abstract form

to some of its principal doctrines.



For the translation of these two dialogues I am indebted to my friend and

secretary, Mr. Knight.



That the Dialogue which goes by the name of the Second Alcibiades is a

genuine writing of Plato will not be maintained by any modern critic, and

was hardly believed by the ancients themselves.  The dialectic is poor and

weak.  There is no power over language, or beauty of style; and there is a

certain abruptness and agroikia in the conversation, which is very un-

Platonic.  The best passage is probably that about the poets:--the remark

that the poet, who is of a reserved disposition, is uncommonly difficult to

understand, and the ridiculous interpretation of Homer, are entirely in the

spirit of Plato (compare Protag; Ion; Apol.).  The characters are ill-

drawn.  Socrates assumes the 'superior person' and preaches too much, while

Alcibiades is stupid and heavy-in-hand.  There are traces of Stoic

influence in the general tone and phraseology of the Dialogue (compare opos

melesei tis...kaka:  oti pas aphron mainetai):  and the writer seems to

have been acquainted with the 'Laws' of Plato (compare Laws).  An incident

from the Symposium is rather clumsily introduced, and two somewhat

hackneyed quotations (Symp., Gorg.) recur.  The reference to the death of

Archelaus as having occurred 'quite lately' is only a fiction, probably

suggested by the Gorgias, where the story of Archelaus is told, and a

similar phrase occurs;--ta gar echthes kai proen gegonota tauta, k.t.l. 

There are several passages which are either corrupt or extremely ill-

expressed.  But there is a modern interest in the subject of the dialogue;

and it is a good example of a short spurious work, which may be attributed

to the second or third century before Christ.





ALCIBIADES II



by



Platonic Imitator (see Appendix II above)



Translated by Benjamin Jowett





PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE:  Socrates and Alcibiades.





SOCRATES:  Are you going, Alcibiades, to offer prayer to Zeus?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes, Socrates, I am.



SOCRATES:  you seem to be troubled and to cast your eyes on the ground, as

though you were thinking about something.



ALCIBIADES:  Of what do you suppose that I am thinking?



SOCRATES:  Of the greatest of all things, as I believe.  Tell me, do you

not suppose that the Gods sometimes partly grant and partly reject the

requests which we make in public and private, and favour some persons and

not others?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  Do you not imagine, then, that a man ought to be very careful,

lest perchance without knowing it he implore great evils for himself,

deeming that he is asking for good, especially if the Gods are in the mood

to grant whatever he may request?  There is the story of Oedipus, for

instance, who prayed that his children might divide their inheritance

between them by the sword:  he did not, as he might have done, beg that his

present evils might be averted, but called down new ones.  And was not his

prayer accomplished, and did not many and terrible evils thence arise, upon

which I need not dilate?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes, Socrates, but you are speaking of a madman:  surely you

do not think that any one in his senses would venture to make such a

prayer?



SOCRATES:  Madness, then, you consider to be the opposite of discretion?



ALCIBIADES:  Of course.



SOCRATES:  And some men seem to you to be discreet, and others the

contrary?



ALCIBIADES:  They do.



SOCRATES:  Well, then, let us discuss who these are.  We acknowledge that

some are discreet, some foolish, and that some are mad?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And again, there are some who are in health?



ALCIBIADES:  There are.



SOCRATES:  While others are ailing?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And they are not the same?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  Nor are there any who are in neither state?



ALCIBIADES:  No.



SOCRATES:  A man must either be sick or be well?



ALCIBIADES:  That is my opinion.



SOCRATES:  Very good:  and do you think the same about discretion and want

of discretion?



ALCIBIADES:  How do you mean?



SOCRATES:  Do you believe that a man must be either in or out of his

senses; or is there some third or intermediate condition, in which he is

neither one nor the other?



ALCIBIADES:  Decidedly not.



SOCRATES:  He must be either sane or insane?



ALCIBIADES:  So I suppose.



SOCRATES:  Did you not acknowledge that madness was the opposite of

discretion?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And that there is no third or middle term between discretion and

indiscretion?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  And there cannot be two opposites to one thing?



ALCIBIADES:  There cannot.



SOCRATES:  Then madness and want of sense are the same?



ALCIBIADES:  That appears to be the case.



SOCRATES:  We shall be in the right, therefore, Alcibiades, if we say that

all who are senseless are mad.  For example, if among persons of your own

age or older than yourself there are some who are senseless,--as there

certainly are,--they are mad.  For tell me, by heaven, do you not think

that in the city the wise are few, while the foolish, whom you call mad,

are many?



ALCIBIADES:  I do.



SOCRATES:  But how could we live in safety with so many crazy people? 

Should we not long since have paid the penalty at their hands, and have

been struck and beaten and endured every other form of ill-usage which

madmen are wont to inflict?  Consider, my dear friend:  may it not be quite

otherwise?



ALCIBIADES:  Why, Socrates, how is that possible?  I must have been

mistaken.



SOCRATES:  So it seems to me.  But perhaps we may consider the matter

thus:--



ALCIBIADES:  How?



SOCRATES:  I will tell you.  We think that some are sick; do we not?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And must every sick person either have the gout, or be in a

fever, or suffer from ophthalmia?  Or do you believe that a man may labour

under some other disease, even although he has none of these complaints? 

Surely, they are not the only maladies which exist?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  And is every kind of ophthalmia a disease?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And every disease ophthalmia?



ALCIBIADES:  Surely not.  But I scarcely understand what I mean myself.



SOCRATES:  Perhaps, if you give me your best attention, 'two of us' looking

together, we may find what we seek.



ALCIBIADES:  I am attending, Socrates, to the best of my power.



SOCRATES:  We are agreed, then, that every form of ophthalmia is a disease,

but not every disease ophthalmia?



ALCIBIADES:  We are.



SOCRATES:  And so far we seem to be right.  For every one who suffers from

a fever is sick; but the sick, I conceive, do not all have fever or gout or

ophthalmia, although each of these is a disease, which, according to those

whom we call physicians, may require a different treatment.  They are not

all alike, nor do they produce the same result, but each has its own

effect, and yet they are all diseases.  May we not take an illustration

from the artizans?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  There are cobblers and carpenters and sculptors and others of

all sorts and kinds, whom we need not stop to enumerate.  All have their

distinct employments and all are workmen, although they are not all of them

cobblers or carpenters or sculptors.



ALCIBIADES:  No, indeed.



SOCRATES:  And in like manner men differ in regard to want of sense.  Those

who are most out of their wits we call 'madmen,' while we term those who

are less far gone 'stupid' or 'idiotic,' or, if we prefer gentler language,

describe them as 'romantic' or 'simple-minded,' or, again, as 'innocent' or

'inexperienced' or 'foolish.'  You may even find other names, if you seek

for them; but by all of them lack of sense is intended.  They only differ

as one art appeared to us to differ from another or one disease from

another.  Or what is your opinion?



ALCIBIADES:  I agree with you.



SOCRATES:  Then let us return to the point at which we digressed.  We said

at first that we should have to consider who were the wise and who the

foolish.  For we acknowledged that there are these two classes?  Did we

not?



ALCIBIADES:  To be sure.



SOCRATES:  And you regard those as sensible who know what ought to be done

or said?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  The senseless are those who do not know this?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  The latter will say or do what they ought not without their own

knowledge?



ALCIBIADES:  Exactly.



SOCRATES:  Oedipus, as I was saying, Alcibiades, was a person of this sort. 

And even now-a-days you will find many who (have offered inauspicious

prayers), although, unlike him, they were not in anger nor thought that

they were asking evil.  He neither sought, nor supposed that he sought for

good, but others have had quite the contrary notion.  I believe that if the

God whom you are about to consult should appear to you, and, in

anticipation of your request, enquired whether you would be contented to

become tyrant of Athens, and if this seemed in your eyes a small and mean

thing, should add to it the dominion of all Hellas; and seeing that even

then you would not be satisfied unless you were ruler of the whole of

Europe, should promise, not only that, but, if you so desired, should

proclaim to all mankind in one and the same day that Alcibiades, son of

Cleinias, was tyrant:--in such a case, I imagine, you would depart full of

joy, as one who had obtained the greatest of goods.



ALCIBIADES:  And not only I, Socrates, but any one else who should meet

with such luck.



SOCRATES:  Yet you would not accept the dominion and lordship of all the

Hellenes and all the barbarians in exchange for your life?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not:  for then what use could I make of them?



SOCRATES:  And would you accept them if you were likely to use them to a

bad and mischievous end?



ALCIBIADES:  I would not.



SOCRATES:  You see that it is not safe for a man either rashly to accept

whatever is offered him, or himself to request a thing, if he is likely to

suffer thereby or immediately to lose his life.  And yet we could tell of

many who, having long desired and diligently laboured to obtain a tyranny,

thinking that thus they would procure an advantage, have nevertheless

fallen victims to designing enemies.  You must have heard of what happened

only the other day, how Archelaus of Macedonia was slain by his beloved

(compare Aristotle, Pol.), whose love for the tyranny was not less than

that of Archelaus for him.  The tyrannicide expected by his crime to become

tyrant and afterwards to have a happy life; but when he had held the

tyranny three or four days, he was in his turn conspired against and slain.

Or look at certain of our own citizens,--and of their actions we have been

not hearers, but eyewitnesses,--who have desired to obtain military

command:  of those who have gained their object, some are even to this day

exiles from the city, while others have lost their lives.  And even they

who seem to have fared best, have not only gone through many perils and

terrors during their office, but after their return home they have been

beset by informers worse than they once were by their foes, insomuch that

several of them have wished that they had remained in a private station

rather than have had the glories of command.  If, indeed, such perils and

terrors were of profit to the commonwealth, there would be reason in

undergoing them; but the very contrary is the case.  Again, you will find

persons who have prayed for offspring, and when their prayers were heard,

have fallen into the greatest pains and sufferings.  For some have begotten

children who were utterly bad, and have therefore passed all their days in

misery, while the parents of good children have undergone the misfortune of

losing them, and have been so little happier than the others that they

would have preferred never to have had children rather than to have had

them and lost them.  And yet, although these and the like examples are

manifest and known of all, it is rare to find any one who has refused what

has been offered him, or, if he were likely to gain aught by prayer, has

refrained from making his petition.  The mass of mankind would not decline

to accept a tyranny, or the command of an army, or any of the numerous

things which cause more harm than good:  but rather, if they had them not,

would have prayed to obtain them.  And often in a short space of time they

change their tone, and wish their old prayers unsaid.  Wherefore also I

suspect that men are entirely wrong when they blame the gods as the authors

of the ills which befall them (compare Republic):  'their own presumption,'

or folly (whichever is the right word)--



'Has brought these unmeasured woes upon them.'  (Homer. Odyss.)



He must have been a wise poet, Alcibiades, who, seeing as I believe, his

friends foolishly praying for and doing things which would not really

profit them, offered up a common prayer in behalf of them all:--



'King Zeus, grant us good whether prayed for or unsought by us;

But that which we ask amiss, do thou avert.'  (The author of these lines,

which are probably of Pythagorean origin, is unknown.  They are found also

in the Anthology (Anth. Pal.).)



In my opinion, I say, the poet spoke both well and prudently; but if you

have anything to say in answer to him, speak out.



ALCIBIADES:  It is difficult, Socrates, to oppose what has been well said. 

And I perceive how many are the ills of which ignorance is the cause,

since, as would appear, through ignorance we not only do, but what is

worse, pray for the greatest evils.  No man would imagine that he would do

so; he would rather suppose that he was quite capable of praying for what

was best:  to call down evils seems more like a curse than a prayer.



SOCRATES:  But perhaps, my good friend, some one who is wiser than either

you or I will say that we have no right to blame ignorance thus rashly,

unless we can add what ignorance we mean and of what, and also to whom and

how it is respectively a good or an evil?



ALCIBIADES:  How do you mean?  Can ignorance possibly be better than

knowledge for any person in any conceivable case?



SOCRATES:  So I believe:--you do not think so?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  And yet surely I may not suppose that you would ever wish to act

towards your mother as they say that Orestes and Alcmeon and others have

done towards their parent.



ALCIBIADES:  Good words, Socrates, prithee.



SOCRATES:  You ought not to bid him use auspicious words, who says that you

would not be willing to commit so horrible a deed, but rather him who

affirms the contrary, if the act appear to you unfit even to be mentioned.

Or do you think that Orestes, had he been in his senses and knew what was

best for him to do, would ever have dared to venture on such a crime?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  Nor would any one else, I fancy?



ALCIBIADES:  No.



SOCRATES:  That ignorance is bad then, it would appear, which is of the

best and does not know what is best?



ALCIBIADES:  So I think, at least.



SOCRATES:  And both to the person who is ignorant and everybody else?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Let us take another case.  Suppose that you were suddenly to get

into your head that it would be a good thing to kill Pericles, your kinsman

and guardian, and were to seize a sword and, going to the doors of his

house, were to enquire if he were at home, meaning to slay only him and no

one else:--the servants reply, 'Yes':  (Mind, I do not mean that you would

really do such a thing; but there is nothing, you think, to prevent a man

who is ignorant of the best, having occasionally the whim that what is

worst is best?



ALCIBIADES:  No.)



SOCRATES:--If, then, you went indoors, and seeing him, did not know him,

but thought that he was some one else, would you venture to slay him?



ALCIBIADES:  Most decidedly not (it seems to me).  (These words are omitted

in several MSS.)



SOCRATES:  For you designed to kill, not the first who offered, but

Pericles himself?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And if you made many attempts, and each time failed to recognize

Pericles, you would never attack him?



ALCIBIADES:  Never.



SOCRATES:  Well, but if Orestes in like manner had not known his mother, do

you think that he would ever have laid hands upon her?



ALCIBIADES:  No.



SOCRATES:  He did not intend to slay the first woman he came across, nor

any one else's mother, but only his own?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  Ignorance, then, is better for those who are in such a frame of

mind, and have such ideas?



ALCIBIADES:  Obviously.



SOCRATES:  You acknowledge that for some persons in certain cases the

ignorance of some things is a good and not an evil, as you formerly

supposed?



ALCIBIADES:  I do.



SOCRATES:  And there is still another case which will also perhaps appear

strange to you, if you will consider it?  (The reading is here uncertain.)



ALCIBIADES:  What is that, Socrates?



SOCRATES:  It may be, in short, that the possession of all the sciences, if

unaccompanied by the knowledge of the best, will more often than not injure

the possessor.  Consider the matter thus:--Must we not, when we intend

either to do or say anything, suppose that we know or ought to know that

which we propose so confidently to do or say?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes, in my opinion.



SOCRATES:  We may take the orators for an example, who from time to time

advise us about war and peace, or the building of walls and the

construction of harbours, whether they understand the business in hand, or

only think that they do.  Whatever the city, in a word, does to another

city, or in the management of her own affairs, all happens by the counsel

of the orators.



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  But now see what follows, if I can (make it clear to you). 

(Some words appear to have dropped out here.)  You would distinguish the

wise from the foolish?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  The many are foolish, the few wise?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And you use both the terms, 'wise' and 'foolish,' in reference

to something?



ALCIBIADES:  I do.



SOCRATES:  Would you call a person wise who can give advice, but does not

know whether or when it is better to carry out the advice?



ALCIBIADES:  Decidedly not.



SOCRATES:  Nor again, I suppose, a person who knows the art of war, but

does not know whether it is better to go to war or for how long?



ALCIBIADES:  No.



SOCRATES:  Nor, once more, a person who knows how to kill another or to

take away his property or to drive him from his native land, but not when

it is better to do so or for whom it is better?



ALCIBIADES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  But he who understands anything of the kind and has at the same

time the knowledge of the best course of action:--and the best and the

useful are surely the same?--



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:--Such an one, I say, we should call wise and a useful adviser

both of himself and of the city.  What do you think?



ALCIBIADES:  I agree.



SOCRATES:  And if any one knows how to ride or to shoot with the bow or to

box or to wrestle, or to engage in any other sort of contest or to do

anything whatever which is in the nature of an art,--what do you call him

who knows what is best according to that art?  Do you not speak of one who

knows what is best in riding as a good rider?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And in a similar way you speak of a good boxer or a good flute-

player or a good performer in any other art?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  But is it necessary that the man who is clever in any of these

arts should be wise also in general?  Or is there a difference between the

clever artist and the wise man?



ALCIBIADES:  All the difference in the world.



SOCRATES:  And what sort of a state do you think that would be which was

composed of good archers and flute-players and athletes and masters in

other arts, and besides them of those others about whom we spoke, who knew

how to go to war and how to kill, as well as of orators puffed up with

political pride, but in which not one of them all had this knowledge of the

best, and there was no one who could tell when it was better to apply any

of these arts or in regard to whom?



ALCIBIADES:  I should call such a state bad, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  You certainly would when you saw each of them rivalling the

other and esteeming that of the greatest importance in the state,



'Wherein he himself most excelled.'  (Euripides, Antiope.)



--I mean that which was best in any art, while he was entirely ignorant of

what was best for himself and for the state, because, as I think, he trusts

to opinion which is devoid of intelligence.  In such a case should we not

be right if we said that the state would be full of anarchy and

lawlessness?



ALCIBIADES:  Decidedly.



SOCRATES:  But ought we not then, think you, either to fancy that we know

or really to know, what we confidently propose to do or say?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And if a person does that which he knows or supposes that he

knows, and the result is beneficial, he will act advantageously both for

himself and for the state?



ALCIBIADES:  True.



SOCRATES:  And if he do the contrary, both he and the state will suffer?



ALCIBIADES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Well, and are you of the same mind, as before?



ALCIBIADES:  I am.



SOCRATES:  But were you not saying that you would call the many unwise and

the few wise?



ALCIBIADES:  I was.



SOCRATES:  And have we not come back to our old assertion that the many

fail to obtain the best because they trust to opinion which is devoid of

intelligence?



ALCIBIADES:  That is the case.



SOCRATES:  It is good, then, for the many, if they particularly desire to

do that which they know or suppose that they know, neither to know nor to

suppose that they know, in cases where if they carry out their ideas in

action they will be losers rather than gainers?



ALCIBIADES:  What you say is very true.



SOCRATES:  Do you not see that I was really speaking the truth when I

affirmed that the possession of any other kind of knowledge was more likely

to injure than to benefit the possessor, unless he had also the knowledge

of the best?



ALCIBIADES:  I do now, if I did not before, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  The state or the soul, therefore, which wishes to have a right

existence must hold firmly to this knowledge, just as the sick man clings

to the physician, or the passenger depends for safety on the pilot.  And if

the soul does not set sail until she have obtained this she will be all the

safer in the voyage through life.  But when she rushes in pursuit of wealth

or bodily strength or anything else, not having the knowledge of the best,

so much the more is she likely to meet with misfortune.  And he who has the

love of learning (Or, reading polumatheian, 'abundant learning.'), and is

skilful in many arts, and does not possess the knowledge of the best, but

is under some other guidance, will make, as he deserves, a sorry voyage:--

he will, I believe, hurry through the brief space of human life, pilotless

in mid-ocean, and the words will apply to him in which the poet blamed his

enemy:--



'...Full many a thing he knew;

But knew them all badly.'  (A fragment from the pseudo-Homeric poem,

'Margites.')



ALCIBIADES:  How in the world, Socrates, do the words of the poet apply to

him?  They seem to me to have no bearing on the point whatever.



SOCRATES:  Quite the contrary, my sweet friend:  only the poet is talking

in riddles after the fashion of his tribe.  For all poetry has by nature an

enigmatical character, and it is by no means everybody who can interpret

it.  And if, moreover, the spirit of poetry happen to seize on a man who is

of a begrudging temper and does not care to manifest his wisdom but keeps

it to himself as far as he can, it does indeed require an almost superhuman

wisdom to discover what the poet would be at.  You surely do not suppose

that Homer, the wisest and most divine of poets, was unaware of the

impossibility of knowing a thing badly:  for it was no less a person than

he who said of Margites that 'he knew many things, but knew them all

badly.'  The solution of the riddle is this, I imagine:--By 'badly' Homer

meant 'bad' and 'knew' stands for 'to know.'  Put the words together;--the

metre will suffer, but the poet's meaning is clear;--'Margites knew all

these things, but it was bad for him to know them.'  And, obviously, if it

was bad for him to know so many things, he must have been a good-for-

nothing, unless the argument has played us false.



ALCIBIADES:  But I do not think that it has, Socrates:  at least, if the

argument is fallacious, it would be difficult for me to find another which

I could trust.



SOCRATES:  And you are right in thinking so.



ALCIBIADES:  Well, that is my opinion.



SOCRATES:  But tell me, by Heaven:--you must see now the nature and

greatness of the difficulty in which you, like others, have your part.  For

you change about in all directions, and never come to rest anywhere:  what

you once most strongly inclined to suppose, you put aside again and quite

alter your mind.  If the God to whose shrine you are going should appear at

this moment, and ask before you made your prayer, 'Whether you would desire

to have one of the things which we mentioned at first, or whether he should

leave you to make your own request:'--what in either case, think you, would

be the best way to take advantage of the opportunity?



ALCIBIADES:  Indeed, Socrates, I could not answer you without

consideration.  It seems to me to be a wild thing (The Homeric word margos

is said to be here employed in allusion to the quotation from the

'Margites' which Socrates has just made; but it is not used in the sense

which it has in Homer.) to make such a request; a man must be very careful

lest he pray for evil under the idea that he is asking for good, when

shortly after he may have to recall his prayer, and, as you were saying,

demand the opposite of what he at first requested.



SOCRATES:  And was not the poet whose words I originally quoted wiser than

we are, when he bade us (pray God) to defend us from evil even though we

asked for it?



ALCIBIADES:  I believe that you are right.



SOCRATES:  The Lacedaemonians, too, whether from admiration of the poet or

because they have discovered the idea for themselves, are wont to offer the

prayer alike in public and private, that the Gods will give unto them the

beautiful as well as the good:--no one is likely to hear them make any

further petition.  And yet up to the present time they have not been less

fortunate than other men; or if they have sometimes met with misfortune,

the fault has not been due to their prayer.  For surely, as I conceive, the

Gods have power either to grant our requests, or to send us the contrary of

what we ask.



And now I will relate to you a story which I have heard from certain of our

elders.  It chanced that when the Athenians and Lacedaemonians were at war,

our city lost every battle by land and sea and never gained a victory.  The

Athenians being annoyed and perplexed how to find a remedy for their

troubles, decided to send and enquire at the shrine of Ammon.  Their envoys

were also to ask, 'Why the Gods always granted the victory to the

Lacedaemonians?'  'We,' (they were to say,) 'offer them more and finer

sacrifices than any other Hellenic state, and adorn their temples with

gifts, as nobody else does; moreover, we make the most solemn and costly

processions to them every year, and spend more money in their service than

all the rest of the Hellenes put together.  But the Lacedaemonians take no

thought of such matters, and pay so little respect to the Gods that they

have a habit of sacrificing blemished animals to them, and in various ways

are less zealous than we are, although their wealth is quite equal to

ours.'  When they had thus spoken, and had made their request to know what

remedy they could find against the evils which troubled them, the prophet

made no direct answer,--clearly because he was not allowed by the God to do

so;--but he summoned them to him and said:  'Thus saith Ammon to the

Athenians:  "The silent worship of the Lacedaemonians pleaseth me better

than all the offerings of the other Hellenes."'  Such were the words of the

God, and nothing more.  He seems to have meant by 'silent worship' the

prayer of the Lacedaemonians, which is indeed widely different from the

usual requests of the Hellenes.  For they either bring to the altar bulls

with gilded horns or make offerings to the Gods, and beg at random for what

they need, good or bad.  When, therefore, the Gods hear them using words of

ill omen they reject these costly processions and sacrifices of theirs. 

And we ought, I think, to be very careful and consider well what we should

say and what leave unsaid.  Homer, too, will furnish us with similar

stories.  For he tells us how the Trojans in making their encampment,



'Offered up whole hecatombs to the immortals,'



and how the 'sweet savour' was borne 'to the heavens by the winds;



'But the blessed Gods were averse and received it not.

For exceedingly did they hate the holy Ilium,

Both Priam and the people of the spear-skilled king.'



So that it was in vain for them to sacrifice and offer gifts, seeing that

they were hateful to the Gods, who are not, like vile usurers, to be gained

over by bribes.  And it is foolish for us to boast that we are superior to

the Lacedaemonians by reason of our much worship.  The idea is

inconceivable that the Gods have regard, not to the justice and purity of

our souls, but to costly processions and sacrifices, which men may

celebrate year after year, although they have committed innumerable crimes

against the Gods or against their fellow-men or the state.  For the Gods,

as Ammon and his prophet declare, are no receivers of gifts, and they scorn

such unworthy service.  Wherefore also it would seem that wisdom and

justice are especially honoured both by the Gods and by men of sense; and

they are the wisest and most just who know how to speak and act towards

Gods and men.  But I should like to hear what your opinion is about these

matters.



ALCIBIADES:  I agree, Socrates, with you and with the God, whom, indeed, it

would be unbecoming for me to oppose.



SOCRATES:  Do you not remember saying that you were in great perplexity,

lest perchance you should ask for evil, supposing that you were asking for

good?



ALCIBIADES:  I do.



SOCRATES:  You see, then, that there is a risk in your approaching the God

in prayer, lest haply he should refuse your sacrifice when he hears the

blasphemy which you utter, and make you partake of other evils as well. 

The wisest plan, therefore, seems to me that you should keep silence; for

your 'highmindedness'--to use the mildest term which men apply to folly--

will most likely prevent you from using the prayer of the Lacedaemonians. 

You had better wait until we find out how we should behave towards the Gods

and towards men.



ALCIBIADES:  And how long must I wait, Socrates, and who will be my

teacher?  I should be very glad to see the man.



SOCRATES:  It is he who takes an especial interest in you.  But first of

all, I think, the darkness must be taken away in which your soul is now

enveloped, just as Athene in Homer removes the mist from the eyes of

Diomede that



'He may distinguish between God and mortal man.'



Afterwards the means may be given to you whereby you may distinguish

between good and evil.  At present, I fear, this is beyond your power.



ALCIBIADES:  Only let my instructor take away the impediment, whether it

pleases him to call it mist or anything else!  I care not who he is; but I

am resolved to disobey none of his commands, if I am likely to be the

better for them.



SOCRATES:  And surely he has a wondrous care for you.



ALCIBIADES:  It seems to be altogether advisable to put off the sacrifice

until he is found.



SOCRATES:  You are right:  that will be safer than running such a

tremendous risk.



ALCIBIADES:  But how shall we manage, Socrates?--At any rate I will set

this crown of mine upon your head, as you have given me such excellent

advice, and to the Gods we will offer crowns and perform the other

customary rites when I see that day approaching:  nor will it be long

hence, if they so will.



SOCRATES:  I accept your gift, and shall be ready and willing to receive

whatever else you may proffer.  Euripides makes Creon say in the play, when

he beholds Teiresias with his crown and hears that he has gained it by his

skill as the first-fruits of the spoil:--



'An auspicious omen I deem thy victor's wreath:

For well thou knowest that wave and storm oppress us.'



And so I count your gift to be a token of good-fortune; for I am in no less

stress than Creon, and would fain carry off the victory over your lovers.








End 





Apology

Also known as The Death of Socrates



by Plato



Translated by Benjamin Jowett






INTRODUCTION.



In what relation the Apology of Plato stands to the real defence of

Socrates, there are no means of determining.  It certainly agrees in tone

and character with the description of Xenophon, who says in the Memorabilia

that Socrates might have been acquitted 'if in any moderate degree he would

have conciliated the favour of the dicasts;' and who informs us in another

passage, on the testimony of Hermogenes, the friend of Socrates, that he

had no wish to live; and that the divine sign refused to allow him to

prepare a defence, and also that Socrates himself declared this to be

unnecessary, on the ground that all his life long he had been preparing

against that hour.  For the speech breathes throughout a spirit of

defiance, (ut non supplex aut reus sed magister aut dominus videretur esse

judicum' (Cic. de Orat.); and the loose and desultory style is an imitation

of the 'accustomed manner' in which Socrates spoke in 'the agora and among

the tables of the money-changers.'  The allusion in the Crito may, perhaps,

be adduced as a further evidence of the literal accuracy of some parts. 

But in the main it must be regarded as the ideal of Socrates, according to

Plato's conception of him, appearing in the greatest and most public scene

of his life, and in the height of his triumph, when he is weakest, and yet

his mastery over mankind is greatest, and his habitual irony acquires a new

meaning and a sort of tragic pathos in the face of death.  The facts of his

life are summed up, and the features of his character are brought out as if

by accident in the course of the defence.  The conversational manner, the

seeming want of arrangement, the ironical simplicity, are found to result

in a perfect work of art, which is the portrait of Socrates.



Yet some of the topics may have been actually used by Socrates; and the

recollection of his very words may have rung in the ears of his disciple. 

The Apology of Plato may be compared generally with those speeches of

Thucydides in which he has embodied his conception of the lofty character

and policy of the great Pericles, and which at the same time furnish a

commentary on the situation of affairs from the point of view of the

historian.  So in the Apology there is an ideal rather than a literal

truth; much is said which was not said, and is only Plato's view of the

situation.  Plato was not, like Xenophon, a chronicler of facts; he does

not appear in any of his writings to have aimed at literal accuracy.  He is

not therefore to be supplemented from the Memorabilia and Symposium of

Xenophon, who belongs to an entirely different class of writers.  The

Apology of Plato is not the report of what Socrates said, but an elaborate

composition, quite as much so in fact as one of the Dialogues.  And we may

perhaps even indulge in the fancy that the actual defence of Socrates was

as much greater than the Platonic defence as the master was greater than

the disciple.  But in any case, some of the words used by him must have

been remembered, and some of the facts recorded must have actually

occurred.  It is significant that Plato is said to have been present at the

defence (Apol.), as he is also said to have been absent at the last scene

in the Phaedo.  Is it fanciful to suppose that he meant to give the stamp

of authenticity to the one and not to the other?--especially when we

consider that these two passages are the only ones in which Plato makes

mention of himself.  The circumstance that Plato was to be one of his

sureties for the payment of the fine which he proposed has the appearance

of truth.  More suspicious is the statement that Socrates received the

first impulse to his favourite calling of cross-examining the world from

the Oracle of Delphi; for he must already have been famous before

Chaerephon went to consult the Oracle (Riddell), and the story is of a kind

which is very likely to have been invented.  On the whole we arrive at the

conclusion that the Apology is true to the character of Socrates, but we

cannot show that any single sentence in it was actually spoken by him.  It

breathes the spirit of Socrates, but has been cast anew in the mould of

Plato.



There is not much in the other Dialogues which can be compared with the

Apology.  The same recollection of his master may have been present to the

mind of Plato when depicting the sufferings of the Just in the Republic. 

The Crito may also be regarded as a sort of appendage to the Apology, in

which Socrates, who has defied the judges, is nevertheless represented as

scrupulously obedient to the laws.  The idealization of the sufferer is

carried still further in the Gorgias, in which the thesis is maintained,

that 'to suffer is better than to do evil;' and the art of rhetoric is

described as only useful for the purpose of self-accusation.  The

parallelisms which occur in the so-called Apology of Xenophon are not worth

noticing, because the writing in which they are contained is manifestly

spurious.  The statements of the Memorabilia respecting the trial and death

of Socrates agree generally with Plato; but they have lost the flavour of

Socratic irony in the narrative of Xenophon.



The Apology or Platonic defence of Socrates is divided into three parts: 

1st. The defence properly so called; 2nd. The shorter address in mitigation

of the penalty; 3rd. The last words of prophetic rebuke and exhortation.



The first part commences with an apology for his colloquial style; he is,

as he has always been, the enemy of rhetoric, and knows of no rhetoric but

truth; he will not falsify his character by making a speech.  Then he

proceeds to divide his accusers into two classes; first, there is the

nameless accuser--public opinion.  All the world from their earliest years

had heard that he was a corrupter of youth, and had seen him caricatured in

the Clouds of Aristophanes.  Secondly, there are the professed accusers,

who are but the mouth-piece of the others.  The accusations of both might

be summed up in a formula.  The first say, 'Socrates is an evil-doer and a

curious person, searching into things under the earth and above the heaven;

and making the worse appear the better cause, and teaching all this to

others.'  The second, 'Socrates is an evil-doer and corrupter of the youth,

who does not receive the gods whom the state receives, but introduces other

new divinities.'  These last words appear to have been the actual

indictment (compare Xen. Mem.); and the previous formula, which is a

summary of public opinion, assumes the same legal style.



The answer begins by clearing up a confusion.  In the representations of

the Comic poets, and in the opinion of the multitude, he had been

identified with the teachers of physical science and with the Sophists. 

But this was an error.  For both of them he professes a respect in the open

court, which contrasts with his manner of speaking about them in other

places.  (Compare for Anaxagoras, Phaedo, Laws; for the Sophists, Meno,

Republic, Tim., Theaet., Soph., etc.)  But at the same time he shows that

he is not one of them.  Of natural philosophy he knows nothing; not that he

despises such pursuits, but the fact is that he is ignorant of them, and

never says a word about them.  Nor is he paid for giving instruction--that

is another mistaken notion:--he has nothing to teach.  But he commends

Evenus for teaching virtue at such a 'moderate' rate as five minae. 

Something of the 'accustomed irony,' which may perhaps be expected to sleep

in the ear of the multitude, is lurking here.



He then goes on to explain the reason why he is in such an evil name.  That

had arisen out of a peculiar mission which he had taken upon himself.  The

enthusiastic Chaerephon (probably in anticipation of the answer which he

received) had gone to Delphi and asked the oracle if there was any man

wiser than Socrates; and the answer was, that there was no man wiser.  What

could be the meaning of this--that he who knew nothing, and knew that he

knew nothing, should be declared by the oracle to be the wisest of men? 

Reflecting upon the answer, he determined to refute it by finding 'a

wiser;' and first he went to the politicians, and then to the poets, and

then to the craftsmen, but always with the same result--he found that they

knew nothing, or hardly anything more than himself; and that the little

advantage which in some cases they possessed was more than counter-balanced

by their conceit of knowledge.  He knew nothing, and knew that he knew

nothing:  they knew little or nothing, and imagined that they knew all

things.  Thus he had passed his life as a sort of missionary in detecting

the pretended wisdom of mankind; and this occupation had quite absorbed him

and taken him away both from public and private affairs.  Young men of the

richer sort had made a pastime of the same pursuit, 'which was not

unamusing.'  And hence bitter enmities had arisen; the professors of

knowledge had revenged themselves by calling him a villainous corrupter of

youth, and by repeating the commonplaces about atheism and materialism and

sophistry, which are the stock-accusations against all philosophers when

there is nothing else to be said of them.



The second accusation he meets by interrogating Meletus, who is present and

can be interrogated.  'If he is the corrupter, who is the improver of the

citizens?'  (Compare Meno.)  'All men everywhere.'  But how absurd, how

contrary to analogy is this!  How inconceivable too, that he should make

the citizens worse when he has to live with them.  This surely cannot be

intentional; and if unintentional, he ought to have been instructed by

Meletus, and not accused in the court.



But there is another part of the indictment which says that he teaches men

not to receive the gods whom the city receives, and has other new gods. 

'Is that the way in which he is supposed to corrupt the youth?'  'Yes, it

is.'  'Has he only new gods, or none at all?'  'None at all.'  'What, not

even the sun and moon?'  'No; why, he says that the sun is a stone, and the

moon earth.'  That, replies Socrates, is the old confusion about

Anaxagoras; the Athenian people are not so ignorant as to attribute to the

influence of Socrates notions which have found their way into the drama,

and may be learned at the theatre.  Socrates undertakes to show that

Meletus (rather unjustifiably) has been compounding a riddle in this part

of the indictment:  'There are no gods, but Socrates believes in the

existence of the sons of gods, which is absurd.'



Leaving Meletus, who has had enough words spent upon him, he returns to the

original accusation.  The question may be asked, Why will he persist in

following a profession which leads him to death?  Why?--because he must

remain at his post where the god has placed him, as he remained at

Potidaea, and Amphipolis, and Delium, where the generals placed him. 

Besides, he is not so overwise as to imagine that he knows whether death is

a good or an evil; and he is certain that desertion of his duty is an evil. 

Anytus is quite right in saying that they should never have indicted him if

they meant to let him go.  For he will certainly obey God rather than man;

and will continue to preach to all men of all ages the necessity of virtue

and improvement; and if they refuse to listen to him he will still

persevere and reprove them.  This is his way of corrupting the youth, which

he will not cease to follow in obedience to the god, even if a thousand

deaths await him.



He is desirous that they should let him live--not for his own sake, but for

theirs; because he is their heaven-sent friend (and they will never have

such another), or, as he may be ludicrously described, he is the gadfly who

stirs the generous steed into motion.  Why then has he never taken part in

public affairs?  Because the familiar divine voice has hindered him; if he

had been a public man, and had fought for the right, as he would certainly

have fought against the many, he would not have lived, and could therefore

have done no good.  Twice in public matters he has risked his life for the

sake of justice--once at the trial of the generals; and again in resistance

to the tyrannical commands of the Thirty.



But, though not a public man, he has passed his days in instructing the

citizens without fee or reward--this was his mission.  Whether his

disciples have turned out well or ill, he cannot justly be charged with the

result, for he never promised to teach them anything.  They might come if

they liked, and they might stay away if they liked:  and they did come,

because they found an amusement in hearing the pretenders to wisdom

detected.  If they have been corrupted, their elder relatives (if not

themselves) might surely come into court and witness against him, and there

is an opportunity still for them to appear.  But their fathers and brothers

all appear in court (including 'this' Plato), to witness on his behalf; and

if their relatives are corrupted, at least they are uncorrupted; 'and they

are my witnesses.  For they know that I am speaking the truth, and that

Meletus is lying.'



This is about all that he has to say.  He will not entreat the judges to

spare his life; neither will he present a spectacle of weeping children,

although he, too, is not made of 'rock or oak.'  Some of the judges

themselves may have complied with this practice on similar occasions, and

he trusts that they will not be angry with him for not following their

example.  But he feels that such conduct brings discredit on the name of

Athens:  he feels too, that the judge has sworn not to give away justice;

and he cannot be guilty of the impiety of asking the judge to break his

oath, when he is himself being tried for impiety.



As he expected, and probably intended, he is convicted.  And now the tone

of the speech, instead of being more conciliatory, becomes more lofty and

commanding.  Anytus proposes death as the penalty:  and what counter-

proposition shall he make?  He, the benefactor of the Athenian people,

whose whole life has been spent in doing them good, should at least have

the Olympic victor's reward of maintenance in the Prytaneum.  Or why should

he propose any counter-penalty when he does not know whether death, which

Anytus proposes, is a good or an evil?  And he is certain that imprisonment

is an evil, exile is an evil.  Loss of money might be an evil, but then he

has none to give; perhaps he can make up a mina.  Let that be the penalty,

or, if his friends wish, thirty minae; for which they will be excellent

securities.



(He is condemned to death.)



He is an old man already, and the Athenians will gain nothing but disgrace

by depriving him of a few years of life.  Perhaps he could have escaped, if

he had chosen to throw down his arms and entreat for his life.  But he does

not at all repent of the manner of his defence; he would rather die in his

own fashion than live in theirs.  For the penalty of unrighteousness is

swifter than death; that penalty has already overtaken his accusers as

death will soon overtake him.



And now, as one who is about to die, he will prophesy to them.  They have

put him to death in order to escape the necessity of giving an account of

their lives.  But his death 'will be the seed' of many disciples who will

convince them of their evil ways, and will come forth to reprove them in

harsher terms, because they are younger and more inconsiderate.



He would like to say a few words, while there is time, to those who would

have acquitted him.  He wishes them to know that the divine sign never

interrupted him in the course of his defence; the reason of which, as he

conjectures, is that the death to which he is going is a good and not an

evil.  For either death is a long sleep, the best of sleeps, or a journey

to another world in which the souls of the dead are gathered together, and

in which there may be a hope of seeing the heroes of old--in which, too,

there are just judges; and as all are immortal, there can be no fear of any

one suffering death for his opinions.



Nothing evil can happen to the good man either in life or death, and his

own death has been permitted by the gods, because it was better for him to

depart; and therefore he forgives his judges because they have done him no

harm, although they never meant to do him any good.



He has a last request to make to them--that they will trouble his sons as

he has troubled them, if they appear to prefer riches to virtue, or to

think themselves something when they are nothing.



...



'Few persons will be found to wish that Socrates should have defended

himself otherwise,'--if, as we must add, his defence was that with which

Plato has provided him.  But leaving this question, which does not admit of

a precise solution, we may go on to ask what was the impression which Plato

in the Apology intended to give of the character and conduct of his master

in the last great scene?  Did he intend to represent him (1) as employing

sophistries; (2) as designedly irritating the judges?  Or are these

sophistries to be regarded as belonging to the age in which he lived and to

his personal character, and this apparent haughtiness as flowing from the

natural elevation of his position?



For example, when he says that it is absurd to suppose that one man is the

corrupter and all the rest of the world the improvers of the youth; or,

when he argues that he never could have corrupted the men with whom he had

to live; or, when he proves his belief in the gods because he believes in

the sons of gods, is he serious or jesting?  It may be observed that these

sophisms all occur in his cross-examination of Meletus, who is easily

foiled and mastered in the hands of the great dialectician.  Perhaps he

regarded these answers as good enough for his accuser, of whom he makes

very light.  Also there is a touch of irony in them, which takes them out

of the category of sophistry.  (Compare Euthyph.)



That the manner in which he defends himself about the lives of his

disciples is not satisfactory, can hardly be denied.  Fresh in the memory

of the Athenians, and detestable as they deserved to be to the newly

restored democracy, were the names of Alcibiades, Critias, Charmides.  It

is obviously not a sufficient answer that Socrates had never professed to

teach them anything, and is therefore not justly chargeable with their

crimes.  Yet the defence, when taken out of this ironical form, is

doubtless sound:  that his teaching had nothing to do with their evil

lives.  Here, then, the sophistry is rather in form than in substance,

though we might desire that to such a serious charge Socrates had given a

more serious answer.



Truly characteristic of Socrates is another point in his answer, which may

also be regarded as sophistical.  He says that 'if he has corrupted the

youth, he must have corrupted them involuntarily.'  But if, as Socrates

argues, all evil is involuntary, then all criminals ought to be admonished

and not punished.  In these words the Socratic doctrine of the

involuntariness of evil is clearly intended to be conveyed.  Here again, as

in the former instance, the defence of Socrates is untrue practically, but

may be true in some ideal or transcendental sense.  The commonplace reply,

that if he had been guilty of corrupting the youth their relations would

surely have witnessed against him, with which he concludes this part of his

defence, is more satisfactory.



Again, when Socrates argues that he must believe in the gods because he

believes in the sons of gods, we must remember that this is a refutation

not of the original indictment, which is consistent enough--'Socrates does

not receive the gods whom the city receives, and has other new divinities'

--but of the interpretation put upon the words by Meletus, who has affirmed

that he is a downright atheist.  To this Socrates fairly answers, in

accordance with the ideas of the time, that a downright atheist cannot

believe in the sons of gods or in divine things.  The notion that demons or

lesser divinities are the sons of gods is not to be regarded as ironical or

sceptical.  He is arguing 'ad hominem' according to the notions of

mythology current in his age.  Yet he abstains from saying that he believed

in the gods whom the State approved.  He does not defend himself, as

Xenophon has defended him, by appealing to his practice of religion. 

Probably he neither wholly believed, nor disbelieved, in the existence of

the popular gods; he had no means of knowing about them.  According to

Plato (compare Phaedo; Symp.), as well as Xenophon (Memor.), he was

punctual in the performance of the least religious duties; and he must have

believed in his own oracular sign, of which he seemed to have an internal

witness.  But the existence of Apollo or Zeus, or the other gods whom the

State approves, would have appeared to him both uncertain and unimportant

in comparison of the duty of self-examination, and of those principles of

truth and right which he deemed to be the foundation of religion.  (Compare

Phaedr.; Euthyph.; Republic.)



The second question, whether Plato meant to represent Socrates as braving

or irritating his judges, must also be answered in the negative.  His

irony, his superiority, his audacity, 'regarding not the person of man,'

necessarily flow out of the loftiness of his situation.  He is not acting a

part upon a great occasion, but he is what he has been all his life long,

'a king of men.'  He would rather not appear insolent, if he could avoid it

(ouch os authadizomenos touto lego).  Neither is he desirous of hastening

his own end, for life and death are simply indifferent to him.  But such a

defence as would be acceptable to his judges and might procure an

acquittal, it is not in his nature to make.  He will not say or do anything

that might pervert the course of justice; he cannot have his tongue bound

even 'in the throat of death.'  With his accusers he will only fence and

play, as he had fenced with other 'improvers of youth,' answering the

Sophist according to his sophistry all his life long.  He is serious when

he is speaking of his own mission, which seems to distinguish him from all

other reformers of mankind, and originates in an accident.  The dedication

of himself to the improvement of his fellow-citizens is not so remarkable

as the ironical spirit in which he goes about doing good only in

vindication of the credit of the oracle, and in the vain hope of finding a

wiser man than himself.  Yet this singular and almost accidental character

of his mission agrees with the divine sign which, according to our notions,

is equally accidental and irrational, and is nevertheless accepted by him

as the guiding principle of his life.  Socrates is nowhere represented to

us as a freethinker or sceptic.  There is no reason to doubt his sincerity

when he speculates on the possibility of seeing and knowing the heroes of

the Trojan war in another world.  On the other hand, his hope of

immortality is uncertain;--he also conceives of death as a long sleep (in

this respect differing from the Phaedo), and at last falls back on

resignation to the divine will, and the certainty that no evil can happen

to the good man either in life or death.  His absolute truthfulness seems

to hinder him from asserting positively more than this; and he makes no

attempt to veil his ignorance in mythology and figures of speech.  The

gentleness of the first part of the speech contrasts with the aggravated,

almost threatening, tone of the conclusion.  He characteristically remarks

that he will not speak as a rhetorician, that is to say, he will not make a

regular defence such as Lysias or one of the orators might have composed

for him, or, according to some accounts, did compose for him.  But he first

procures himself a hearing by conciliatory words.  He does not attack the

Sophists; for they were open to the same charges as himself; they were

equally ridiculed by the Comic poets, and almost equally hateful to Anytus

and Meletus.  Yet incidentally the antagonism between Socrates and the

Sophists is allowed to appear.  He is poor and they are rich; his

profession that he teaches nothing is opposed to their readiness to teach

all things; his talking in the marketplace to their private instructions;

his tarry-at-home life to their wandering from city to city.  The tone

which he assumes towards them is one of real friendliness, but also of

concealed irony.  Towards Anaxagoras, who had disappointed him in his hopes

of learning about mind and nature, he shows a less kindly feeling, which is

also the feeling of Plato in other passages (Laws).  But Anaxagoras had

been dead thirty years, and was beyond the reach of persecution.



It has been remarked that the prophecy of a new generation of teachers who

would rebuke and exhort the Athenian people in harsher and more violent

terms was, as far as we know, never fulfilled.  No inference can be drawn

from this circumstance as to the probability of the words attributed to him

having been actually uttered.  They express the aspiration of the first

martyr of philosophy, that he would leave behind him many followers,

accompanied by the not unnatural feeling that they would be fiercer and

more inconsiderate in their words when emancipated from his control.



The above remarks must be understood as applying with any degree of

certainty to the Platonic Socrates only.  For, although these or similar

words may have been spoken by Socrates himself, we cannot exclude the

possibility, that like so much else, e.g. the wisdom of Critias, the poem

of Solon, the virtues of Charmides, they may have been due only to the

imagination of Plato.  The arguments of those who maintain that the Apology

was composed during the process, resting on no evidence, do not require a

serious refutation.  Nor are the reasonings of Schleiermacher, who argues

that the Platonic defence is an exact or nearly exact reproduction of the

words of Socrates, partly because Plato would not have been guilty of the

impiety of altering them, and also because many points of the defence might

have been improved and strengthened, at all more conclusive.  (See English

Translation.)  What effect the death of Socrates produced on the mind of

Plato, we cannot certainly determine; nor can we say how he would or must

have written under the circumstances.  We observe that the enmity of

Aristophanes to Socrates does not prevent Plato from introducing them

together in the Symposium engaged in friendly intercourse.  Nor is there

any trace in the Dialogues of an attempt to make Anytus or Meletus

personally odious in the eyes of the Athenian public.





APOLOGY



by



Plato



Translated by Benjamin Jowett





How you, O Athenians, have been affected by my accusers, I cannot tell; but

I know that they almost made me forget who I was--so persuasively did they

speak; and yet they have hardly uttered a word of truth.  But of the many

falsehoods told by them, there was one which quite amazed me;--I mean when

they said that you should be upon your guard and not allow yourselves to be

deceived by the force of my eloquence.  To say this, when they were certain

to be detected as soon as I opened my lips and proved myself to be anything

but a great speaker, did indeed appear to me most shameless--unless by the

force of eloquence they mean the force of truth; for is such is their

meaning, I admit that I am eloquent.  But in how different a way from

theirs!  Well, as I was saying, they have scarcely spoken the truth at all;

but from me you shall hear the whole truth:  not, however, delivered after

their manner in a set oration duly ornamented with words and phrases. No,

by heaven! but I shall use the words and arguments which occur to me at the

moment; for I am confident in the justice of my cause (Or, I am certain

that I am right in taking this course.):  at my time of life I ought not to

be appearing before you, O men of Athens, in the character of a juvenile

orator--let no one expect it of me.  And I must beg of you to grant me a

favour:--If I defend myself in my accustomed manner, and you hear me using

the words which I have been in the habit of using in the agora, at the

tables of the money-changers, or anywhere else, I would ask you not to be

surprised, and not to interrupt me on this account.  For I am more than

seventy years of age, and appearing now for the first time in a court of

law, I am quite a stranger to the language of the place; and therefore I

would have you regard me as if I were really a stranger, whom you would

excuse if he spoke in his native tongue, and after the fashion of his

country:--Am I making an unfair request of you?  Never mind the manner,

which may or may not be good; but think only of the truth of my words, and

give heed to that:  let the speaker speak truly and the judge decide

justly.



And first, I have to reply to the older charges and to my first accusers,

and then I will go on to the later ones.  For of old I have had many

accusers, who have accused me falsely to you during many years; and I am

more afraid of them than of Anytus and his associates, who are dangerous,

too, in their own way.  But far more dangerous are the others, who began

when you were children, and took possession of your minds with their

falsehoods, telling of one Socrates, a wise man, who speculated about the

heaven above, and searched into the earth beneath, and made the worse

appear the better cause.  The disseminators of this tale are the accusers

whom I dread; for their hearers are apt to fancy that such enquirers do not

believe in the existence of the gods.  And they are many, and their charges

against me are of ancient date, and they were made by them in the days when

you were more impressible than you are now--in childhood, or it may have

been in youth--and the cause when heard went by default, for there was none

to answer.  And hardest of all, I do not know and cannot tell the names of

my accusers; unless in the chance case of a Comic poet.  All who from envy

and malice have persuaded you--some of them having first convinced

themselves--all this class of men are most difficult to deal with; for I

cannot have them up here, and cross-examine them, and therefore I must

simply fight with shadows in my own defence, and argue when there is no one

who answers.  I will ask you then to assume with me, as I was saying, that

my opponents are of two kinds; one recent, the other ancient:  and I hope

that you will see the propriety of my answering the latter first, for these

accusations you heard long before the others, and much oftener.



Well, then, I must make my defence, and endeavour to clear away in a short

time, a slander which has lasted a long time.  May I succeed, if to succeed

be for my good and yours, or likely to avail me in my cause!  The task is

not an easy one; I quite understand the nature of it.  And so leaving the

event with God, in obedience to the law I will now make my defence.



I will begin at the beginning, and ask what is the accusation which has

given rise to the slander of me, and in fact has encouraged Meletus to

proof this charge against me.  Well, what do the slanderers say?  They

shall be my prosecutors, and I will sum up their words in an affidavit: 

'Socrates is an evil-doer, and a curious person, who searches into things

under the earth and in heaven, and he makes the worse appear the better

cause; and he teaches the aforesaid doctrines to others.'  Such is the

nature of the accusation:  it is just what you have yourselves seen in the

comedy of Aristophanes (Aristoph., Clouds.), who has introduced a man whom

he calls Socrates, going about and saying that he walks in air, and talking

a deal of nonsense concerning matters of which I do not pretend to know

either much or little--not that I mean to speak disparagingly of any one

who is a student of natural philosophy.  I should be very sorry if Meletus

could bring so grave a charge against me.  But the simple truth is, O

Athenians, that I have nothing to do with physical speculations.  Very many

of those here present are witnesses to the truth of this, and to them I

appeal.  Speak then, you who have heard me, and tell your neighbours

whether any of you have ever known me hold forth in few words or in many

upon such matters...You hear their answer.  And from what they say of this

part of the charge you will be able to judge of the truth of the rest.



As little foundation is there for the report that I am a teacher, and take

money; this accusation has no more truth in it than the other.  Although,

if a man were really able to instruct mankind, to receive money for giving

instruction would, in my opinion, be an honour to him.  There is Gorgias of

Leontium, and Prodicus of Ceos, and Hippias of Elis, who go the round of

the cities, and are able to persuade the young men to leave their own

citizens by whom they might be taught for nothing, and come to them whom

they not only pay, but are thankful if they may be allowed to pay them. 

There is at this time a Parian philosopher residing in Athens, of whom I

have heard; and I came to hear of him in this way:--I came across a man who

has spent a world of money on the Sophists, Callias, the son of Hipponicus,

and knowing that he had sons, I asked him:  'Callias,' I said, 'if your two

sons were foals or calves, there would be no difficulty in finding some one

to put over them; we should hire a trainer of horses, or a farmer probably,

who would improve and perfect them in their own proper virtue and

excellence; but as they are human beings, whom are you thinking of placing

over them?  Is there any one who understands human and political virtue? 

You must have thought about the matter, for you have sons; is there any

one?'  'There is,' he said.  'Who is he?' said I; 'and of what country? and

what does he charge?'  'Evenus the Parian,' he replied; 'he is the man, and

his charge is five minae.'  Happy is Evenus, I said to myself, if he really

has this wisdom, and teaches at such a moderate charge.  Had I the same, I

should have been very proud and conceited; but the truth is that I have no

knowledge of the kind.



I dare say, Athenians, that some one among you will reply, 'Yes, Socrates,

but what is the origin of these accusations which are brought against you;

there must have been something strange which you have been doing?  All

these rumours and this talk about you would never have arisen if you had

been like other men:  tell us, then, what is the cause of them, for we

should be sorry to judge hastily of you.'  Now I regard this as a fair

challenge, and I will endeavour to explain to you the reason why I am

called wise and have such an evil fame.  Please to attend then.  And

although some of you may think that I am joking, I declare that I will tell

you the entire truth.  Men of Athens, this reputation of mine has come of a

certain sort of wisdom which I possess.  If you ask me what kind of wisdom,

I reply, wisdom such as may perhaps be attained by man, for to that extent

I am inclined to believe that I am wise; whereas the persons of whom I was

speaking have a superhuman wisdom which I may fail to describe, because I

have it not myself; and he who says that I have, speaks falsely, and is

taking away my character.  And here, O men of Athens, I must beg you not to

interrupt me, even if I seem to say something extravagant.  For the word

which I will speak is not mine.  I will refer you to a witness who is

worthy of credit; that witness shall be the God of Delphi--he will tell you

about my wisdom, if I have any, and of what sort it is.  You must have

known Chaerephon; he was early a friend of mine, and also a friend of

yours, for he shared in the recent exile of the people, and returned with

you.  Well, Chaerephon, as you know, was very impetuous in all his doings,

and he went to Delphi and boldly asked the oracle to tell him whether--as I

was saying, I must beg you not to interrupt--he asked the oracle to tell

him whether anyone was wiser than I was, and the Pythian prophetess

answered, that there was no man wiser.  Chaerephon is dead himself; but his

brother, who is in court, will confirm the truth of what I am saying.



Why do I mention this?  Because I am going to explain to you why I have

such an evil name.  When I heard the answer, I said to myself, What can the

god mean? and what is the interpretation of his riddle? for I know that I

have no wisdom, small or great.  What then can he mean when he says that I

am the wisest of men?  And yet he is a god, and cannot lie; that would be

against his nature.  After long consideration, I thought of a method of

trying the question.  I reflected that if I could only find a man wiser

than myself, then I might go to the god with a refutation in my hand.  I

should say to him, 'Here is a man who is wiser than I am; but you said that

I was the wisest.'  Accordingly I went to one who had the reputation of

wisdom, and observed him--his name I need not mention; he was a politician

whom I selected for examination--and the result was as follows:  When I

began to talk with him, I could not help thinking that he was not really

wise, although he was thought wise by many, and still wiser by himself; and

thereupon I tried to explain to him that he thought himself wise, but was

not really wise; and the consequence was that he hated me, and his enmity

was shared by several who were present and heard me.  So I left him, saying

to myself, as I went away:  Well, although I do not suppose that either of

us knows anything really beautiful and good, I am better off than he is,--

for he knows nothing, and thinks that he knows; I neither know nor think

that I know.  In this latter particular, then, I seem to have slightly the

advantage of him.  Then I went to another who had still higher pretensions

to wisdom, and my conclusion was exactly the same.  Whereupon I made

another enemy of him, and of many others besides him.



Then I went to one man after another, being not unconscious of the enmity

which I provoked, and I lamented and feared this:  but necessity was laid

upon me,--the word of God, I thought, ought to be considered first.  And I

said to myself, Go I must to all who appear to know, and find out the

meaning of the oracle.  And I swear to you, Athenians, by the dog I swear!

--for I must tell you the truth--the result of my mission was just this:  I

found that the men most in repute were all but the most foolish; and that

others less esteemed were really wiser and better.  I will tell you the

tale of my wanderings and of the 'Herculean' labours, as I may call them,

which I endured only to find at last the oracle irrefutable.  After the

politicians, I went to the poets; tragic, dithyrambic, and all sorts.  And

there, I said to myself, you will be instantly detected; now you will find

out that you are more ignorant than they are.  Accordingly, I took them

some of the most elaborate passages in their own writings, and asked what

was the meaning of them--thinking that they would teach me something.  Will

you believe me?  I am almost ashamed to confess the truth, but I must say

that there is hardly a person present who would not have talked better

about their poetry than they did themselves.  Then I knew that not by

wisdom do poets write poetry, but by a sort of genius and inspiration; they

are like diviners or soothsayers who also say many fine things, but do not

understand the meaning of them.  The poets appeared to me to be much in the

same case; and I further observed that upon the strength of their poetry

they believed themselves to be the wisest of men in other things in which

they were not wise.  So I departed, conceiving myself to be superior to

them for the same reason that I was superior to the politicians.



At last I went to the artisans.  I was conscious that I knew nothing at

all, as I may say, and I was sure that they knew many fine things; and here

I was not mistaken, for they did know many things of which I was ignorant,

and in this they certainly were wiser than I was.  But I observed that even

the good artisans fell into the same error as the poets;--because they were

good workmen they thought that they also knew all sorts of high matters,

and this defect in them overshadowed their wisdom; and therefore I asked

myself on behalf of the oracle, whether I would like to be as I was,

neither having their knowledge nor their ignorance, or like them in both;

and I made answer to myself and to the oracle that I was better off as I

was.



This inquisition has led to my having many enemies of the worst and most

dangerous kind, and has given occasion also to many calumnies.  And I am

called wise, for my hearers always imagine that I myself possess the wisdom

which I find wanting in others:  but the truth is, O men of Athens, that

God only is wise; and by his answer he intends to show that the wisdom of

men is worth little or nothing; he is not speaking of Socrates, he is only

using my name by way of illustration, as if he said, He, O men, is the

wisest, who, like Socrates, knows that his wisdom is in truth worth

nothing.  And so I go about the world, obedient to the god, and search and

make enquiry into the wisdom of any one, whether citizen or stranger, who

appears to be wise; and if he is not wise, then in vindication of the

oracle I show him that he is not wise; and my occupation quite absorbs me,

and I have no time to give either to any public matter of interest or to

any concern of my own, but I am in utter poverty by reason of my devotion

to the god.



There is another thing:--young men of the richer classes, who have not much

to do, come about me of their own accord; they like to hear the pretenders

examined, and they often imitate me, and proceed to examine others; there

are plenty of persons, as they quickly discover, who think that they know

something, but really know little or nothing; and then those who are

examined by them instead of being angry with themselves are angry with me: 

This confounded Socrates, they say; this villainous misleader of youth!--

and then if somebody asks them, Why, what evil does he practise or teach?

they do not know, and cannot tell; but in order that they may not appear to

be at a loss, they repeat the ready-made charges which are used against all

philosophers about teaching things up in the clouds and under the earth,

and having no gods, and making the worse appear the better cause; for they

do not like to confess that their pretence of knowledge has been detected--

which is the truth; and as they are numerous and ambitious and energetic,

and are drawn up in battle array and have persuasive tongues, they have

filled your ears with their loud and inveterate calumnies.  And this is the

reason why my three accusers, Meletus and Anytus and Lycon, have set upon

me; Meletus, who has a quarrel with me on behalf of the poets; Anytus, on

behalf of the craftsmen and politicians; Lycon, on behalf of the

rhetoricians:  and as I said at the beginning, I cannot expect to get rid

of such a mass of calumny all in a moment.  And this, O men of Athens, is

the truth and the whole truth; I have concealed nothing, I have dissembled

nothing.  And yet, I know that my plainness of speech makes them hate me,

and what is their hatred but a proof that I am speaking the truth?--Hence

has arisen the prejudice against me; and this is the reason of it, as you

will find out either in this or in any future enquiry.



I have said enough in my defence against the first class of my accusers; I

turn to the second class.  They are headed by Meletus, that good man and

true lover of his country, as he calls himself.  Against these, too, I must

try to make a defence:--Let their affidavit be read:  it contains something

of this kind:  It says that Socrates is a doer of evil, who corrupts the

youth; and who does not believe in the gods of the state, but has other new

divinities of his own.  Such is the charge; and now let us examine the

particular counts.  He says that I am a doer of evil, and corrupt the

youth; but I say, O men of Athens, that Meletus is a doer of evil, in that

he pretends to be in earnest when he is only in jest, and is so eager to

bring men to trial from a pretended zeal and interest about matters in

which he really never had the smallest interest.  And the truth of this I

will endeavour to prove to you.



Come hither, Meletus, and let me ask a question of you.  You think a great

deal about the improvement of youth?



Yes, I do.



Tell the judges, then, who is their improver; for you must know, as you

have taken the pains to discover their corrupter, and are citing and

accusing me before them.  Speak, then, and tell the judges who their

improver is.--Observe, Meletus, that you are silent, and have nothing to

say.  But is not this rather disgraceful, and a very considerable proof of

what I was saying, that you have no interest in the matter?  Speak up,

friend, and tell us who their improver is.



The laws.



But that, my good sir, is not my meaning.  I want to know who the person

is, who, in the first place, knows the laws.



The judges, Socrates, who are present in court.



What, do you mean to say, Meletus, that they are able to instruct and

improve youth?



Certainly they are.



What, all of them, or some only and not others?



All of them.



By the goddess Here, that is good news!  There are plenty of improvers,

then.  And what do you say of the audience,--do they improve them?



Yes, they do.



And the senators?



Yes, the senators improve them.



But perhaps the members of the assembly corrupt them?--or do they too

improve them?



They improve them.



Then every Athenian improves and elevates them; all with the exception of

myself; and I alone am their corrupter?  Is that what you affirm?



That is what I stoutly affirm.



I am very unfortunate if you are right.  But suppose I ask you a question: 

How about horses?  Does one man do them harm and all the world good?  Is

not the exact opposite the truth?  One man is able to do them good, or at

least not many;--the trainer of horses, that is to say, does them good, and

others who have to do with them rather injure them?  Is not that true,

Meletus, of horses, or of any other animals?  Most assuredly it is; whether

you and Anytus say yes or no.  Happy indeed would be the condition of youth

if they had one corrupter only, and all the rest of the world were their

improvers.  But you, Meletus, have sufficiently shown that you never had a

thought about the young:  your carelessness is seen in your not caring

about the very things which you bring against me.



And now, Meletus, I will ask you another question--by Zeus I will:  Which

is better, to live among bad citizens, or among good ones?  Answer, friend,

I say; the question is one which may be easily answered.  Do not the good

do their neighbours good, and the bad do them evil?



Certainly.



And is there anyone who would rather be injured than benefited by those who

live with him?  Answer, my good friend, the law requires you to answer--

does any one like to be injured?



Certainly not.



And when you accuse me of corrupting and deteriorating the youth, do you

allege that I corrupt them intentionally or unintentionally?



Intentionally, I say.



But you have just admitted that the good do their neighbours good, and the

evil do them evil.  Now, is that a truth which your superior wisdom has

recognized thus early in life, and am I, at my age, in such darkness and

ignorance as not to know that if a man with whom I have to live is

corrupted by me, I am very likely to be harmed by him; and yet I corrupt

him, and intentionally, too--so you say, although neither I nor any other

human being is ever likely to be convinced by you.  But either I do not

corrupt them, or I corrupt them unintentionally; and on either view of the

case you lie.  If my offence is unintentional, the law has no cognizance of

unintentional offences: you ought to have taken me privately, and warned

and admonished me; for if I had been better advised, I should have left off

doing what I only did unintentionally--no doubt I should; but you would

have nothing to say to me and refused to teach me.  And now you bring me up

in this court, which is a place not of instruction, but of punishment.



It will be very clear to you, Athenians, as I was saying, that Meletus has

no care at all, great or small, about the matter.  But still I should like

to know, Meletus, in what I am affirmed to corrupt the young.  I suppose

you mean, as I infer from your indictment, that I teach them not to

acknowledge the gods which the state acknowledges, but some other new

divinities or spiritual agencies in their stead.  These are the lessons by

which I corrupt the youth, as you say.



Yes, that I say emphatically.



Then, by the gods, Meletus, of whom we are speaking, tell me and the court,

in somewhat plainer terms, what you mean! for I do not as yet understand

whether you affirm that I teach other men to acknowledge some gods, and

therefore that I do believe in gods, and am not an entire atheist--this you

do not lay to my charge,--but only you say that they are not the same gods

which the city recognizes--the charge is that they are different gods.  Or,

do you mean that I am an atheist simply, and a teacher of atheism?



I mean the latter--that you are a complete atheist.



What an extraordinary statement!  Why do you think so, Meletus?  Do you

mean that I do not believe in the godhead of the sun or moon, like other

men?



I assure you, judges, that he does not:  for he says that the sun is stone,

and the moon earth.



Friend Meletus, you think that you are accusing Anaxagoras:  and you have

but a bad opinion of the judges, if you fancy them illiterate to such a

degree as not to know that these doctrines are found in the books of

Anaxagoras the Clazomenian, which are full of them.  And so, forsooth, the

youth are said to be taught them by Socrates, when there are not

unfrequently exhibitions of them at the theatre (Probably in allusion to

Aristophanes who caricatured, and to Euripides who borrowed the notions of

Anaxagoras, as well as to other dramatic poets.) (price of admission one

drachma at the most); and they might pay their money, and laugh at Socrates

if he pretends to father these extraordinary views.  And so, Meletus, you

really think that I do not believe in any god?



I swear by Zeus that you believe absolutely in none at all.



Nobody will believe you, Meletus, and I am pretty sure that you do not

believe yourself.  I cannot help thinking, men of Athens, that Meletus is

reckless and impudent, and that he has written this indictment in a spirit

of mere wantonness and youthful bravado.  Has he not compounded a riddle,

thinking to try me?  He said to himself:--I shall see whether the wise

Socrates will discover my facetious contradiction, or whether I shall be

able to deceive him and the rest of them.  For he certainly does appear to

me to contradict himself in the indictment as much as if he said that

Socrates is guilty of not believing in the gods, and yet of believing in

them--but this is not like a person who is in earnest.



I should like you, O men of Athens, to join me in examining what I conceive

to be his inconsistency; and do you, Meletus, answer.  And I must remind

the audience of my request that they would not make a disturbance if I

speak in my accustomed manner:



Did ever man, Meletus, believe in the existence of human things, and not of

human beings?...I wish, men of Athens, that he would answer, and not be

always trying to get up an interruption.  Did ever any man believe in

horsemanship, and not in horses? or in flute-playing, and not in flute-

players?  No, my friend; I will answer to you and to the court, as you

refuse to answer for yourself.  There is no man who ever did.  But now

please to answer the next question:  Can a man believe in spiritual and

divine agencies, and not in spirits or demigods?



He cannot.



How lucky I am to have extracted that answer, by the assistance of the

court!  But then you swear in the indictment that I teach and believe in

divine or spiritual agencies (new or old, no matter for that); at any rate,

I believe in spiritual agencies,--so you say and swear in the affidavit;

and yet if I believe in divine beings, how can I help believing in spirits

or demigods;--must I not?  To be sure I must; and therefore I may assume

that your silence gives consent.  Now what are spirits or demigods?  Are

they not either gods or the sons of gods?



Certainly they are.



But this is what I call the facetious riddle invented by you:  the demigods

or spirits are gods, and you say first that I do not believe in gods, and

then again that I do believe in gods; that is, if I believe in demigods. 

For if the demigods are the illegitimate sons of gods, whether by the

nymphs or by any other mothers, of whom they are said to be the sons--what

human being will ever believe that there are no gods if they are the sons

of gods?  You might as well affirm the existence of mules, and deny that of

horses and asses.  Such nonsense, Meletus, could only have been intended by

you to make trial of me.  You have put this into the indictment because you

had nothing real of which to accuse me.  But no one who has a particle of

understanding will ever be convinced by you that the same men can believe

in divine and superhuman things, and yet not believe that there are gods

and demigods and heroes.



I have said enough in answer to the charge of Meletus:  any elaborate

defence is unnecessary, but I know only too well how many are the enmities

which I have incurred, and this is what will be my destruction if I am

destroyed;--not Meletus, nor yet Anytus, but the envy and detraction of the

world, which has been the death of many good men, and will probably be the

death of many more; there is no danger of my being the last of them.



Some one will say:  And are you not ashamed, Socrates, of a course of life

which is likely to bring you to an untimely end?  To him I may fairly

answer:  There you are mistaken:  a man who is good for anything ought not

to calculate the chance of living or dying; he ought only to consider

whether in doing anything he is doing right or wrong--acting the part of a

good man or of a bad.  Whereas, upon your view, the heroes who fell at Troy

were not good for much, and the son of Thetis above all, who altogether

despised danger in comparison with disgrace; and when he was so eager to

slay Hector, his goddess mother said to him, that if he avenged his

companion Patroclus, and slew Hector, he would die himself--'Fate,' she

said, in these or the like words, 'waits for you next after Hector;' he,

receiving this warning, utterly despised danger and death, and instead of

fearing them, feared rather to live in dishonour, and not to avenge his

friend.  'Let me die forthwith,' he replies, 'and be avenged of my enemy,

rather than abide here by the beaked ships, a laughing-stock and a burden

of the earth.'  Had Achilles any thought of death and danger?  For wherever

a man's place is, whether the place which he has chosen or that in which he

has been placed by a commander, there he ought to remain in the hour of

danger; he should not think of death or of anything but of disgrace.  And

this, O men of Athens, is a true saying.



Strange, indeed, would be my conduct, O men of Athens, if I who, when I was

ordered by the generals whom you chose to command me at Potidaea and

Amphipolis and Delium, remained where they placed me, like any other man,

facing death--if now, when, as I conceive and imagine, God orders me to

fulfil the philosopher's mission of searching into myself and other men, I

were to desert my post through fear of death, or any other fear; that would

indeed be strange, and I might justly be arraigned in court for denying the

existence of the gods, if I disobeyed the oracle because I was afraid of

death, fancying that I was wise when I was not wise.  For the fear of death

is indeed the pretence of wisdom, and not real wisdom, being a pretence of

knowing the unknown; and no one knows whether death, which men in their

fear apprehend to be the greatest evil, may not be the greatest good.  Is

not this ignorance of a disgraceful sort, the ignorance which is the

conceit that a man knows what he does not know?  And in this respect only I

believe myself to differ from men in general, and may perhaps claim to be

wiser than they are:--that whereas I know but little of the world below, I

do not suppose that I know:  but I do know that injustice and disobedience

to a better, whether God or man, is evil and dishonourable, and I will

never fear or avoid a possible good rather than a certain evil.  And

therefore if you let me go now, and are not convinced by Anytus, who said

that since I had been prosecuted I must be put to death; (or if not that I

ought never to have been prosecuted at all); and that if I escape now, your

sons will all be utterly ruined by listening to my words--if you say to me,

Socrates, this time we will not mind Anytus, and you shall be let off, but

upon one condition, that you are not to enquire and speculate in this way

any more, and that if you are caught doing so again you shall die;--if this

was the condition on which you let me go, I should reply:  Men of Athens, I

honour and love you; but I shall obey God rather than you, and while I have

life and strength I shall never cease from the practice and teaching of

philosophy, exhorting any one whom I meet and saying to him after my

manner:  You, my friend,--a citizen of the great and mighty and wise city

of Athens,--are you not ashamed of heaping up the greatest amount of money

and honour and reputation, and caring so little about wisdom and truth and

the greatest improvement of the soul, which you never regard or heed at

all?  And if the person with whom I am arguing, says:  Yes, but I do care;

then I do not leave him or let him go at once; but I proceed to interrogate

and examine and cross-examine him, and if I think that he has no virtue in

him, but only says that he has, I reproach him with undervaluing the

greater, and overvaluing the less.  And I shall repeat the same words to

every one whom I meet, young and old, citizen and alien, but especially to

the citizens, inasmuch as they are my brethren.  For know that this is the

command of God; and I believe that no greater good has ever happened in the

state than my service to the God.  For I do nothing but go about persuading

you all, old and young alike, not to take thought for your persons or your

properties, but first and chiefly to care about the greatest improvement of

the soul.  I tell you that virtue is not given by money, but that from

virtue comes money and every other good of man, public as well as private.

This is my teaching, and if this is the doctrine which corrupts the youth,

I am a mischievous person.  But if any one says that this is not my

teaching, he is speaking an untruth.  Wherefore, O men of Athens, I say to

you, do as Anytus bids or not as Anytus bids, and either acquit me or not;

but whichever you do, understand that I shall never alter my ways, not even

if I have to die many times.



Men of Athens, do not interrupt, but hear me; there was an understanding

between us that you should hear me to the end:  I have something more to

say, at which you may be inclined to cry out; but I believe that to hear me

will be good for you, and therefore I beg that you will not cry out.  I

would have you know, that if you kill such an one as I am, you will injure

yourselves more than you will injure me.  Nothing will injure me, not

Meletus nor yet Anytus--they cannot, for a bad man is not permitted to

injure a better than himself.  I do not deny that Anytus may, perhaps, kill

him, or drive him into exile, or deprive him of civil rights; and he may

imagine, and others may imagine, that he is inflicting a great injury upon

him:  but there I do not agree.  For the evil of doing as he is doing--the

evil of unjustly taking away the life of another--is greater far.



And now, Athenians, I am not going to argue for my own sake, as you may

think, but for yours, that you may not sin against the God by condemning

me, who am his gift to you.  For if you kill me you will not easily find a

successor to me, who, if I may use such a ludicrous figure of speech, am a

sort of gadfly, given to the state by God; and the state is a great and

noble steed who is tardy in his motions owing to his very size, and

requires to be stirred into life.  I am that gadfly which God has attached

to the state, and all day long and in all places am always fastening upon

you, arousing and persuading and reproaching you.  You will not easily find

another like me, and therefore I would advise you to spare me.  I dare say

that you may feel out of temper (like a person who is suddenly awakened

from sleep), and you think that you might easily strike me dead as Anytus

advises, and then you would sleep on for the remainder of your lives,

unless God in his care of you sent you another gadfly.  When I say that I

am given to you by God, the proof of my mission is this:--if I had been

like other men, I should not have neglected all my own concerns or

patiently seen the neglect of them during all these years, and have been

doing yours, coming to you individually like a father or elder brother,

exhorting you to regard virtue; such conduct, I say, would be unlike human

nature.  If I had gained anything, or if my exhortations had been paid,

there would have been some sense in my doing so; but now, as you will

perceive, not even the impudence of my accusers dares to say that I have

ever exacted or sought pay of any one; of that they have no witness.  And I

have a sufficient witness to the truth of what I say--my poverty.



Some one may wonder why I go about in private giving advice and busying

myself with the concerns of others, but do not venture to come forward in

public and advise the state.  I will tell you why.  You have heard me speak

at sundry times and in divers places of an oracle or sign which comes to

me, and is the divinity which Meletus ridicules in the indictment.  This

sign, which is a kind of voice, first began to come to me when I was a

child; it always forbids but never commands me to do anything which I am

going to do.  This is what deters me from being a politician.  And rightly,

as I think.  For I am certain, O men of Athens, that if I had engaged in

politics, I should have perished long ago, and done no good either to you

or to myself.  And do not be offended at my telling you the truth:  for the

truth is, that no man who goes to war with you or any other multitude,

honestly striving against the many lawless and unrighteous deeds which are

done in a state, will save his life; he who will fight for the right, if he

would live even for a brief space, must have a private station and not a

public one.



I can give you convincing evidence of what I say, not words only, but what

you value far more--actions.  Let me relate to you a passage of my own life

which will prove to you that I should never have yielded to injustice from

any fear of death, and that 'as I should have refused to yield' I must have

died at once.  I will tell you a tale of the courts, not very interesting

perhaps, but nevertheless true.  The only office of state which I ever

held, O men of Athens, was that of senator:  the tribe Antiochis, which is

my tribe, had the presidency at the trial of the generals who had not taken

up the bodies of the slain after the battle of Arginusae; and you proposed

to try them in a body, contrary to law, as you all thought afterwards; but

at the time I was the only one of the Prytanes who was opposed to the

illegality, and I gave my vote against you; and when the orators threatened

to impeach and arrest me, and you called and shouted, I made up my mind

that I would run the risk, having law and justice with me, rather than take

part in your injustice because I feared imprisonment and death.  This

happened in the days of the democracy.  But when the oligarchy of the

Thirty was in power, they sent for me and four others into the rotunda, and

bade us bring Leon the Salaminian from Salamis, as they wanted to put him

to death.  This was a specimen of the sort of commands which they were

always giving with the view of implicating as many as possible in their

crimes; and then I showed, not in word only but in deed, that, if I may be

allowed to use such an expression, I cared not a straw for death, and that

my great and only care was lest I should do an unrighteous or unholy thing. 

For the strong arm of that oppressive power did not frighten me into doing

wrong; and when we came out of the rotunda the other four went to Salamis

and fetched Leon, but I went quietly home.  For which I might have lost my

life, had not the power of the Thirty shortly afterwards come to an end. 

And many will witness to my words.



Now do you really imagine that I could have survived all these years, if I

had led a public life, supposing that like a good man I had always

maintained the right and had made justice, as I ought, the first thing?  No

indeed, men of Athens, neither I nor any other man.  But I have been always

the same in all my actions, public as well as private, and never have I

yielded any base compliance to those who are slanderously termed my

disciples, or to any other.  Not that I have any regular disciples.  But if

any one likes to come and hear me while I am pursuing my mission, whether

he be young or old, he is not excluded.  Nor do I converse only with those

who pay; but any one, whether he be rich or poor, may ask and answer me and

listen to my words; and whether he turns out to be a bad man or a good one,

neither result can be justly imputed to me; for I never taught or professed

to teach him anything.  And if any one says that he has ever learned or

heard anything from me in private which all the world has not heard, let me

tell you that he is lying.



But I shall be asked, Why do people delight in continually conversing with

you?  I have told you already, Athenians, the whole truth about this

matter:  they like to hear the cross-examination of the pretenders to

wisdom; there is amusement in it.  Now this duty of cross-examining other

men has been imposed upon me by God; and has been signified to me by

oracles, visions, and in every way in which the will of divine power was

ever intimated to any one.  This is true, O Athenians, or, if not true,

would be soon refuted.  If I am or have been corrupting the youth, those of

them who are now grown up and have become sensible that I gave them bad

advice in the days of their youth should come forward as accusers, and take

their revenge; or if they do not like to come themselves, some of their

relatives, fathers, brothers, or other kinsmen, should say what evil their

families have suffered at my hands.  Now is their time.  Many of them I see

in the court.  There is Crito, who is of the same age and of the same deme

with myself, and there is Critobulus his son, whom I also see.  Then again

there is Lysanias of Sphettus, who is the father of Aeschines--he is

present; and also there is Antiphon of Cephisus, who is the father of

Epigenes; and there are the brothers of several who have associated with

me.  There is Nicostratus the son of Theosdotides, and the brother of

Theodotus (now Theodotus himself is dead, and therefore he, at any rate,

will not seek to stop him); and there is Paralus the son of Demodocus, who

had a brother Theages; and Adeimantus the son of Ariston, whose brother

Plato is present; and Aeantodorus, who is the brother of Apollodorus, whom

I also see.  I might mention a great many others, some of whom Meletus

should have produced as witnesses in the course of his speech; and let him

still produce them, if he has forgotten--I will make way for him.  And let

him say, if he has any testimony of the sort which he can produce.  Nay,

Athenians, the very opposite is the truth.  For all these are ready to

witness on behalf of the corrupter, of the injurer of their kindred, as

Meletus and Anytus call me; not the corrupted youth only--there might have

been a motive for that--but their uncorrupted elder relatives.  Why should

they too support me with their testimony?  Why, indeed, except for the sake

of truth and justice, and because they know that I am speaking the truth,

and that Meletus is a liar.



Well, Athenians, this and the like of this is all the defence which I have

to offer.  Yet a word more.  Perhaps there may be some one who is offended

at me, when he calls to mind how he himself on a similar, or even a less

serious occasion, prayed and entreated the judges with many tears, and how

he produced his children in court, which was a moving spectacle, together

with a host of relations and friends; whereas I, who am probably in danger

of my life, will do none of these things.  The contrast may occur to his

mind, and he may be set against me, and vote in anger because he is

displeased at me on this account.  Now if there be such a person among

you,--mind, I do not say that there is,--to him I may fairly reply:  My

friend, I am a man, and like other men, a creature of flesh and blood, and

not 'of wood or stone,' as Homer says; and I have a family, yes, and sons,

O Athenians, three in number, one almost a man, and two others who are

still young; and yet I will not bring any of them hither in order to

petition you for an acquittal.  And why not?  Not from any self-assertion

or want of respect for you.  Whether I am or am not afraid of death is

another question, of which I will not now speak.  But, having regard to

public opinion, I feel that such conduct would be discreditable to myself,

and to you, and to the whole state.  One who has reached my years, and who

has a name for wisdom, ought not to demean himself.  Whether this opinion

of me be deserved or not, at any rate the world has decided that Socrates

is in some way superior to other men.  And if those among you who are said

to be superior in wisdom and courage, and any other virtue, demean

themselves in this way, how shameful is their conduct!  I have seen men of

reputation, when they have been condemned, behaving in the strangest

manner:  they seemed to fancy that they were going to suffer something

dreadful if they died, and that they could be immortal if you only allowed

them to live; and I think that such are a dishonour to the state, and that

any stranger coming in would have said of them that the most eminent men of

Athens, to whom the Athenians themselves give honour and command, are no

better than women.  And I say that these things ought not to be done by

those of us who have a reputation; and if they are done, you ought not to

permit them; you ought rather to show that you are far more disposed to

condemn the man who gets up a doleful scene and makes the city ridiculous,

than him who holds his peace.



But, setting aside the question of public opinion, there seems to be

something wrong in asking a favour of a judge, and thus procuring an

acquittal, instead of informing and convincing him.  For his duty is, not

to make a present of justice, but to give judgment; and he has sworn that

he will judge according to the laws, and not according to his own good

pleasure; and we ought not to encourage you, nor should you allow

yourselves to be encouraged, in this habit of perjury--there can be no

piety in that.  Do not then require me to do what I consider dishonourable

and impious and wrong, especially now, when I am being tried for impiety on

the indictment of Meletus.  For if, O men of Athens, by force of persuasion

and entreaty I could overpower your oaths, then I should be teaching you to

believe that there are no gods, and in defending should simply convict

myself of the charge of not believing in them.  But that is not so--far

otherwise.  For I do believe that there are gods, and in a sense higher

than that in which any of my accusers believe in them.  And to you and to

God I commit my cause, to be determined by you as is best for you and me.



...



There are many reasons why I am not grieved, O men of Athens, at the vote

of condemnation.  I expected it, and am only surprised that the votes are

so nearly equal; for I had thought that the majority against me would have

been far larger; but now, had thirty votes gone over to the other side, I

should have been acquitted.  And I may say, I think, that I have escaped

Meletus.  I may say more; for without the assistance of Anytus and Lycon,

any one may see that he would not have had a fifth part of the votes, as

the law requires, in which case he would have incurred a fine of a thousand

drachmae.



And so he proposes death as the penalty.  And what shall I propose on my

part, O men of Athens?  Clearly that which is my due.  And what is my due?

What return shall be made to the man who has never had the wit to be idle

during his whole life; but has been careless of what the many care for--

wealth, and family interests, and military offices, and speaking in the

assembly, and magistracies, and plots, and parties.  Reflecting that I was

really too honest a man to be a politician and live, I did not go where I

could do no good to you or to myself; but where I could do the greatest

good privately to every one of you, thither I went, and sought to persuade

every man among you that he must look to himself, and seek virtue and

wisdom before he looks to his private interests, and look to the state

before he looks to the interests of the state; and that this should be the

order which he observes in all his actions.  What shall be done to such an

one?  Doubtless some good thing, O men of Athens, if he has his reward; and

the good should be of a kind suitable to him.  What would be a reward

suitable to a poor man who is your benefactor, and who desires leisure that

he may instruct you?  There can be no reward so fitting as maintenance in

the Prytaneum, O men of Athens, a reward which he deserves far more than

the citizen who has won the prize at Olympia in the horse or chariot race,

whether the chariots were drawn by two horses or by many.  For I am in

want, and he has enough; and he only gives you the appearance of happiness,

and I give you the reality.  And if I am to estimate the penalty fairly, I

should say that maintenance in the Prytaneum is the just return.



Perhaps you think that I am braving you in what I am saying now, as in what

I said before about the tears and prayers.  But this is not so.  I speak

rather because I am convinced that I never intentionally wronged any one,

although I cannot convince you--the time has been too short; if there were

a law at Athens, as there is in other cities, that a capital cause should

not be decided in one day, then I believe that I should have convinced you.

But I cannot in a moment refute great slanders; and, as I am convinced that

I never wronged another, I will assuredly not wrong myself.  I will not say

of myself that I deserve any evil, or propose any penalty.  Why should I?

because I am afraid of the penalty of death which Meletus proposes?  When I

do not know whether death is a good or an evil, why should I propose a

penalty which would certainly be an evil?  Shall I say imprisonment?  And

why should I live in prison, and be the slave of the magistrates of the

year--of the Eleven?  Or shall the penalty be a fine, and imprisonment

until the fine is paid?  There is the same objection.  I should have to lie

in prison, for money I have none, and cannot pay.  And if I say exile (and

this may possibly be the penalty which you will affix), I must indeed be

blinded by the love of life, if I am so irrational as to expect that when

you, who are my own citizens, cannot endure my discourses and words, and

have found them so grievous and odious that you will have no more of them,

others are likely to endure me.  No indeed, men of Athens, that is not very

likely.  And what a life should I lead, at my age, wandering from city to

city, ever changing my place of exile, and always being driven out!  For I

am quite sure that wherever I go, there, as here, the young men will flock

to me; and if I drive them away, their elders will drive me out at their

request; and if I let them come, their fathers and friends will drive me

out for their sakes.



Some one will say:  Yes, Socrates, but cannot you hold your tongue, and

then you may go into a foreign city, and no one will interfere with you? 

Now I have great difficulty in making you understand my answer to this. 

For if I tell you that to do as you say would be a disobedience to the God,

and therefore that I cannot hold my tongue, you will not believe that I am

serious; and if I say again that daily to discourse about virtue, and of

those other things about which you hear me examining myself and others, is

the greatest good of man, and that the unexamined life is not worth living,

you are still less likely to believe me.  Yet I say what is true, although

a thing of which it is hard for me to persuade you.  Also, I have never

been accustomed to think that I deserve to suffer any harm.  Had I money I

might have estimated the offence at what I was able to pay, and not have

been much the worse.  But I have none, and therefore I must ask you to

proportion the fine to my means.  Well, perhaps I could afford a mina, and

therefore I propose that penalty:  Plato, Crito, Critobulus, and

Apollodorus, my friends here, bid me say thirty minae, and they will be the

sureties.  Let thirty minae be the penalty; for which sum they will be

ample security to you.



...



Not much time will be gained, O Athenians, in return for the evil name

which you will get from the detractors of the city, who will say that you

killed Socrates, a wise man; for they will call me wise, even although I am

not wise, when they want to reproach you.  If you had waited a little

while, your desire would have been fulfilled in the course of nature.  For

I am far advanced in years, as you may perceive, and not far from death.  I

am speaking now not to all of you, but only to those who have condemned me

to death.  And I have another thing to say to them:  you think that I was

convicted because I had no words of the sort which would have procured my

acquittal--I mean, if I had thought fit to leave nothing undone or unsaid.

Not so; the deficiency which led to my conviction was not of words--

certainly not.  But I had not the boldness or impudence or inclination to

address you as you would have liked me to do, weeping and wailing and

lamenting, and saying and doing many things which you have been accustomed

to hear from others, and which, as I maintain, are unworthy of me.  I

thought at the time that I ought not to do anything common or mean when in

danger:  nor do I now repent of the style of my defence; I would rather die

having spoken after my manner, than speak in your manner and live.  For

neither in war nor yet at law ought I or any man to use every way of

escaping death.  Often in battle there can be no doubt that if a man will

throw away his arms, and fall on his knees before his pursuers, he may

escape death; and in other dangers there are other ways of escaping death,

if a man is willing to say and do anything.  The difficulty, my friends, is

not to avoid death, but to avoid unrighteousness; for that runs faster than

death.  I am old and move slowly, and the slower runner has overtaken me,

and my accusers are keen and quick, and the faster runner, who is

unrighteousness, has overtaken them.  And now I depart hence condemned by

you to suffer the penalty of death,--they too go their ways condemned by

the truth to suffer the penalty of villainy and wrong; and I must abide by

my award--let them abide by theirs.  I suppose that these things may be

regarded as fated,--and I think that they are well.



And now, O men who have condemned me, I would fain prophesy to you; for I

am about to die, and in the hour of death men are gifted with prophetic

power.  And I prophesy to you who are my murderers, that immediately after

my departure punishment far heavier than you have inflicted on me will

surely await you.  Me you have killed because you wanted to escape the

accuser, and not to give an account of your lives.  But that will not be as

you suppose:  far otherwise.  For I say that there will be more accusers of

you than there are now; accusers whom hitherto I have restrained:  and as

they are younger they will be more inconsiderate with you, and you will be

more offended at them.  If you think that by killing men you can prevent

some one from censuring your evil lives, you are mistaken; that is not a

way of escape which is either possible or honourable; the easiest and the

noblest way is not to be disabling others, but to be improving yourselves. 

This is the prophecy which I utter before my departure to the judges who

have condemned me.



Friends, who would have acquitted me, I would like also to talk with you

about the thing which has come to pass, while the magistrates are busy, and

before I go to the place at which I must die.  Stay then a little, for we

may as well talk with one another while there is time.  You are my friends,

and I should like to show you the meaning of this event which has happened

to me.  O my judges--for you I may truly call judges--I should like to tell

you of a wonderful circumstance.  Hitherto the divine faculty of which the

internal oracle is the source has constantly been in the habit of opposing

me even about trifles, if I was going to make a slip or error in any

matter; and now as you see there has come upon me that which may be

thought, and is generally believed to be, the last and worst evil.  But the

oracle made no sign of opposition, either when I was leaving my house in

the morning, or when I was on my way to the court, or while I was speaking,

at anything which I was going to say; and yet I have often been stopped in

the middle of a speech, but now in nothing I either said or did touching

the matter in hand has the oracle opposed me.  What do I take to be the

explanation of this silence?  I will tell you.  It is an intimation that

what has happened to me is a good, and that those of us who think that

death is an evil are in error.  For the customary sign would surely have

opposed me had I been going to evil and not to good.



Let us reflect in another way, and we shall see that there is great reason

to hope that death is a good; for one of two things--either death is a

state of nothingness and utter unconsciousness, or, as men say, there is a

change and migration of the soul from this world to another.  Now if you

suppose that there is no consciousness, but a sleep like the sleep of him

who is undisturbed even by dreams, death will be an unspeakable gain.  For

if a person were to select the night in which his sleep was undisturbed

even by dreams, and were to compare with this the other days and nights of

his life, and then were to tell us how many days and nights he had passed

in the course of his life better and more pleasantly than this one, I think

that any man, I will not say a private man, but even the great king will

not find many such days or nights, when compared with the others.  Now if

death be of such a nature, I say that to die is gain; for eternity is then

only a single night.  But if death is the journey to another place, and

there, as men say, all the dead abide, what good, O my friends and judges,

can be greater than this?  If indeed when the pilgrim arrives in the world

below, he is delivered from the professors of justice in this world, and

finds the true judges who are said to give judgment there, Minos and

Rhadamanthus and Aeacus and Triptolemus, and other sons of God who were

righteous in their own life, that pilgrimage will be worth making.  What

would not a man give if he might converse with Orpheus and Musaeus and

Hesiod and Homer?  Nay, if this be true, let me die again and again.  I

myself, too, shall have a wonderful interest in there meeting and

conversing with Palamedes, and Ajax the son of Telamon, and any other

ancient hero who has suffered death through an unjust judgment; and there

will be no small pleasure, as I think, in comparing my own sufferings with

theirs.  Above all, I shall then be able to continue my search into true

and false knowledge; as in this world, so also in the next; and I shall

find out who is wise, and who pretends to be wise, and is not.  What would

not a man give, O judges, to be able to examine the leader of the great

Trojan expedition; or Odysseus or Sisyphus, or numberless others, men and

women too!  What infinite delight would there be in conversing with them

and asking them questions!  In another world they do not put a man to death

for asking questions:  assuredly not.  For besides being happier than we

are, they will be immortal, if what is said is true.



Wherefore, O judges, be of good cheer about death, and know of a certainty,

that no evil can happen to a good man, either in life or after death.  He

and his are not neglected by the gods; nor has my own approaching end

happened by mere chance.  But I see clearly that the time had arrived when

it was better for me to die and be released from trouble; wherefore the

oracle gave no sign.  For which reason, also, I am not angry with my

condemners, or with my accusers; they have done me no harm, although they

did not mean to do me any good; and for this I may gently blame them.



Still I have a favour to ask of them.  When my sons are grown up, I would

ask you, O my friends, to punish them; and I would have you trouble them,

as I have troubled you, if they seem to care about riches, or anything,

more than about virtue; or if they pretend to be something when they are

really nothing,--then reprove them, as I have reproved you, for not caring

about that for which they ought to care, and thinking that they are

something when they are really nothing.  And if you do this, both I and my

sons will have received justice at your hands.



The hour of departure has arrived, and we go our ways--I to die, and you to

live.  Which is better God only knows.








End 



Charmides



by Plato, translated by Benjamin Jowett.





THE DIALOGUES OF PLATO


TRANSLATED INTO ENGLISH WITH ANALYSES AND INTRODUCTIONS



BY



B. JOWETT, M.A.



Master of Balliol College

Regius Professor of Greek in the University of Oxford

Doctor in Theology of the University of Leyden





TO MY FORMER PUPILS



in Balliol College and in the University of Oxford who during fifty years

have been the best of friends to me these volumes are inscribed in grateful

recognition of their never failing attachment.





The additions and alterations which have been made, both in the

Introductions and in the Text of this Edition, affect at least a third of

the work.



Having regard to the extent of these alterations, and to the annoyance

which is naturally felt by the owner of a book at the possession of it in

an inferior form, and still more keenly by the writer himself, who must

always desire to be read as he is at his best, I have thought that the

possessor of either of the former Editions (1870 and 1876) might wish to

exchange it for the present one.  I have therefore arranged that those who

would like to make this exchange, on depositing a perfect and undamaged

copy of the first or second Edition with any agent of the Clarendon Press,

shall be entitled to receive a copy of a new Edition at half-price.





PREFACE TO THE FIRST EDITION.



The Text which has been mostly followed in this Translation of Plato is the

latest 8vo. edition of Stallbaum; the principal deviations are noted at the

bottom of the page.



I have to acknowledge many obligations to old friends and pupils.  These

are:--Mr. John Purves, Fellow of Balliol College, with whom I have revised

about half of the entire Translation; the Rev. Professor Campbell, of St.

Andrews, who has helped me in the revision of several parts of the work,

especially of the Theaetetus, Sophist, and Politicus; Mr. Robinson Ellis,

Fellow of Trinity College, and Mr. Alfred Robinson, Fellow of New College,

who read with me the Cratylus and the Gorgias; Mr. Paravicini, Student of

Christ Church, who assisted me in the Symposium; Mr. Raper, Fellow of

Queen's College, Mr. Monro, Fellow of Oriel College, and Mr. Shadwell,

Student of Christ Church, who gave me similar assistance in the Laws.  Dr.

Greenhill, of Hastings, has also kindly sent me remarks on the

physiological part of the Timaeus, which I have inserted as corrections

under the head of errata at the end of the Introduction.  The degree of

accuracy which I have been enabled to attain is in great measure due to

these gentlemen, and I heartily thank them for the pains and time which

they have bestowed on my work.



I have further to explain how far I have received help from other labourers

in the same field.  The books which I have found of most use are Steinhart

and Muller's German Translation of Plato with Introductions; Zeller's

'Philosophie der Griechen,' and 'Platonische Studien;' Susemihl's

'Genetische Entwickelung der Paltonischen Philosophie;' Hermann's

'Geschichte der Platonischen Philosophie;' Bonitz, 'Platonische Studien;'

Stallbaum's Notes and Introductions; Professor Campbell's editions of the

'Theaetetus,' the 'Sophist,' and the 'Politicus;' Professor Thompson's

'Phaedrus;' Th. Martin's 'Etudes sur le Timee;' Mr. Poste's edition and

translation of the 'Philebus;' the Translation of the 'Republic,' by

Messrs. Davies and Vaughan, and the Translation of the 'Gorgias,' by Mr.

Cope.



I have also derived much assistance from the great work of Mr. Grote, which

contains excellent analyses of the Dialogues, and is rich in original

thoughts and observations.  I agree with him in rejecting as futile the

attempt of Schleiermacher and others to arrange the Dialogues of Plato into

a harmonious whole.  Any such arrangement appears to me not only to be

unsupported by evidence, but to involve an anachronism in the history of

philosophy.  There is a common spirit in the writings of Plato, but not a

unity of design in the whole, nor perhaps a perfect unity in any single

Dialogue.  The hypothesis of a general plan which is worked out in the

successive Dialogues is an after-thought of the critics who have attributed

a system to writings belonging to an age when system had not as yet taken

possession of philosophy.



If Mr. Grote should do me the honour to read any portion of this work he

will probably remark that I have endeavoured to approach Plato from a point

of view which is opposed to his own.  The aim of the Introductions in these

volumes has been to represent Plato as the father of Idealism, who is not

to be measured by the standard of utilitarianism or any other modern

philosophical system.  He is the poet or maker of ideas, satisfying the

wants of his own age, providing the instruments of thought for future

generations.  He is no dreamer, but a great philosophical genius struggling

with the unequal conditions of light and knowledge under which he is

living.  He may be illustrated by the writings of moderns, but he must be

interpreted by his own, and by his place in the history of philosophy.  We

are not concerned to determine what is the residuum of truth which remains

for ourselves.  His truth may not be our truth, and nevertheless may have

an extraordinary value and interest for us.



I cannot agree with Mr. Grote in admitting as genuine all the writings

commonly attributed to Plato in antiquity, any more than with Schaarschmidt

and some other German critics who reject nearly half of them.  The German

critics, to whom I refer, proceed chiefly on grounds of internal evidence;

they appear to me to lay too much stress on the variety of doctrine and

style, which must be equally acknowledged as a fact, even in the Dialogues

regarded by Schaarschmidt as genuine, e.g. in the Phaedrus, or Symposium,

when compared with the Laws.  He who admits works so different in style and

matter to have been the composition of the same author, need have no

difficulty in admitting the Sophist or the Politicus.  (The negative

argument adduced by the same school of critics, which is based on the

silence of Aristotle, is not worthy of much consideration.  For why should

Aristotle, because he has quoted several Dialogues of Plato, have quoted

them all?  Something must be allowed to chance, and to the nature of the

subjects treated of in them.)  On the other hand, Mr. Grote trusts mainly

to the Alexandrian Canon.  But I hardly think that we are justified in

attributing much weight to the authority of the Alexandrian librarians in

an age when there was no regular publication of books, and every temptation

to forge them; and in which the writings of a school were naturally

attributed to the founder of the school.  And even without intentional

fraud, there was an inclination to believe rather than to enquire.  Would

Mr. Grote accept as genuine all the writings which he finds in the lists of

learned ancients attributed to Hippocrates, to Xenophon, to Aristotle?  The

Alexandrian Canon of the Platonic writings is deprived of credit by the

admission of the Epistles, which are not only unworthy of Plato, and in

several passages plagiarized from him, but flagrantly at variance with

historical fact.  It will be seen also that I do not agree with Mr. Grote's

views about the Sophists; nor with the low estimate which he has formed of

Plato's Laws; nor with his opinion respecting Plato's doctrine of the

rotation of the earth.  But I 'am not going to lay hands on my father

Parmenides' (Soph.), who will, I hope, forgive me for differing from him on

these points.  I cannot close this Preface without expressing my deep

respect for his noble and gentle character, and the great services which he

has rendered to Greek Literature.



Balliol College,

January, 1871.





PREFACE TO THE SECOND AND THIRD EDITIONS.



In publishing a Second Edition (1875) of the Dialogues of Plato in English,

I had to acknowledge the assistance of several friends:  of the Rev. G.G.

Bradley, Master of University College, now Dean of Westminster, who sent me

some valuable remarks on the Phaedo; of Dr. Greenhill, who had again

revised a portion of the Timaeus; of Mr. R.L. Nettleship, Fellow and Tutor

of Balliol College, to whom I was indebted for an excellent criticism of

the Parmenides; and, above all, of the Rev. Professor Campbell of St.

Andrews, and Mr. Paravicini, late Student of Christ Church and Tutor of

Balliol College, with whom I had read over the greater part of the

translation.  I was also indebted to Mr. Evelyn Abbott, Fellow and Tutor of

Balliol College, for a complete and accurate index.



In this, the Third Edition, I am under very great obligations to Mr.

Matthew Knight, who has not only favoured me with valuable suggestions

throughout the work, but has largely extended the Index (from 61 to 175

pages) and translated the Eryxias and Second Alcibiades; and to Mr Frank

Fletcher, of Balliol College, my Secretary.  I am also considerably

indebted to Mr. J.W. Mackail, late Fellow of Balliol College, who read over

the Republic in the Second Edition and noted several inaccuracies.



In both editions the Introductions to the Dialogues have been enlarged, and

essays on subjects having an affinity to the Platonic Dialogues have been

introduced into several of them.  The analyses have been corrected, and

innumerable alterations have been made in the Text.  There have been added

also, in the Third Edition, headings to the pages and a marginal analysis

to the text of each dialogue.



At the end of a long task, the translator may without impropriety point out

the difficulties which he has had to encounter.  These have been far

greater than he would have anticipated; nor is he at all sanguine that he

has succeeded in overcoming them.  Experience has made him feel that a

translation, like a picture, is dependent for its effect on very minute

touches; and that it is a work of infinite pains, to be returned to in many

moods and viewed in different lights.



I.  An English translation ought to be idiomatic and interesting, not only

to the scholar, but to the unlearned reader.  Its object should not simply

be to render the words of one language into the words of another or to

preserve the construction and order of the original;--this is the ambition

of a schoolboy, who wishes to show that he has made a good use of his

Dictionary and Grammar; but is quite unworthy of the translator, who seeks

to produce on his reader an impression similar or nearly similar to that

produced by the original.  To him the feeling should be more important than

the exact word.  He should remember Dryden's quaint admonition not to

'lacquey by the side of his author, but to mount up behind him.' 

(Dedication to the Aeneis.)  He must carry in his mind a comprehensive view

of the whole work, of what has preceded and of what is to follow,--as well

as of the meaning of particular passages.  His version should be based, in

the first instance, on an intimate knowledge of the text; but the precise

order and arrangement of the words may be left to fade out of sight, when

the translation begins to take shape.  He must form a general idea of the

two languages, and reduce the one to the terms of the other.  His work

should be rhythmical and varied, the right admixture of words and

syllables, and even of letters, should be carefully attended to; above all,

it should be equable in style.  There must also be quantity, which is

necessary in prose as well as in verse:  clauses, sentences, paragraphs,

must be in due proportion.  Metre and even rhyme may be rarely admitted;

though neither is a legitimate element of prose writing, they may help to

lighten a cumbrous expression (Symp.).  The translation should retain as

far as possible the characteristic qualities of the ancient writer--his

freedom, grace, simplicity, stateliness, weight, precision; or the best

part of him will be lost to the English reader.  It should read as an

original work, and should also be the most faithful transcript which can be

made of the language from which the translation is taken, consistently with

the first requirement of all, that it be English.  Further, the translation

being English, it should also be perfectly intelligible in itself without

reference to the Greek, the English being really the more lucid and exact

of the two languages.  In some respects it may be maintained that ordinary

English writing, such as the newspaper article, is superior to Plato:  at

any rate it is couched in language which is very rarely obscure.  On the

other hand, the greatest writers of Greece, Thucydides, Plato, Aeschylus,

Sophocles, Pindar, Demosthenes, are generally those which are found to be

most difficult and to diverge most widely from the English idiom.  The

translator will often have to convert the more abstract Greek into the more

concrete English, or vice versa, and he ought not to force upon one

language the character of another.  In some cases, where the order is

confused, the expression feeble, the emphasis misplaced, or the sense

somewhat faulty, he will not strive in his rendering to reproduce these

characteristics, but will re-write the passage as his author would have

written it at first, had he not been 'nodding'; and he will not hesitate to

supply anything which, owing to the genius of the language or some accident

of composition, is omitted in the Greek, but is necessary to make the

English clear and consecutive.



It is difficult to harmonize all these conflicting elements.  In a

translation of Plato what may be termed the interests of the Greek and

English are often at war with one another.  In framing the English sentence

we are insensibly diverted from the exact meaning of the Greek; when we

return to the Greek we are apt to cramp and overlay the English.  We

substitute, we compromise, we give and take, we add a little here and leave

out a little there.  The translator may sometimes be allowed to sacrifice

minute accuracy for the sake of clearness and sense.  But he is not

therefore at liberty to omit words and turns of expression which the

English language is quite capable of supplying.  He must be patient and

self-controlled; he must not be easily run away with.  Let him never allow

the attraction of a favourite expression, or a sonorous cadence, to

overpower his better judgment, or think much of an ornament which is out of

keeping with the general character of his work.  He must ever be casting

his eyes upwards from the copy to the original, and down again from the

original to the copy (Rep.).  His calling is not held in much honour by the

world of scholars; yet he himself may be excused for thinking it a kind of

glory to have lived so many years in the companionship of one of the

greatest of human intelligences, and in some degree, more perhaps than

others, to have had the privilege of understanding him (Sir Joshua

Reynolds' Lectures: Disc. xv.).



There are fundamental differences in Greek and English, of which some may

be managed while others remain intractable.  (1).  The structure of the

Greek language is partly adversative and alternative, and partly

inferential; that is to say, the members of a sentence are either opposed

to one another, or one of them expresses the cause or effect or condition

or reason of another.  The two tendencies may be called the horizontal and

perpendicular lines of the language; and the opposition or inference is

often much more one of words than of ideas.  But modern languages have

rubbed off this adversative and inferential form:  they have fewer links of

connection, there is less mortar in the interstices, and they are content

to place sentences side by side, leaving their relation to one another to

be gathered from their position or from the context.  The difficulty of

preserving the effect of the Greek is increased by the want of adversative

and inferential particles in English, and by the nice sense of tautology

which characterizes all modern languages.  We cannot have two 'buts' or two

'fors' in the same sentence where the Greek repeats (Greek).  There is a

similar want of particles expressing the various gradations of objective

and subjective thought--(Greek) and the like, which are so thickly

scattered over the Greek page.  Further, we can only realize to a very

imperfect degree the common distinction between (Greek), and the

combination of the two suggests a subtle shade of negation which cannot be

expressed in English.  And while English is more dependent than Greek upon

the apposition of clauses and sentences, yet there is a difficulty in using

this form of construction owing to the want of case endings.  For the same

reason there cannot be an equal variety in the order of words or an equal

nicety of emphasis in English as in Greek.



(2) The formation of the sentence and of the paragraph greatly differs in

Greek and English.  The lines by which they are divided are generally much

more marked in modern languages than in ancient.  Both sentences and

paragraphs are more precise and definite--they do not run into one another.

They are also more regularly developed from within.  The sentence marks

another step in an argument or a narrative or a statement; in reading a

paragraph we silently turn over the page and arrive at some new view or

aspect of the subject.  Whereas in Plato we are not always certain where a

sentence begins and ends; and paragraphs are few and far between.  The

language is distributed in a different way, and less articulated than in

English.  For it was long before the true use of the period was attained by

the classical writers both in poetry or prose; it was (Greek).  The balance

of sentences and the introduction of paragraphs at suitable intervals must

not be neglected if the harmony of the English language is to be preserved.

And still a caution has to be added on the other side, that we must avoid

giving it a numerical or mechanical character.



(3) This, however, is not one of the greatest difficulties of the

translator; much greater is that which arises from the restriction of the

use of the genders.  Men and women in English are masculine and feminine,

and there is a similar distinction of sex in the words denoting animals;

but all things else, whether outward objects or abstract ideas, are

relegated to the class of neuters.  Hardly in some flight of poetry do we

ever endue any of them with the characteristics of a sentient being, and

then only by speaking of them in the feminine gender.  The virtues may be

pictured in female forms, but they are not so described in language; a ship

is humorously supposed to be the sailor's bride; more doubtful are the

personifications of church and country as females.  Now the genius of the

Greek language is the opposite of this.  The same tendency to

personification which is seen in the Greek mythology is common also in the

language; and genders are attributed to things as well as persons according

to their various degrees of strength and weakness; or from fanciful

resemblances to the male or female form, or some analogy too subtle to be

discovered.  When the gender of any object was once fixed, a similar gender

was naturally assigned to similar objects, or to words of similar

formation.  This use of genders in the denotation of objects or ideas not

only affects the words to which genders are attributed, but the words with

which they are construed or connected, and passes into the general

character of the style.  Hence arises a difficulty in translating Greek

into English which cannot altogether be overcome.  Shall we speak of the

soul and its qualities, of virtue, power, wisdom, and the like, as feminine

or neuter?  The usage of the English language does not admit of the former,

and yet the life and beauty of the style are impaired by the latter.  Often

the translator will have recourse to the repetition of the word, or to the

ambiguous 'they,' 'their,' etc.; for fear of spoiling the effect of the

sentence by introducing 'it.'  Collective nouns in Greek and English create

a similar but lesser awkwardness.



(4) To use of relation is far more extended in Greek than in English. 

Partly the greater variety of genders and cases makes the connexion of

relative and antecedent less ambiguous:  partly also the greater number of

demonstrative and relative pronouns, and the use of the article, make the

correlation of ideas simpler and more natural.  The Greek appears to have

had an ear or intelligence for a long and complicated sentence which is

rarely to be found in modern nations; and in order to bring the Greek down

to the level of the modern, we must break up the long sentence into two or

more short ones.  Neither is the same precision required in Greek as in

Latin or English, nor in earlier Greek as in later; there was nothing

shocking to the contemporary of Thucydides and Plato in anacolutha and

repetitions.  In such cases the genius of the English language requires

that the translation should be more intelligible than the Greek.  The want

of more distinctions between the demonstrative pronouns is also greatly

felt.  Two genitives dependent on one another, unless familiarised by

idiom, have an awkward effect in English.  Frequently the noun has to take

the place of the pronoun.  'This' and 'that' are found repeating themselves

to weariness in the rough draft of a translation.  As in the previous case,

while the feeling of the modern language is more opposed to tautology,

there is also a greater difficulty in avoiding it.



(5) Though no precise rule can be laid down about the repetition of words,

there seems to be a kind of impertinence in presenting to the reader the

same thought in the same words, repeated twice over in the same passage

without any new aspect or modification of it.  And the evasion of

tautology--that is, the substitution of one word of precisely the same

meaning for another--is resented by us equally with the repetition of

words.  Yet on the other hand the least difference of meaning or the least

change of form from a substantive to an adjective, or from a participle to

a verb, will often remedy the unpleasant effect.  Rarely and only for the

sake of emphasis or clearness can we allow an important word to be used

twice over in two successive sentences or even in the same paragraph.  The

particles and pronouns, as they are of most frequent occurrence, are also

the most troublesome.  Strictly speaking, except a few of the commonest of

them, 'and,' 'the,' etc., they ought not to occur twice in the same

sentence.  But the Greek has no such precise rules; and hence any literal

translation of a Greek author is full of tautology.  The tendency of modern

languages is to become more correct as well as more perspicuous than

ancient.  And, therefore, while the English translator is limited in the

power of expressing relation or connexion, by the law of his own language

increased precision and also increased clearness are required of him.  The

familiar use of logic, and the progress of science, have in these two

respects raised the standard.  But modern languages, while they have become

more exacting in their demands, are in many ways not so well furnished with

powers of expression as the ancient classical ones.



Such are a few of the difficulties which have to be overcome in the work of

translation; and we are far from having exhausted the list.  (6) The

excellence of a translation will consist, not merely in the faithful

rendering of words, or in the composition of a sentence only, or yet of a

single paragraph, but in the colour and style of the whole work. 

Equability of tone is best attained by the exclusive use of familiar and

idiomatic words.  But great care must be taken; for an idiomatic phrase, if

an exception to the general style, is of itself a disturbing element.  No

word, however expressive and exact, should be employed, which makes the

reader stop to think, or unduly attracts attention by difficulty and

peculiarity, or disturbs the effect of the surrounding language.  In

general the style of one author is not appropriate to another; as in

society, so in letters, we expect every man to have 'a good coat of his

own,' and not to dress himself out in the rags of another.  (a) Archaic

expressions are therefore to be avoided.  Equivalents may be occasionally

drawn from Shakspere, who is the common property of us all; but they must

be used sparingly.  For, like some other men of genius of the Elizabethan

and Jacobean age, he outdid the capabilities of the language, and many of

the expressions which he introduced have been laid aside and have dropped

out of use.  (b) A similar principle should be observed in the employment

of Scripture.  Having a greater force and beauty than other language, and a

religious association, it disturbs the even flow of the style.  It may be

used to reproduce in the translation the quaint effect of some antique

phrase in the original, but rarely; and when adopted, it should have a

certain freshness and a suitable 'entourage.'  It is strange to observe

that the most effective use of Scripture phraseology arises out of the

application of it in a sense not intended by the author.  (c) Another

caution:  metaphors differ in different languages, and the translator will

often be compelled to substitute one for another, or to paraphrase them,

not giving word for word, but diffusing over several words the more

concentrated thought of the original.  The Greek of Plato often goes beyond

the English in its imagery: compare Laws, (Greek); Rep.; etc.  Or again the

modern word, which in substance is the nearest equivalent to the Greek, may

be found to include associations alien to Greek life:  e.g. (Greek),

'jurymen,' (Greek), 'the bourgeoisie.'  (d) The translator has also to

provide expressions for philosophical terms of very indefinite meaning in

the more definite language of modern philosophy.  And he must not allow

discordant elements to enter into the work.  For example, in translating

Plato, it would equally be an anachronism to intrude on him the feeling and

spirit of the Jewish or Christian Scriptures or the technical terms of the

Hegelian or Darwinian philosophy.



(7) As no two words are precise equivalents (just as no two leaves of the

forest are exactly similar), it is a mistaken attempt at precision always

to translate the same Greek word by the same English word.  There is no

reason why in the New Testament (Greek) should always be rendered

'righteousness,' or (Greek) 'covenant.'  In such cases the translator may

be allowed to employ two words--sometimes when the two meanings occur in

the same passage, varying them by an 'or'--e.g. (Greek), 'science' or

'knowledge,' (Greek), 'idea' or 'class,' (Greek), 'temperance' or

'prudence,'--at the point where the change of meaning occurs.  If

translations are intended not for the Greek scholar but for the general

reader, their worst fault will be that they sacrifice the general effect

and meaning to the over-precise rendering of words and forms of speech.



(8) There is no kind of literature in English which corresponds to the

Greek Dialogue; nor is the English language easily adapted to it.  The

rapidity and abruptness of question and answer, the constant repetition of

(Greek), etc., which Cicero avoided in Latin (de Amicit), the frequent

occurrence of expletives, would, if reproduced in a translation, give

offence to the reader.  Greek has a freer and more frequent use of the

Interrogative, and is of a more passionate and emotional character, and

therefore lends itself with greater readiness to the dialogue form.  Most

of the so-called English Dialogues are but poor imitations of Plato, which

fall very far short of the original.  The breath of conversation, the

subtle adjustment of question and answer, the lively play of fancy, the

power of drawing characters, are wanting in them.  But the Platonic

dialogue is a drama as well as a dialogue, of which Socrates is the central

figure, and there are lesser performers as well:--the insolence of

Thrasymachus, the anger of Callicles and Anytus, the patronizing style of

Protagoras, the self-consciousness of Prodicus and Hippias, are all part of

the entertainment. To reproduce this living image the same sort of effort

is required as in translating poetry.  The language, too, is of a finer

quality; the mere prose English is slow in lending itself to the form of

question and answer, and so the ease of conversation is lost, and at the

same time the dialectical precision with which the steps of the argument

are drawn out is apt to be impaired.



II.  In the Introductions to the Dialogues there have been added some

essays on modern philosophy, and on political and social life.  The chief

subjects discussed in these are Utility, Communism, the Kantian and

Hegelian philosophies, Psychology, and the Origin of Language.  (There have

been added also in the Third Edition remarks on other subjects.  A list of

the most important of these additions is given at the end of this Preface.)



Ancient and modern philosophy throw a light upon one another:  but they

should be compared, not confounded.  Although the connexion between them is

sometimes accidental, it is often real.  The same questions are discussed

by them under different conditions of language and civilization; but in

some cases a mere word has survived, while nothing or hardly anything of

the pre-Socratic, Platonic, or Aristotelian meaning is retained.  There are

other questions familiar to the moderns, which have no place in ancient

philosophy.  The world has grown older in two thousand years, and has

enlarged its stock of ideas and methods of reasoning.  Yet the germ of

modern thought is found in ancient, and we may claim to have inherited,

notwithstanding many accidents of time and place, the spirit of Greek

philosophy.  There is, however, no continuous growth of the one into the

other, but a new beginning, partly artificial, partly arising out of the

questionings of the mind itself, and also receiving a stimulus from the

study of ancient writings.



Considering the great and fundamental differences which exist in ancient

and modern philosophy, it seems best that we should at first study them

separately, and seek for the interpretation of either, especially of the

ancient, from itself only, comparing the same author with himself and with

his contemporaries, and with the general state of thought and feeling

prevalent in his age.  Afterwards comes the remoter light which they cast

on one another.  We begin to feel that the ancients had the same thoughts

as ourselves, the same difficulties which characterize all periods of

transition, almost the same opposition between science and religion. 

Although we cannot maintain that ancient and modern philosophy are one and

continuous (as has been affirmed with more truth respecting ancient and

modern history), for they are separated by an interval of a thousand years,

yet they seem to recur in a sort of cycle, and we are surprised to find

that the new is ever old, and that the teaching of the past has still a

meaning for us.



III.  In the preface to the first edition I expressed a strong opinion at

variance with Mr. Grote's, that the so-called Epistles of Plato were

spurious.  His friend and editor, Professor Bain, thinks that I ought to

give the reasons why I differ from so eminent an authority.  Reserving the

fuller discussion of the question for another place, I will shortly defend

my opinion by the following arguments:--



(a) Because almost all epistles purporting to be of the classical age of

Greek literature are forgeries.  (Compare Bentley's Works (Dyce's

Edition).)  Of all documents this class are the least likely to be

preserved and the most likely to be invented.  The ancient world swarmed

with them; the great libraries stimulated the demand for them; and at a

time when there was no regular publication of books, they easily crept into

the world.



(b) When one epistle out of a number is spurious, the remainder of the

series cannot be admitted to be genuine, unless there be some independent

ground for thinking them so:  when all but one are spurious, overwhelming

evidence is required of the genuineness of the one:  when they are all

similar in style or motive, like witnesses who agree in the same tale, they

stand or fall together.  But no one, not even Mr. Grote, would maintain

that all the Epistles of Plato are genuine, and very few critics think that

more than one of them is so.  And they are clearly all written from the

same motive, whether serious or only literary.  Nor is there an example in

Greek antiquity of a series of Epistles, continuous and yet coinciding with

a succession of events extending over a great number of years.



The external probability therefore against them is enormous, and the

internal probability is not less:  for they are trivial and unmeaning,

devoid of delicacy and subtlety, wanting in a single fine expression.  And

even if this be matter of dispute, there can be no dispute that there are

found in them many plagiarisms, inappropriately borrowed, which is a common

note of forgery.  They imitate Plato, who never imitates either himself or

any one else; reminiscences of the Republic and the Laws are continually

recurring in them; they are too like him and also too unlike him, to be

genuine (see especially Karsten, Commentio Critica de Platonis quae

feruntur Epistolis).  They are full of egotism, self-assertion,

affectation, faults which of all writers Plato was most careful to avoid,

and into which he was least likely to fall.  They abound in obscurities,

irrelevancies, solecisms, pleonasms, inconsistencies, awkwardnesses of

construction, wrong uses of words.  They also contain historical blunders,

such as the statement respecting Hipparinus and Nysaeus, the nephews of

Dion, who are said to 'have been well inclined to philosophy, and well able

to dispose the mind of their brother Dionysius in the same course,' at a

time when they could not have been more than six or seven years of age--

also foolish allusions, such as the comparison of the Athenian empire to

the empire of Darius, which show a spirit very different from that of

Plato; and mistakes of fact, as e.g. about the Thirty Tyrants, whom the

writer of the letters seems to have confused with certain inferior

magistrates, making them in all fifty-one.  These palpable errors and

absurdities are absolutely irreconcileable with their genuineness.  And as

they appear to have a common parentage, the more they are studied, the more

they will be found to furnish evidence against themselves.  The Seventh,

which is thought to be the most important of these Epistles, has affinities

with the Third and the Eighth, and is quite as impossible and inconsistent

as the rest.  It is therefore involved in the same condemnation.--The final

conclusion is that neither the Seventh nor any other of them, when

carefully analyzed, can be imagined to have proceeded from the hand or mind

of Plato.  The other testimonies to the voyages of Plato to Sicily and the

court of Dionysius are all of them later by several centuries than the

events to which they refer.  No extant writer mentions them older than

Cicero and Cornelius Nepos.  It does not seem impossible that so attractive

a theme as the meeting of a philosopher and a tyrant, once imagined by the

genius of a Sophist, may have passed into a romance which became famous in

Hellas and the world.  It may have created one of the mists of history,

like the Trojan war or the legend of Arthur, which we are unable to

penetrate.  In the age of Cicero, and still more in that of Diogenes

Laertius and Appuleius, many other legends had gathered around the

personality of Plato,--more voyages, more journeys to visit tyrants and

Pythagorean philosophers.  But if, as we agree with Karsten in supposing,

they are the forgery of some rhetorician or sophist, we cannot agree with

him in also supposing that they are of any historical value, the rather as

there is no early independent testimony by which they are supported or with

which they can be compared.



IV.  There is another subject to which I must briefly call attention, lest

I should seem to have overlooked it.  Dr. Henry Jackson, of Trinity

College, Cambridge, in a series of articles which he has contributed to the

Journal of Philology, has put forward an entirely new explanation of the

Platonic 'Ideas.'  He supposes that in the mind of Plato they took, at

different times in his life, two essentially different forms:--an earlier

one which is found chiefly in the Republic and the Phaedo, and a later,

which appears in the Theaetetus, Philebus, Sophist, Politicus, Parmenides,

Timaeus.  In the first stage of his philosophy Plato attributed Ideas to

all things, at any rate to all things which have classes or common notions: 

these he supposed to exist only by participation in them.  In the later

Dialogues he no longer included in them manufactured articles and ideas of

relation, but restricted them to 'types of nature,' and having become

convinced that the many cannot be parts of the one, for the idea of

participation in them he substituted imitation of them.  To quote Dr.

Jackson's own expressions,--'whereas in the period of the Republic and the

Phaedo, it was proposed to pass through ontology to the sciences, in the

period of the Parmenides and the Philebus, it is proposed to pass through

the sciences to ontology':  or, as he repeats in nearly the same words,--

'whereas in the Republic and in the Phaedo he had dreamt of passing through

ontology to the sciences, he is now content to pass through the sciences to

ontology.'



This theory is supposed to be based on Aristotle's Metaphysics, a passage

containing an account of the ideas, which hitherto scholars have found

impossible to reconcile with the statements of Plato himself.  The

preparations for the new departure are discovered in the Parmenides and in

the Theaetetus; and it is said to be expressed under a different form by

the (Greek) and the (Greek) of the Philebus.  The (Greek) of the Philebus

is the principle which gives form and measure to the (Greek); and in the

'Later Theory' is held to be the (Greek) or (Greek) which converts the

Infinite or Indefinite into ideas.  They are neither (Greek) nor (Greek),

but belong to the (Greek) which partakes of both.



With great respect for the learning and ability of Dr. Jackson, I find

myself unable to agree in this newly fashioned doctrine of the Ideas, which

he ascribes to Plato.  I have not the space to go into the question fully;

but I will briefly state some objections which are, I think, fatal to it.



(1) First, the foundation of his argument is laid in the Metaphysics of

Aristotle.  But we cannot argue, either from the Metaphysics, or from any

other of the philosophical treatises of Aristotle, to the dialogues of

Plato until we have ascertained the relation in which his so-called works

stand to the philosopher himself.  There is of course no doubt of the great

influence exercised upon Greece and upon the world by Aristotle and his

philosophy.  But on the other hand almost every one who is capable of

understanding the subject acknowledges that his writings have not come down

to us in an authentic form like most of the dialogues of Plato.  How much

of them is to be ascribed to Aristotle's own hand, how much is due to his

successors in the Peripatetic School, is a question which has never been

determined, and probably never can be, because the solution of it depends

upon internal evidence only.  To 'the height of this great argument' I do

not propose to ascend.  But one little fact, not irrelevant to the present

discussion, will show how hopeless is the attempt to explain Plato out of

the writings of Aristotle.  In the chapter of the Metaphysics quoted by Dr.

Jackson, about two octavo pages in length, there occur no less than seven

or eight references to Plato, although nothing really corresponding to them

can be found in his extant writings:--a small matter truly; but what a

light does it throw on the character of the entire book in which they

occur!  We can hardly escape from the conclusion that they are not

statements of Aristotle respecting Plato, but of a later generation of

Aristotelians respecting a later generation of Platonists.  (Compare the

striking remark of the great Scaliger respecting the Magna Moralia:--Haec

non sunt Aristotelis, tamen utitur auctor Aristotelis nomine tanquam suo.)



(2) There is no hint in Plato's own writings that he was conscious of

having made any change in the Doctrine of Ideas such as Dr. Jackson

attributes to him, although in the Republic the platonic Socrates speaks of

'a longer and a shorter way', and of a way in which his disciple Glaucon

'will be unable to follow him'; also of a way of Ideas, to which he still

holds fast, although it has often deserted him (Philebus, Phaedo), and

although in the later dialogues and in the Laws the reference to Ideas

disappears, and Mind claims her own (Phil.; Laws).  No hint is given of

what Plato meant by the 'longer way' (Rep.), or 'the way in which Glaucon

was unable to follow'; or of the relation of Mind to the Ideas.  It might

be said with truth that the conception of the Idea predominates in the

first half of the Dialogues, which, according to the order adopted in this

work, ends with the Republic, the 'conception of Mind' and a way of

speaking more in agreement with modern terminology, in the latter half. 

But there is no reason to suppose that Plato's theory, or, rather, his

various theories, of the Ideas underwent any definite change during his

period of authorship.  They are substantially the same in the twelfth Book

of the Laws as in the Meno and Phaedo; and since the Laws were written in

the last decade of his life, there is no time to which this change of

opinions can be ascribed.  It is true that the theory of Ideas takes

several different forms, not merely an earlier and a later one, in the

various Dialogues.  They are personal and impersonal, ideals and ideas,

existing by participation or by imitation, one and many, in different parts

of his writings or even in the same passage.  They are the universal

definitions of Socrates, and at the same time 'of more than mortal

knowledge' (Rep.).  But they are always the negations of sense, of matter,

of generation, of the particular:  they are always the subjects of

knowledge and not of opinion; and they tend, not to diversity, but to

unity.  Other entities or intelligences are akin to them, but not the same

with them, such as mind, measure, limit, eternity, essence (Philebus;

Timaeus):  these and similar terms appear to express the same truths from a

different point of view, and to belong to the same sphere with them.  But

we are not justified, therefore, in attempting to identify them, any more

than in wholly opposing them.  The great oppositions of the sensible and

intellectual, the unchangeable and the transient, in whatever form of words

expressed, are always maintained in Plato.  But the lesser logical

distinctions, as we should call them, whether of ontology or predication,

which troubled the pre-Socratic philosophy and came to the front in

Aristotle, are variously discussed and explained.  Thus far we admit

inconsistency in Plato, but no further.  He lived in an age before logic

and system had wholly permeated language, and therefore we must not always

expect to find in him systematic arrangement or logical precision:--'poema

magis putandum.'  But he is always true to his own context, the careful

study of which is of more value to the interpreter than all the

commentators and scholiasts put together.



(3) The conclusions at which Dr. Jackson has arrived are such as might be

expected to follow from his method of procedure.  For he takes words

without regard to their connection, and pieces together different parts of

dialogues in a purely arbitrary manner, although there is no indication

that the author intended the two passages to be so combined, or that when

he appears to be experimenting on the different points of view from which a

subject of philosophy may be regarded, he is secretly elaborating a system. 

By such a use of language any premises may be made to lead to any

conclusion.  I am not one of those who believe Plato to have been a mystic

or to have had hidden meanings; nor do I agree with Dr. Jackson in thinking

that 'when he is precise and dogmatic, he generally contrives to introduce

an element of obscurity into the expostion' (J. of Philol.).  The great

master of language wrote as clearly as he could in an age when the minds of

men were clouded by controversy, and philosophical terms had not yet

acquired a fixed meaning.  I have just said that Plato is to be interpreted

by his context; and I do not deny that in some passages, especially in the

Republic and Laws, the context is at a greater distance than would be

allowable in a modern writer.  But we are not therefore justified in

connecting passages from different parts of his writings, or even from the

same work, which he has not himself joined.  We cannot argue from the

Parmenides to the Philebus, or from either to the Sophist, or assume that

the Parmenides, the Philebus, and the Timaeus were 'written

simultaneously,' or 'were intended to be studied in the order in which they

are here named (J. of Philol.)  We have no right to connect statements

which are only accidentally similar.  Nor is it safe for the author of a

theory about ancient philosophy to argue from what will happen if his

statements are rejected.  For those consequences may never have entered

into the mind of the ancient writer himself; and they are very likely to be

modern consequences which would not have been understood by him.  'I cannot

think,' says Dr. Jackson, 'that Plato would have changed his opinions, but

have nowhere explained the nature of the change.'  But is it not much more

improbable that he should have changed his opinions, and not stated in an

unmistakable manner that the most essential principle of his philosophy had

been reversed?  It is true that a few of the dialogues, such as the

Republic and the Timaeus, or the Theaetetus and the Sophist, or the Meno

and the Apology, contain allusions to one another.  But these allusions are

superficial and, except in the case of the Republic and the Laws, have no

philosophical importance.  They do not affect the substance of the work. 

It may be remarked further that several of the dialogues, such as the

Phaedrus, the Sophist, and the Parmenides, have more than one subject.  But

it does not therefore follow that Plato intended one dialogue to succeed

another, or that he begins anew in one dialogue a subject which he has left

unfinished in another, or that even in the same dialogue he always intended

the two parts to be connected with each other.  We cannot argue from a

casual statement found in the Parmenides to other statements which occur in

the Philebus.  Much more truly is his own manner described by himself when

he says that 'words are more plastic than wax' (Rep.), and 'whither the

wind blows, the argument follows'.  The dialogues of Plato are like poems,

isolated and separate works, except where they are indicated by the author

himself to have an intentional sequence.



It is this method of taking passages out of their context and placing them

in a new connexion when they seem to confirm a preconceived theory, which

is the defect of Dr. Jackson's procedure.  It may be compared, though not

wholly the same with it, to that method which the Fathers practised,

sometimes called 'the mystical interpretation of Scripture,' in which

isolated words are separated from their context, and receive any sense

which the fancy of the interpreter may suggest.  It is akin to the method

employed by Schleiermacher of arranging the dialogues of Plato in

chronological order according to what he deems the true arrangement of the

ideas contained in them.  (Dr. Jackson is also inclined, having constructed

a theory, to make the chronology of Plato's writings dependent upon it 

(See J. of Philol.and elsewhere.).)  It may likewise be illustrated by the

ingenuity of those who employ symbols to find in Shakespeare a hidden

meaning.  In the three cases the error is nearly the same:--words are taken

out of their natural context, and thus become destitute of any real

meaning.



(4) According to Dr. Jackson's 'Later Theory,' Plato's Ideas, which were

once regarded as the summa genera of all things, are now to be explained as

Forms or Types of some things only,--that is to say, of natural objects: 

these we conceive imperfectly, but are always seeking in vain to have a

more perfect notion of them.  He says (J. of Philol.) that 'Plato hoped by

the study of a series of hypothetical or provisional classifications to

arrive at one in which nature's distribution of kinds is approximately

represented, and so to attain approximately to the knowledge of the ideas. 

But whereas in the Republic, and even in the Phaedo, though less hopefully,

he had sought to convert his provisional definitions into final ones by

tracing their connexion with the summum genus, the (Greek), in the

Parmenides his aspirations are less ambitious,' and so on.  But where does

Dr. Jackson find any such notion as this in Plato or anywhere in ancient

philosophy?  Is it not an anachronism, gracious to the modern physical

philosopher, and the more acceptable because it seems to form a link

between ancient and modern philosophy, and between physical and

metaphysical science; but really unmeaning?



(5) To this 'Later Theory' of Plato's Ideas I oppose the authority of

Professor Zeller, who affirms that none of the passages to which Dr.

Jackson appeals (Theaet.; Phil.; Tim.; Parm.) 'in the smallest degree prove

his point'; and that in the second class of dialogues, in which the 'Later

Theory of Ideas' is supposed to be found, quite as clearly as in the first,

are admitted Ideas, not only of natural objects, but of properties,

relations, works of art, negative notions (Theaet.; Parm.; Soph.); and that

what Dr. Jackson distinguishes as the first class of dialogues from the

second equally assert or imply that the relation of things to the Ideas, is

one of participation in them as well as of imitation of them (Prof.

Zeller's summary of his own review of Dr. Jackson, Archiv fur Geschichte

der Philosophie.)



In conclusion I may remark that in Plato's writings there is both unity,

and also growth and development; but that we must not intrude upon him

either a system or a technical language.



Balliol College,

October, 1891.





NOTE



The chief additions to the Introductions in the Third Edition consist of

Essays on the following subjects:--



1.  Language.



2.  The decline of Greek Literature.



3.  The 'Ideas' of Plato and Modern Philosophy.



4.  The myths of Plato.



5.  The relation of the Republic, Statesman and Laws.



6.  The legend of Atlantis.



7.  Psychology.



8.  Comparison of the Laws of Plato with Spartan and Athenian Laws and

Institutions.





CHARMIDES.



INTRODUCTION.



The subject of the Charmides is Temperance or (Greek), a peculiarly Greek

notion, which may also be rendered Moderation (Compare Cic. Tusc. '(Greek),

quam soleo equidem tum temperantiam, tum moderationem appellare, nonnunquam

etiam modestiam.'), Modesty, Discretion, Wisdom, without completely

exhausting by all these terms the various associations of the word.  It may

be described as 'mens sana in corpore sano,' the harmony or due proportion

of the higher and lower elements of human nature which 'makes a man his own

master,' according to the definition of the Republic.  In the accompanying

translation the word has been rendered in different places either

Temperance or Wisdom, as the connection seemed to require:  for in the

philosophy of Plato (Greek) still retains an intellectual element (as

Socrates is also said to have identified (Greek) with (Greek):  Xen. Mem.) 

and is not yet relegated to the sphere of moral virtue, as in the

Nicomachean Ethics of Aristotle.



The beautiful youth, Charmides, who is also the most temperate of human

beings, is asked by Socrates, 'What is Temperance?'  He answers

characteristically, (1) 'Quietness.'  'But Temperance is a fine and noble

thing; and quietness in many or most cases is not so fine a thing as

quickness.'  He tries again and says (2) that temperance is modesty.  But

this again is set aside by a sophistical application of Homer:  for

temperance is good as well as noble, and Homer has declared that 'modesty

is not good for a needy man.'  (3) Once more Charmides makes the attempt. 

This time he gives a definition which he has heard, and of which Socrates

conjectures that Critias must be the author:  'Temperance is doing one's

own business.'  But the artisan who makes another man's shoes may be

temperate, and yet he is not doing his own business; and temperance defined

thus would be opposed to the division of labour which exists in every

temperate or well-ordered state.  How is this riddle to be explained?



Critias, who takes the place of Charmides, distinguishes in his answer

between 'making' and 'doing,' and with the help of a misapplied quotation

from Hesiod assigns to the words 'doing' and 'work' an exclusively good

sense:  Temperance is doing one's own business;--(4) is doing good.



Still an element of knowledge is wanting which Critias is readily induced

to admit at the suggestion of Socrates; and, in the spirit of Socrates and

of Greek life generally, proposes as a fifth definition, (5) Temperance is

self-knowledge.  But all sciences have a subject:  number is the subject of

arithmetic, health of medicine--what is the subject of temperance or

wisdom?  The answer is that (6) Temperance is the knowledge of what a man

knows and of what he does not know.  But this is contrary to analogy; there

is no vision of vision, but only of visible things; no love of loves, but

only of beautiful things; how then can there be a knowledge of knowledge? 

That which is older, heavier, lighter, is older, heavier, and lighter than

something else, not than itself, and this seems to be true of all relative

notions--the object of relation is outside of them; at any rate they can

only have relation to themselves in the form of that object.  Whether there

are any such cases of reflex relation or not, and whether that sort of

knowledge which we term Temperance is of this reflex nature, has yet to be

determined by the great metaphysician.  But even if knowledge can know

itself, how does the knowledge of what we know imply the knowledge of what

we do not know?  Besides, knowledge is an abstraction only, and will not

inform us of any particular subject, such as medicine, building, and the

like.  It may tell us that we or other men know something, but can never

tell us what we know.



Admitting that there is a knowledge of what we know and of what we do not

know, which would supply a rule and measure of all things, still there

would be no good in this; and the knowledge which temperance gives must be

of a kind which will do us good; for temperance is a good.  But this

universal knowledge does not tend to our happiness and good:  the only kind

of knowledge which brings happiness is the knowledge of good and evil.  To

this Critias replies that the science or knowledge of good and evil, and

all the other sciences, are regulated by the higher science or knowledge of

knowledge.  Socrates replies by again dividing the abstract from the

concrete, and asks how this knowledge conduces to happiness in the same

definite way in which medicine conduces to health.



And now, after making all these concessions, which are really inadmissible,

we are still as far as ever from ascertaining the nature of temperance,

which Charmides has already discovered, and had therefore better rest in

the knowledge that the more temperate he is the happier he will be, and not

trouble himself with the speculations of Socrates.



In this Dialogue may be noted (1) The Greek ideal of beauty and goodness,

the vision of the fair soul in the fair body, realised in the beautiful

Charmides; (2) The true conception of medicine as a science of the whole as

well as the parts, and of the mind as well as the body, which is playfully

intimated in the story of the Thracian; (3) The tendency of the age to

verbal distinctions, which here, as in the Protagoras and Cratylus, are

ascribed to the ingenuity of Prodicus; and to interpretations or rather

parodies of Homer or Hesiod, which are eminently characteristic of Plato

and his contemporaries; (4) The germ of an ethical principle contained in

the notion that temperance is 'doing one's own business,' which in the

Republic (such is the shifting character of the Platonic philosophy) is

given as the definition, not of temperance, but of justice; (5) The

impatience which is exhibited by Socrates of any definition of temperance

in which an element of science or knowledge is not included; (6) The

beginning of metaphysics and logic implied in the two questions:  whether

there can be a science of science, and whether the knowledge of what you

know is the same as the knowledge of what you do not know; and also in the

distinction between 'what you know' and 'that you know,' (Greek;) here too

is the first conception of an absolute self-determined science (the claims

of which, however, are disputed by Socrates, who asks cui bono?) as well as

the first suggestion of the difficulty of the abstract and concrete, and

one of the earliest anticipations of the relation of subject and object,

and of the subjective element in knowledge--a 'rich banquet' of

metaphysical questions in which we 'taste of many things.'  (7) And still

the mind of Plato, having snatched for a moment at these shadows of the

future, quickly rejects them:  thus early has he reached the conclusion

that there can be no science which is a 'science of nothing' (Parmen.). 

(8) The conception of a science of good and evil also first occurs here, an

anticipation of the Philebus and Republic as well as of moral philosophy in

later ages.



The dramatic interest of the Dialogue chiefly centres in the youth

Charmides, with whom Socrates talks in the kindly spirit of an elder.  His

childlike simplicity and ingenuousness are contrasted with the dialectical

and rhetorical arts of Critias, who is the grown-up man of the world,

having a tincture of philosophy.  No hint is given, either here or in the

Timaeus, of the infamy which attaches to the name of the latter in Athenian

history.  He is simply a cultivated person who, like his kinsman Plato, is

ennobled by the connection of his family with Solon (Tim.), and had been

the follower, if not the disciple, both of Socrates and of the Sophists. 

In the argument he is not unfair, if allowance is made for a slight

rhetorical tendency, and for a natural desire to save his reputation with

the company; he is sometimes nearer the truth than Socrates.  Nothing in

his language or behaviour is unbecoming the guardian of the beautiful

Charmides.  His love of reputation is characteristically Greek, and

contrasts with the humility of Socrates.  Nor in Charmides himself do we

find any resemblance to the Charmides of history, except, perhaps, the

modest and retiring nature which, according to Xenophon, at one time of his

life prevented him from speaking in the Assembly (Mem.); and we are

surprised to hear that, like Critias, he afterwards became one of the

thirty tyrants.  In the Dialogue he is a pattern of virtue, and is

therefore in no need of the charm which Socrates is unable to apply.  With

youthful naivete, keeping his secret and entering into the spirit of

Socrates, he enjoys the detection of his elder and guardian Critias, who is

easily seen to be the author of the definition which he has so great an

interest in maintaining.  The preceding definition, 'Temperance is doing

one's own business,' is assumed to have been borrowed by Charmides from

another; and when the enquiry becomes more abstract he is superseded by

Critias (Theaet.; Euthyd.).  Socrates preserves his accustomed irony to the

end; he is in the neighbourhood of several great truths, which he views in

various lights, but always either by bringing them to the test of common

sense, or by demanding too great exactness in the use of words, turns aside

from them and comes at last to no conclusion.



The definitions of temperance proceed in regular order from the popular to

the philosophical.  The first two are simple enough and partially true,

like the first thoughts of an intelligent youth; the third, which is a real

contribution to ethical philosophy, is perverted by the ingenuity of

Socrates, and hardly rescued by an equal perversion on the part of Critias.

The remaining definitions have a higher aim, which is to introduce the

element of knowledge, and at last to unite good and truth in a single

science.  But the time has not yet arrived for the realization of this

vision of metaphysical philosophy; and such a science when brought nearer

to us in the Philebus and the Republic will not be called by the name of

(Greek).  Hence we see with surprise that Plato, who in his other writings

identifies good and knowledge, here opposes them, and asks, almost in the

spirit of Aristotle, how can there be a knowledge of knowledge, and even if

attainable, how can such a knowledge be of any use?



The difficulty of the Charmides arises chiefly from the two senses of the

word (Greek), or temperance.  From the ethical notion of temperance, which

is variously defined to be quietness, modesty, doing our own business, the

doing of good actions, the dialogue passes onto the intellectual conception

of (Greek), which is declared also to be the science of self-knowledge, or

of the knowledge of what we know and do not know, or of the knowledge of

good and evil.  The dialogue represents a stage in the history of

philosophy in which knowledge and action were not yet distinguished.  Hence

the confusion between them, and the easy transition from one to the other. 

The definitions which are offered are all rejected, but it is to be

observed that they all tend to throw a light on the nature of temperance,

and that, unlike the distinction of Critias between (Greek), none of them

are merely verbal quibbles, it is implied that this question, although it

has not yet received a solution in theory, has been already answered by

Charmides himself, who has learned to practise the virtue of self-knowledge

which philosophers are vainly trying to define in words.  In a similar

spirit we might say to a young man who is disturbed by theological

difficulties, 'Do not trouble yourself about such matters, but only lead a

good life;' and yet in either case it is not to be denied that right ideas

of truth may contribute greatly to the improvement of character.



The reasons why the Charmides, Lysis, Laches have been placed together and

first in the series of Platonic dialogues, are:  (i) Their shortness and

simplicity.  The Charmides and the Lysis, if not the Laches, are of the

same 'quality' as the Phaedrus and Symposium:  and it is probable, though

far from certain, that the slighter effort preceded the greater one.  (ii)

Their eristic, or rather Socratic character; they belong to the class

called dialogues of search (Greek), which have no conclusion.  (iii) The

absence in them of certain favourite notions of Plato, such as the doctrine

of recollection and of the Platonic ideas; the questions, whether virtue

can be taught; whether the virtues are one or many.  (iv) They have a want

of depth, when compared with the dialogues of the middle and later period;

and a youthful beauty and grace which is wanting in the later ones.  (v)

Their resemblance to one another; in all the three boyhood has a great

part.  These reasons have various degrees of weight in determining their

place in the catalogue of the Platonic writings, though they are not

conclusive.  No arrangement of the Platonic dialogues can be strictly

chronological.  The order which has been adopted is intended mainly for the

convenience of the reader; at the same time, indications of the date

supplied either by Plato himself or allusions found in the dialogues have

not been lost sight of.  Much may be said about this subject, but the

results can only be probable; there are no materials which would enable us

to attain to anything like certainty.



The relations of knowledge and virtue are again brought forward in the

companion dialogues of the Lysis and Laches; and also in the Protagoras and

Euthydemus.  The opposition of abstract and particular knowledge in this

dialogue may be compared with a similar opposition of ideas and phenomena

which occurs in the Prologues to the Parmenides, but seems rather to belong

to a later stage of the philosophy of Plato.



     

CHARMIDES, OR TEMPERANCE



by



Plato



Translated by Benjamin Jowett





PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE:  Socrates, who is the narrator, Charmides,

Chaerephon, Critias.



SCENE:  The Palaestra of Taureas, which is near the Porch of the King

Archon.



Yesterday evening I returned from the army at Potidaea, and having been a

good while away, I thought that I should like to go and look at my old

haunts.  So I went into the palaestra of Taureas, which is over against the

temple adjoining the porch of the King Archon, and there I found a number

of persons, most of whom I knew, but not all.  My visit was unexpected, and

no sooner did they see me entering than they saluted me from afar on all

sides; and Chaerephon, who is a kind of madman, started up and ran to me,

seizing my hand, and saying, How did you escape, Socrates?--(I should

explain that an engagement had taken place at Potidaea not long before we

came away, of which the news had only just reached Athens.)



You see, I replied, that here I am.



There was a report, he said, that the engagement was very severe, and that

many of our acquaintance had fallen.



That, I replied, was not far from the truth.



I suppose, he said, that you were present.



I was.



Then sit down, and tell us the whole story, which as yet we have only heard

imperfectly.



I took the place which he assigned to me, by the side of Critias the son of

Callaeschrus, and when I had saluted him and the rest of the company, I

told them the news from the army, and answered their several enquiries.



Then, when there had been enough of this, I, in my turn, began to make

enquiries about matters at home--about the present state of philosophy, and

about the youth.  I asked whether any of them were remarkable for wisdom or

beauty, or both.  Critias, glancing at the door, invited my attention to

some youths who were coming in, and talking noisily to one another,

followed by a crowd.  Of the beauties, Socrates, he said, I fancy that you

will soon be able to form a judgment.  For those who are just entering are

the advanced guard of the great beauty, as he is thought to be, of the day,

and he is likely to be not far off himself.



Who is he, I said; and who is his father?



Charmides, he replied, is his name; he is my cousin, and the son of my

uncle Glaucon:  I rather think that you know him too, although he was not

grown up at the time of your departure.



Certainly, I know him, I said, for he was remarkable even then when he was

still a child, and I should imagine that by this time he must be almost a

young man.



You will see, he said, in a moment what progress he has made and what he is

like.  He had scarcely said the word, when Charmides entered.



Now you know, my friend, that I cannot measure anything, and of the

beautiful, I am simply such a measure as a white line is of chalk; for

almost all young persons appear to be beautiful in my eyes.  But at that

moment, when I saw him coming in, I confess that I was quite astonished at

his beauty and stature; all the world seemed to be enamoured of him;

amazement and confusion reigned when he entered; and a troop of lovers

followed him.  That grown-up men like ourselves should have been affected

in this way was not surprising, but I observed that there was the same

feeling among the boys; all of them, down to the very least child, turned

and looked at him, as if he had been a statue.



Chaerephon called me and said:  What do you think of him, Socrates?  Has he

not a beautiful face?



Most beautiful, I said.



But you would think nothing of his face, he replied, if you could see his

naked form:  he is absolutely perfect.



And to this they all agreed.



By Heracles, I said, there never was such a paragon, if he has only one

other slight addition.



What is that? said Critias.



If he has a noble soul; and being of your house, Critias, he may be

expected to have this.



He is as fair and good within, as he is without, replied Critias.



Then, before we see his body, should we not ask him to show us his soul,

naked and undisguised? he is just of an age at which he will like to talk.



That he will, said Critias, and I can tell you that he is a philosopher

already, and also a considerable poet, not in his own opinion only, but in

that of others.



That, my dear Critias, I replied, is a distinction which has long been in

your family, and is inherited by you from Solon.  But why do you not call

him, and show him to us? for even if he were younger than he is, there

could be no impropriety in his talking to us in the presence of you, who

are his guardian and cousin.



Very well, he said; then I will call him; and turning to the attendant, he

said, Call Charmides, and tell him that I want him to come and see a

physician about the illness of which he spoke to me the day before

yesterday.  Then again addressing me, he added:  He has been complaining

lately of having a headache when he rises in the morning:  now why should

you not make him believe that you know a cure for the headache?



Why not, I said; but will he come?



He will be sure to come, he replied.



He came as he was bidden, and sat down between Critias and me.  Great

amusement was occasioned by every one pushing with might and main at his

neighbour in order to make a place for him next to themselves, until at the

two ends of the row one had to get up and the other was rolled over

sideways.  Now I, my friend, was beginning to feel awkward; my former bold

belief in my powers of conversing with him had vanished.  And when Critias

told him that I was the person who had the cure, he looked at me in such an

indescribable manner, and was just going to ask a question.  And at that

moment all the people in the palaestra crowded about us, and, O rare! I

caught a sight of the inwards of his garment, and took the flame.  Then I

could no longer contain myself.  I thought how well Cydias understood the

nature of love, when, in speaking of a fair youth, he warns some one 'not

to bring the fawn in the sight of the lion to be devoured by him,' for I

felt that I had been overcome by a sort of wild-beast appetite.  But I

controlled myself, and when he asked me if I knew the cure of the headache,

I answered, but with an effort, that I did know.



And what is it? he said.



I replied that it was a kind of leaf, which required to be accompanied by a

charm, and if a person would repeat the charm at the same time that he used

the cure, he would be made whole; but that without the charm the leaf would

be of no avail.



Then I will write out the charm from your dictation, he said.



With my consent? I said, or without my consent?



With your consent, Socrates, he said, laughing.



Very good, I said; and are you quite sure that you know my name?



I ought to know you, he replied, for there is a great deal said about you

among my companions; and I remember when I was a child seeing you in

company with my cousin Critias.



I am glad to find that you remember me, I said; for I shall now be more at

home with you and shall be better able to explain the nature of the charm,

about which I felt a difficulty before.  For the charm will do more,

Charmides, than only cure the headache.  I dare say that you have heard

eminent physicians say to a patient who comes to them with bad eyes, that

they cannot cure his eyes by themselves, but that if his eyes are to be

cured, his head must be treated; and then again they say that to think of

curing the head alone, and not the rest of the body also, is the height of

folly.  And arguing in this way they apply their methods to the whole body,

and try to treat and heal the whole and the part together.  Did you ever

observe that this is what they say?



Yes, he said.



And they are right, and you would agree with them?



Yes, he said, certainly I should.



His approving answers reassured me, and I began by degrees to regain

confidence, and the vital heat returned.  Such, Charmides, I said, is the

nature of the charm, which I learned when serving with the army from one of

the physicians of the Thracian king Zamolxis, who are said to be so skilful

that they can even give immortality.  This Thracian told me that in these

notions of theirs, which I was just now mentioning, the Greek physicians

are quite right as far as they go; but Zamolxis, he added, our king, who is

also a god, says further, 'that as you ought not to attempt to cure the

eyes without the head, or the head without the body, so neither ought you

to attempt to cure the body without the soul; and this,' he said, 'is the

reason why the cure of many diseases is unknown to the physicians of

Hellas, because they are ignorant of the whole, which ought to be studied

also; for the part can never be well unless the whole is well.'  For all

good and evil, whether in the body or in human nature, originates, as he

declared, in the soul, and overflows from thence, as if from the head into

the eyes.  And therefore if the head and body are to be well, you must

begin by curing the soul; that is the first thing.  And the cure, my dear

youth, has to be effected by the use of certain charms, and these charms

are fair words; and by them temperance is implanted in the soul, and where

temperance is, there health is speedily imparted, not only to the head, but

to the whole body.  And he who taught me the cure and the charm at the same

time added a special direction:  'Let no one,' he said, 'persuade you to

cure the head, until he has first given you his soul to be cured by the

charm.  For this,' he said, 'is the great error of our day in the treatment

of the human body, that physicians separate the soul from the body.'  And

he added with emphasis, at the same time making me swear to his words, 'Let

no one, however rich, or noble, or fair, persuade you to give him the cure,

without the charm.'  Now I have sworn, and I must keep my oath, and

therefore if you will allow me to apply the Thracian charm first to your

soul, as the stranger directed, I will afterwards proceed to apply the cure

to your head.  But if not, I do not know what I am to do with you, my dear

Charmides.



Critias, when he heard this, said:  The headache will be an unexpected gain

to my young relation, if the pain in his head compels him to improve his

mind:  and I can tell you, Socrates, that Charmides is not only pre-eminent

in beauty among his equals, but also in that quality which is given by the

charm; and this, as you say, is temperance?



Yes, I said.



Then let me tell you that he is the most temperate of human beings, and for

his age inferior to none in any quality.



Yes, I said, Charmides; and indeed I think that you ought to excel others

in all good qualities; for if I am not mistaken there is no one present who

could easily point out two Athenian houses, whose union would be likely to

produce a better or nobler scion than the two from which you are sprung. 

There is your father's house, which is descended from Critias the son of

Dropidas, whose family has been commemorated in the panegyrical verses of

Anacreon, Solon, and many other poets, as famous for beauty and virtue and

all other high fortune:  and your mother's house is equally distinguished;

for your maternal uncle, Pyrilampes, is reputed never to have found his

equal, in Persia at the court of the great king, or on the continent of

Asia, in all the places to which he went as ambassador, for stature and

beauty; that whole family is not a whit inferior to the other.  Having such

ancestors you ought to be first in all things, and, sweet son of Glaucon,

your outward form is no dishonour to any of them.  If to beauty you add

temperance, and if in other respects you are what Critias declares you to

be, then, dear Charmides, blessed art thou, in being the son of thy mother. 

And here lies the point; for if, as he declares, you have this gift of

temperance already, and are temperate enough, in that case you have no need

of any charms, whether of Zamolxis or of Abaris the Hyperborean, and I may

as well let you have the cure of the head at once; but if you have not yet

acquired this quality, I must use the charm before I give you the medicine.

Please, therefore, to inform me whether you admit the truth of what Critias

has been saying;--have you or have you not this quality of temperance?



Charmides blushed, and the blush heightened his beauty, for modesty is

becoming in youth; he then said very ingenuously, that he really could not

at once answer, either yes, or no, to the question which I had asked:  For,

said he, if I affirm that I am not temperate, that would be a strange thing

for me to say of myself, and also I should give the lie to Critias, and

many others who think as he tells you, that I am temperate:  but, on the

other hand, if I say that I am, I shall have to praise myself, which would

be ill manners; and therefore I do not know how to answer you.



I said to him:  That is a natural reply, Charmides, and I think that you

and I ought together to enquire whether you have this quality about which I

am asking or not; and then you will not be compelled to say what you do not

like; neither shall I be a rash practitioner of medicine:  therefore, if

you please, I will share the enquiry with you, but I will not press you if

you would rather not.



There is nothing which I should like better, he said; and as far as I am

concerned you may proceed in the way which you think best.



I think, I said, that I had better begin by asking you a question; for if

temperance abides in you, you must have an opinion about her; she must give

some intimation of her nature and qualities, which may enable you to form a

notion of her.  Is not that true?



Yes, he said, that I think is true.



You know your native language, I said, and therefore you must be able to

tell what you feel about this.



Certainly, he said.



In order, then, that I may form a conjecture whether you have temperance

abiding in you or not, tell me, I said, what, in your opinion, is

Temperance?



At first he hesitated, and was very unwilling to answer:  then he said that

he thought temperance was doing things orderly and quietly, such things for

example as walking in the streets, and talking, or anything else of that

nature.  In a word, he said, I should answer that, in my opinion,

temperance is quietness.



Are you right, Charmides? I said.  No doubt some would affirm that the

quiet are the temperate; but let us see whether these words have any

meaning; and first tell me whether you would not acknowledge temperance to

be of the class of the noble and good?



Yes.



But which is best when you are at the writing-master's, to write the same

letters quickly or quietly?



Quickly.



And to read quickly or slowly?



Quickly again.



And in playing the lyre, or wrestling, quickness or sharpness are far

better than quietness and slowness?



Yes.



And the same holds in boxing and in the pancratium?



Certainly.



And in leaping and running and in bodily exercises generally, quickness and

agility are good; slowness, and inactivity, and quietness, are bad?



That is evident.



Then, I said, in all bodily actions, not quietness, but the greatest

agility and quickness, is noblest and best?



Yes, certainly.



And is temperance a good?



Yes.



Then, in reference to the body, not quietness, but quickness will be the

higher degree of temperance, if temperance is a good?



True, he said.



And which, I said, is better--facility in learning, or difficulty in

learning?



Facility.



Yes, I said; and facility in learning is learning quickly, and difficulty

in learning is learning quietly and slowly?



True.



And is it not better to teach another quickly and energetically, rather

than quietly and slowly?



Yes.



And which is better, to call to mind, and to remember, quickly and readily,

or quietly and slowly?



The former.



And is not shrewdness a quickness or cleverness of the soul, and not a

quietness?



True.



And is it not best to understand what is said, whether at the writing-

master's or the music-master's, or anywhere else, not as quietly as

possible, but as quickly as possible?



Yes.



And in the searchings or deliberations of the soul, not the quietest, as I

imagine, and he who with difficulty deliberates and discovers, is thought

worthy of praise, but he who does so most easily and quickly?



Quite true, he said.



And in all that concerns either body or soul, swiftness and activity are

clearly better than slowness and quietness?



Clearly they are.



Then temperance is not quietness, nor is the temperate life quiet,--

certainly not upon this view; for the life which is temperate is supposed

to be the good.  And of two things, one is true,--either never, or very

seldom, do the quiet actions in life appear to be better than the quick and

energetic ones; or supposing that of the nobler actions, there are as many

quiet, as quick and vehement:  still, even if we grant this, temperance

will not be acting quietly any more than acting quickly and energetically,

either in walking or talking or in anything else; nor will the quiet life

be more temperate than the unquiet, seeing that temperance is admitted by

us to be a good and noble thing, and the quick have been shown to be as

good as the quiet.



I think, he said, Socrates, that you are right.



Then once more, Charmides, I said, fix your attention, and look within;

consider the effect which temperance has upon yourself, and the nature of

that which has the effect.  Think over all this, and, like a brave youth,

tell me--What is temperance?



After a moment's pause, in which he made a real manly effort to think, he

said:  My opinion is, Socrates, that temperance makes a man ashamed or

modest, and that temperance is the same as modesty.



Very good, I said; and did you not admit, just now, that temperance is

noble?



Yes, certainly, he said.



And the temperate are also good?



Yes.



And can that be good which does not make men good?



Certainly not.



And you would infer that temperance is not only noble, but also good?



That is my opinion.



Well, I said; but surely you would agree with Homer when he says,



'Modesty is not good for a needy man'?



Yes, he said; I agree.



Then I suppose that modesty is and is not good?



Clearly.



But temperance, whose presence makes men only good, and not bad, is always

good?



That appears to me to be as you say.



And the inference is that temperance cannot be modesty--if temperance is a

good, and if modesty is as much an evil as a good?



All that, Socrates, appears to me to be true; but I should like to know

what you think about another definition of temperance, which I just now

remember to have heard from some one, who said, 'That temperance is doing

our own business.'  Was he right who affirmed that?



You monster! I said; this is what Critias, or some philosopher has told

you.



Some one else, then, said Critias; for certainly I have not.



But what matter, said Charmides, from whom I heard this?



No matter at all, I replied; for the point is not who said the words, but

whether they are true or not.



There you are in the right, Socrates, he replied.



To be sure, I said; yet I doubt whether we shall ever be able to discover

their truth or falsehood; for they are a kind of riddle.



What makes you think so? he said.



Because, I said, he who uttered them seems to me to have meant one thing,

and said another.  Is the scribe, for example, to be regarded as doing

nothing when he reads or writes?



I should rather think that he was doing something.



And does the scribe write or read, or teach you boys to write or read, your

own names only, or did you write your enemies' names as well as your own

and your friends'?



As much one as the other.



And was there anything meddling or intemperate in this?



Certainly not.



And yet if reading and writing are the same as doing, you were doing what

was not your own business?



But they are the same as doing.



And the healing art, my friend, and building, and weaving, and doing

anything whatever which is done by art,--these all clearly come under the

head of doing?



Certainly.



And do you think that a state would be well ordered by a law which

compelled every man to weave and wash his own coat, and make his own shoes,

and his own flask and strigil, and other implements, on this principle of

every one doing and performing his own, and abstaining from what is not his

own?



I think not, he said.



But, I said, a temperate state will be a well-ordered state.



Of course, he replied.



Then temperance, I said, will not be doing one's own business; not at least

in this way, or doing things of this sort?



Clearly not.



Then, as I was just now saying, he who declared that temperance is a man

doing his own business had another and a hidden meaning; for I do not think

that he could have been such a fool as to mean this.  Was he a fool who

told you, Charmides?



Nay, he replied, I certainly thought him a very wise man.



Then I am quite certain that he put forth his definition as a riddle,

thinking that no one would know the meaning of the words 'doing his own

business.'



I dare say, he replied.



And what is the meaning of a man doing his own business?  Can you tell me?



Indeed, I cannot; and I should not wonder if the man himself who used this

phrase did not understand what he was saying.  Whereupon he laughed slyly,

and looked at Critias.



Critias had long been showing uneasiness, for he felt that he had a

reputation to maintain with Charmides and the rest of the company.  He had,

however, hitherto managed to restrain himself; but now he could no longer

forbear, and I am convinced of the truth of the suspicion which I

entertained at the time, that Charmides had heard this answer about

temperance from Critias.  And Charmides, who did not want to answer

himself, but to make Critias answer, tried to stir him up.  He went on

pointing out that he had been refuted, at which Critias grew angry, and

appeared, as I thought, inclined to quarrel with him; just as a poet might

quarrel with an actor who spoiled his poems in repeating them; so he looked

hard at him and said--



Do you imagine, Charmides, that the author of this definition of temperance

did not understand the meaning of his own words, because you do not

understand them?



Why, at his age, I said, most excellent Critias, he can hardly be expected

to understand; but you, who are older, and have studied, may well be

assumed to know the meaning of them; and therefore, if you agree with him,

and accept his definition of temperance, I would much rather argue with you

than with him about the truth or falsehood of the definition.



I entirely agree, said Critias, and accept the definition.



Very good, I said; and now let me repeat my question--Do you admit, as I

was just now saying, that all craftsmen make or do something?



I do.



And do they make or do their own business only, or that of others also?



They make or do that of others also.



And are they temperate, seeing that they make not for themselves or their

own business only?



Why not? he said.



No objection on my part, I said, but there may be a difficulty on his who

proposes as a definition of temperance, 'doing one's own business,' and

then says that there is no reason why those who do the business of others

should not be temperate.



Nay (The English reader has to observe that the word 'make' (Greek), in

Greek, has also the sense of 'do' (Greek).), said he; did I ever

acknowledge that those who do the business of others are temperate?  I

said, those who make, not those who do.



What! I asked; do you mean to say that doing and making are not the same?



No more, he replied, than making or working are the same; thus much I have

learned from Hesiod, who says that 'work is no disgrace.'  Now do you

imagine that if he had meant by working and doing such things as you were

describing, he would have said that there was no disgrace in them--for

example, in the manufacture of shoes, or in selling pickles, or sitting for

hire in a house of ill-fame?  That, Socrates, is not to be supposed:  but I

conceive him to have distinguished making from doing and work; and, while

admitting that the making anything might sometimes become a disgrace, when

the employment was not honourable, to have thought that work was never any

disgrace at all.  For things nobly and usefully made he called works; and

such makings he called workings, and doings; and he must be supposed to

have called such things only man's proper business, and what is hurtful,

not his business:  and in that sense Hesiod, and any other wise man, may be

reasonably supposed to call him wise who does his own work.



O Critias, I said, no sooner had you opened your mouth, than I pretty well

knew that you would call that which is proper to a man, and that which is

his own, good; and that the makings (Greek) of the good you would call

doings (Greek), for I am no stranger to the endless distinctions which

Prodicus draws about names.  Now I have no objection to your giving names

any signification which you please, if you will only tell me what you mean

by them.  Please then to begin again, and be a little plainer.  Do you mean

that this doing or making, or whatever is the word which you would use, of

good actions, is temperance?



I do, he said.



Then not he who does evil, but he who does good, is temperate?



Yes, he said; and you, friend, would agree.



No matter whether I should or not; just now, not what I think, but what you

are saying, is the point at issue.



Well, he answered; I mean to say, that he who does evil, and not good, is

not temperate; and that he is temperate who does good, and not evil:  for

temperance I define in plain words to be the doing of good actions.



And you may be very likely right in what you are saying; but I am curious

to know whether you imagine that temperate men are ignorant of their own

temperance?



I do not think so, he said.



And yet were you not saying, just now, that craftsmen might be temperate in

doing another's work, as well as in doing their own?



I was, he replied; but what is your drift?



I have no particular drift, but I wish that you would tell me whether a

physician who cures a patient may do good to himself and good to another

also?



I think that he may.



And he who does so does his duty?



Yes.



And does not he who does his duty act temperately or wisely?



Yes, he acts wisely.



But must the physician necessarily know when his treatment is likely to

prove beneficial, and when not? or must the craftsman necessarily know when

he is likely to be benefited, and when not to be benefited, by the work

which he is doing?



I suppose not.



Then, I said, he may sometimes do good or harm, and not know what he is

himself doing, and yet, in doing good, as you say, he has done temperately

or wisely.  Was not that your statement?



Yes.



Then, as would seem, in doing good, he may act wisely or temperately, and

be wise or temperate, but not know his own wisdom or temperance?



But that, Socrates, he said, is impossible; and therefore if this is, as

you imply, the necessary consequence of any of my previous admissions, I

will withdraw them, rather than admit that a man can be temperate or wise

who does not know himself; and I am not ashamed to confess that I was in

error.  For self-knowledge would certainly be maintained by me to be the

very essence of knowledge, and in this I agree with him who dedicated the

inscription, 'Know thyself!' at Delphi.  That word, if I am not mistaken,

is put there as a sort of salutation which the god addresses to those who

enter the temple; as much as to say that the ordinary salutation of 'Hail!'

is not right, and that the exhortation 'Be temperate!' would be a far

better way of saluting one another.  The notion of him who dedicated the

inscription was, as I believe, that the god speaks to those who enter his

temple, not as men speak; but, when a worshipper enters, the first word

which he hears is 'Be temperate!'  This, however, like a prophet he

expresses in a sort of riddle, for 'Know thyself!' and 'Be temperate!' are

the same, as I maintain, and as the letters imply (Greek), and yet they may

be easily misunderstood; and succeeding sages who added 'Never too much,'

or, 'Give a pledge, and evil is nigh at hand,' would appear to have so

misunderstood them; for they imagined that 'Know thyself!' was a piece of

advice which the god gave, and not his salutation of the worshippers at

their first coming in; and they dedicated their own inscription under the

idea that they too would give equally useful pieces of advice.  Shall I

tell you, Socrates, why I say all this?  My object is to leave the previous

discussion (in which I know not whether you or I are more right, but, at

any rate, no clear result was attained), and to raise a new one in which I

will attempt to prove, if you deny, that temperance is self-knowledge.



Yes, I said, Critias; but you come to me as though I professed to know

about the questions which I ask, and as though I could, if I only would,

agree with you.  Whereas the fact is that I enquire with you into the truth

of that which is advanced from time to time, just because I do not know;

and when I have enquired, I will say whether I agree with you or not. 

Please then to allow me time to reflect.



Reflect, he said.



I am reflecting, I replied, and discover that temperance, or wisdom, if

implying a knowledge of anything, must be a science, and a science of

something.



Yes, he said; the science of itself.



Is not medicine, I said, the science of health?



True.



And suppose, I said, that I were asked by you what is the use or effect of

medicine, which is this science of health, I should answer that medicine is

of very great use in producing health, which, as you will admit, is an

excellent effect.



Granted.



And if you were to ask me, what is the result or effect of architecture,

which is the science of building, I should say houses, and so of other

arts, which all have their different results.  Now I want you, Critias, to

answer a similar question about temperance, or wisdom, which, according to

you, is the science of itself.  Admitting this view, I ask of you, what

good work, worthy of the name wise, does temperance or wisdom, which is the

science of itself, effect?  Answer me.



That is not the true way of pursuing the enquiry, Socrates, he said; for

wisdom is not like the other sciences, any more than they are like one

another:  but you proceed as if they were alike.  For tell me, he said,

what result is there of computation or geometry, in the same sense as a

house is the result of building, or a garment of weaving, or any other work

of any other art?  Can you show me any such result of them?  You cannot.



That is true, I said; but still each of these sciences has a subject which

is different from the science.  I can show you that the art of computation

has to do with odd and even numbers in their numerical relations to

themselves and to each other.  Is not that true?



Yes, he said.



And the odd and even numbers are not the same with the art of computation?



They are not.



The art of weighing, again, has to do with lighter and heavier; but the art

of weighing is one thing, and the heavy and the light another.  Do you

admit that?



Yes.



Now, I want to know, what is that which is not wisdom, and of which wisdom

is the science?



You are just falling into the old error, Socrates, he said.  You come

asking in what wisdom or temperance differs from the other sciences, and

then you try to discover some respect in which they are alike; but they are

not, for all the other sciences are of something else, and not of

themselves; wisdom alone is a science of other sciences, and of itself. 

And of this, as I believe, you are very well aware:  and that you are only

doing what you denied that you were doing just now, trying to refute me,

instead of pursuing the argument.



And what if I am?  How can you think that I have any other motive in

refuting you but what I should have in examining into myself? which motive

would be just a fear of my unconsciously fancying that I knew something of

which I was ignorant.  And at this moment I pursue the argument chiefly for

my own sake, and perhaps in some degree also for the sake of my other

friends.  For is not the discovery of things as they truly are, a good

common to all mankind?



Yes, certainly, Socrates, he said.



Then, I said, be cheerful, sweet sir, and give your opinion in answer to

the question which I asked, never minding whether Critias or Socrates is

the person refuted; attend only to the argument, and see what will come of

the refutation.



I think that you are right, he replied; and I will do as you say.



Tell me, then, I said, what you mean to affirm about wisdom.



I mean to say that wisdom is the only science which is the science of

itself as well as of the other sciences.



But the science of science, I said, will also be the science of the absence

of science.



Very true, he said.



Then the wise or temperate man, and he only, will know himself, and be able

to examine what he knows or does not know, and to see what others know and

think that they know and do really know; and what they do not know, and

fancy that they know, when they do not.  No other person will be able to do

this.  And this is wisdom and temperance and self-knowledge--for a man to

know what he knows, and what he does not know.  That is your meaning?



Yes, he said.



Now then, I said, making an offering of the third or last argument to Zeus

the Saviour, let us begin again, and ask, in the first place, whether it is

or is not possible for a person to know that he knows and does not know

what he knows and does not know; and in the second place, whether, if

perfectly possible, such knowledge is of any use.



That is what we have to consider, he said.



And here, Critias, I said, I hope that you will find a way out of a

difficulty into which I have got myself.  Shall I tell you the nature of

the difficulty?



By all means, he replied.



Does not what you have been saying, if true, amount to this:  that there

must be a single science which is wholly a science of itself and of other

sciences, and that the same is also the science of the absence of science?



Yes.



But consider how monstrous this proposition is, my friend:  in any parallel

case, the impossibility will be transparent to you.



How is that? and in what cases do you mean?



In such cases as this:  Suppose that there is a kind of vision which is not

like ordinary vision, but a vision of itself and of other sorts of vision,

and of the defect of them, which in seeing sees no colour, but only itself

and other sorts of vision:  Do you think that there is such a kind of

vision?



Certainly not.



Or is there a kind of hearing which hears no sound at all, but only itself

and other sorts of hearing, or the defects of them?



There is not.



Or take all the senses:  can you imagine that there is any sense of itself

and of other senses, but which is incapable of perceiving the objects of

the senses?



I think not.



Could there be any desire which is not the desire of any pleasure, but of

itself, and of all other desires?



Certainly not.



Or can you imagine a wish which wishes for no good, but only for itself and

all other wishes?



I should answer, No.



Or would you say that there is a love which is not the love of beauty, but

of itself and of other loves?



I should not.



Or did you ever know of a fear which fears itself or other fears, but has

no object of fear?



I never did, he said.



Or of an opinion which is an opinion of itself and of other opinions, and

which has no opinion on the subjects of opinion in general?



Certainly not.



But surely we are assuming a science of this kind, which, having no

subject-matter, is a science of itself and of the other sciences?



Yes, that is what is affirmed.



But how strange is this, if it be indeed true:  we must not however as yet

absolutely deny the possibility of such a science; let us rather consider

the matter.



You are quite right.



Well then, this science of which we are speaking is a science of something,

and is of a nature to be a science of something?



Yes.



Just as that which is greater is of a nature to be greater than something

else?  (Socrates is intending to show that science differs from the object

of science, as any other relative differs from the object of relation.  But

where there is comparison--greater, less, heavier, lighter, and the like--a

relation to self as well as to other things involves an absolute

contradiction; and in other cases, as in the case of the senses, is hardly

conceivable.  The use of the genitive after the comparative in Greek,

(Greek), creates an unavoidable obscurity in the translation.)



Yes.



Which is less, if the other is conceived to be greater?



To be sure.



And if we could find something which is at once greater than itself, and

greater than other great things, but not greater than those things in

comparison of which the others are greater, then that thing would have the

property of being greater and also less than itself?



That, Socrates, he said, is the inevitable inference.



Or if there be a double which is double of itself and of other doubles,

these will be halves; for the double is relative to the half?



That is true.



And that which is greater than itself will also be less, and that which is

heavier will also be lighter, and that which is older will also be younger: 

and the same of other things; that which has a nature relative to self will

retain also the nature of its object:  I mean to say, for example, that

hearing is, as we say, of sound or voice.  Is that true?



Yes.



Then if hearing hears itself, it must hear a voice; for there is no other

way of hearing.



Certainly.



And sight also, my excellent friend, if it sees itself must see a colour,

for sight cannot see that which has no colour.



No.



Do you remark, Critias, that in several of the examples which have been

recited the notion of a relation to self is altogether inadmissible, and in

other cases hardly credible--inadmissible, for example, in the case of

magnitudes, numbers, and the like?



Very true.



But in the case of hearing and sight, or in the power of self-motion, and

the power of heat to burn, this relation to self will be regarded as

incredible by some, but perhaps not by others.  And some great man, my

friend, is wanted, who will satisfactorily determine for us, whether there

is nothing which has an inherent property of relation to self, or some

things only and not others; and whether in this class of self-related

things, if there be such a class, that science which is called wisdom or

temperance is included.  I altogether distrust my own power of determining

these matters:  I am not certain whether there is such a science of science

at all; and even if there be, I should not acknowledge this to be wisdom or

temperance, until I can also see whether such a science would or would not

do us any good; for I have an impression that temperance is a benefit and a

good.  And therefore, O son of Callaeschrus, as you maintain that

temperance or wisdom is a science of science, and also of the absence of

science, I will request you to show in the first place, as I was saying

before, the possibility, and in the second place, the advantage, of such a

science; and then perhaps you may satisfy me that you are right in your

view of temperance.



Critias heard me say this, and saw that I was in a difficulty; and as one

person when another yawns in his presence catches the infection of yawning

from him, so did he seem to be driven into a difficulty by my difficulty. 

But as he had a reputation to maintain, he was ashamed to admit before the

company that he could not answer my challenge or determine the question at

issue; and he made an unintelligible attempt to hide his perplexity.  In

order that the argument might proceed, I said to him, Well then Critias, if

you like, let us assume that there is this science of science; whether the

assumption is right or wrong may hereafter be investigated.  Admitting the

existence of it, will you tell me how such a science enables us to

distinguish what we know or do not know, which, as we were saying, is

self-knowledge or wisdom:  so we were saying?



Yes, Socrates, he said; and that I think is certainly true:  for he who has

this science or knowledge which knows itself will become like the knowledge

which he has, in the same way that he who has swiftness will be swift, and

he who has beauty will be beautiful, and he who has knowledge will know. 

In the same way he who has that knowledge which is self-knowing, will know

himself.



I do not doubt, I said, that a man will know himself, when he possesses

that which has self-knowledge:  but what necessity is there that, having

this, he should know what he knows and what he does not know?



Because, Socrates, they are the same.



Very likely, I said; but I remain as stupid as ever; for still I fail to

comprehend how this knowing what you know and do not know is the same as

the knowledge of self.



What do you mean? he said.



This is what I mean, I replied:  I will admit that there is a science of

science;--can this do more than determine that of two things one is and the

other is not science or knowledge?



No, just that.



But is knowledge or want of knowledge of health the same as knowledge or

want of knowledge of justice?



Certainly not.



The one is medicine, and the other is politics; whereas that of which we

are speaking is knowledge pure and simple.



Very true.



And if a man knows only, and has only knowledge of knowledge, and has no

further knowledge of health and justice, the probability is that he will

only know that he knows something, and has a certain knowledge, whether

concerning himself or other men.



True.



Then how will this knowledge or science teach him to know what he knows? 

Say that he knows health;--not wisdom or temperance, but the art of

medicine has taught it to him;--and he has learned harmony from the art of

music, and building from the art of building,--neither, from wisdom or

temperance:  and the same of other things.



That is evident.



How will wisdom, regarded only as a knowledge of knowledge or science of

science, ever teach him that he knows health, or that he knows building?



It is impossible.



Then he who is ignorant of these things will only know that he knows, but

not what he knows?



True.



Then wisdom or being wise appears to be not the knowledge of the things

which we do or do not know, but only the knowledge that we know or do not

know?



That is the inference.



Then he who has this knowledge will not be able to examine whether a

pretender knows or does not know that which he says that he knows:  he will

only know that he has a knowledge of some kind; but wisdom will not show

him of what the knowledge is?



Plainly not.



Neither will he be able to distinguish the pretender in medicine from the

true physician, nor between any other true and false professor of

knowledge.  Let us consider the matter in this way:  If the wise man or any

other man wants to distinguish the true physician from the false, how will

he proceed?  He will not talk to him about medicine; and that, as we were

saying, is the only thing which the physician understands.



True.



And, on the other hand, the physician knows nothing of science, for this

has been assumed to be the province of wisdom.



True.



And further, since medicine is science, we must infer that he does not know

anything of medicine.



Exactly.



Then the wise man may indeed know that the physician has some kind of

science or knowledge; but when he wants to discover the nature of this he

will ask, What is the subject-matter?  For the several sciences are

distinguished not by the mere fact that they are sciences, but by the

nature of their subjects.  Is not that true?



Quite true.



And medicine is distinguished from other sciences as having the subject-

matter of health and disease?



Yes.



And he who would enquire into the nature of medicine must pursue the

enquiry into health and disease, and not into what is extraneous?



True.



And he who judges rightly will judge of the physician as a physician in

what relates to these?



He will.



He will consider whether what he says is true, and whether what he does is

right, in relation to health and disease?



He will.



But can any one attain the knowledge of either unless he have a knowledge

of medicine?



He cannot.



No one at all, it would seem, except the physician can have this knowledge;

and therefore not the wise man; he would have to be a physician as well as

a wise man.



Very true.



Then, assuredly, wisdom or temperance, if only a science of science, and of

the absence of science or knowledge, will not be able to distinguish the

physician who knows from one who does not know but pretends or thinks that

he knows, or any other professor of anything at all; like any other artist,

he will only know his fellow in art or wisdom, and no one else.



That is evident, he said.



But then what profit, Critias, I said, is there any longer in wisdom or

temperance which yet remains, if this is wisdom?  If, indeed, as we were

supposing at first, the wise man had been able to distinguish what he knew

and did not know, and that he knew the one and did not know the other, and

to recognize a similar faculty of discernment in others, there would

certainly have been a great advantage in being wise; for then we should

never have made a mistake, but have passed through life the unerring guides

of ourselves and of those who are under us; and we should not have

attempted to do what we did not know, but we should have found out those

who knew, and have handed the business over to them and trusted in them;

nor should we have allowed those who were under us to do anything which

they were not likely to do well; and they would be likely to do well just

that of which they had knowledge; and the house or state which was ordered

or administered under the guidance of wisdom, and everything else of which

wisdom was the lord, would have been well ordered; for truth guiding, and

error having been eliminated, in all their doings, men would have done

well, and would have been happy.  Was not this, Critias, what we spoke of

as the great advantage of wisdom--to know what is known and what is unknown

to us?



Very true, he said.



And now you perceive, I said, that no such science is to be found anywhere.



I perceive, he said.



May we assume then, I said, that wisdom, viewed in this new light merely as

a knowledge of knowledge and ignorance, has this advantage:--that he who

possesses such knowledge will more easily learn anything which he learns;

and that everything will be clearer to him, because, in addition to the

knowledge of individuals, he sees the science, and this also will better

enable him to test the knowledge which others have of what he knows

himself; whereas the enquirer who is without this knowledge may be supposed

to have a feebler and weaker insight?  Are not these, my friend, the real

advantages which are to be gained from wisdom?  And are not we looking and

seeking after something more than is to be found in her?



That is very likely, he said.



That is very likely, I said; and very likely, too, we have been enquiring

to no purpose; as I am led to infer, because I observe that if this is

wisdom, some strange consequences would follow.  Let us, if you please,

assume the possibility of this science of sciences, and further admit and

allow, as was originally suggested, that wisdom is the knowledge of what we

know and do not know.  Assuming all this, still, upon further

consideration, I am doubtful, Critias, whether wisdom, such as this, would

do us much good.  For we were wrong, I think, in supposing, as we were

saying just now, that such wisdom ordering the government of house or state

would be a great benefit.



How so? he said.



Why, I said, we were far too ready to admit the great benefits which

mankind would obtain from their severally doing the things which they knew,

and committing the things of which they are ignorant to those who were

better acquainted with them.



Were we not right in making that admission?



I think not.



How very strange, Socrates!



By the dog of Egypt, I said, there I agree with you; and I was thinking as

much just now when I said that strange consequences would follow, and that

I was afraid we were on the wrong track; for however ready we may be to

admit that this is wisdom, I certainly cannot make out what good this sort

of thing does to us.



What do you mean? he said; I wish that you could make me understand what

you mean.



I dare say that what I am saying is nonsense, I replied; and yet if a man

has any feeling of what is due to himself, he cannot let the thought which

comes into his mind pass away unheeded and unexamined.



I like that, he said.



Hear, then, I said, my own dream; whether coming through the horn or the

ivory gate, I cannot tell.  The dream is this:  Let us suppose that wisdom

is such as we are now defining, and that she has absolute sway over us;

then each action will be done according to the arts or sciences, and no one

professing to be a pilot when he is not, or any physician or general, or

any one else pretending to know matters of which he is ignorant, will

deceive or elude us; our health will be improved; our safety at sea, and

also in battle, will be assured; our coats and shoes, and all other

instruments and implements will be skilfully made, because the workmen will

be good and true.  Aye, and if you please, you may suppose that prophecy,

which is the knowledge of the future, will be under the control of wisdom,

and that she will deter deceivers and set up the true prophets in their

place as the revealers of the future.  Now I quite agree that mankind, thus

provided, would live and act according to knowledge, for wisdom would watch

and prevent ignorance from intruding on us.  But whether by acting

according to knowledge we shall act well and be happy, my dear Critias,--

this is a point which we have not yet been able to determine.



Yet I think, he replied, that if you discard knowledge, you will hardly

find the crown of happiness in anything else.



But of what is this knowledge? I said.  Just answer me that small question. 

Do you mean a knowledge of shoemaking?



God forbid.



Or of working in brass?



Certainly not.



Or in wool, or wood, or anything of that sort?



No, I do not.



Then, I said, we are giving up the doctrine that he who lives according to

knowledge is happy, for these live according to knowledge, and yet they are

not allowed by you to be happy; but I think that you mean to confine

happiness to particular individuals who live according to knowledge, such

for example as the prophet, who, as I was saying, knows the future.  Is it

of him you are speaking or of some one else?



Yes, I mean him, but there are others as well.



Yes, I said, some one who knows the past and present as well as the future,

and is ignorant of nothing.  Let us suppose that there is such a person,

and if there is, you will allow that he is the most knowing of all living

men.



Certainly he is.



Yet I should like to know one thing more:  which of the different kinds of

knowledge makes him happy? or do all equally make him happy?



Not all equally, he replied.



But which most tends to make him happy? the knowledge of what past,

present, or future thing?  May I infer this to be the knowledge of the game

of draughts?



Nonsense about the game of draughts.



Or of computation?



No.



Or of health?



That is nearer the truth, he said.



And that knowledge which is nearest of all, I said, is the knowledge of

what?



The knowledge with which he discerns good and evil.



Monster! I said; you have been carrying me round in a circle, and all this

time hiding from me the fact that the life according to knowledge is not

that which makes men act rightly and be happy, not even if knowledge

include all the sciences, but one science only, that of good and evil. 

For, let me ask you, Critias, whether, if you take away this, medicine will

not equally give health, and shoemaking equally produce shoes, and the art

of the weaver clothes?--whether the art of the pilot will not equally save

our lives at sea, and the art of the general in war?



Quite so.



And yet, my dear Critias, none of these things will be well or beneficially

done, if the science of the good be wanting.



True.



But that science is not wisdom or temperance, but a science of human

advantage; not a science of other sciences, or of ignorance, but of good

and evil:  and if this be of use, then wisdom or temperance will not be of

use.



And why, he replied, will not wisdom be of use?  For, however much we

assume that wisdom is a science of sciences, and has a sway over other

sciences, surely she will have this particular science of the good under

her control, and in this way will benefit us.



And will wisdom give health? I said; is not this rather the effect of

medicine?  Or does wisdom do the work of any of the other arts,--do they

not each of them do their own work?  Have we not long ago asseverated that

wisdom is only the knowledge of knowledge and of ignorance, and of nothing

else?



That is obvious.



Then wisdom will not be the producer of health.



Certainly not.



The art of health is different.



Yes, different.



Nor does wisdom give advantage, my good friend; for that again we have just

now been attributing to another art.



Very true.



How then can wisdom be advantageous, when giving no advantage?



That, Socrates, is certainly inconceivable.



You see then, Critias, that I was not far wrong in fearing that I could

have no sound notion about wisdom; I was quite right in depreciating

myself; for that which is admitted to be the best of all things would never

have seemed to us useless, if I had been good for anything at an enquiry. 

But now I have been utterly defeated, and have failed to discover what that

is to which the imposer of names gave this name of temperance or wisdom. 

And yet many more admissions were made by us than could be fairly granted;

for we admitted that there was a science of science, although the argument

said No, and protested against us; and we admitted further, that this

science knew the works of the other sciences (although this too was denied

by the argument), because we wanted to show that the wise man had knowledge

of what he knew and did not know; also we nobly disregarded, and never even

considered, the impossibility of a man knowing in a sort of way that which

he does not know at all; for our assumption was, that he knows that which

he does not know; than which nothing, as I think, can be more irrational. 

And yet, after finding us so easy and good-natured, the enquiry is still

unable to discover the truth; but mocks us to a degree, and has gone out of

its way to prove the inutility of that which we admitted only by a sort of

supposition and fiction to be the true definition of temperance or wisdom: 

which result, as far as I am concerned, is not so much to be lamented, I

said.  But for your sake, Charmides, I am very sorry--that you, having such

beauty and such wisdom and temperance of soul, should have no profit or

good in life from your wisdom and temperance.  And still more am I grieved

about the charm which I learned with so much pain, and to so little profit,

from the Thracian, for the sake of a thing which is nothing worth.  I think

indeed that there is a mistake, and that I must be a bad enquirer, for

wisdom or temperance I believe to be really a great good; and happy are

you, Charmides, if you certainly possess it.  Wherefore examine yourself,

and see whether you have this gift and can do without the charm; for if you

can, I would rather advise you to regard me simply as a fool who is never

able to reason out anything; and to rest assured that the more wise and

temperate you are, the happier you will be.



Charmides said:  I am sure that I do not know, Socrates, whether I have or

have not this gift of wisdom and temperance; for how can I know whether I

have a thing, of which even you and Critias are, as you say, unable to

discover the nature?--(not that I believe you.)  And further, I am sure,

Socrates, that I do need the charm, and as far as I am concerned, I shall

be willing to be charmed by you daily, until you say that I have had

enough.



Very good, Charmides, said Critias; if you do this I shall have a proof of

your temperance, that is, if you allow yourself to be charmed by Socrates,

and never desert him at all.



You may depend on my following and not deserting him, said Charmides:  if

you who are my guardian command me, I should be very wrong not to obey you.



And I do command you, he said.



Then I will do as you say, and begin this very day.



You sirs, I said, what are you conspiring about?



We are not conspiring, said Charmides, we have conspired already.



And are you about to use violence, without even going through the forms of

justice?



Yes, I shall use violence, he replied, since he orders me; and therefore

you had better consider well.



But the time for consideration has passed, I said, when violence is

employed; and you, when you are determined on anything, and in the mood of

violence, are irresistible.



Do not you resist me then, he said.



I will not resist you, I replied.











End 



Cratylus

by Plato

Translated by Benjamin Jowett






INTRODUCTION.



The Cratylus has always been a source of perplexity to the student of

Plato.  While in fancy and humour, and perfection of style and metaphysical

originality, this dialogue may be ranked with the best of the Platonic

writings, there has been an uncertainty about the motive of the piece,

which interpreters have hitherto not succeeded in dispelling.  We need not

suppose that Plato used words in order to conceal his thoughts, or that he

would have been unintelligible to an educated contemporary.  In the

Phaedrus and Euthydemus we also find a difficulty in determining the

precise aim of the author.  Plato wrote satires in the form of dialogues,

and his meaning, like that of other satirical writers, has often slept in

the ear of posterity.  Two causes may be assigned for this obscurity:  1st,

the subtlety and allusiveness of this species of composition; 2nd, the

difficulty of reproducing a state of life and literature which has passed

away.  A satire is unmeaning unless we can place ourselves back among the

persons and thoughts of the age in which it was written.  Had the treatise

of Antisthenes upon words, or the speculations of Cratylus, or some other

Heracleitean of the fourth century B.C., on the nature of language been

preserved to us; or if we had lived at the time, and been 'rich enough to

attend the fifty-drachma course of Prodicus,' we should have understood

Plato better, and many points which are now attributed to the extravagance

of Socrates' humour would have been found, like the allusions of

Aristophanes in the Clouds, to have gone home to the sophists and

grammarians of the day.



For the age was very busy with philological speculation; and many questions

were beginning to be asked about language which were parallel to other

questions about justice, virtue, knowledge, and were illustrated in a

similar manner by the analogy of the arts.  Was there a correctness in

words, and were they given by nature or convention?  In the presocratic

philosophy mankind had been striving to attain an expression of their

ideas, and now they were beginning to ask themselves whether the expression

might not be distinguished from the idea?  They were also seeking to

distinguish the parts of speech and to enquire into the relation of subject

and predicate.  Grammar and logic were moving about somewhere in the depths

of the human soul, but they were not yet awakened into consciousness and

had not found names for themselves, or terms by which they might be

expressed.  Of these beginnings of the study of language we know little,

and there necessarily arises an obscurity when the surroundings of such a

work as the Cratylus are taken away.  Moreover, in this, as in most of the

dialogues of Plato, allowance has to be made for the character of Socrates. 

For the theory of language can only be propounded by him in a manner which

is consistent with his own profession of ignorance.  Hence his ridicule of

the new school of etymology is interspersed with many declarations 'that he

knows nothing,' 'that he has learned from Euthyphro,' and the like.  Even

the truest things which he says are depreciated by himself.  He professes

to be guessing, but the guesses of Plato are better than all the other

theories of the ancients respecting language put together.



The dialogue hardly derives any light from Plato's other writings, and

still less from Scholiasts and Neoplatonist writers.  Socrates must be

interpreted from himself, and on first reading we certainly have a

difficulty in understanding his drift, or his relation to the two other

interlocutors in the dialogue.  Does he agree with Cratylus or with

Hermogenes, and is he serious in those fanciful etymologies, extending over

more than half the dialogue, which he seems so greatly to relish?  Or is he

serious in part only; and can we separate his jest from his earnest?--Sunt

bona, sunt quaedum mediocria, sunt mala plura.  Most of them are

ridiculously bad, and yet among them are found, as if by accident,

principles of philology which are unsurpassed in any ancient writer, and

even in advance of any philologer of the last century.  May we suppose that

Plato, like Lucian, has been amusing his fancy by writing a comedy in the

form of a prose dialogue?  And what is the final result of the enquiry?  Is

Plato an upholder of the conventional theory of language, which he

acknowledges to be imperfect? or does he mean to imply that a perfect

language can only be based on his own theory of ideas?  Or if this latter

explanation is refuted by his silence, then in what relation does his

account of language stand to the rest of his philosophy?  Or may we be so

bold as to deny the connexion between them?  (For the allusion to the ideas

at the end of the dialogue is merely intended to show that we must not put

words in the place of things or realities, which is a thesis strongly

insisted on by Plato in many other passages)...These are some of the first

thoughts which arise in the mind of the reader of the Cratylus.  And the

consideration of them may form a convenient introduction to the general

subject of the dialogue.



We must not expect all the parts of a dialogue of Plato to tend equally to

some clearly-defined end.  His idea of literary art is not the absolute

proportion of the whole, such as we appear to find in a Greek temple or

statue; nor should his works be tried by any such standard.  They have

often the beauty of poetry, but they have also the freedom of conversation.

'Words are more plastic than wax' (Rep.), and may be moulded into any form. 

He wanders on from one topic to another, careless of the unity of his work,

not fearing any 'judge, or spectator, who may recall him to the point'

(Theat.), 'whither the argument blows we follow' (Rep.).  To have

determined beforehand, as in a modern didactic treatise, the nature and

limits of the subject, would have been fatal to the spirit of enquiry or

discovery, which is the soul of the dialogue...These remarks are applicable

to nearly all the works of Plato, but to the Cratylus and Phaedrus more

than any others.  See Phaedrus, Introduction.



There is another aspect under which some of the dialogues of Plato may be

more truly viewed:--they are dramatic sketches of an argument.  We have

found that in the Lysis, Charmides, Laches, Protagoras, Meno, we arrived at

no conclusion--the different sides of the argument were personified in the

different speakers; but the victory was not distinctly attributed to any of

them, nor the truth wholly the property of any.  And in the Cratylus we

have no reason to assume that Socrates is either wholly right or wholly

wrong, or that Plato, though he evidently inclines to him, had any other

aim than that of personifying, in the characters of Hermogenes, Socrates,

and Cratylus, the three theories of language which are respectively

maintained by them.



The two subordinate persons of the dialogue, Hermogenes and Cratylus, are

at the opposite poles of the argument.  But after a while the disciple of

the Sophist and the follower of Heracleitus are found to be not so far

removed from one another as at first sight appeared; and both show an

inclination to accept the third view which Socrates interposes between

them.  First, Hermogenes, the poor brother of the rich Callias, expounds

the doctrine that names are conventional; like the names of slaves, they

may be given and altered at pleasure.  This is one of those principles

which, whether applied to society or language, explains everything and

nothing.  For in all things there is an element of convention; but the

admission of this does not help us to understand the rational ground or

basis in human nature on which the convention proceeds.  Socrates first of

all intimates to Hermogenes that his view of language is only a part of a

sophistical whole, and ultimately tends to abolish the distinction between

truth and falsehood.  Hermogenes is very ready to throw aside the

sophistical tenet, and listens with a sort of half admiration, half belief,

to the speculations of Socrates.



Cratylus is of opinion that a name is either a true name or not a name at

all.  He is unable to conceive of degrees of imitation; a word is either

the perfect expression of a thing, or a mere inarticulate sound (a fallacy

which is still prevalent among theorizers about the origin of language). 

He is at once a philosopher and a sophist; for while wanting to rest

language on an immutable basis, he would deny the possibility of falsehood. 

He is inclined to derive all truth from language, and in language he sees

reflected the philosophy of Heracleitus.  His views are not like those of

Hermogenes, hastily taken up, but are said to be the result of mature

consideration, although he is described as still a young man.  With a

tenacity characteristic of the Heracleitean philosophers, he clings to the

doctrine of the flux.  (Compare Theaet.)  Of the real Cratylus we know

nothing, except that he is recorded by Aristotle to have been the friend or

teacher of Plato; nor have we any proof that he resembled the likeness of

him in Plato any more than the Critias of Plato is like the real Critias,

or the Euthyphro in this dialogue like the other Euthyphro, the diviner, in

the dialogue which is called after him.



Between these two extremes, which have both of them a sophistical

character, the view of Socrates is introduced, which is in a manner the

union of the two.  Language is conventional and also natural, and the true

conventional-natural is the rational.  It is a work not of chance, but of

art; the dialectician is the artificer of words, and the legislator gives

authority to them.  They are the expressions or imitations in sound of

things.  In a sense, Cratylus is right in saying that things have by nature

names; for nature is not opposed either to art or to law.  But vocal

imitation, like any other copy, may be imperfectly executed; and in this

way an element of chance or convention enters in.  There is much which is

accidental or exceptional in language.  Some words have had their original

meaning so obscured, that they require to be helped out by convention.  But

still the true name is that which has a natural meaning.  Thus nature, art,

chance, all combine in the formation of language.  And the three views

respectively propounded by Hermogenes, Socrates, Cratylus, may be described

as the conventional, the artificial or rational, and the natural.  The view

of Socrates is the meeting-point of the other two, just as conceptualism is

the meeting-point of nominalism and realism.



We can hardly say that Plato was aware of the truth, that 'languages are

not made, but grow.'  But still, when he says that 'the legislator made

language with the dialectician standing on his right hand,' we need not

infer from this that he conceived words, like coins, to be issued from the

mint of the State.  The creator of laws and of social life is naturally

regarded as the creator of language, according to Hellenic notions, and the

philosopher is his natural advisor.  We are not to suppose that the

legislator is performing any extraordinary function; he is merely the

Eponymus of the State, who prescribes rules for the dialectician and for

all other artists.  According to a truly Platonic mode of approaching the

subject, language, like virtue in the Republic, is examined by the analogy

of the arts.  Words are works of art which may be equally made in different

materials, and are well made when they have a meaning.  Of the process

which he thus describes, Plato had probably no very definite notion.  But

he means to express generally that language is the product of intelligence,

and that languages belong to States and not to individuals.



A better conception of language could not have been formed in Plato's age,

than that which he attributes to Socrates.  Yet many persons have thought

that the mind of Plato is more truly seen in the vague realism of Cratylus.

This misconception has probably arisen from two causes:  first, the desire

to bring Plato's theory of language into accordance with the received

doctrine of the Platonic ideas; secondly, the impression created by

Socrates himself, that he is not in earnest, and is only indulging the

fancy of the hour.



1.  We shall have occasion to show more at length, in the Introduction to

future dialogues, that the so-called Platonic ideas are only a semi-

mythical form, in which he attempts to realize abstractions, and that they

are replaced in his later writings by a rational theory of psychology. 

(See introductions to the Meno and the Sophist.)  And in the Cratylus he

gives a general account of the nature and origin of language, in which Adam

Smith, Rousseau, and other writers of the last century, would have

substantially agreed.  At the end of the dialogue, he speaks as in the

Symposium and Republic of absolute beauty and good; but he never supposed

that they were capable of being embodied in words.  Of the names of the

ideas, he would have said, as he says of the names of the Gods, that we

know nothing.  Even the realism of Cratylus is not based upon the ideas of

Plato, but upon the flux of Heracleitus.  Here, as in the Sophist and

Politicus, Plato expressly draws attention to the want of agreement in

words and things.  Hence we are led to infer, that the view of Socrates is

not the less Plato's own, because not based upon the ideas; 2nd, that

Plato's theory of language is not inconsistent with the rest of his

philosophy.



2.  We do not deny that Socrates is partly in jest and partly in earnest. 

He is discoursing in a high-flown vein, which may be compared to the

'dithyrambics of the Phaedrus.'  They are mysteries of which he is

speaking, and he professes a kind of ludicrous fear of his imaginary

wisdom.  When he is arguing out of Homer, about the names of Hector's son,

or when he describes himself as inspired or maddened by Euthyphro, with

whom he has been sitting from the early dawn (compare Phaedrus and Lysias;

Phaedr.) and expresses his intention of yielding to the illusion to-day,

and to-morrow he will go to a priest and be purified, we easily see that

his words are not to be taken seriously.  In this part of the dialogue his

dread of committing impiety, the pretended derivation of his wisdom from

another, the extravagance of some of his etymologies, and, in general, the

manner in which the fun, fast and furious, vires acquirit eundo, remind us

strongly of the Phaedrus.  The jest is a long one, extending over more than

half the dialogue.  But then, we remember that the Euthydemus is a still

longer jest, in which the irony is preserved to the very end.  There he is

parodying the ingenious follies of early logic; in the Cratylus he is

ridiculing the fancies of a new school of sophists and grammarians.  The

fallacies of the Euthydemus are still retained at the end of our logic

books; and the etymologies of the Cratylus have also found their way into

later writers.  Some of these are not much worse than the conjectures of

Hemsterhuis, and other critics of the last century; but this does not prove

that they are serious.  For Plato is in advance of his age in his

conception of language, as much as he is in his conception of mythology. 

(Compare Phaedrus.)



When the fervour of his etymological enthusiasm has abated, Socrates ends,

as he has begun, with a rational explanation of language.  Still he

preserves his 'know nothing' disguise, and himself declares his first

notions about names to be reckless and ridiculous.  Having explained

compound words by resolving them into their original elements, he now

proceeds to analyse simple words into the letters of which they are

composed.  The Socrates who 'knows nothing,' here passes into the teacher,

the dialectician, the arranger of species.  There is nothing in this part

of the dialogue which is either weak or extravagant.  Plato is a supporter

of the Onomatopoetic theory of language; that is to say, he supposes words

to be formed by the imitation of ideas in sounds; he also recognises the

effect of time, the influence of foreign languages, the desire of euphony,

to be formative principles; and he admits a certain element of chance.  But

he gives no imitation in all this that he is preparing the way for the

construction of an ideal language.  Or that he has any Eleatic speculation

to oppose to the Heracleiteanism of Cratylus.



The theory of language which is propounded in the Cratylus is in accordance

with the later phase of the philosophy of Plato, and would have been

regarded by him as in the main true.  The dialogue is also a satire on the

philological fancies of the day.  Socrates in pursuit of his vocation as a

detector of false knowledge, lights by accident on the truth.  He is

guessing, he is dreaming; he has heard, as he says in the Phaedrus, from

another:  no one is more surprised than himself at his own discoveries. 

And yet some of his best remarks, as for example his view of the derivation

of Greek words from other languages, or of the permutations of letters, or

again, his observation that in speaking of the Gods we are only speaking of

our names of them, occur among these flights of humour.



We can imagine a character having a profound insight into the nature of men

and things, and yet hardly dwelling upon them seriously; blending

inextricably sense and nonsense; sometimes enveloping in a blaze of jests

the most serious matters, and then again allowing the truth to peer

through; enjoying the flow of his own humour, and puzzling mankind by an

ironical exaggeration of their absurdities.  Such were Aristophanes and

Rabelais; such, in a different style, were Sterne, Jean Paul, Hamann,--

writers who sometimes become unintelligible through the extravagance of

their fancies.  Such is the character which Plato intends to depict in some

of his dialogues as the Silenus Socrates; and through this medium we have

to receive our theory of language.



There remains a difficulty which seems to demand a more exact answer:  In

what relation does the satirical or etymological portion of the dialogue

stand to the serious?  Granting all that can be said about the provoking

irony of Socrates, about the parody of Euthyphro, or Prodicus, or

Antisthenes, how does the long catalogue of etymologies furnish any answer

to the question of Hermogenes, which is evidently the main thesis of the

dialogue:  What is the truth, or correctness, or principle of names?



After illustrating the nature of correctness by the analogy of the arts,

and then, as in the Republic, ironically appealing to the authority of the

Homeric poems, Socrates shows that the truth or correctness of names can

only be ascertained by an appeal to etymology.  The truth of names is to be

found in the analysis of their elements.  But why does he admit etymologies

which are absurd, based on Heracleitean fancies, fourfold interpretations

of words, impossible unions and separations of syllables and letters?



1.  The answer to this difficulty has been already anticipated in part: 

Socrates is not a dogmatic teacher, and therefore he puts on this wild and

fanciful disguise, in order that the truth may be permitted to appear:  2.

as Benfey remarks, an erroneous example may illustrate a principle of

language as well as a true one:  3. many of these etymologies, as, for

example, that of dikaion, are indicated, by the manner in which Socrates

speaks of them, to have been current in his own age:  4. the philosophy of

language had not made such progress as would have justified Plato in

propounding real derivations.  Like his master Socrates, he saw through the

hollowness of the incipient sciences of the day, and tries to move in a

circle apart from them, laying down the conditions under which they are to

be pursued, but, as in the Timaeus, cautious and tentative, when he is

speaking of actual phenomena.  To have made etymologies seriously, would


have seemed to him like the interpretation of the myths in the Phaedrus,

the task 'of a not very fortunate individual, who had a great deal of time

on his hands.'  The irony of Socrates places him above and beyond the

errors of his contemporaries.



The Cratylus is full of humour and satirical touches:  the inspiration

which comes from Euthyphro, and his prancing steeds, the light admixture of

quotations from Homer, and the spurious dialectic which is applied to them;

the jest about the fifty-drachma course of Prodicus, which is declared on

the best authority, viz. his own, to be a complete education in grammar and

rhetoric; the double explanation of the name Hermogenes, either as 'not

being in luck,' or 'being no speaker;' the dearly-bought wisdom of Callias,

the Lacedaemonian whose name was 'Rush,' and, above all, the pleasure which

Socrates expresses in his own dangerous discoveries, which 'to-morrow he

will purge away,' are truly humorous.  While delivering a lecture on the

philosophy of language, Socrates is also satirizing the endless fertility

of the human mind in spinning arguments out of nothing, and employing the

most trifling and fanciful analogies in support of a theory.  Etymology in

ancient as in modern times was a favourite recreation; and Socrates makes

merry at the expense of the etymologists.  The simplicity of Hermogenes,

who is ready to believe anything that he is told, heightens the effect. 

Socrates in his genial and ironical mood hits right and left at his

adversaries:  Ouranos is so called apo tou oran ta ano, which, as some

philosophers say, is the way to have a pure mind; the sophists are by a

fanciful explanation converted into heroes; 'the givers of names were like

some philosophers who fancy that the earth goes round because their heads

are always going round.'  There is a great deal of 'mischief' lurking in

the following:  'I found myself in greater perplexity about justice than I

was before I began to learn;'  'The rho in katoptron must be the addition

of some one who cares nothing about truth, but thinks only of putting the

mouth into shape;'  'Tales and falsehoods have generally to do with the

Tragic and goatish life, and tragedy is the place of them.'  Several


philosophers and sophists are mentioned by name:  first, Protagoras and

Euthydemus are assailed; then the interpreters of Homer, oi palaioi

Omerikoi (compare Arist. Met.) and the Orphic poets are alluded to by the

way; then he discovers a hive of wisdom in the philosophy of Heracleitus;--

the doctrine of the flux is contained in the word ousia (= osia the pushing

principle), an anticipation of Anaxagoras is found in psuche and selene.

Again, he ridicules the arbitrary methods of pulling out and putting in

letters which were in vogue among the philologers of his time; or slightly

scoffs at contemporary religious beliefs.  Lastly, he is impatient of

hearing from the half-converted Cratylus the doctrine that falsehood can

neither be spoken, nor uttered, nor addressed; a piece of sophistry

attributed to Gorgias, which reappears in the Sophist.  And he proceeds to

demolish, with no less delight than he had set up, the Heracleitean theory

of language.



In the latter part of the dialogue Socrates becomes more serious, though he

does not lay aside but rather aggravates his banter of the Heracleiteans,

whom here, as in the Theaetetus, he delights to ridicule.  What was the

origin of this enmity we can hardly determine:--was it due to the natural

dislike which may be supposed to exist between the 'patrons of the flux'

and the 'friends of the ideas' (Soph.)? or is it to be attributed to the

indignation which Plato felt at having wasted his time upon 'Cratylus and

the doctrines of Heracleitus' in the days of his youth?  Socrates, touching

on some of the characteristic difficulties of early Greek philosophy,

endeavours to show Cratylus that imitation may be partial or imperfect,

that a knowledge of things is higher than a knowledge of names, and that

there can be no knowledge if all things are in a state of transition.  But

Cratylus, who does not easily apprehend the argument from common sense,

remains unconvinced, and on the whole inclines to his former opinion.  Some

profound philosophical remarks are scattered up and down, admitting of an

application not only to language but to knowledge generally; such as the

assertion that 'consistency is no test of truth:' or again, 'If we are

over-precise about words, truth will say "too late" to us as to the belated

traveller in Aegina.'



The place of the dialogue in the series cannot be determined with

certainty.  The style and subject, and the treatment of the character of

Socrates, have a close resemblance to the earlier dialogues, especially to

the Phaedrus and Euthydemus.  The manner in which the ideas are spoken of

at the end of the dialogue, also indicates a comparatively early date.  The

imaginative element is still in full vigour; the Socrates of the Cratylus

is the Socrates of the Apology and Symposium, not yet Platonized; and he

describes, as in the Theaetetus, the philosophy of Heracleitus by

'unsavoury' similes--he cannot believe that the world is like 'a leaky

vessel,' or 'a man who has a running at the nose'; he attributes the flux

of the world to the swimming in some folks' heads.  On the other hand, the

relation of thought to language is omitted here, but is treated of in the

Sophist.  These grounds are not sufficient to enable us to arrive at a

precise conclusion.  But we shall not be far wrong in placing the Cratylus

about the middle, or at any rate in the first half, of the series.



Cratylus, the Heracleitean philosopher, and Hermogenes, the brother of

Callias, have been arguing about names; the former maintaining that they

are natural, the latter that they are conventional.  Cratylus affirms that

his own is a true name, but will not allow that the name of Hermogenes is

equally true.  Hermogenes asks Socrates to explain to him what Cratylus

means; or, far rather, he would like to know, What Socrates himself thinks

about the truth or correctness of names?  Socrates replies, that hard is

knowledge, and the nature of names is a considerable part of knowledge:  he

has never been to hear the fifty-drachma course of Prodicus; and having

only attended the single-drachma course, he is not competent to give an

opinion on such matters.  When Cratylus denies that Hermogenes is a true

name, he supposes him to mean that he is not a true son of Hermes, because

he is never in luck.  But he would like to have an open council and to hear

both sides.



Hermogenes is of opinion that there is no principle in names; they may be

changed, as we change the names of slaves, whenever we please, and the

altered name is as good as the original one.



You mean to say, for instance, rejoins Socrates, that if I agree to call a

man a horse, then a man will be rightly called a horse by me, and a man by

the rest of the world?  But, surely, there is in words a true and a false,

as there are true and false propositions.  If a whole proposition be true

or false, then the parts of a proposition may be true or false, and the

least parts as well as the greatest; and the least parts are names, and

therefore names may be true or false.  Would Hermogenes maintain that

anybody may give a name to anything, and as many names as he pleases; and

would all these names be always true at the time of giving them? 

Hermogenes replies that this is the only way in which he can conceive that

names are correct; and he appeals to the practice of different nations, and

of the different Hellenic tribes, in confirmation of his view.  Socrates

asks, whether the things differ as the words which represent them differ:--

Are we to maintain with Protagoras, that what appears is?  Hermogenes has

always been puzzled about this, but acknowledges, when he is pressed by

Socrates, that there are a few very good men in the world, and a great many

very bad; and the very good are the wise, and the very bad are the foolish;

and this is not mere appearance but reality.  Nor is he disposed to say

with Euthydemus, that all things equally and always belong to all men; in

that case, again, there would be no distinction between bad and good men. 

But then, the only remaining possibility is, that all things have their

several distinct natures, and are independent of our notions about them. 

And not only things, but actions, have distinct natures, and are done by

different processes.  There is a natural way of cutting or burning, and a

natural instrument with which men cut or burn, and any other way will

fail;--this is true of all actions.  And speaking is a kind of action, and

naming is a kind of speaking, and we must name according to a natural

process, and with a proper instrument.  We cut with a knife, we pierce with

an awl, we weave with a shuttle, we name with a name.  And as a shuttle

separates the warp from the woof, so a name distinguishes the natures of

things.  The weaver will use the shuttle well,--that is, like a weaver; and

the teacher will use the name well,--that is, like a teacher.  The shuttle

will be made by the carpenter; the awl by the smith or skilled person.  But

who makes a name?  Does not the law give names, and does not the teacher

receive them from the legislator?  He is the skilled person who makes them,

and of all skilled workmen he is the rarest.  But how does the carpenter

make or repair the shuttle, and to what will he look?  Will he not look at

the ideal which he has in his mind?  And as the different kinds of work

differ, so ought the instruments which make them to differ.  The several

kinds of shuttles ought to answer in material and form to the several kinds

of webs.  And the legislator ought to know the different materials and

forms of which names are made in Hellas and other countries.  But who is to

be the judge of the proper form?  The judge of shuttles is the weaver who

uses them; the judge of lyres is the player of the lyre; the judge of ships

is the pilot.  And will not the judge who is able to direct the legislator

in his work of naming, be he who knows how to use the names--he who can ask

and answer questions--in short, the dialectician?  The pilot directs the

carpenter how to make the rudder, and the dialectician directs the

legislator how he is to impose names; for to express the ideal forms of

things in syllables and letters is not the easy task, Hermogenes, which you

imagine.



'I should be more readily persuaded, if you would show me this natural

correctness of names.'



Indeed I cannot; but I see that you have advanced; for you now admit that

there is a correctness of names, and that not every one can give a name. 

But what is the nature of this correctness or truth, you must learn from

the Sophists, of whom your brother Callias has bought his reputation for

wisdom rather dearly; and since they require to be paid, you, having no

money, had better learn from him at second-hand.  'Well, but I have just

given up Protagoras, and I should be inconsistent in going to learn of

him.'  Then if you reject him you may learn of the poets, and in particular

of Homer, who distinguishes the names given by Gods and men to the same

things, as in the verse about the river God who fought with Hephaestus,

'whom the Gods call Xanthus, and men call Scamander;' or in the lines in

which he mentions the bird which the Gods call 'Chalcis,' and men

'Cymindis;' or the hill which men call 'Batieia,' and the Gods 'Myrinna's

Tomb.'  Here is an important lesson; for the Gods must of course be right

in their use of names.  And this is not the only truth about philology

which may be learnt from Homer.  Does he not say that Hector's son had two

names--



'Hector called him Scamandrius, but the others Astyanax'?



Now, if the men called him Astyanax, is it not probable that the other name

was conferred by the women?  And which are more likely to be right--the

wiser or the less wise, the men or the women?  Homer evidently agreed with

the men:  and of the name given by them he offers an explanation;--the boy

was called Astyanax ('king of the city'), because his father saved the

city.  The names Astyanax and Hector, moreover, are really the same,--the

one means a king, and the other is 'a holder or possessor.'  For as the

lion's whelp may be called a lion, or the horse's foal a foal, so the son

of a king may be called a king.  But if the horse had produced a calf, then

that would be called a calf.  Whether the syllables of a name are the same

or not makes no difference, provided the meaning is retained.  For example;

the names of letters, whether vowels or consonants, do not correspond to

their sounds, with the exception of epsilon, upsilon, omicron, omega.  The

name Beta has three letters added to the sound--and yet this does not alter

the sense of the word, or prevent the whole name having the value which the

legislator intended.  And the same may be said of a king and the son of a

king, who like other animals resemble each other in the course of nature;

the words by which they are signified may be disguised, and yet amid

differences of sound the etymologist may recognise the same notion, just as

the physician recognises the power of the same drugs under different

disguises of colour and smell.  Hector and Astyanax have only one letter

alike, but they have the same meaning; and Agis (leader) is altogether

different in sound from Polemarchus (chief in war), or Eupolemus (good

warrior); but the two words present the same idea of leader or general,

like the words Iatrocles and Acesimbrotus, which equally denote a

physician.  The son succeeds the father as the foal succeeds the horse, but

when, out of the course of nature, a prodigy occurs, and the offspring no

longer resembles the parent, then the names no longer agree.  This may be

illustrated by the case of Agamemnon and his son Orestes, of whom the

former has a name significant of his patience at the siege of Troy; while

the name of the latter indicates his savage, man-of-the-mountain nature. 

Atreus again, for his murder of Chrysippus, and his cruelty to Thyestes, is

rightly named Atreus, which, to the eye of the etymologist, is ateros

(destructive), ateires (stubborn), atreotos (fearless); and Pelops is o ta

pelas oron (he who sees what is near only), because in his eagerness to win

Hippodamia, he was unconscious of the remoter consequences which the murder

of Myrtilus would entail upon his race.  The name Tantalus, if slightly

changed, offers two etymologies; either apo tes tou lithou talanteias, or

apo tou talantaton einai, signifying at once the hanging of the stone over

his head in the world below, and the misery which he brought upon his

country.  And the name of his father, Zeus, Dios, Zenos, has an excellent

meaning, though hard to be understood, because really a sentence which is

divided into two parts (Zeus, Dios).  For he, being the lord and king of

all, is the author of our being, and in him all live:  this is implied in

the double form, Dios, Zenos, which being put together and interpreted is

di on ze panta.  There may, at first sight, appear to be some irreverence

in calling him the son of Cronos, who is a proverb for stupidity; but the

meaning is that Zeus himself is the son of a mighty intellect; Kronos,

quasi koros, not in the sense of a youth, but quasi to katharon kai

akeraton tou nou--the pure and garnished mind, which in turn is begotten of

Uranus, who is so called apo tou oran ta ano, from looking upwards; which,

as philosophers say, is the way to have a pure mind.  The earlier portion

of Hesiod's genealogy has escaped my memory, or I would try more

conclusions of the same sort.  'You talk like an oracle.'  I caught the

infection from Euthyphro, who gave me a long lecture which began at dawn,

and has not only entered into my ears, but filled my soul, and my intention

is to yield to the inspiration to-day; and to-morrow I will be exorcised by

some priest or sophist.  'Go on; I am anxious to hear the rest.'  Now that

we have a general notion, how shall we proceed?  What names will afford the

most crucial test of natural fitness?  Those of heroes and ordinary men are

often deceptive, because they are patronymics or expressions of a wish; let

us try gods and demi-gods.  Gods are so called, apo tou thein, from the

verb 'to run;' because the sun, moon, and stars run about the heaven; and

they being the original gods of the Hellenes, as they still are of the

Barbarians, their name is given to all Gods.  The demons are the golden

race of Hesiod, and by golden he means not literally golden, but good; and

they are called demons, quasi daemones, which in old Attic was used for

daimones--good men are well said to become daimones when they die, because

they are knowing.  Eros (with an epsilon) is the same word as eros (with an

eta):  'the sons of God saw the daughters of men that they were fair;' or

perhaps they were a species of sophists or rhetoricians, and so called apo

tou erotan, or eirein, from their habit of spinning questions; for eirein

is equivalent to legein.  I get all this from Euthyphro; and now a new and

ingenious idea comes into my mind, and, if I am not careful, I shall be

wiser than I ought to be by to-morrow's dawn.  My idea is, that we may put

in and pull out letters at pleasure and alter the accents (as, for example,

Dii philos may be turned into Diphilos), and we may make words into

sentences and sentences into words.  The name anthrotos is a case in point,

for a letter has been omitted and the accent changed; the original meaning

being o anathron a opopen--he who looks up at what he sees.  Psuche may be

thought to be the reviving, or refreshing, or animating principle--e

anapsuchousa to soma; but I am afraid that Euthyphro and his disciples will

scorn this derivation, and I must find another:  shall we identify the soul

with the 'ordering mind' of Anaxagoras, and say that psuche, quasi phuseche

= e phusin echei or ochei?--this might easily be refined into psyche. 

'That is a more artistic etymology.'



After psuche follows soma; this, by a slight permutation, may be either =

(1) the 'grave' of the soul, or (2) may mean 'that by which the soul

signifies (semainei) her wishes.'  But more probably, the word is Orphic,

and simply denotes that the body is the place of ward in which the soul

suffers the penalty of sin,--en o sozetai.  'I should like to hear some

more explanations of the names of the Gods, like that excellent one of

Zeus.'  The truest names of the Gods are those which they give themselves;

but these are unknown to us.  Less true are those by which we propitiate

them, as men say in prayers, 'May he graciously receive any name by which I

call him.'  And to avoid offence, I should like to let them know beforehand

that we are not presuming to enquire about them, but only about the names

which they usually bear.  Let us begin with Hestia.  What did he mean who

gave the name Hestia?  'That is a very difficult question.'  O, my dear

Hermogenes, I believe that there was a power of philosophy and talk among

the first inventors of names, both in our own and in other languages; for

even in foreign words a principle is discernible.  Hestia is the same with

esia, which is an old form of ousia, and means the first principle of

things:  this agrees with the fact that to Hestia the first sacrifices are

offered.  There is also another reading--osia, which implies that 'pushing'

(othoun) is the first principle of all things.  And here I seem to discover

a delicate allusion to the flux of Heracleitus--that antediluvian

philosopher who cannot walk twice in the same stream; and this flux of his

may accomplish yet greater marvels.  For the names Cronos and Rhea cannot

have been accidental; the giver of them must have known something about the

doctrine of Heracleitus.  Moreover, there is a remarkable coincidence in

the words of Hesiod, when he speaks of Oceanus, 'the origin of Gods;' and

in the verse of Orpheus, in which he describes Oceanus espousing his sister

Tethys.  Tethys is nothing more than the name of a spring--to diattomenon

kai ethoumenon.  Poseidon is posidesmos, the chain of the feet, because you

cannot walk on the sea--the epsilon is inserted by way of ornament; or

perhaps the name may have been originally polleidon, meaning, that the God

knew many things (polla eidos):  he may also be the shaker, apo tou

seiein,--in this case, pi and delta have been added.  Pluto is connected

with ploutos, because wealth comes out of the earth; or the word may be a

euphemism for Hades, which is usually derived apo tou aeidous, because the

God is concerned with the invisible.  But the name Hades was really given

him from his knowing (eidenai) all good things.  Men in general are

foolishly afraid of him, and talk with horror of the world below from which

no one may return.  The reason why his subjects never wish to come back,

even if they could, is that the God enchains them by the strongest of

spells, namely by the desire of virtue, which they hope to obtain by

constant association with him.  He is the perfect and accomplished Sophist

and the great benefactor of the other world; for he has much more than he

wants there, and hence he is called Pluto or the rich.  He will have

nothing to do with the souls of men while in the body, because he cannot

work his will with them so long as they are confused and entangled by

fleshly lusts.  Demeter is the mother and giver of food--e didousa meter

tes edodes.  Here is erate tis, or perhaps the legislator may have been

thinking of the weather, and has merely transposed the letters of the word

aer.  Pherephatta, that word of awe, is pheretapha, which is only an

euphonious contraction of e tou pheromenou ephaptomene,--all things are in

motion, and she in her wisdom moves with them, and the wise God Hades

consorts with her--there is nothing very terrible in this, any more than in

the her other appellation Persephone, which is also significant of her

wisdom (sophe).  Apollo is another name, which is supposed to have some

dreadful meaning, but is susceptible of at least four perfectly innocent

explanations.  First, he is the purifier or purger or absolver (apolouon);

secondly, he is the true diviner, Aplos, as he is called in the Thessalian

dialect (aplos = aplous, sincere); thirdly, he is the archer (aei ballon),

always shooting; or again, supposing alpha to mean ama or omou, Apollo

becomes equivalent to ama polon, which points to both his musical and his

heavenly attributes; for there is a 'moving together' alike in music and in

the harmony of the spheres.  The second lambda is inserted in order to

avoid the ill-omened sound of destruction.  The Muses are so called--apo

tou mosthai.  The gentle Leto or Letho is named from her willingness

(ethelemon), or because she is ready to forgive and forget (lethe). 

Artemis is so called from her healthy well-balanced nature, dia to artemes,

or as aretes istor; or as a lover of virginity, aroton misesasa.  One of

these explanations is probably true,--perhaps all of them.  Dionysus is o

didous ton oinon, and oinos is quasi oionous because wine makes those think

(oiesthai) that they have a mind (nous) who have none.  The established

derivation of Aphrodite dia ten tou athrou genesin may be accepted on the

authority of Hesiod.  Again, there is the name of Pallas, or Athene, which

we, who are Athenians, must not forget.  Pallas is derived from armed

dances--apo tou pallein ta opla.  For Athene we must turn to the

allegorical interpreters of Homer, who make the name equivalent to theonoe,

or possibly the word was originally ethonoe and signified moral

intelligence (en ethei noesis).  Hephaestus, again, is the lord of light--o

tou phaeos istor.  This is a good notion; and, to prevent any other getting

into our heads, let us go on to Ares.  He is the manly one (arren), or the

unchangeable one (arratos).  Enough of the Gods; for, by the Gods, I am

afraid of them; but if you suggest other words, you will see how the horses

of Euthyphro prance.  'Only one more God; tell me about my godfather

Hermes.'  He is ermeneus, the messenger or cheater or thief or bargainer;

or o eirein momenos, that is, eiremes or ermes--the speaker or contriver of

speeches.  'Well said Cratylus, then, that I am no son of Hermes.'  Pan, as

the son of Hermes, is speech or the brother of speech, and is called Pan

because speech indicates everything--o pan menuon.  He has two forms, a

true and a false; and is in the upper part smooth, and in the lower part

shaggy.  He is the goat of Tragedy, in which there are plenty of

falsehoods.



'Will you go on to the elements--sun, moon, stars, earth, aether, air,

fire, water, seasons, years?'  Very good:  and which shall I take first? 

Let us begin with elios, or the sun.  The Doric form elios helps us to see

that he is so called because at his rising he gathers (alizei) men

together, or because he rolls about (eilei) the earth, or because he

variegates (aiolei = poikillei) the earth.  Selene is an anticipation of

Anaxagoras, being a contraction of selaenoneoaeia, the light (selas) which

is ever old and new, and which, as Anaxagoras says, is borrowed from the

sun; the name was harmonized into selanaia, a form which is still in use. 

'That is a true dithyrambic name.'  Meis is so called apo tou meiousthai,

from suffering diminution, and astron is from astrape (lightning), which is

an improvement of anastrope, that which turns the eyes inside out.  'How do

you explain pur n udor?'  I suspect that pur, which, like udor n kuon, is

found in Phrygian, is a foreign word; for the Hellenes have borrowed much

from the barbarians, and I always resort to this theory of a foreign origin

when I am at a loss.  Aer may be explained, oti airei ta apo tes ges; or,

oti aei rei; or, oti pneuma ex autou ginetai (compare the poetic word

aetai).  So aither quasi aeitheer oti aei thei peri ton aera:  ge, gaia

quasi genneteira (compare the Homeric form gegaasi); ora (with an omega),

or, according to the old Attic form ora (with an omicron), is derived apo

tou orizein, because it divides the year; eniautos and etos are the same

thought--o en eauto etazon, cut into two parts, en eauto and etazon, like

di on ze into Dios and Zenos.



'You make surprising progress.'  True; I am run away with, and am not even

yet at my utmost speed.  'I should like very much to hear your account of

the virtues.  What principle of correctness is there in those charming

words, wisdom, understanding, justice, and the rest?'  To explain all that

will be a serious business; still, as I have put on the lion's skin,

appearances must be maintained.  My opinion is, that primitive men were

like some modern philosophers, who, by always going round in their search

after the nature of things, become dizzy; and this phenomenon, which was

really in themselves, they imagined to take place in the external world. 

You have no doubt remarked, that the doctrine of the universal flux, or

generation of things, is indicated in names.  'No, I never did.'  Phronesis

is only phoras kai rou noesis, or perhaps phoras onesis, and in any case is

connected with pheresthai; gnome is gones skepsis kai nomesis; noesis is

neou or gignomenon esis; the word neos implies that creation is always

going on--the original form was neoesis; sophrosune is soteria phroneseos;

episteme is e epomene tois pragmasin--the faculty which keeps close,

neither anticipating nor lagging behind; sunesis is equivalent to sunienai,

sumporeuesthai ten psuche, and is a kind of conclusion--sullogismos tis,

akin therefore in idea to episteme; sophia is very difficult, and has a

foreign look--the meaning is, touching the motion or stream of things, and

may be illustrated by the poetical esuthe and the Lacedaemonian proper name

Sous, or Rush; agathon is ro agaston en te tachuteti,--for all things are

in motion, and some are swifter than others:  dikaiosune is clearly e tou

dikaiou sunesis.  The word dikaion is more troublesome, and appears to mean

the subtle penetrating power which, as the lovers of motion say, preserves

all things, and is the cause of all things, quasi diaion going through--the

letter kappa being inserted for the sake of euphony.  This is a great

mystery which has been confided to me; but when I ask for an explanation I

am thought obtrusive, and another derivation is proposed to me.  Justice is

said to be o kaion, or the sun; and when I joyfully repeat this beautiful

notion, I am answered, 'What, is there no justice when the sun is down?' 

And when I entreat my questioner to tell me his own opinion, he replies,

that justice is fire in the abstract, or heat in the abstract; which is not

very intelligible.  Others laugh at such notions, and say with Anaxagoras,

that justice is the ordering mind.  'I think that some one must have told

you this.'  And not the rest?  Let me proceed then, in the hope of proving

to you my originality.  Andreia is quasi anpeia quasi e ano roe, the stream

which flows upwards, and is opposed to injustice, which clearly hinders the

principle of penetration; arren and aner have a similar derivation; gune is

the same as gone; thelu is derived apo tes theles, because the teat makes

things flourish (tethelenai), and the word thallein itself implies increase

of youth, which is swift and sudden ever (thein and allesthai).  I am

getting over the ground fast:  but much has still to be explained.  There

is techne, for instance.  This, by an aphaeresis of tau and an epenthesis

of omicron in two places, may be identified with echonoe, and signifies

'that which has mind.'



'A very poor etymology.'  Yes; but you must remember that all language is

in process of change; letters are taken in and put out for the sake of

euphony, and time is also a great alterer of words.  For example, what

business has the letter rho in the word katoptron, or the letter sigma in

the word sphigx?  The additions are often such that it is impossible to

make out the original word; and yet, if you may put in and pull out, as you

like, any name is equally good for any object.  The fact is, that great

dictators of literature like yourself should observe the rules of

moderation.  'I will do my best.'  But do not be too much of a precisian,

or you will paralyze me.  If you will let me add mechane, apo tou mekous,

which means polu, and anein, I shall be at the summit of my powers, from

which elevation I will examine the two words kakia and arete.  The first is

easily explained in accordance with what has preceded; for all things being

in a flux, kakia is to kakos ion.  This derivation is illustrated by the

word deilia, which ought to have come after andreia, and may be regarded as

o lian desmos tes psuches, just as aporia signifies an impediment to motion

(from alpha not, and poreuesthai to go), and arete is euporia, which is the

opposite of this--the everflowing (aei reousa or aeireite), or the

eligible, quasi airete.  You will think that I am inventing, but I say that

if kakia is right, then arete is also right.  But what is kakon?  That is a

very obscure word, to which I can only apply my old notion and declare that

kakon is a foreign word.  Next, let us proceed to kalon, aischron.  The

latter is doubtless contracted from aeischoroun, quasi aei ischon roun. 

The inventor of words being a patron of the flux, was a great enemy to

stagnation.  Kalon is to kaloun ta pragmata--this is mind (nous or

dianoia); which is also the principle of beauty; and which doing the works

of beauty, is therefore rightly called the beautiful.  The meaning of

sumpheron is explained by previous examples;--like episteme, signifying

that the soul moves in harmony with the world (sumphora, sumpheronta). 

Kerdos is to pasi kerannumenon--that which mingles with all things: 

lusiteloun is equivalent to to tes phoras luon to telos, and is not to be

taken in the vulgar sense of gainful, but rather in that of swift, being

the principle which makes motion immortal and unceasing; ophelimon is apo

tou ophellein--that which gives increase:  this word, which is Homeric, is

of foreign origin.  Blaberon is to blamton or boulomenon aptein tou rou--

that which injures or seeks to bind the stream.  The proper word would be

boulapteroun, but this is too much of a mouthful--like a prelude on the

flute in honour of Athene.  The word zemiodes is difficult; great changes,

as I was saying, have been made in words, and even a small change will

alter their meaning very much.  The word deon is one of these disguised

words.  You know that according to the old pronunciation, which is

especially affected by the women, who are great conservatives, iota and

delta were used where we should now use eta and zeta:  for example, what we

now call emera was formerly called imera; and this shows the meaning of the

word to have been 'the desired one coming after night,' and not, as is

often supposed, 'that which makes things gentle' (emera).  So again, zugon

is duogon, quasi desis duein eis agogen--(the binding of two together for

the purpose of drawing.  Deon, as ordinarily written, has an evil sense,

signifying the chain (desmos) or hindrance of motion; but in its ancient

form dion is expressive of good, quasi diion, that which penetrates or goes

through all.  Zemiodes is really demiodes, and means that which binds

motion (dounti to ion):  edone is e pros ten onrsin teinousa praxis--the

delta is an insertion:  lupe is derived apo tes dialuseos tou somatos: ania

is from alpha and ienai, to go:  algedon is a foreign word, and is so

called apo tou algeinou:  odune is apo tes enduseos tes lupes:  achthedon

is in its very sound a burden:  chapa expresses the flow of soul:  terpsis

is apo tou terpnou, and terpnon is properly erpnon, because the sensation

of pleasure is likened to a breath (pnoe) which creeps (erpei) through the

soul:  euphrosune is named from pheresthai, because the soul moves in

harmony with nature:  epithumia is e epi ton thumon iousa dunamis:  thumos

is apo tes thuseos tes psuches:  imeros--oti eimenos pei e psuche:  pothos,

the desire which is in another place, allothi pou:  eros was anciently

esros, and so called because it flows into (esrei) the soul from without: 

doxa is e dioxis tou eidenai, or expresses the shooting from a bow (toxon). 

The latter etymology is confirmed by the words boulesthai, boule, aboulia,

which all have to do with shooting (bole):  and similarly oiesis is nothing

but the movement (oisis) of the soul towards essence.  Ekousion is to

eikon--the yielding--anagke is e an agke iousa, the passage through ravines

which impede motion:  aletheia is theia ale, divine motion.  Pseudos is the

opposite of this, implying the principle of constraint and forced repose,

which is expressed under the figure of sleep, to eudon; the psi is an

addition.  Onoma, a name, affirms the real existence of that which is

sought after--on ou masma estin.  On and ousia are only ion with an iota

broken off; and ouk on is ouk ion.  'And what are ion, reon, doun?'  One

way of explaining them has been already suggested--they may be of foreign

origin; and possibly this is the true answer.  But mere antiquity may often

prevent our recognizing words, after all the complications which they have

undergone; and we must remember that however far we carry back our analysis

some ultimate elements or roots will remain which can be no further

analyzed.  For example; the word agathos was supposed by us to be a

compound of agastos and thoos, and probably thoos may be further

resolvable.  But if we take a word of which no further resolution seems

attainable, we may fairly conclude that we have reached one of these

original elements, and the truth of such a word must be tested by some new

method.  Will you help me in the search?



All names, whether primary or secondary, are intended to show the nature of

things; and the secondary, as I conceive, derive their significance from

the primary.  But then, how do the primary names indicate anything?  And

let me ask another question,--If we had no faculty of speech, how should we

communicate with one another?  Should we not use signs, like the deaf and

dumb?  The elevation of our hands would mean lightness--heaviness would be

expressed by letting them drop.  The running of any animal would be

described by a similar movement of our own frames.  The body can only

express anything by imitation; and the tongue or mouth can imitate as well

as the rest of the body.  But this imitation of the tongue or voice is not

yet a name, because people may imitate sheep or goats without naming them. 

What, then, is a name?  In the first place, a name is not a musical, or,

secondly, a pictorial imitation, but an imitation of that kind which

expresses the nature of a thing; and is the invention not of a musician, or

of a painter, but of a namer.



And now, I think that we may consider the names about which you were

asking.  The way to analyze them will be by going back to the letters, or

primary elements of which they are composed.  First, we separate the

alphabet into classes of letters, distinguishing the consonants, mutes,

vowels, and semivowels; and when we have learnt them singly, we shall learn

to know them in their various combinations of two or more letters; just as

the painter knows how to use either a single colour, or a combination of

colours.  And like the painter, we may apply letters to the expression of

objects, and form them into syllables; and these again into words, until

the picture or figure--that is, language--is completed.  Not that I am

literally speaking of ourselves, but I mean to say that this was the way in

which the ancients framed language.  And this leads me to consider whether

the primary as well as the secondary elements are rightly given.  I may

remark, as I was saying about the Gods, that we can only attain to

conjecture of them.  But still we insist that ours is the true and only

method of discovery; otherwise we must have recourse, like the tragic

poets, to a Deus ex machina, and say that God gave the first names, and

therefore they are right; or that the barbarians are older than we are, and

that we learnt of them; or that antiquity has cast a veil over the truth. 

Yet all these are not reasons; they are only ingenious excuses for having

no reasons.



I will freely impart to you my own notions, though they are somewhat

crude:--the letter rho appears to me to be the general instrument which the

legislator has employed to express all motion or kinesis.  (I ought to

explain that kinesis is just iesis (going), for the letter eta was unknown

to the ancients; and the root, kiein, is a foreign form of ienai:  of

kinesis or eisis, the opposite is stasis).  This use of rho is evident in

the words tremble, break, crush, crumble, and the like; the imposer of

names perceived that the tongue is most agitated in the pronunciation of

this letter, just as he used iota to express the subtle power which

penetrates through all things.  The letters phi, psi, sigma, zeta, which

require a great deal of wind, are employed in the imitation of such notions

as shivering, seething, shaking, and in general of what is windy.  The

letters delta and tau convey the idea of binding and rest in a place:  the

lambda denotes smoothness, as in the words slip, sleek, sleep, and the

like.  But when the slipping tongue is detained by the heavier sound of

gamma, then arises the notion of a glutinous clammy nature:  nu is sounded

from within, and has a notion of inwardness:  alpha is the expression of

size; eta of length; omicron of roundness, and therefore there is plenty of

omicron in the word goggulon.  That is my view, Hermogenes, of the

correctness of names; and I should like to hear what Cratylus would say. 

'But, Socrates, as I was telling you, Cratylus mystifies me; I should like

to ask him, in your presence, what he means by the fitness of names?'  To

this appeal, Cratylus replies 'that he cannot explain so important a

subject all in a moment.'  'No, but you may "add little to little," as

Hesiod says.'  Socrates here interposes his own request, that Cratylus will

give some account of his theory.  Hermogenes and himself are mere

sciolists, but Cratylus has reflected on these matters, and has had

teachers.  Cratylus replies in the words of Achilles:  '"Illustrious Ajax,

you have spoken in all things much to my mind," whether Euthyphro, or some

Muse inhabiting your own breast, was the inspirer.'  Socrates replies, that

he is afraid of being self-deceived, and therefore he must 'look fore and

aft,' as Homer remarks.  Does not Cratylus agree with him that names teach

us the nature of things?  'Yes.'  And naming is an art, and the artists are

legislators, and like artists in general, some of them are better and some

of them are worse than others, and give better or worse laws, and make

better or worse names.  Cratylus cannot admit that one name is better than

another; they are either true names, or they are not names at all; and when

he is asked about the name of Hermogenes, who is acknowledged to have no

luck in him, he affirms this to be the name of somebody else.  Socrates

supposes him to mean that falsehood is impossible, to which his own answer

would be, that there has never been a lack of liars.  Cratylus presses him

with the old sophistical argument, that falsehood is saying that which is

not, and therefore saying nothing;--you cannot utter the word which is not.

Socrates complains that this argument is too subtle for an old man to

understand:  Suppose a person addressing Cratylus were to say, Hail,

Athenian Stranger, Hermogenes! would these words be true or false?  'I

should say that they would be mere unmeaning sounds, like the hammering of

a brass pot.'  But you would acknowledge that names, as well as pictures,

are imitations, and also that pictures may give a right or wrong

representation of a man or woman:--why may not names then equally give a

representation true and right or false and wrong?  Cratylus admits that

pictures may give a true or false representation, but denies that names

can.  Socrates argues, that he may go up to a man and say 'this is year

picture,' and again, he may go and say to him 'this is your name'--in the

one case appealing to his sense of sight, and in the other to his sense of

hearing;--may he not?  'Yes.'  Then you will admit that there is a right or

a wrong assignment of names, and if of names, then of verbs and nouns; and

if of verbs and nouns, then of the sentences which are made up of them; and

comparing nouns to pictures, you may give them all the appropriate sounds,

or only some of them.  And as he who gives all the colours makes a good

picture, and he who gives only some of them, a bad or imperfect one, but

still a picture; so he who gives all the sounds makes a good name, and he

who gives only some of them, a bad or imperfect one, but a name still.  The

artist of names, that is, the legislator, may be a good or he may be a bad

artist.  'Yes, Socrates, but the cases are not parallel; for if you

subtract or misplace a letter, the name ceases to be a name.'  Socrates

admits that the number 10, if an unit is subtracted, would cease to be 10,

but denies that names are of this purely quantitative nature.  Suppose that

there are two objects--Cratylus and the image of Cratylus; and let us

imagine that some God makes them perfectly alike, both in their outward

form and in their inner nature and qualities:  then there will be two

Cratyluses, and not merely Cratylus and the image of Cratylus.  But an

image in fact always falls short in some degree of the original, and if

images are not exact counterparts, why should names be? if they were, they

would be the doubles of their originals, and indistinguishable from them;

and how ridiculous would this be!  Cratylus admits the truth of Socrates'

remark.  But then Socrates rejoins, he should have the courage to

acknowledge that letters may be wrongly inserted in a noun, or a noun in a

sentence; and yet the noun or the sentence may retain a meaning.  Better to

admit this, that we may not be punished like the traveller in Egina who

goes about at night, and that Truth herself may not say to us, 'Too late.' 

And, errors excepted, we may still affirm that a name to be correct must

have proper letters, which bear a resemblance to the thing signified.  I

must remind you of what Hermogenes and I were saying about the letter rho

accent, which was held to be expressive of motion and hardness, as lambda

is of smoothness;--and this you will admit to be their natural meaning. 

But then, why do the Eritreans call that skleroter which we call sklerotes?

We can understand one another, although the letter rho accent is not

equivalent to the letter s:  why is this?  You reply, because the two

letters are sufficiently alike for the purpose of expressing motion.  Well,

then, there is the letter lambda; what business has this in a word meaning

hardness?  'Why, Socrates, I retort upon you, that we put in and pull out

letters at pleasure.'  And the explanation of this is custom or agreement: 

we have made a convention that the rho shall mean s and a convention may

indicate by the unlike as well as by the like.  How could there be names

for all the numbers unless you allow that convention is used?  Imitation is

a poor thing, and has to be supplemented by convention, which is another

poor thing; although I agree with you in thinking that the most perfect

form of language is found only where there is a perfect correspondence of

sound and meaning.  But let me ask you what is the use and force of names? 

'The use of names, Socrates, is to inform, and he who knows names knows

things.'  Do you mean that the discovery of names is the same as the

discovery of things?  'Yes.'  But do you not see that there is a degree of

deception about names?  He who first gave names, gave them according to his

conception, and that may have been erroneous.  'But then, why, Socrates, is

language so consistent? all words have the same laws.'  Mere consistency is

no test of truth.  In geometrical problems, for example, there may be a

flaw at the beginning, and yet the conclusion may follow consistently. 

And, therefore, a wise man will take especial care of first principles. 

But are words really consistent; are there not as many terms of praise

which signify rest as which signify motion?  There is episteme, which is

connected with stasis, as mneme is with meno.  Bebaion, again, is the

expression of station and position; istoria is clearly descriptive of the

stopping istanai of the stream; piston indicates the cessation of motion;

and there are many words having a bad sense, which are connected with ideas

of motion, such as sumphora, amartia, etc.:  amathia, again, might be

explained, as e ama theo iontos poreia, and akolasia as e akolouthia tois

pragmasin.  Thus the bad names are framed on the same principle as the

good, and other examples might be given, which would favour a theory of

rest rather than of motion.  'Yes; but the greater number of words express

motion.'  Are we to count them, Cratylus; and is correctness of names to be

determined by the voice of a majority?



Here is another point:  we were saying that the legislator gives names; and

therefore we must suppose that he knows the things which he names:  but how

can he have learnt things from names before there were any names?  'I

believe, Socrates, that some power more than human first gave things their

names, and that these were necessarily true names.'  Then how came the

giver of names to contradict himself, and to make some names expressive of

rest, and others of motion?  'I do not suppose that he did make them both.' 

Then which did he make--those which are expressive of rest, or those which

are expressive of motion?...But if some names are true and others false, we

can only decide between them, not by counting words, but by appealing to

things.  And, if so, we must allow that things may be known without names;

for names, as we have several times admitted, are the images of things; and

the higher knowledge is of things, and is not to be derived from names; and

though I do not doubt that the inventors of language gave names, under the

idea that all things are in a state of motion and flux, I believe that they

were mistaken; and that having fallen into a whirlpool themselves, they are

trying to drag us after them.  For is there not a true beauty and a true

good, which is always beautiful and always good?  Can the thing beauty be

vanishing away from us while the words are yet in our mouths?  And they

could not be known by any one if they are always passing away--for if they

are always passing away, the observer has no opportunity of observing their

state.  Whether the doctrine of the flux or of the eternal nature be the

truer, is hard to determine.  But no man of sense will put himself, or the

education of his mind, in the power of names:  he will not condemn himself

to be an unreal thing, nor will he believe that everything is in a flux

like the water in a leaky vessel, or that the world is a man who has a

running at the nose.  This doctrine may be true, Cratylus, but is also very

likely to be untrue; and therefore I would have you reflect while you are

young, and find out the truth, and when you know come and tell me.  'I have

thought, Socrates, and after a good deal of thinking I incline to

Heracleitus.'  Then another day, my friend, you shall give me a lesson. 

'Very good, Socrates, and I hope that you will continue to study these

things yourself.'



...



We may now consider (I) how far Plato in the Cratylus has discovered the

true principles of language, and then (II) proceed to compare modern

speculations respecting the origin and nature of language with the

anticipations of his genius.



I.  (1) Plato is aware that language is not the work of chance; nor does he

deny that there is a natural fitness in names.  He only insists that this

natural fitness shall be intelligibly explained.  But he has no idea that

language is a natural organism.  He would have heard with surprise that

languages are the common work of whole nations in a primitive or semi-

barbarous age.  How, he would probably have argued, could men devoid of art

have contrived a structure of such complexity?  No answer could have been

given to this question, either in ancient or in modern times, until the

nature of primitive antiquity had been thoroughly studied, and the

instincts of man had been shown to exist in greater force, when his state

approaches more nearly to that of children or animals.  The philosophers of

the last century, after their manner, would have vainly endeavoured to

trace the process by which proper names were converted into common, and

would have shown how the last effort of abstraction invented prepositions

and auxiliaries.  The theologian would have proved that language must have

had a divine origin, because in childhood, while the organs are pliable,

the intelligence is wanting, and when the intelligence is able to frame

conceptions, the organs are no longer able to express them.  Or, as others

have said:  Man is man because he has the gift of speech; and he could not

have invented that which he is.  But this would have been an 'argument too

subtle' for Socrates, who rejects the theological account of the origin of

language 'as an excuse for not giving a reason,' which he compares to the

introduction of the 'Deus ex machina' by the tragic poets when they have to

solve a difficulty; thus anticipating many modern controversies in which

the primary agency of the divine Being is confused with the secondary

cause; and God is assumed to have worked a miracle in order to fill up a

lacuna in human knowledge.  (Compare Timaeus.)



Neither is Plato wrong in supposing that an element of design and art

enters into language.  The creative power abating is supplemented by a

mechanical process.  'Languages are not made but grow,' but they are made

as well as grow; bursting into life like a plant or a flower, they are also

capable of being trained and improved and engrafted upon one another.  The

change in them is effected in earlier ages by musical and euphonic

improvements, at a later stage by the influence of grammar and logic, and

by the poetical and literary use of words.  They develope rapidly in

childhood, and when they are full grown and set they may still put forth

intellectual powers, like the mind in the body, or rather we may say that

the nobler use of language only begins when the frame-work is complete. 

The savage or primitive man, in whom the natural instinct is strongest, is

also the greatest improver of the forms of language.  He is the poet or

maker of words, as in civilised ages the dialectician is the definer or

distinguisher of them.  The latter calls the second world of abstract terms

into existence, as the former has created the picture sounds which

represent natural objects or processes.  Poetry and philosophy--these two,

are the two great formative principles of language, when they have passed

their first stage, of which, as of the first invention of the arts in

general, we only entertain conjecture.  And mythology is a link between

them, connecting the visible and invisible, until at length the sensuous

exterior falls away, and the severance of the inner and outer world, of the

idea and the object of sense, becomes complete.  At a later period, logic

and grammar, sister arts, preserve and enlarge the decaying instinct of

language, by rule and method, which they gather from analysis and

observation.



(2) There is no trace in any of Plato's writings that he was acquainted

with any language but Greek.  Yet he has conceived very truly the relation

of Greek to foreign languages, which he is led to consider, because he

finds that many Greek words are incapable of explanation.  Allowing a good

deal for accident, and also for the fancies of the conditores linguae

Graecae, there is an element of which he is unable to give an account. 

These unintelligible words he supposes to be of foreign origin, and to have

been derived from a time when the Greeks were either barbarians, or in

close relations to the barbarians.  Socrates is aware that this principle

is liable to great abuse; and, like the 'Deus ex machina,' explains

nothing.  Hence he excuses himself for the employment of such a device, 

and remarks that in foreign words there is still a principle of

correctness, which applies equally both to Greeks and barbarians.



(3)  But the greater number of primary words do not admit of derivation

from foreign languages; they must be resolved into the letters out of which

they are composed, and therefore the letters must have a meaning.  The

framers of language were aware of this; they observed that alpha was

adapted to express size; eta length; omicron roundness; nu inwardness; rho

accent rush or roar; lambda liquidity; gamma lambda the detention of the

liquid or slippery element; delta and tau binding; phi, psi, sigma, xi,

wind and cold, and so on.  Plato's analysis of the letters of the alphabet

shows a wonderful insight into the nature of language.  He does not

expressively distinguish between mere imitation and the symbolical use of

sound to express thought, but he recognises in the examples which he gives

both modes of imitation.  Gesture is the mode which a deaf and dumb person

would take of indicating his meaning.  And language is the gesture of the

tongue; in the use of the letter rho accent, to express a rushing or

roaring, or of omicron to express roundness, there is a direct imitation;

while in the use of the letter alpha to express size, or of eta to express

length, the imitation is symbolical.  The use of analogous or similar

sounds, in order to express similar analogous ideas, seems to have escaped

him.



In passing from the gesture of the body to the movement of the tongue,

Plato makes a great step in the physiology of language.  He was probably

the first who said that 'language is imitative sound,' which is the

greatest and deepest truth of philology; although he is not aware of the

laws of euphony and association by which imitation must be regulated.  He

was probably also the first who made a distinction between simple and

compound words, a truth second only in importance to that which has just

been mentioned.  His great insight in one direction curiously contrasts

with his blindness in another; for he appears to be wholly unaware (compare

his derivation of agathos from agastos and thoos) of the difference between

the root and termination.  But we must recollect that he was necessarily

more ignorant than any schoolboy of Greek grammar, and had no table of the

inflexions of verbs and nouns before his eyes, which might have suggested

to him the distinction.



(4) Plato distinctly affirms that language is not truth, or 'philosophie

une langue bien faite.'  At first, Socrates has delighted himself with

discovering the flux of Heracleitus in language.  But he is covertly

satirising the pretence of that or any other age to find philosophy in

words; and he afterwards corrects any erroneous inference which might be

gathered from his experiment.  For he finds as many, or almost as many,

words expressive of rest, as he had previously found expressive of motion. 

And even if this had been otherwise, who would learn of words when he might

learn of things?  There is a great controversy and high argument between

Heracleiteans and Eleatics, but no man of sense would commit his soul in

such enquiries to the imposers of names...In this and other passages Plato

shows that he is as completely emancipated from the influence of 'Idols of

the tribe' as Bacon himself.



The lesson which may be gathered from words is not metaphysical or moral,

but historical.  They teach us the affinity of races, they tell us

something about the association of ideas, they occasionally preserve the

memory of a disused custom; but we cannot safely argue from them about

right and wrong, matter and mind, freedom and necessity, or the other

problems of moral and metaphysical philosophy.  For the use of words on

such subjects may often be metaphorical, accidental, derived from other

languages, and may have no relation to the contemporary state of thought

and feeling.  Nor in any case is the invention of them the result of

philosophical reflection; they have been commonly transferred from matter

to mind, and their meaning is the very reverse of their etymology.  Because

there is or is not a name for a thing, we cannot argue that the thing has

or has not an actual existence; or that the antitheses, parallels,

conjugates, correlatives of language have anything corresponding to them in

nature.  There are too many words as well as too few; and they generalize

the objects or ideas which they represent.  The greatest lesson which the

philosophical analysis of language teaches us is, that we should be above

language, making words our servants, and not allowing them to be our

masters.



Plato does not add the further observation, that the etymological meaning

of words is in process of being lost.  If at first framed on a principle of

intelligibility, they would gradually cease to be intelligible, like those

of a foreign language, he is willing to admit that they are subject to many

changes, and put on many disguises.  He acknowledges that the 'poor

creature' imitation is supplemented by another 'poor creature,'--

convention.  But he does not see that 'habit and repute,' and their

relation to other words, are always exercising an influence over them. 

Words appear to be isolated, but they are really the parts of an organism

which is always being reproduced.  They are refined by civilization,

harmonized by poetry, emphasized by literature, technically applied in

philosophy and art; they are used as symbols on the border-ground of human

knowledge; they receive a fresh impress from individual genius, and come

with a new force and association to every lively-minded person.  They are

fixed by the simultaneous utterance of millions, and yet are always

imperceptibly changing;--not the inventors of language, but writing and

speaking, and particularly great writers, or works which pass into the

hearts of nations, Homer, Shakespear, Dante, the German or English Bible,

Kant and Hegel, are the makers of them in later ages.  They carry with them

the faded recollection of their own past history; the use of a word in a

striking and familiar passage gives a complexion to its use everywhere

else, and the new use of an old and familiar phrase has also a peculiar

power over us.  But these and other subtleties of language escaped the

observation of Plato.  He is not aware that the languages of the world are

organic structures, and that every word in them is related to every other;

nor does he conceive of language as the joint work of the speaker and the

hearer, requiring in man a faculty not only of expressing his thoughts but

of understanding those of others.



On the other hand, he cannot be justly charged with a desire to frame

language on artificial principles.  Philosophers have sometimes dreamed of

a technical or scientific language, in words which should have fixed

meanings, and stand in the same relation to one another as the substances

which they denote.  But there is no more trace of this in Plato than there

is of a language corresponding to the ideas; nor, indeed, could the want of

such a language be felt until the sciences were far more developed.  Those

who would extend the use of technical phraseology beyond the limits of

science or of custom, seem to forget that freedom and suggestiveness and

the play of association are essential characteristics of language.  The

great master has shown how he regarded pedantic distinctions of words or

attempts to confine their meaning in the satire on Prodicus in the

Protagoras.



(5) In addition to these anticipations of the general principles of

philology, we may note also a few curious observations on words and sounds.

'The Eretrians say sklerotes for skleroter;' 'the Thessalians call Apollo

Amlos;' 'The Phrygians have the words pur, udor, kunes slightly changed;'

'there is an old Homeric word emesato, meaning "he contrived";' 'our

forefathers, and especially the women, who are most conservative of the

ancient language, loved the letters iota and delta; but now iota is changed

into eta and epsilon, and delta into zeta; this is supposed to increase the

grandeur of the sound.'  Plato was very willing to use inductive arguments,

so far as they were within his reach; but he would also have assigned a

large influence to chance.  Nor indeed is induction applicable to philology

in the same degree as to most of the physical sciences.  For after we have

pushed our researches to the furthest point, in language as in all the

other creations of the human mind, there will always remain an element of

exception or accident or free-will, which cannot be eliminated.



The question, 'whether falsehood is impossible,' which Socrates

characteristically sets aside as too subtle for an old man (compare

Euthyd.), could only have arisen in an age of imperfect consciousness,

which had not yet learned to distinguish words from things.  Socrates

replies in effect that words have an independent existence; thus

anticipating the solution of the mediaeval controversy of Nominalism and

Realism.  He is aware too that languages exist in various degrees of

perfection, and that the analysis of them can only be carried to a certain

point.  'If we could always, or almost always, use likenesses, which are

the appropriate expressions, that would be the most perfect state of

language.'  These words suggest a question of deeper interest than the

origin of language; viz. what is the ideal of language, how far by any

correction of their usages existing languages might become clearer and more

expressive than they are, more poetical, and also more logical; or whether

they are now finally fixed and have received their last impress from time

and authority.



On the whole, the Cratylus seems to contain deeper truths about language

than any other ancient writing.  But feeling the uncertain ground upon

which he is walking, and partly in order to preserve the character of

Socrates, Plato envelopes the whole subject in a robe of fancy, and allows

his principles to drop out as if by accident.



II.  What is the result of recent speculations about the origin and nature

of language?  Like other modern metaphysical enquiries, they end at last in

a statement of facts.  But, in order to state or understand the facts, a

metaphysical insight seems to be required.  There are more things in

language than the human mind easily conceives.  And many fallacies have to

be dispelled, as well as observations made.  The true spirit of philosophy

or metaphysics can alone charm away metaphysical illusions, which are

always reappearing, formerly in the fancies of neoplatonist writers, now in

the disguise of experience and common sense.  An analogy, a figure of

speech, an intelligible theory, a superficial observation of the

individual, have often been mistaken for a true account of the origin of

language.



Speaking is one of the simplest natural operations, and also the most

complex.  Nothing would seem to be easier or more trivial than a few words

uttered by a child in any language.  Yet into the formation of those words

have entered causes which the human mind is not capable of calculating. 

They are a drop or two of the great stream or ocean of speech which has

been flowing in all ages.  They have been transmitted from one language to

another; like the child himself, they go back to the beginnings of the

human race.  How they originated, who can tell?  Nevertheless we can

imagine a stage of human society in which the circle of men's minds was

narrower and their sympathies and instincts stronger; in which their organs

of speech were more flexible, and the sense of hearing finer and more

discerning; in which they lived more in company, and after the manner of

children were more given to express their feelings; in which 'they moved

all together,' like a herd of wild animals, 'when they moved at all.' 

Among them, as in every society, a particular person would be more

sensitive and intelligent than the rest.  Suddenly, on some occasion of

interest (at the approach of a wild beast, shall we say?), he first, they

following him, utter a cry which resounds through the forest.  The cry is

almost or quite involuntary, and may be an imitation of the roar of the

animal.  Thus far we have not speech, but only the inarticulate expression

of feeling or emotion in no respect differing from the cries of animals;

for they too call to one another and are answered.  But now suppose that

some one at a distance not only hears the sound, but apprehends the

meaning:  or we may imagine that the cry is repeated to a member of the

society who had been absent; the others act the scene over again when he

returns home in the evening.  And so the cry becomes a word.  The hearer in

turn gives back the word to the speaker, who is now aware that he has

acquired a new power.  Many thousand times he exercises this power; like a

child learning to talk, he repeats the same cry again, and again he is

answered; he tries experiments with a like result, and the speaker and the

hearer rejoice together in their newly-discovered faculty.  At first there

would be few such cries, and little danger of mistaking or confusing them. 

For the mind of primitive man had a narrow range of perceptions and

feelings; his senses were microscopic; twenty or thirty sounds or gestures

would be enough for him, nor would he have any difficulty in finding them. 

Naturally he broke out into speech--like the young infant he laughed and

babbled; but not until there were hearers as well as speakers did language

begin.  Not the interjection or the vocal imitation of the object, but the

interjection or the vocal imitation of the object understood, is the first

rudiment of human speech.



After a while the word gathers associations, and has an independent

existence.  The imitation of the lion's roar calls up the fears and hopes

of the chase, which are excited by his appearance.  In the moment of

hearing the sound, without any appreciable interval, these and other latent

experiences wake up in the mind of the hearer.  Not only does he receive an

impression, but he brings previous knowledge to bear upon that impression. 

Necessarily the pictorial image becomes less vivid, while the association

of the nature and habits of the animal is more distinctly perceived.  The

picture passes into a symbol, for there would be too many of them and they

would crowd the mind; the vocal imitation, too, is always in process of

being lost and being renewed, just as the picture is brought back again in

the description of the poet.  Words now can be used more freely because

there are more of them.  What was once an involuntary expression becomes

voluntary.  Not only can men utter a cry or call, but they can communicate

and converse; they can not only use words, but they can even play with

them.  The word is separated both from the object and from the mind; and

slowly nations and individuals attain to a fuller consciousness of

themselves.



Parallel with this mental process the articulation of sounds is gradually

becoming perfected.  The finer sense detects the differences of them, and

begins, first to agglomerate, then to distinguish them.  Times, persons,

places, relations of all kinds, are expressed by modifications of them. 

The earliest parts of speech, as we may call them by anticipation, like the

first utterances of children, probably partook of the nature of

interjections and nouns; then came verbs; at length the whole sentence

appeared, and rhythm and metre followed.  Each stage in the progress of

language was accompanied by some corresponding stage in the mind and

civilisation of man.  In time, when the family became a nation, the wild

growth of dialects passed into a language.  Then arose poetry and

literature.  We can hardly realize to ourselves how much with each

improvement of language the powers of the human mind were enlarged; how the

inner world took the place of outer; how the pictorial or symbolical or

analogical word was refined into a notion; how language, fair and large and

free, was at last complete.



So we may imagine the speech of man to have begun as with the cries of

animals, or the stammering lips of children, and to have attained by

degrees the perfection of Homer and Plato.  Yet we are far from saying that

this or any other theory of language is proved by facts.  It is not

difficult to form an hypothesis which by a series of imaginary transitions

will bridge over the chasm which separates man from the animals. 

Differences of kind may often be thus resolved into differences of degree.

But we must not assume that we have in this way discovered the true account

of them.  Through what struggles the harmonious use of the organs of speech

was acquired; to what extent the conditions of human life were different;

how far the genius of individuals may have contributed to the discovery of

this as of the other arts, we cannot say:  Only we seem to see that

language is as much the creation of the ear as of the tongue, and the

expression of a movement stirring the hearts not of one man only but of

many, 'as the trees of the wood are stirred by the wind.'  The theory is

consistent or not inconsistent with our own mental experience, and throws

some degree of light upon a dark corner of the human mind.



In the later analysis of language, we trace the opposite and contrasted

elements of the individual and nation, of the past and present, of the

inward and outward, of the subject and object, of the notional and

relational, of the root or unchanging part of the word and of the changing 

inflexion, if such a distinction be admitted, of the vowel and the

consonant, of quantity and accent, of speech and writing, of poetry and

prose.  We observe also the reciprocal influence of sounds and conceptions

on each other, like the connexion of body and mind; and further remark that

although the names of objects were originally proper names, as the

grammarian or logician might call them, yet at a later stage they become

universal notions, which combine into particulars and individuals, and are

taken out of the first rude agglomeration of sounds that they may be

replaced in a higher and more logical order.  We see that in the simplest

sentences are contained grammar and logic--the parts of speech, the Eleatic

philosophy and the Kantian categories.  So complex is language, and so

expressive not only of the meanest wants of man, but of his highest

thoughts; so various are the aspects in which it is regarded by us.  Then

again, when we follow the history of languages, we observe that they are

always slowly moving, half dead, half alive, half solid, half fluid; the

breath of a moment, yet like the air, continuous in all ages and

countries,--like the glacier, too, containing within them a trickling

stream which deposits debris of the rocks over which it passes.  There were

happy moments, as we may conjecture, in the lives of nations, at which they

came to the birth--as in the golden age of literature, the man and the time

seem to conspire; the eloquence of the bard or chief, as in later times the

creations of the great writer who is the expression of his age, became

impressed on the minds of their countrymen, perhaps in the hour of some

crisis of national development--a migration, a conquest, or the like.  The

picture of the word which was beginning to be lost, is now revived; the

sound again echoes to the sense; men find themselves capable not only of

expressing more feelings, and describing more objects, but of expressing

and describing them better.  The world before the flood, that is to say,

the world of ten, twenty, a hundred thousand years ago, has passed away and

left no sign.  But the best conception that we can form of it, though

imperfect and uncertain, is gained from the analogy of causes still in

action, some powerful and sudden, others working slowly in the course of

infinite ages.  Something too may be allowed to 'the persistency of the

strongest,' to 'the survival of the fittest,' in this as in the other

realms of nature.



These are some of the reflections which the modern philosophy of language

suggests to us about the powers of the human mind and the forces and

influences by which the efforts of men to utter articulate sounds were

inspired.  Yet in making these and similar generalizations we may note also

dangers to which we are exposed.  (1) There is the confusion of ideas with

facts--of mere possibilities, and generalities, and modes of conception

with actual and definite knowledge.  The words 'evolution,' 'birth,' 'law,'

development,' 'instinct,' 'implicit,' 'explicit,' and the like, have a

false clearness or comprehensiveness, which adds nothing to our knowledge. 

The metaphor of a flower or a tree, or some other work of nature or art, is

often in like manner only a pleasing picture.  (2) There is the fallacy of

resolving the languages which we know into their parts, and then imagining

that we can discover the nature of language by reconstructing them.  (3)

There is the danger of identifying language, not with thoughts but with

ideas.  (4) There is the error of supposing that the analysis of grammar

and logic has always existed, or that their distinctions were familiar to

Socrates and Plato.  (5) There is the fallacy of exaggerating, and also of

diminishing the interval which separates articulate from inarticulate

language--the cries of animals from the speech of man--the instincts of

animals from the reason of man.  (6) There is the danger which besets all

enquiries into the early history of man--of interpreting the past by the

present, and of substituting the definite and intelligible for the true but

dim outline which is the horizon of human knowledge.



The greatest light is thrown upon the nature of language by analogy.  We

have the analogy of the cries of animals, of the songs of birds ('man, like

the nightingale, is a singing bird, but is ever binding up thoughts with

musical notes'), of music, of children learning to speak, of barbarous


nations in which the linguistic instinct is still undecayed, of ourselves

learning to think and speak a new language, of the deaf and dumb who have

words without sounds, of the various disorders of speech; and we have the

after-growth of mythology, which, like language, is an unconscious creation

of the human mind.  We can observe the social and collective instincts of

animals, and may remark how, when domesticated, they have the power of

understanding but not of speaking, while on the other hand, some birds

which are comparatively devoid of intelligence, make a nearer approach to

articulate speech.  We may note how in the animals there is a want of that

sympathy with one another which appears to be the soul of language.  We can

compare the use of speech with other mental and bodily operations; for

speech too is a kind of gesture, and in the child or savage accompanied

with gesture.  We may observe that the child learns to speak, as he learns

to walk or to eat, by a natural impulse; yet in either case not without a

power of imitation which is also natural to him--he is taught to read, but

he breaks forth spontaneously in speech.  We can trace the impulse to bind

together the world in ideas beginning in the first efforts to speak and

culminating in philosophy.  But there remains an element which cannot be

explained, or even adequately described.  We can understand how man creates

or constructs consciously and by design; and see, if we do not understand,

how nature, by a law, calls into being an organised structure.  But the

intermediate organism which stands between man and nature, which is the

work of mind yet unconscious, and in which mind and matter seem to meet,

and mind unperceived to herself is really limited by all other minds, is

neither understood nor seen by us, and is with reluctance admitted to be a

fact.



Language is an aspect of man, of nature, and of nations, the

transfiguration of the world in thought, the meeting-point of the physical

and mental sciences, and also the mirror in which they are reflected,

present at every moment to the individual, and yet having a sort of eternal

or universal nature.  When we analyze our own mental processes, we find

words everywhere in every degree of clearness and consistency, fading away

in dreams and more like pictures, rapidly succeeding one another in our

waking thoughts, attaining a greater distinctness and consecutiveness in

speech, and a greater still in writing, taking the place of one another

when we try to become emancipated from their influence.  For in all

processes of the mind which are conscious we are talking to ourselves; the

attempt to think without words is a mere illusion,--they are always

reappearing when we fix our thoughts.  And speech is not a separate

faculty, but the expression of all our faculties, to which all our other

powers of expression, signs, looks, gestures, lend their aid, of which the

instrument is not the tongue only, but more than half the human frame.



The minds of men are sometimes carried on to think of their lives and of

their actions as links in a chain of causes and effects going back to the

beginning of time.  A few have seemed to lose the sense of their own

individuality in the universal cause or nature.  In like manner we might

think of the words which we daily use, as derived from the first speech of

man, and of all the languages in the world, as the expressions or varieties

of a single force or life of language of which the thoughts of men are the

accident.  Such a conception enables us to grasp the power and wonder of

languages, and is very natural to the scientific philologist.  For he, like

the metaphysician, believes in the reality of that which absorbs his own

mind.  Nor do we deny the enormous influence which language has exercised

over thought.  Fixed words, like fixed ideas, have often governed the

world.  But in such representations we attribute to language too much the

nature of a cause, and too little of an effect,--too much of an absolute,

too little of a relative character,--too much of an ideal, too little of a

matter-of-fact existence.



Or again, we may frame a single abstract notion of language of which all

existent languages may be supposed to be the perversion.  But we must not

conceive that this logical figment had ever a real existence, or is

anything more than an effort of the mind to give unity to infinitely

various phenomena.  There is no abstract language 'in rerum natura,' any

more than there is an abstract tree, but only languages in various stages

of growth, maturity, and decay.  Nor do other logical distinctions or even

grammatical exactly correspond to the facts of language; for they too are

attempts to give unity and regularity to a subject which is partly

irregular.



We find, however, that there are distinctions of another kind by which this

vast field of language admits of being mapped out.  There is the

distinction between biliteral and triliteral roots, and the various

inflexions which accompany them; between the mere mechanical cohesion of

sounds or words, and the 'chemical' combination of them into a new word;

there is the distinction between languages which have had a free and full

development of their organisms, and languages which have been stunted in

their growth,--lamed in their hands or feet, and never able to acquire

afterwards the powers in which they are deficient; there is the distinction

between synthetical languages like Greek and Latin, which have retained

their inflexions, and analytical languages like English or French, which

have lost them.  Innumerable as are the languages and dialects of mankind,

there are comparatively few classes to which they can be referred.



Another road through this chaos is provided by the physiology of speech. 

The organs of language are the same in all mankind, and are only capable of

uttering a certain number of sounds.  Every man has tongue, teeth, lips,

palate, throat, mouth, which he may close or open, and adapt in various

ways; making, first, vowels and consonants; and secondly, other classes of

letters.  The elements of all speech, like the elements of the musical

scale, are few and simple, though admitting of infinite gradations and

combinations.  Whatever slight differences exist in the use or formation of

these organs, owing to climate or the sense of euphony or other causes,

they are as nothing compared with their agreement.  Here then is a real

basis of unity in the study of philology, unlike that imaginary abstract

unity of which we were just now speaking.



Whether we regard language from the psychological, or historical, or

physiological point of view, the materials of our knowledge are

inexhaustible.  The comparisons of children learning to speak, of barbarous

nations, of musical notes, of the cries of animals, of the song of birds,

increase our insight into the nature of human speech.  Many observations

which would otherwise have escaped us are suggested by them.  But they do

not explain why, in man and in man only, the speaker met with a response

from the hearer, and the half articulate sound gradually developed into

Sanscrit and Greek.  They hardly enable us to approach any nearer the

secret of the origin of language, which, like some of the other great

secrets of nature,--the origin of birth and death, or of animal life,--

remains inviolable.  That problem is indissolubly bound up with the origin

of man; and if we ever know more of the one, we may expect to know more of

the other.  (Compare W. Humboldt, 'Ueber die Verschiedenheit des

menschlichen Sprachbaues;' M. Muller, 'Lectures on the Science of

Language;' Steinthal, 'Einleitung in die Psychologie und

Sprachwissenschaft.'



...



It is more than sixteen years since the preceding remarks were written,

which with a few alterations have now been reprinted.  During the interval

the progress of philology has been very great.  More languages have been

compared; the inner structure of language has been laid bare; the relations

of sounds have been more accurately discriminated; the manner in which

dialects affect or are affected by the literary or principal form of a

language is better understood.  Many merely verbal questions have been

eliminated; the remains of the old traditional methods have died away.  The

study has passed from the metaphysical into an historical stage.  Grammar

is no longer confused with language, nor the anatomy of words and sentences

with their life and use.  Figures of speech, by which the vagueness of

theories is often concealed, have been stripped off; and we see language

more as it truly was.  The immensity of the subject is gradually revealed

to us, and the reign of law becomes apparent.  Yet the law is but partially

seen; the traces of it are often lost in the distance.  For languages have

a natural but not a perfect growth; like other creations of nature into

which the will of man enters, they are full of what we term accident and

irregularity.  And the difficulties of the subject become not less, but

greater, as we proceed--it is one of those studies in which we seem to know

less as we know more; partly because we are no longer satisfied with the

vague and superficial ideas of it which prevailed fifty years ago; partly

also because the remains of the languages with which we are acquainted

always were, and if they are still living, are, in a state of transition;

and thirdly, because there are lacunae in our knowledge of them which can

never be filled up.  Not a tenth, not a hundredth part of them has been

preserved.  Yet the materials at our disposal are far greater than any

individual can use.  Such are a few of the general reflections which the

present state of philology calls up.



(1)  Language seems to be composite, but into its first elements the

philologer has never been able to penetrate.  However far he goes back, he

never arrives at the beginning; or rather, as in Geology or in Astronomy,

there is no beginning.  He is too apt to suppose that by breaking up the

existing forms of language into their parts he will arrive at a previous

stage of it, but he is merely analyzing what never existed, or is never

known to have existed, except in a composite form.  He may divide nouns and

verbs into roots and inflexions, but he has no evidence which will show

that the omega of tupto or the mu of tithemi, though analogous to ego, me,

either became pronouns or were generated out of pronouns.  To say that

'pronouns, like ripe fruit, dropped out of verbs,' is a misleading figure

of speech.  Although all languages have some common principles, there is no

primitive form or forms of language known to us, or to be reasonably

imagined, from which they are all descended.  No inference can be drawn

from language, either for or against the unity of the human race.  Nor is

there any proof that words were ever used without any relation to each

other.  Whatever may be the meaning of a sentence or a word when applied to

primitive language, it is probable that the sentence is more akin to the

original form than the word, and that the later stage of language is the

result rather of analysis than of synthesis, or possibly is a combination

of the two.  Nor, again, are we sure that the original process of learning

to speak was the same in different places or among different races of men. 

It may have been slower with some, quicker with others.  Some tribes may

have used shorter, others longer words or cries:  they may have been more

or less inclined to agglutinate or to decompose them:  they may have

modified them by the use of prefixes, suffixes, infixes; by the lengthening

and strengthening of vowels or by the shortening and weakening of them, by

the condensation or rarefaction of consonants.  But who gave to language

these primeval laws; or why one race has triliteral, another biliteral

roots; or why in some members of a group of languages b becomes p, or d, t,

or ch, k; or why two languages resemble one another in certain parts of

their structure and differ in others; or why in one language there is a

greater development of vowels, in another of consonants, and the like--are

questions of which we only 'entertain conjecture.'  We must remember the

length of time that has elapsed since man first walked upon the earth, and

that in this vast but unknown period every variety of language may have

been in process of formation and decay, many times over. 



(Compare Plato, Laws):--



'ATHENIAN STRANGER:  And what then is to be regarded as the origin of

government?  Will not a man be able to judge best from a point of view in

which he may behold the progress of states and their transitions to good

and evil?



CLEINIAS:  What do you mean?



ATHENIAN STRANGER:  I mean that he might watch them from the point of view

of time, and observe the changes which take place in them during infinite

ages.



CLEINIAS:  How so?



ATHENIAN STRANGER:  Why, do you think that you can reckon the time which

has elapsed since cities first existed and men were citizens of them?



CLEINIAS:  Hardly.



ATHENIAN STRANGER:  But you are quite sure that it must be vast and

incalculable?



CLEINIAS:  No doubt.



ATHENIAN STRANGER:  And have there not been thousands and thousands of

cities which have come into being and perished during this period?  And has

not every place had endless forms of government, and been sometimes rising,

and at other times falling, and again improving or waning?'



Aristot. Metaph.:--



'And if a person should conceive the tales of mythology to mean only that

men thought the gods to be the first essences of things, he would deem the

reflection to have been inspired and would consider that, whereas probably

every art and part of wisdom had been DISCOVERED AND LOST MANY TIMES OVER,

such notions were but a remnant of the past which has survived to our

day.')



It can hardly be supposed that any traces of an original language still

survive, any more than of the first huts or buildings which were

constructed by man.  Nor are we at all certain of the relation, if any, in

which the greater families of languages stand to each other.  The influence

of individuals must always have been a disturbing element.  Like great

writers in later times, there may have been many a barbaric genius who

taught the men of his tribe to sing or speak, showing them by example how

to continue or divide their words, charming their souls with rhythm and

accent and intonation, finding in familiar objects the expression of their

confused fancies--to whom the whole of language might in truth be said to

be a figure of speech.  One person may have introduced a new custom into

the formation or pronunciation of a word; he may have been imitated by

others, and the custom, or form, or accent, or quantity, or rhyme which he

introduced in a single word may have become the type on which many other

words or inflexions of words were framed, and may have quickly ran through

a whole language.  For like the other gifts which nature has bestowed upon

man, that of speech has been conveyed to him through the medium, not of the

many, but of the few, who were his 'law-givers'--'the legislator with the

dialectician standing on his right hand,' in Plato's striking image, who

formed the manners of men and gave them customs, whose voice and look and

behaviour, whose gesticulations and other peculiarities were instinctively

imitated by them,--the 'king of men' who was their priest, almost their

God...But these are conjectures only:  so little do we know of the origin

of language that the real scholar is indisposed to touch the subject at

all.



(2)  There are other errors besides the figment of a primitive or original

language which it is time to leave behind us.  We no longer divide

languages into synthetical and analytical, or suppose similarity of

structure to be the safe or only guide to the affinities of them.  We do

not confuse the parts of speech with the categories of Logic.  Nor do we

conceive languages any more than civilisations to be in a state of

dissolution; they do not easily pass away, but are far more tenacious of

life than the tribes by whom they are spoken.  'Where two or three are

gathered together,' they survive.  As in the human frame, as in the state,

there is a principle of renovation as well as of decay which is at work in

all of them.  Neither do we suppose them to be invented by the wit of man.

With few exceptions, e.g. technical words or words newly imported from a

foreign language, and the like, in which art has imitated nature, 'words

are not made but grow.'  Nor do we attribute to them a supernatural origin. 

The law which regulates them is like the law which governs the circulation

of the blood, or the rising of the sap in trees; the action of it is

uniform, but the result, which appears in the superficial forms of men and

animals or in the leaves of trees, is an endless profusion and variety. 

The laws of vegetation are invariable, but no two plants, no two leaves of

the forest are precisely the same.  The laws of language are invariable,

but no two languages are alike, no two words have exactly the same meaning. 

No two sounds are exactly of the same quality, or give precisely the same

impression.



It would be well if there were a similar consensus about some other points

which appear to be still in dispute.  Is language conscious or unconscious? 

In speaking or writing have we present to our minds the meaning or the

sound or the construction of the words which we are using?--No more than

the separate drops of water with which we quench our thirst are present: 

the whole draught may be conscious, but not the minute particles of which

it is made up:  So the whole sentence may be conscious, but the several

words, syllables, letters are not thought of separately when we are

uttering them.  Like other natural operations, the process of speech, when

most perfect, is least observed by us.  We do not pause at each mouthful to

dwell upon the taste of it:  nor has the speaker time to ask himself the

comparative merits of different modes of expression while he is uttering

them.  There are many things in the use of language which may be observed

from without, but which cannot be explained from within.  Consciousness

carries us but a little way in the investigation of the mind; it is not the

faculty of internal observation, but only the dim light which makes such

observation possible.  What is supposed to be our consciousness of language

is really only the analysis of it, and this analysis admits of innumerable

degrees.  But would it not be better if this term, which is so misleading,

and yet has played so great a part in mental science, were either banished

or used only with the distinct meaning of 'attention to our own minds,'

such as is called forth, not by familiar mental processes, but by the

interruption of them?  Now in this sense we may truly say that we are not

conscious of ordinary speech, though we are commonly roused to attention by

the misuse or  mispronunciation of a word.  Still less, even in schools and

academies, do we ever attempt to invent new words or to alter the meaning

of old ones, except in the case, mentioned above, of technical or borrowed

words which are artificially made or imported because a need of them is

felt.  Neither in our own nor in any other age has the conscious effort of

reflection in man contributed in an appreciable degree to the formation of

language.  'Which of us by taking thought' can make new words or

constructions?  Reflection is the least of the causes by which language is

affected, and is likely to have the least power, when the linguistic

instinct is greatest, as in young children and in the infancy of nations.



A kindred error is the separation of the phonetic from the mental element

of language; they are really inseparable--no definite line can be drawn

between them, any more than in any other common act of mind and body.  It

is true that within certain limits we possess the power of varying sounds

by opening and closing the mouth, by touching the palate or the teeth with

the tongue, by lengthening or shortening the vocal instrument, by greater

or less stress, by a higher or lower pitch of the voice, and we can

substitute one note or accent for another.  But behind the organs of speech

and their action there remains the informing mind, which sets them in

motion and works together with them.  And behind the great structure of

human speech and the lesser varieties of language which arise out of the

many degrees and kinds of human intercourse, there is also the unknown or

over-ruling law of God or nature which gives order to it in its infinite

greatness, and variety in its infinitesimal minuteness--both equally

inscrutable to us.  We need no longer discuss whether philology is to be

classed with the Natural or the Mental sciences, if we frankly recognize

that, like all the sciences which are concerned with man, it has a double

aspect,--inward and outward; and that the inward can only be known through

the outward.  Neither need we raise the question whether the laws of

language, like the other laws of human action, admit of exceptions.  The

answer in all cases is the same--that the laws of nature are uniform,

though the consistency or continuity of them is not always perceptible to

us.  The superficial appearances of language, as of nature, are irregular,

but we do not therefore deny their deeper uniformity.  The comparison of

the growth of language in the individual and in the nation cannot be wholly

discarded, for nations are made up of individuals.  But in this, as in the

other political sciences, we must distinguish between collective and

individual actions or processes, and not attribute to the one what belongs

to the other.  Again, when we speak of the hereditary or paternity of a

language, we must remember that the parents are alive as well as the

children, and that all the preceding generations survive (after a manner)

in the latest form of it.  And when, for the purposes of comparison, we

form into groups the roots or terminations of words, we should not forget

how casual is the manner in which their resemblances have arisen--they were

not first written down by a grammarian in the paradigms of a grammar and

learned out of a book, but were due to many chance attractions of sound or

of meaning, or of both combined.  So many cautions have to be borne in

mind, and so many first thoughts to be dismissed, before we can proceed

safely in the path of philological enquiry.  It might be well sometimes to

lay aside figures of speech, such as the 'root' and the 'branches,' the

'stem,' the 'strata' of Geology, the 'compounds' of Chemistry, 'the ripe

fruit of pronouns dropping from verbs' (see above), and the like, which are

always interesting, but are apt to be delusive.  Yet such figures of speech

are far nearer the truth than the theories which attribute the invention

and improvement of language to the conscious action of the human

mind...Lastly, it is doubted by recent philologians whether climate can be

supposed to have exercised any influence worth speaking of on a language: 

such a view is said to be unproven:  it had better therefore not be

silently assumed.



'Natural selection' and the 'survival of the fittest' have been applied in

the field of philology, as well as in the other sciences which are

concerned with animal and vegetable life.  And a Darwinian school of

philologists has sprung up, who are sometimes accused of putting words in

the place of things.  It seems to be true, that whether applied to language

or to other branches of knowledge, the Darwinian theory, unless very

precisely defined, hardly escapes from being a truism.  If by 'the natural

selection' of words or meanings of words or by the 'persistence and

survival of the fittest' the maintainer of the theory intends to affirm

nothing more than this--that the word 'fittest to survive' survives, he

adds not much to the knowledge of language.  But if he means that the word

or the meaning of the word or some portion of the word which comes into use

or drops out of use is selected or rejected on the ground of economy or

parsimony or ease to the speaker or clearness or euphony or expressiveness,

or greater or less demand for it, or anything of this sort, he is affirming

a proposition which has several senses, and in none of these senses can be

assisted to be uniformly true.  For the laws of language are precarious,

and can only act uniformly when there is such frequency of intercourse

among neighbours as is sufficient to enforce them.  And there are many

reasons why a man should prefer his own way of speaking to that of others,

unless by so doing he becomes unintelligible.  The struggle for existence

among words is not of that fierce and irresistible kind in which birds,

beasts and fishes devour one another, but of a milder sort, allowing one

usage to be substituted for another, not by force, but by the persuasion,

or rather by the prevailing habit, of a majority.  The favourite figure, in

this, as in some other uses of it, has tended rather to obscure than

explain the subject to which it has been applied.  Nor in any case can the

struggle for existence be deemed to be the sole or principal cause of

changes in language, but only one among many, and one of which we cannot

easily measure the importance.  There is a further objection which may be

urged equally against all applications of the Darwinian theory.  As in

animal life and likewise in vegetable, so in languages, the process of

change is said to be insensible:  sounds, like animals, are supposed to

pass into one another by imperceptible gradation.  But in both cases the

newly-created forms soon become fixed; there are few if any vestiges of the

intermediate links, and so the better half of the evidence of the change is

wanting.



(3)  Among the incumbrances or illusions of language may be reckoned many

of the rules and traditions of grammar, whether ancient grammar or the

corrections of it which modern philology has introduced.  Grammar, like

law, delights in definition:  human speech, like human action, though very

far from being a mere chaos, is indefinite, admits of degrees, and is

always in a state of change or transition.  Grammar gives an erroneous

conception of language:  for it reduces to a system that which is not a

system.  Its figures of speech, pleonasms, ellipses, anacolutha, pros to

semainomenon, and the like have no reality; they do not either make

conscious expressions more intelligible or show the way in which they have

arisen; they are chiefly designed to bring an earlier use of language into

conformity with the later.  Often they seem intended only to remind us that

great poets like Aeschylus or Sophocles or Pindar or a great prose writer

like Thucydides are guilty of taking unwarrantable liberties with

grammatical rules; it appears never to have occurred to the inventors of

them that these real 'conditores linguae Graecae' lived in an age before

grammar, when 'Greece also was living Greece.'  It is the anatomy, not the

physiology of language, which grammar seeks to describe:  into the idiom

and higher life of words it does not enter.  The ordinary Greek grammar

gives a complete paradigm of the verb, without suggesting that the double

or treble forms of Perfects, Aorists, etc. are hardly ever contemporaneous. 

It distinguishes Moods and Tenses, without observing how much of the nature

of one passes into the other.  It makes three Voices, Active, Passive, and

Middle, but takes no notice of the precarious existence and uncertain

character of the last of the three.  Language is a thing of degrees and

relations and associations and exceptions:  grammar ties it up in fixed

rules.  Language has many varieties of usage:  grammar tries to reduce them

to a single one.  Grammar divides verbs into regular and irregular:  it

does not recognize that the irregular, equally with the regular, are

subject to law, and that a language which had no exceptions would not be a

natural growth:  for it could not have been subjected to the influences by

which language is ordinarily affected.  It is always wanting to describe

ancient languages in the terms of a modern one.  It has a favourite fiction

that one word is put in the place of another; the truth is that no word is

ever put for another.  It has another fiction, that a word has been

omitted:  words are omitted because they are no longer needed; and the

omission has ceased to be observed.  The common explanation of kata or some

other preposition 'being understood' in a Greek sentence is another fiction

of the same kind, which tends to disguise the fact that under cases were

comprehended originally many more relations, and that prepositions are used

only to define the meaning of them with greater precision.  These instances

are sufficient to show the sort of errors which grammar introduces into

language.  We are not considering the question of its utility to the

beginner in the study.  Even to him the best grammar is the shortest and

that in which he will have least to unlearn.  It may be said that the

explanations here referred to are already out of date, and that the study

of Greek grammar has received a new character from comparative philology. 

This is true; but it is also true that the traditional grammar has still a

great hold on the mind of the student.



Metaphysics are even more troublesome than the figments of grammar, because

they wear the appearance of philosophy and there is no test to which they

can be subjected.  They are useful in so far as they give us an insight

into the history of the human mind and the modes of thought which have

existed in former ages; or in so far as they furnish wider conceptions of

the different branches of knowledge and of their relation to one another. 

But they are worse than useless when they outrun experience and abstract

the mind from the observation of facts, only to envelope it in a mist of

words.  Some philologers, like Schleicher, have been greatly influenced by

the philosophy of Hegel; nearly all of them to a certain extent have fallen

under the dominion of physical science.  Even Kant himself thought that the

first principles of philosophy could be elicited from the analysis of the

proposition, in this respect falling short of Plato.  Westphal holds that

there are three stages of language:  (1) in which things were characterized

independently, (2) in which they were regarded in relation to human

thought, and (3) in relation to one another.  But are not such distinctions

an anachronism? for they imply a growth of abstract ideas which never

existed in early times.  Language cannot be explained by Metaphysics; for

it is prior to them and much more nearly allied to sense.  It is not likely

that the meaning of the cases is ultimately resolvable into relations of

space and time.  Nor can we suppose the conception of cause and effect or

of the finite and infinite or of the same and other to be latent in

language at a time when in their abstract form they had never entered into

the mind of man...If the science of Comparative Philology had possessed

'enough of Metaphysics to get rid of Metaphysics,' it would have made far

greater progress.



(4) Our knowledge of language is almost confined to languages which are

fully developed.  They are of several patterns; and these become altered by

admixture in various degrees,--they may only borrow a few words from one

another and retain their life comparatively unaltered, or they may meet in

a struggle for existence until one of the two is overpowered and retires

from the field.  They attain the full rights and dignity of language when

they acquire the use of writing and have a literature of their own; they

pass into dialects and grow out of them, in proportion as men are isolated

or united by locality or occupation.  The common language sometimes reacts

upon the dialects and imparts to them also a literary character.  The laws

of language can be best discerned in the great crises of language,

especially in the transitions from ancient to modern forms of them, whether

in Europe or Asia.  Such changes are the silent notes of the world's

history; they mark periods of unknown length in which war and conquest were

running riot over whole continents, times of suffering too great to be

endured by the human race, in which the masters became subjects and the

subject races masters, in which driven by necessity or impelled by some

instinct, tribes or nations left their original homes and but slowly found

a resting-place.  Language would be the greatest of all historical

monuments, if it could only tell us the history of itself.



(5) There are many ways in which we may approach this study.  The simplest

of all is to observe our own use of language in conversation or in writing,

how we put words together, how we construct and connect sentences, what are

the rules of accent and rhythm in verse or prose, the formation and

composition of words, the laws of euphony and sound, the affinities of

letters, the mistakes to which we are ourselves most liable of spelling or

pronunciation.  We may compare with our own language some other, even when

we have only a slight knowledge of it, such as French or German.  Even a

little Latin will enable us to appreciate the grand difference between

ancient and modern European languages.  In the child learning to speak we

may note the inherent strength of language, which like 'a mountain river'

is always forcing its way out.  We may witness the delight in imitation and

repetition, and some of the laws by which sounds pass into one another.  We

may learn something also from the falterings of old age, the searching for

words, and the confusion of them with one another, the forgetfulness of

proper names (more commonly than of other words because they are more

isolated), aphasia, and the like.  There are philological lessons also to

be gathered from nicknames, from provincialisms, from the slang of great

cities, from the argot of Paris (that language of suffering and crime, so

pathetically described by Victor Hugo), from the imperfect articulation of

the deaf and dumb, from the jabbering of animals, from the analysis of

sounds in relation to the organs of speech.  The phonograph affords a

visible evidence of the nature and divisions of sound; we may be truly said

to know what we can manufacture.  Artificial languages, such as that of

Bishop Wilkins, are chiefly useful in showing what language is not.  The

study of any foreign language may be made also a study of Comparative

Philology.  There are several points, such as the nature of irregular

verbs, of indeclinable parts of speech, the influence of euphony, the decay

or loss of inflections, the elements of syntax, which may be examined as

well in the history of our own language as of any other.  A few well-

selected questions may lead the student at once into the heart of the

mystery:  such as, Why are the pronouns and the verb of existence generally

more irregular than any other parts of speech?  Why is the number of words

so small in which the sound is an echo of the sense?  Why does the meaning

of words depart so widely from their etymology?  Why do substantives often

differ in meaning from the verbs to which they are related, adverbs from

adjectives?  Why do words differing in origin coalesce in the same sound

though retaining their differences of meaning?  Why are some verbs

impersonal?  Why are there only so many parts of speech, and on what

principle are they divided?  These are a few crucial questions which give

us an insight from different points of view into the true nature of

language.



(6) Thus far we have been endeavouring to strip off from language the false

appearances in which grammar and philology, or the love of system

generally, have clothed it.  We have also sought to indicate the sources of

our knowledge of it and the spirit in which we should approach it, we may

now proceed to consider some of the principles or natural laws which have

created or modified it.



i.  The first and simplest of all the principles of language, common also

to the animals, is imitation.  The lion roars, the wolf howls in the

solitude of the forest:  they are answered by similar cries heard from a

distance.  The bird, too, mimics the voice of man and makes answer to him.

Man tells to man the secret place in which he is hiding himself; he

remembers and repeats the sound which he has heard.  The love of imitation

becomes a passion and an instinct to him.  Primitive men learnt to speak

from one another, like a child from its mother or nurse.  They learnt of

course a rudimentary, half-articulate language, the cry or song or speech

which was the expression of what we now call human thoughts and feelings. 

We may still remark how much greater and more natural the exercise of the

power is in the use of language than in any other process or action of the

human mind.



ii.  Imitation provided the first material of language:  but it was

'without form and void.'  During how many years or hundreds or thousands of

years the imitative or half-articulate stage continued there is no

possibility of determining.  But we may reasonably conjecture that there

was a time when the vocal utterance of man was intermediate between what we

now call language and the cry of a bird or animal.  Speech before language

was a rudis indigestaque materies, not yet distributed into words and

sentences, in which the cry of fear or joy mingled with more definite

sounds recognized by custom as the expressions of things or events.  It was

the principle of analogy which introduced into this 'indigesta moles' order

and measure.  It was Anaxagoras' omou panta chremata, eita nous elthon

diekosmese:  the light of reason lighted up all things and at once began to

arrange them.  In every sentence, in every word and every termination of a

word, this power of forming relations to one another was contained.  There

was a proportion of sound to sound, of meaning to meaning, of meaning to

sound.  The cases and numbers of nouns, the persons, tenses, numbers of

verbs, were generally on the same or nearly the same pattern and had the

same meaning.  The sounds by which they were expressed were rough-hewn at

first; after a while they grew more refined--the natural laws of euphony

began to affect them.  The rules of syntax are likewise based upon analogy. 

Time has an analogy with space, arithmetic with geometry.  Not only in

musical notes, but in the quantity, quality, accent, rhythm of human

speech, trivial or serious, there is a law of proportion.  As in things of

beauty, as in all nature, in the composition as well as in the motion of

all things, there is a similarity of relations by which they are held

together.



It would be a mistake to suppose that the analogies of language are always

uniform:  there may be often a choice between several, and sometimes one

and sometimes another will prevail.  In Greek there are three declensions

of nouns; the forms of cases in one of them may intrude upon another. 

Similarly verbs in -omega and -mu iota interchange forms of tenses, and the

completed paradigm of the verb is often made up of both.  The same nouns

may be partly declinable and partly indeclinable, and in some of their

cases may have fallen out of use.  Here are rules with exceptions; they are

not however really exceptions, but contain in themselves indications of

other rules.  Many of these interruptions or variations of analogy occur in

pronouns or in the verb of existence of which the forms were too common and

therefore too deeply imbedded in language entirely to drop out.  The same

verbs in the same meaning may sometimes take one case, sometimes another. 

The participle may also have the character of an adjective, the adverb

either of an adjective or of a preposition.  These exceptions are as

regular as the rules, but the causes of them are seldom known to us.



Language, like the animal and vegetable worlds, is everywhere intersected

by the lines of analogy.  Like number from which it seems to be derived,

the principle of analogy opens the eyes of men to discern the similarities

and differences of things, and their relations to one another.  At first

these are such as lie on the surface only; after a time they are seen by

men to reach farther down into the nature of things.  Gradually in language

they arrange themselves into a sort of imperfect system; groups of personal

and case endings are placed side by side.  The fertility of language

produces many more than are wanted; and the superfluous ones are utilized

by the assignment to them of new meanings.  The vacuity and the superfluity

are thus partially compensated by each other.  It must be remembered that

in all the languages which have a literature, certainly in Sanskrit, Greek,

Latin, we are not at the beginning but almost at the end of the linguistic

process; we have reached a time when the verb and the noun are nearly

perfected, though in no language did they completely perfect themselves,

because for some unknown reason the motive powers of languages seem to have

ceased when they were on the eve of completion:  they became fixed or

crystallized in an imperfect form either from the influence of writing and

literature, or because no further differentiation of them was required for

the intelligibility of language.  So not without admixture and confusion

and displacement and contamination of sounds and the meanings of words, a

lower stage of language passes into a higher.  Thus far we can see and no

further.  When we ask the reason why this principle of analogy prevails in

all the vast domain of language, there is no answer to the question; or no

other answer but this, that there are innumerable ways in which, like

number, analogy permeates, not only language, but the whole world, both

visible and intellectual.  We know from experience that it does not (a)

arise from any conscious act of reflection that the accusative of a Latin

noun in 'us' should end in 'um;' nor (b) from any necessity of being

understood,--much less articulation would suffice for this; nor (c) from

greater convenience or expressiveness of particular sounds.  Such notions

were certainly far enough away from the mind of primitive man.  We may

speak of a latent instinct, of a survival of the fittest, easiest, most

euphonic, most economical of breath, in the case of one of two competing

sounds; but these expressions do not add anything to our knowledge.  We may

try to grasp the infinity of language either under the figure of a

limitless plain divided into countries and districts by natural boundaries,

or of a vast river eternally flowing whose origin is concealed from us; we

may apprehend partially the laws by which speech is regulated:  but we do

not know, and we seem as if we should never know, any more than in the

parallel case of the origin of species, how vocal sounds received life and

grew, and in the form of languages came to be distributed over the earth.



iii.  Next in order to analogy in the formation of language or even prior

to it comes the principle of onomatopea, which is itself a kind of analogy

or similarity of sound and meaning.  In by far the greater number of words

it has become disguised and has disappeared; but in no stage of language is

it entirely lost.  It belongs chiefly to early language, in which words

were few; and its influence grew less and less as time went on.  To the ear

which had a sense of harmony it became a barbarism which disturbed the flow

and equilibrium of discourse; it was an excrescence which had to be cut

out, a survival which needed to be got rid of, because it was out of

keeping with the rest.  It remained for the most part only as a formative

principle, which used words and letters not as crude imitations of other

natural sounds, but as symbols of ideas which were naturally associated

with them.  It received in another way a new character; it affected not so

much single words, as larger portions of human speech.  It regulated the

juxtaposition of sounds and the cadence of sentences.  It was the music,

not of song, but of speech, in prose as well as verse.  The old onomatopea

of primitive language was refined into an onomatopea of a higher kind, in

which it is no longer true to say that a particular sound corresponds to a

motion or action of man or beast or movement of nature, but that in all the

higher uses of language the sound is the echo of the sense, especially in

poetry, in which beauty and expressiveness are given to human thoughts by

the harmonious composition of the words, syllables, letters, accents,

quantities, rhythms, rhymes, varieties and contrasts of all sorts.  The

poet with his 'Break, break, break' or his e pasin nekuessi

kataphthimenoisin anassein or his 'longius ex altoque sinum trahit,' can

produce a far finer music than any crude imitations of things or actions in

sound, although a letter or two having this imitative power may be a lesser

element of beauty in such passages.  The same subtle sensibility, which

adapts the word to the thing, adapts the sentence or cadence to the general

meaning or spirit of the passage.  This is the higher onomatopea which has

banished the cruder sort as unworthy to have a place in great languages and

literatures.



We can see clearly enough that letters or collocations of letters do by

various degrees of strength or weakness, length or shortness, emphasis or

pitch, become the natural expressions of the finer parts of human feeling

or thought.  And not only so, but letters themselves have a significance;

as Plato observes that the letter rho accent is expressive of motion, the

letters delta and tau of binding and rest, the letter lambda of smoothness,

nu of inwardness, the letter eta of length, the letter omicron of

roundness.  These were often combined so as to form composite notions, as

for example in tromos (trembling), trachus (rugged), thrauein (crush),

krouein (strike), thruptein (break), pumbein (whirl),--in all which words

we notice a parallel composition of sounds in their English equivalents. 

Plato also remarks, as we remark, that the onomatopoetic principle is far

from prevailing uniformly, and further that no explanation of language

consistently corresponds with any system of philosophy, however great may

be the light which language throws upon the nature of the mind.  Both in

Greek and English we find groups of words such as string, swing, sling,

spring, sting, which are parallel to one another and may be said to derive

their vocal effect partly from contrast of letters, but in which it is

impossible to assign a precise amount of meaning to each of the expressive

and onomatopoetic letters.  A few of them are directly imitative, as for

example the omega in oon, which represents the round form of the egg by the

figure of the mouth:  or bronte (thunder), in which the fulness of the

sound of the word corresponds to the thing signified by it; or bombos

(buzzing), of which the first syllable, as in its English equivalent, has

the meaning of a deep sound.  We may observe also (as we see in the case of

the poor stammerer) that speech has the co-operation of the whole body and

may be often assisted or half expressed by gesticulation.  A sound or word

is not the work of the vocal organs only; nearly the whole of the upper

part of the human frame, including head, chest, lungs, have a share in

creating it; and it may be accompanied by a movement of the eyes, nose,

fingers, hands, feet which contributes to the effect of it.



The principle of onomatopea has fallen into discredit, partly because it

has been supposed to imply an actual manufacture of words out of syllables

and letters, like a piece of joiner's work,--a theory of language which is

more and more refuted by facts, and more and more going out of fashion with

philologians; and partly also because the traces of onomatopea in separate

words become almost obliterated in the course of ages.  The poet of

language cannot put in and pull out letters, as a painter might insert or

blot out a shade of colour to give effect to his picture.  It would be

ridiculous for him to alter any received form of a word in order to render

it more expressive of the sense.  He can only select, perhaps out of some

dialect, the form which is already best adapted to his purpose.  The true

onomatopea is not a creative, but a formative principle, which in the later

stage of the history of language ceases to act upon individual words; but

still works through the collocation of them in the sentence or paragraph,

and the adaptation of every word, syllable, letter to one another and to

the rhythm of the whole passage.



iv.  Next, under a distinct head, although not separable from the

preceding, may be considered the differentiation of languages, i.e. the

manner in which differences of meaning and form have arisen in them.  Into

their first creation we have ceased to enquire:  it is their aftergrowth

with which we are now concerned.  How did the roots or substantial portions

of words become modified or inflected? and how did they receive separate

meanings?  First we remark that words are attracted by the sounds and

senses of other words, so that they form groups of nouns and verbs

analogous in sound and sense to one another, each noun or verb putting

forth inflexions, generally of two or three patterns, and with exceptions. 

We do not say that we know how sense became first allied to sound; but we

have no difficulty in ascertaining how the sounds and meanings of words

were in time parted off or differentiated.  (1) The chief causes which

regulate the variations of sound are (a) double or differing analogies,

which lead sometimes to one form, sometimes to another (b) euphony, by

which is meant chiefly the greater pleasure to the ear and the greater

facility to the organs of speech which is given by a new formation or

pronunciation of a word (c) the necessity of finding new expressions for

new classes or processes of things.  We are told that changes of sound take

place by innumerable gradations until a whole tribe or community or society

find themselves acquiescing in a new pronunciation or use of language.  Yet

no one observes the change, or is at all aware that in the course of a

lifetime he and his contemporaries have appreciably varied their intonation

or use of words.  On the other hand, the necessities of language seem to

require that the intermediate sounds or meanings of words should quickly

become fixed or set and not continue in a state of transition.  The process

of settling down is aided by the organs of speech and by the use of writing

and printing.  (2) The meaning of words varies because ideas vary or the

number of things which is included under them or with which they are

associated is increased.  A single word is thus made to do duty for many

more things than were formerly expressed by it; and it parts into different

senses when the classes of things or ideas which are represented by it are

themselves different and distinct.  A figurative use of a word may easily

pass into a new sense:  a new meaning caught up by association may become

more important than all the rest.  The good or neutral sense of a word,

such as Jesuit, Puritan, Methodist, Heretic, has been often converted into

a bad one by the malevolence of party spirit.  Double forms suggest

different meanings and are often used to express them; and the form or

accent of a word has been not unfrequently altered when there is a

difference of meaning.  The difference of gender in nouns is utilized for

the same reason.  New meanings of words push themselves into the vacant

spaces of language and retire when they are no longer needed.  Language

equally abhors vacancy and superfluity.  But the remedial measures by which

both are eliminated are not due to any conscious action of the human mind;

nor is the force exerted by them constraining or necessary.



(7) We have shown that language, although subject to laws, is far from

being of an exact and uniform nature.  We may now speak briefly of the

faults of language.  They may be compared to the faults of Geology, in

which different strata cross one another or meet at an angle, or mix with

one another either by slow transitions or by violent convulsions, leaving

many lacunae which can be no longer filled up, and often becoming so

complex that no true explanation of them can be given.  So in language

there are the cross influences of meaning and sound, of logic and grammar,

of differing analogies, of words and the inflexions of words, which often

come into conflict with each other.  The grammarian, if he were to form new

words, would make them all of the same pattern according to what he

conceives to be the rule, that is, the more common usage of language.  The

subtlety of nature goes far beyond art, and it is complicated by

irregularity, so that often we can hardly say that there is a right or

wrong in the formation of words.  For almost any formation which is not at

variance with the first principles of language is possible and may be

defended.



The imperfection of language is really due to the formation and correlation

of words by accident, that is to say, by principles which are unknown to

us.  Hence we see why Plato, like ourselves unable to comprehend the whole

of language, was constrained to 'supplement the poor creature imitation by

another poor creature convention.'  But the poor creature convention in the

end proves too much for all the rest:  for we do not ask what is the origin

of words or whether they are formed according to a correct analogy, but

what is the usage of them; and we are compelled to admit with Hermogenes in

Plato and with Horace that usage is the ruling principle, 'quem penes

arbitrium est, et jus et norma loquendi.'



(8) There are two ways in which a language may attain permanence or fixity.

First, it may have been embodied in poems or hymns or laws, which may be

repeated for hundreds, perhaps for thousands of years with a religious

accuracy, so that to the priests or rhapsodists of a nation the whole or

the greater part of a language is literally preserved; secondly, it may be

written down and in a written form distributed more or less widely among

the whole nation.  In either case the language which is familiarly spoken

may have grown up wholly or in a great measure independently of them.  (1)

The first of these processes has been sometimes attended by the result that

the sound of the words has been carefully preserved and that the meaning of

them has either perished wholly, or is only doubtfully recovered by the

efforts of modern philology.  The verses have been repeated as a chant or

part of a ritual, but they have had no relation to ordinary life or speech. 

(2) The invention of writing again is commonly attributed to a particular

epoch, and we are apt to think that such an inestimable gift would have

immediately been diffused over a whole country.  But it may have taken a

long time to perfect the art of writing, and another long period may have

elapsed before it came into common use.  Its influence on language has been

increased ten, twenty or one hundred fold by the invention of printing.



Before the growth of poetry or the invention of writing, languages were

only dialects.  So they continued to be in parts of the country in which

writing was not used or in which there was no diffusion of literature.  In

most of the counties of England there is still a provincial style, which

has been sometimes made by a great poet the vehicle of his fancies.  When a

book sinks into the mind of a nation, such as Luther's Bible or the

Authorized English Translation of the Bible, or again great classical works

like Shakspere or Milton, not only have new powers of expression been

diffused through a whole nation, but a great step towards uniformity has

been made.  The instinct of language demands regular grammar and correct

spelling:  these are imprinted deeply on the tablets of a nation's memory

by a common use of classical and popular writers.  In our own day we have

attained to a point at which nearly every printed book is spelt correctly

and written grammatically.



(9) Proceeding further to trace the influence of literature on language we

note some other causes which have affected the higher use of it:  such as

(1) the necessity of clearness and connexion; (2) the fear of tautology;

(3) the influence of metre, rhythm, rhyme, and of the language of prose and

verse upon one another; (4) the power of idiom and quotation; (5) the

relativeness of words to one another.



It has been usual to depreciate modern languages when compared with

ancient.  The latter are regarded as furnishing a type of excellence to

which the former cannot attain.  But the truth seems to be that modern

languages, if through the loss of inflections and genders they lack some

power or beauty or expressiveness or precision which is possessed by the

ancient, are in many other respects superior to them:  the thought is

generally clearer, the connexion closer, the sentence and paragraph are

better distributed.  The best modern languages, for example English or

French, possess as great a power of self-improvement as the Latin, if not

as the Greek.  Nor does there seem to be any reason why they should ever

decline or decay.  It is a popular remark that our great writers are

beginning to disappear:  it may also be remarked that whenever a great

writer appears in the future he will find the English language as perfect

and as ready for use as in the days of Shakspere or Milton.  There is no

reason to suppose that English or French will ever be reduced to the low

level of Modern Greek or of Mediaeval Latin.  The wide diffusion of great

authors would make such a decline impossible.  Nor will modern languages be

easily broken up by amalgamation with each other.  The distance between

them is too wide to be spanned, the differences are too great to be

overcome, and the use of printing makes it impossible that one of them

should ever be lost in another.



The structure of the English language differs greatly from that of either

Latin or Greek.  In the two latter, especially in Greek, sentences are

joined together by connecting particles.  They are distributed on the right

hand and on the left by men, de, alla, kaitoi, kai de and the like, or

deduced from one another by ara, de, oun, toinun and the like.  In English

the majority of sentences are independent and in apposition to one another;

they are laid side by side or slightly connected by the copula.  But within

the sentence the expression of the logical relations of the clauses is

closer and more exact:  there is less of apposition and participial

structure.  The sentences thus laid side by side are also constructed into

paragraphs; these again are less distinctly marked in Greek and Latin than

in English.  Generally French, German, and English have an advantage over

the classical languages in point of accuracy.  The three concords are more

accurately observed in English than in either Greek or Latin.  On the other

hand, the extension of the familiar use of the masculine and feminine

gender to objects of sense and abstract ideas as well as to men and animals

no doubt lends a nameless grace to style which we have a difficulty in

appreciating, and the possible variety in the order of words gives more

flexibility and also a kind of dignity to the period.  Of the comparative

effect of accent and quantity and of the relation between them in ancient

and modern languages we are not able to judge.



Another quality in which modern are superior to ancient languages is

freedom from tautology.  No English style is thought tolerable in which,

except for the sake of emphasis, the same words are repeated at short

intervals.  Of course the length of the interval must depend on the

character of the word.  Striking words and expressions cannot be allowed to

reappear, if at all, except at the distance of a page or more.  Pronouns,

prepositions, conjunctions may or rather must recur in successive lines. 

It seems to be a kind of impertinence to the reader and strikes

unpleasantly both on the mind and on the ear that the same sounds should be

used twice over, when another word or turn of expression would have given a

new shade of meaning to the thought and would have added a pleasing variety

to the sound.  And the mind equally rejects the repetition of the word and

the use of a mere synonym for it,--e.g. felicity and happiness.  The

cultivated mind desires something more, which a skilful writer is easily

able to supply out of his treasure-house.



The fear of tautology has doubtless led to the multiplications of words and

the meanings of words, and generally to an enlargement of the vocabulary. 

It is a very early instinct of language; for ancient poetry is almost as

free from tautology as the best modern writings.  The speech of young

children, except in so far as they are compelled to repeat themselves by

the fewness of their words, also escapes from it.  When they grow up and

have ideas which are beyond their powers of expression, especially in

writing, tautology begins to appear.  In like manner when language is

'contaminated' by philosophy it is apt to become awkward, to stammer and

repeat itself, to lose its flow and freedom.  No philosophical writer with

the exception of Plato, who is himself not free from tautology, and perhaps

Bacon, has attained to any high degree of literary excellence.



To poetry the form and polish of language is chiefly to be attributed; and

the most critical period in the history of language is the transition from

verse to prose.  At first mankind were contented to express their thoughts

in a set form of words having a kind of rhythm; to which regularity was

given by accent and quantity.  But after a time they demanded a greater

degree of freedom, and to those who had all their life been hearing poetry

the first introduction of prose had the charm of novelty.  The prose

romances into which the Homeric Poems were converted, for a while probably

gave more delight to the hearers or readers of them than the Poems

themselves, and in time the relation of the two was reversed:  the poems

which had once been a necessity of the human mind became a luxury:  they

were now superseded by prose, which in all succeeding ages became the

natural vehicle of expression to all mankind.  Henceforward prose and

poetry formed each other.  A comparatively slender link between them was

also furnished by proverbs.  We may trace in poetry how the simple

succession of lines, not without monotony, has passed into a complicated

period, and how in prose, rhythm and accent and the order of words and the

balance of clauses, sometimes not without a slight admixture of rhyme, make

up a new kind of harmony, swelling into strains not less majestic than

those of Homer, Virgil, or Dante.



One of the most curious and characteristic features of language, affecting

both syntax and style, is idiom.  The meaning of the word 'idiom' is that

which is peculiar, that which is familiar, the word or expression which

strikes us or comes home to us, which is more readily understood or more

easily remembered.  It is a quality which really exists in infinite

degrees, which we turn into differences of kind by applying the term only

to conspicuous and striking examples of words or phrases which have this

quality.  It often supersedes the laws of language or the rules of grammar,

or rather is to be regarded as another law of language which is natural and

necessary.  The word or phrase which has been repeated many times over is

more intelligible and familiar to us than one which is rare, and our

familiarity with it more than compensates for incorrectness or inaccuracy

in the use of it.  Striking expressions also which have moved the hearts of

nations or are the precious stones and jewels of great authors partake of

the nature of idioms:  they are taken out of the sphere of grammar and are

exempt from the proprieties of language.  Every one knows that we often put

words together in a manner which would be intolerable if it were not

idiomatic.  We cannot argue either about the meaning of words or the use of

constructions that because they are used in one connexion they will be

legitimate in another, unless we allow for this principle.  We can bear to

have words and sentences used in new senses or in a new order or even a

little perverted in meaning when we are quite familiar with them.

Quotations are as often applied in a sense which the author did not intend

as in that which he did.  The parody of the words of Shakspere or of the

Bible, which has in it something of the nature of a lie, is far from

unpleasing to us.  The better known words, even if their meaning be

perverted, are more agreeable to us and have a greater power over us.  Most

of us have experienced a sort of delight and feeling of curiosity when we

first came across or when we first used for ourselves a new word or phrase

or figure of speech.



There are associations of sound and of sense by which every word is linked

to every other.  One letter harmonizes with another; every verb or noun

derives its meaning, not only from itself, but from the words with which it

is associated.  Some reflection of them near or distant is embodied in it.

In any new use of a word all the existing uses of it have to be considered.

Upon these depends the question whether it will bear the proposed extension

of meaning or not.  According to the famous expression of Luther, 'Words

are living creatures, having hands and feet.'  When they cease to retain

this living power of adaptation, when they are only put together like the

parts of a piece of furniture, language becomes unpoetical, in expressive,

dead.



Grammars would lead us to suppose that words have a fixed form and sound. 

Lexicons assign to each word a definite meaning or meanings.  They both

tend to obscure the fact that the sentence precedes the word and that all

language is relative.  (1) It is relative to its own context.  Its meaning

is modified by what has been said before and after in the same or in some

other passage:  without comparing the context we are not sure whether it is

used in the same sense even in two successive sentences.  (2) It is

relative to facts, to time, place, and occasion:  when they are already

known to the hearer or reader, they may be presupposed; there is no need to

allude to them further.  (3) It is relative to the knowledge of the writer

and reader or of the speaker and hearer.  Except for the sake of order and

consecutiveness nothing ought to be expressed which is already commonly or

universally known.  A word or two may be sufficient to give an intimation

to a friend; a long or elaborate speech or composition is required to

explain some new idea to a popular audience or to the ordinary reader or to

a young pupil.  Grammars and dictionaries are not to be despised; for in

teaching we need clearness rather than subtlety.  But we must not therefore

forget that there is also a higher ideal of language in which all is

relative--sounds to sounds, words to words, the parts to the whole--in

which besides the lesser context of the book or speech, there is also the

larger context of history and circumstances.



The study of Comparative Philology has introduced into the world a new

science which more than any other binds up man with nature, and distant

ages and countries with one another.  It may be said to have thrown a light

upon all other sciences and upon the nature of the human mind itself.  The

true conception of it dispels many errors, not only of metaphysics and

theology, but also of natural knowledge.  Yet it is far from certain that

this newly-found science will continue to progress in the same surprising

manner as heretofore; or that even if our materials are largely increased,

we shall arrive at much more definite conclusions than at present.  Like

some other branches of knowledge, it may be approaching a point at which it

can no longer be profitably studied.  But at any rate it has brought back

the philosophy of language from theory to fact; it has passed out of the

region of guesses and hypotheses, and has attained the dignity of an

Inductive Science.  And it is not without practical and political

importance.  It gives a new interest to distant and subject countries; it

brings back the dawning light from one end of the earth to the other. 

Nations, like individuals, are better understood by us when we know

something of their early life; and when they are better understood by us,

we feel more kindly towards them.  Lastly, we may remember that all

knowledge is valuable for its own sake; and we may also hope that a deeper

insight into the nature of human speech will give us a greater command of

it and enable us to make a nobler use of it.  (Compare again W. Humboldt,

'Ueber die Verschiedenheit des menschlichen Sprachbaues;' M. Muller,

'Lectures on the Science of Language;' Steinthal, 'Einleitung in die

Psychologie und Sprachwissenschaft:' and for the latter part of the Essay,

Delbruck, 'Study of Language;' Paul's 'Principles of the History of

Language:'  to the latter work the author of this Essay is largely

indebted.)





CRATYLUS



by



Plato



Translated by Benjamin Jowett





PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE:  Socrates, Hermogenes, Cratylus.





HERMOGENES:  Suppose that we make Socrates a party to the argument?



CRATYLUS:  If you please.



HERMOGENES:  I should explain to you, Socrates, that our friend Cratylus

has been arguing about names; he says that they are natural and not

conventional; not a portion of the human voice which men agree to use; but

that there is a truth or correctness in them, which is the same for

Hellenes as for barbarians.  Whereupon I ask him, whether his own name of

Cratylus is a true name or not, and he answers 'Yes.'  And Socrates? 

'Yes.'  Then every man's name, as I tell him, is that which he is called. 

To this he replies--'If all the world were to call you Hermogenes, that

would not be your name.'  And when I am anxious to have a further

explanation he is ironical and mysterious, and seems to imply that he has a

notion of his own about the matter, if he would only tell, and could

entirely convince me, if he chose to be intelligible.  Tell me, Socrates,

what this oracle means; or rather tell me, if you will be so good, what is

your own view of the truth or correctness of names, which I would far

sooner hear.



SOCRATES:  Son of Hipponicus, there is an ancient saying, that 'hard is the

knowledge of the good.'  And the knowledge of names is a great part of

knowledge.  If I had not been poor, I might have heard the fifty-drachma

course of the great Prodicus, which is a complete education in grammar and

language--these are his own words--and then I should have been at once able

to answer your question about the correctness of names.  But, indeed, I

have only heard the single-drachma course, and therefore, I do not know the

truth about such matters; I will, however, gladly assist you and Cratylus

in the investigation of them.  When he declares that your name is not

really Hermogenes, I suspect that he is only making fun of you;--he means

to say that you are no true son of Hermes, because you are always looking

after a fortune and never in luck.  But, as I was saying, there is a good

deal of difficulty in this sort of knowledge, and therefore we had better

leave the question open until we have heard both sides.



HERMOGENES:  I have often talked over this matter, both with Cratylus and

others, and cannot convince myself that there is any principle of

correctness in names other than convention and agreement; any name which

you give, in my opinion, is the right one, and if you change that and give

another, the new name is as correct as the old--we frequently change the

names of our slaves, and the newly-imposed name is as good as the old:  for

there is no name given to anything by nature; all is convention and habit

of the users;--such is my view.  But if I am mistaken I shall be happy to

hear and learn of Cratylus, or of any one else.



SOCRATES:  I dare say that you may be right, Hermogenes:  let us see;--Your

meaning is, that the name of each thing is only that which anybody agrees

to call it?



HERMOGENES:  That is my notion.



SOCRATES:  Whether the giver of the name be an individual or a city?



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Well, now, let me take an instance;--suppose that I call a man a

horse or a horse a man, you mean to say that a man will be rightly called a

horse by me individually, and rightly called a man by the rest of the

world; and a horse again would be rightly called a man by me and a horse by

the world:--that is your meaning?



HERMOGENES:  He would, according to my view.



SOCRATES:  But how about truth, then? you would acknowledge that there is

in words a true and a false?



HERMOGENES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And there are true and false propositions?



HERMOGENES:  To be sure.



SOCRATES:  And a true proposition says that which is, and a false

proposition says that which is not?



HERMOGENES:  Yes; what other answer is possible?



SOCRATES:  Then in a proposition there is a true and false?



HERMOGENES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  But is a proposition true as a whole only, and are the parts

untrue?



HERMOGENES:  No; the parts are true as well as the whole.



SOCRATES:  Would you say the large parts and not the smaller ones, or every

part?



HERMOGENES:  I should say that every part is true.



SOCRATES:  Is a proposition resolvable into any part smaller than a name?



HERMOGENES:  No; that is the smallest.



SOCRATES:  Then the name is a part of the true proposition?



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Yes, and a true part, as you say.



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And is not the part of a falsehood also a falsehood?



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Then, if propositions may be true and false, names may be true

and false?



HERMOGENES:  So we must infer.



SOCRATES:  And the name of anything is that which any one affirms to be the

name?



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And will there be so many names of each thing as everybody says

that there are? and will they be true names at the time of uttering them?



HERMOGENES:  Yes, Socrates, I can conceive no correctness of names other

than this; you give one name, and I another; and in different cities and

countries there are different names for the same things; Hellenes differ

from barbarians in their use of names, and the several Hellenic tribes from

one another.



SOCRATES:  But would you say, Hermogenes, that the things differ as the

names differ? and are they relative to individuals, as Protagoras tells us? 

For he says that man is the measure of all things, and that things are to

me as they appear to me, and that they are to you as they appear to you. 

Do you agree with him, or would you say that things have a permanent

essence of their own?



HERMOGENES:  There have been times, Socrates, when I have been driven in my

perplexity to take refuge with Protagoras; not that I agree with him at

all.



SOCRATES:  What! have you ever been driven to admit that there was no such

thing as a bad man?



HERMOGENES:  No, indeed; but I have often had reason to think that there

are very bad men, and a good many of them.



SOCRATES:  Well, and have you ever found any very good ones?



HERMOGENES:  Not many.



SOCRATES:  Still you have found them?



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And would you hold that the very good were the very wise, and

the very evil very foolish?  Would that be your view?



HERMOGENES:  It would.



SOCRATES:  But if Protagoras is right, and the truth is that things are as

they appear to any one, how can some of us be wise and some of us foolish?



HERMOGENES:  Impossible.



SOCRATES:  And if, on the other hand, wisdom and folly are really

distinguishable, you will allow, I think, that the assertion of Protagoras

can hardly be correct.  For if what appears to each man is true to him, one

man cannot in reality be wiser than another.



HERMOGENES:  He cannot.



SOCRATES:  Nor will you be disposed to say with Euthydemus, that all things

equally belong to all men at the same moment and always; for neither on his

view can there be some good and others bad, if virtue and vice are always

equally to be attributed to all.



HERMOGENES:  There cannot.



SOCRATES:  But if neither is right, and things are not relative to

individuals, and all things do not equally belong to all at the same moment

and always, they must be supposed to have their own proper and permanent

essence:  they are not in relation to us, or influenced by us, fluctuating

according to our fancy, but they are independent, and maintain to their own

essence the relation prescribed by nature.



HERMOGENES:  I think, Socrates, that you have said the truth.



SOCRATES:  Does what I am saying apply only to the things themselves, or

equally to the actions which proceed from them?  Are not actions also a

class of being?



HERMOGENES:  Yes, the actions are real as well as the things.



SOCRATES:  Then the actions also are done according to their proper nature,

and not according to our opinion of them?  In cutting, for example, we do

not cut as we please, and with any chance instrument; but we cut with the

proper instrument only, and according to the natural process of cutting;

and the natural process is right and will succeed, but any other will fail

and be of no use at all.



HERMOGENES:  I should say that the natural way is the right way.



SOCRATES:  Again, in burning, not every way is the right way; but the right

way is the natural way, and the right instrument the natural instrument.



HERMOGENES:  True.



SOCRATES:  And this holds good of all actions?



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And speech is a kind of action?



HERMOGENES:  True.



SOCRATES:  And will a man speak correctly who speaks as he pleases?  Will

not the successful speaker rather be he who speaks in the natural way of

speaking, and as things ought to be spoken, and with the natural

instrument?  Any other mode of speaking will result in error and failure.



HERMOGENES:  I quite agree with you.



SOCRATES:  And is not naming a part of speaking? for in giving names men

speak.



HERMOGENES:  That is true.



SOCRATES:  And if speaking is a sort of action and has a relation to acts,

is not naming also a sort of action?



HERMOGENES:  True.



SOCRATES:  And we saw that actions were not relative to ourselves, but had

a special nature of their own?



HERMOGENES:  Precisely.



SOCRATES:  Then the argument would lead us to infer that names ought to be

given according to a natural process, and with a proper instrument, and not

at our pleasure:  in this and no other way shall we name with success.



HERMOGENES:  I agree.



SOCRATES:  But again, that which has to be cut has to be cut with

something?



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And that which has to be woven or pierced has to be woven or

pierced with something?



HERMOGENES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And that which has to be named has to be named with something?



HERMOGENES:  True.



SOCRATES:  What is that with which we pierce?



HERMOGENES:  An awl.



SOCRATES:  And with which we weave?



HERMOGENES:  A shuttle.



SOCRATES:  And with which we name?



HERMOGENES:  A name.



SOCRATES:  Very good:  then a name is an instrument?



HERMOGENES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  Suppose that I ask, 'What sort of instrument is a shuttle?'  And

you answer, 'A weaving instrument.'



HERMOGENES:  Well.



SOCRATES:  And I ask again, 'What do we do when we weave?'--The answer is,

that we separate or disengage the warp from the woof.



HERMOGENES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  And may not a similar description be given of an awl, and of

instruments in general?



HERMOGENES:  To be sure.



SOCRATES:  And now suppose that I ask a similar question about names:  will

you answer me?  Regarding the name as an instrument, what do we do when we

name?



HERMOGENES:  I cannot say.



SOCRATES:  Do we not give information to one another, and distinguish

things according to their natures?



HERMOGENES:  Certainly we do.



SOCRATES:  Then a name is an instrument of teaching and of distinguishing

natures, as the shuttle is of distinguishing the threads of the web.



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And the shuttle is the instrument of the weaver?



HERMOGENES:  Assuredly.



SOCRATES:  Then the weaver will use the shuttle well--and well means like a

weaver? and the teacher will use the name well--and well means like a

teacher?



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And when the weaver uses the shuttle, whose work will he be

using well?



HERMOGENES:  That of the carpenter.



SOCRATES:  And is every man a carpenter, or the skilled only?



HERMOGENES:  Only the skilled.



SOCRATES:  And when the piercer uses the awl, whose work will he be using

well?



HERMOGENES:  That of the smith.



SOCRATES:  And is every man a smith, or only the skilled?



HERMOGENES:  The skilled only.



SOCRATES:  And when the teacher uses the name, whose work will he be using?



HERMOGENES:  There again I am puzzled.



SOCRATES:  Cannot you at least say who gives us the names which we use?



HERMOGENES:  Indeed I cannot.




SOCRATES:  Does not the law seem to you to give us them?



HERMOGENES:  Yes, I suppose so.



SOCRATES:  Then the teacher, when he gives us a name, uses the work of the

legislator?



HERMOGENES:  I agree.



SOCRATES:  And is every man a legislator, or the skilled only?



HERMOGENES:  The skilled only.



SOCRATES:  Then, Hermogenes, not every man is able to give a name, but only

a maker of names; and this is the legislator, who of all skilled artisans

in the world is the rarest.



HERMOGENES:  True.



SOCRATES:  And how does the legislator make names? and to what does he

look?  Consider this in the light of the previous instances:  to what does

the carpenter look in making the shuttle?  Does he not look to that which

is naturally fitted to act as a shuttle?



HERMOGENES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And suppose the shuttle to be broken in making, will he make

another, looking to the broken one? or will he look to the form according

to which he made the other?



HERMOGENES:  To the latter, I should imagine.



SOCRATES:  Might not that be justly called the true or ideal shuttle?



HERMOGENES:  I think so.



SOCRATES:  And whatever shuttles are wanted, for the manufacture of

garments, thin or thick, of flaxen, woollen, or other material, ought all

of them to have the true form of the shuttle; and whatever is the shuttle

best adapted to each kind of work, that ought to be the form which the

maker produces in each case.



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And the same holds of other instruments:  when a man has

discovered the instrument which is naturally adapted to each work, he must

express this natural form, and not others which he fancies, in the

material, whatever it may be, which he employs; for example, he ought to

know how to put into iron the forms of awls adapted by nature to their

several uses?



HERMOGENES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And how to put into wood forms of shuttles adapted by nature to

their uses?



HERMOGENES:  True.



SOCRATES:  For the several forms of shuttles naturally answer to the

several kinds of webs; and this is true of instruments in general.



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Then, as to names:  ought not our legislator also to know how to

put the true natural name of each thing into sounds and syllables, and to

make and give all names with a view to the ideal name, if he is to be a

namer in any true sense?  And we must remember that different legislators

will not use the same syllables.  For neither does every smith, although he

may be making the same instrument for the same purpose, make them all of

the same iron.  The form must be the same, but the material may vary, and

still the instrument may be equally good of whatever iron made, whether in

Hellas or in a foreign country;--there is no difference.



HERMOGENES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  And the legislator, whether he be Hellene or barbarian, is not

therefore to be deemed by you a worse legislator, provided he gives the

true and proper form of the name in whatever syllables; this or that

country makes no matter.



HERMOGENES:  Quite true.



SOCRATES:  But who then is to determine whether the proper form is given to

the shuttle, whatever sort of wood may be used? the carpenter who makes, or

the weaver who is to use them?



HERMOGENES:  I should say, he who is to use them, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  And who uses the work of the lyre-maker?  Will not he be the man

who knows how to direct what is being done, and who will know also whether

the work is being well done or not?



HERMOGENES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And who is he?



HERMOGENES:  The player of the lyre.



SOCRATES:  And who will direct the shipwright?



HERMOGENES:  The pilot.



SOCRATES:  And who will be best able to direct the legislator in his work,

and will know whether the work is well done, in this or any other country? 

Will not the user be the man?



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And this is he who knows how to ask questions?



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And how to answer them?



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And him who knows how to ask and answer you would call a

dialectician?



HERMOGENES:  Yes; that would be his name.



SOCRATES:  Then the work of the carpenter is to make a rudder, and the

pilot has to direct him, if the rudder is to be well made.



HERMOGENES:  True.



SOCRATES:  And the work of the legislator is to give names, and the

dialectician must be his director if the names are to be rightly given?



HERMOGENES:  That is true.



SOCRATES:  Then, Hermogenes, I should say that this giving of names can be

no such light matter as you fancy, or the work of light or chance persons;

and Cratylus is right in saying that things have names by nature, and that

not every man is an artificer of names, but he only who looks to the name

which each thing by nature has, and is able to express the true forms of

things in letters and syllables.



HERMOGENES:  I cannot answer you, Socrates; but I find a difficulty in

changing my opinion all in a moment, and I think that I should be more

readily persuaded, if you would show me what this is which you term the

natural fitness of names.



SOCRATES:  My good Hermogenes, I have none to show.  Was I not telling you

just now (but you have forgotten), that I knew nothing, and proposing to

share the enquiry with you?  But now that you and I have talked over the

matter, a step has been gained; for we have discovered that names have by

nature a truth, and that not every man knows how to give a thing a name.



HERMOGENES:  Very good.



SOCRATES:  And what is the nature of this truth or correctness of names? 

That, if you care to know, is the next question.



HERMOGENES:  Certainly, I care to know.



SOCRATES:  Then reflect.



HERMOGENES:  How shall I reflect?



SOCRATES:  The true way is to have the assistance of those who know, and

you must pay them well both in money and in thanks; these are the Sophists,

of whom your brother, Callias, has--rather dearly--bought the reputation of

wisdom.  But you have not yet come into your inheritance, and therefore you

had better go to him, and beg and entreat him to tell you what he has

learnt from Protagoras about the fitness of names.



HERMOGENES:  But how inconsistent should I be, if, whilst repudiating

Protagoras and his truth ('Truth' was the title of the book of Protagoras;

compare Theaet.), I were to attach any value to what he and his book

affirm!



SOCRATES:  Then if you despise him, you must learn of Homer and the poets.



HERMOGENES:  And where does Homer say anything about names, and what does

he say?



SOCRATES:  He often speaks of them; notably and nobly in the places where

he distinguishes the different names which Gods and men give to the same

things.  Does he not in these passages make a remarkable statement about

the correctness of names?  For the Gods must clearly be supposed to call

things by their right and natural names; do you not think so?



HERMOGENES:  Why, of course they call them rightly, if they call them at

all.  But to what are you referring?



SOCRATES:  Do you not know what he says about the river in Troy who had a

single combat with Hephaestus?



'Whom,' as he says, 'the Gods call Xanthus, and men call Scamander.'



HERMOGENES:  I remember.



SOCRATES:  Well, and about this river--to know that he ought to be called

Xanthus and not Scamander--is not that a solemn lesson?  Or about the bird

which, as he says,



'The Gods call Chalcis, and men Cymindis:'



to be taught how much more correct the name Chalcis is than the name

Cymindis--do you deem that a light matter?  Or about Batieia and Myrina? 

(Compare Il. 'The hill which men call Batieia and the immortals the tomb of

the sportive Myrina.')  And there are many other observations of the same

kind in Homer and other poets.  Now, I think that this is beyond the

understanding of you and me; but the names of Scamandrius and Astyanax,

which he affirms to have been the names of Hector's son, are more within

the range of human faculties, as I am disposed to think; and what the poet

means by correctness may be more readily apprehended in that instance:  you

will remember I dare say the lines to which I refer?  (Il.)



HERMOGENES:  I do.



SOCRATES:  Let me ask you, then, which did Homer think the more correct of

the names given to Hector's son--Astyanax or Scamandrius?



HERMOGENES:  I do not know.



SOCRATES:  How would you answer, if you were asked whether the wise or the

unwise are more likely to give correct names?



HERMOGENES:  I should say the wise, of course.



SOCRATES:  And are the men or the women of a city, taken as a class, the

wiser?



HERMOGENES:  I should say, the men.



SOCRATES:  And Homer, as you know, says that the Trojan men called him

Astyanax (king of the city); but if the men called him Astyanax, the other

name of Scamandrius could only have been given to him by the women.



HERMOGENES:  That may be inferred.



SOCRATES:  And must not Homer have imagined the Trojans to be wiser than

their wives?



HERMOGENES:  To be sure.



SOCRATES:  Then he must have thought Astyanax to be a more correct name for

the boy than Scamandrius?



HERMOGENES:  Clearly.



SOCRATES:  And what is the reason of this?  Let us consider:--does he not

himself suggest a very good reason, when he says,



'For he alone defended their city and long walls'?



This appears to be a good reason for calling the son of the saviour king of

the city which his father was saving, as Homer observes.



HERMOGENES:  I see.



SOCRATES:  Why, Hermogenes, I do not as yet see myself; and do you?



HERMOGENES:  No, indeed; not I.



SOCRATES:  But tell me, friend, did not Homer himself also give Hector his

name?



HERMOGENES:  What of that?



SOCRATES:  The name appears to me to be very nearly the same as the name of

Astyanax--both are Hellenic; and a king (anax) and a holder (ektor) have

nearly the same meaning, and are both descriptive of a king; for a man is

clearly the holder of that of which he is king; he rules, and owns, and

holds it.  But, perhaps, you may think that I am talking nonsense; and

indeed I believe that I myself did not know what I meant when I imagined

that I had found some indication of the opinion of Homer about the

correctness of names.



HERMOGENES:  I assure you that I think otherwise, and I believe you to be

on the right track.



SOCRATES:  There is reason, I think, in calling the lion's whelp a lion,

and the foal of a horse a horse; I am speaking only of the ordinary course

of nature, when an animal produces after his kind, and not of extraordinary

births;--if contrary to nature a horse have a calf, then I should not call

that a foal but a calf; nor do I call any inhuman birth a man, but only a

natural birth.  And the same may be said of trees and other things.  Do you

agree with me?



HERMOGENES:  Yes, I agree.



SOCRATES:  Very good.  But you had better watch me and see that I do not

play tricks with you.  For on the same principle the son of a king is to be

called a king.  And whether the syllables of the name are the same or not

the same, makes no difference, provided the meaning is retained; nor does

the addition or subtraction of a letter make any difference so long as the

essence of the thing remains in possession of the name and appears in it.



HERMOGENES:  What do you mean?



SOCRATES:  A very simple matter.  I may illustrate my meaning by the names

of letters, which you know are not the same as the letters themselves with

the exception of the four epsilon, upsilon, omicron, omega; the names of

the rest, whether vowels or consonants, are made up of other letters which

we add to them; but so long as we introduce the meaning, and there can be

no mistake, the name of the letter is quite correct.  Take, for example,

the letter beta--the addition of eta, tau, alpha, gives no offence, and

does not prevent the whole name from having the value which the legislator

intended--so well did he know how to give the letters names.



HERMOGENES:  I believe you are right.



SOCRATES:  And may not the same be said of a king? a king will often be the

son of a king, the good son or the noble son of a good or noble sire; and

similarly the offspring of every kind, in the regular course of nature, is

like the parent, and therefore has the same name.  Yet the syllables may be

disguised until they appear different to the ignorant person, and he may

not recognize them, although they are the same, just as any one of us would

not recognize the same drugs under different disguises of colour and smell,

although to the physician, who regards the power of them, they are the

same, and he is not put out by the addition; and in like manner the

etymologist is not put out by the addition or transposition or subtraction

of a letter or two, or indeed by the change of all the letters, for this

need not interfere with the meaning.  As was just now said, the names of

Hector and Astyanax have only one letter alike, which is tau, and yet they

have the same meaning.  And how little in common with the letters of their

names has Archepolis (ruler of the city)--and yet the meaning is the same. 

And there are many other names which just mean 'king.'  Again, there are

several names for a general, as, for example, Agis (leader) and Polemarchus

(chief in war) and Eupolemus (good warrior); and others which denote a

physician, as Iatrocles (famous healer) and Acesimbrotus (curer of

mortals); and there are many others which might be cited, differing in

their syllables and letters, but having the same meaning.  Would you not

say so?



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  The same names, then, ought to be assigned to those who follow

in the course of nature?



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And what of those who follow out of the course of nature, and

are prodigies? for example, when a good and religious man has an

irreligious son, he ought to bear the name not of his father, but of the

class to which he belongs, just as in the case which was before supposed of

a horse foaling a calf.



HERMOGENES:  Quite true.



SOCRATES:  Then the irreligious son of a religious father should be called

irreligious?



HERMOGENES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  He should not be called Theophilus (beloved of God) or

Mnesitheus (mindful of God), or any of these names:  if names are correctly

given, his should have an opposite meaning.



HERMOGENES:  Certainly, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  Again, Hermogenes, there is Orestes (the man of the mountains)

who appears to be rightly called; whether chance gave the name, or perhaps

some poet who meant to express the brutality and fierceness and mountain

wildness of his hero's nature.



HERMOGENES:  That is very likely, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  And his father's name is also according to nature.



HERMOGENES:  Clearly.



SOCRATES:  Yes, for as his name, so also is his nature; Agamemnon

(admirable for remaining) is one who is patient and persevering in the

accomplishment of his resolves, and by his virtue crowns them; and his

continuance at Troy with all the vast army is a proof of that admirable

endurance in him which is signified by the name Agamemnon.  I also think

that Atreus is rightly called; for his murder of Chrysippus and his

exceeding cruelty to Thyestes are damaging and destructive to his

reputation--the name is a little altered and disguised so as not to be

intelligible to every one, but to the etymologist there is no difficulty in

seeing the meaning, for whether you think of him as ateires the stubborn,

or as atrestos the fearless, or as ateros the destructive one, the name is

perfectly correct in every point of view.  And I think that Pelops is also

named appropriately; for, as the name implies, he is rightly called Pelops

who sees what is near only (o ta pelas oron).



HERMOGENES:  How so?



SOCRATES:  Because, according to the tradition, he had no forethought or

foresight of all the evil which the murder of Myrtilus would entail upon

his whole race in remote ages; he saw only what was at hand and immediate,

--or in other words, pelas (near), in his eagerness to win Hippodamia by

all means for his bride.  Every one would agree that the name of Tantalus

is rightly given and in accordance with nature, if the traditions about him

are true.



HERMOGENES:  And what are the traditions?



SOCRATES:  Many terrible misfortunes are said to have happened to him in

his life--last of all, came the utter ruin of his country; and after his

death he had the stone suspended (talanteia) over his head in the world

below--all this agrees wonderfully well with his name.  You might imagine

that some person who wanted to call him Talantatos (the most weighted down

by misfortune), disguised the name by altering it into Tantalus; and into

this form, by some accident of tradition, it has actually been transmuted. 

The name of Zeus, who is his alleged father, has also an excellent meaning,

although hard to be understood, because really like a sentence, which is

divided into two parts, for some call him Zena, and use the one half, and

others who use the other half call him Dia; the two together signify the

nature of the God, and the business of a name, as we were saying, is to

express the nature.  For there is none who is more the author of life to us

and to all, than the lord and king of all.  Wherefore we are right in

calling him Zena and Dia, which are one name, although divided, meaning the

God through whom all creatures always have life (di on zen aei pasi tois

zosin uparchei).  There is an irreverence, at first sight, in calling him

son of Cronos (who is a proverb for stupidity), and we might rather expect

Zeus to be the child of a mighty intellect.  Which is the fact; for this is

the meaning of his father's name:  Kronos quasi Koros (Choreo, to sweep),

not in the sense of a youth, but signifying to chatharon chai acheraton tou

nou, the pure and garnished mind (sc. apo tou chorein).  He, as we are

informed by tradition, was begotten of Uranus, rightly so called (apo tou

oran ta ano) from looking upwards; which, as philosophers tell us, is the

way to have a pure mind, and the name Uranus is therefore correct.  If I

could remember the genealogy of Hesiod, I would have gone on and tried more

conclusions of the same sort on the remoter ancestors of the Gods,--then I

might have seen whether this wisdom, which has come to me all in an

instant, I know not whence, will or will not hold good to the end.



HERMOGENES:  You seem to me, Socrates, to be quite like a prophet newly

inspired, and to be uttering oracles.



SOCRATES:  Yes, Hermogenes, and I believe that I caught the inspiration

from the great Euthyphro of the Prospaltian deme, who gave me a long

lecture which commenced at dawn:  he talked and I listened, and his wisdom

and enchanting ravishment has not only filled my ears but taken possession

of my soul,and to-day I shall let his superhuman power work and finish the

investigation of names--that will be the way; but to-morrow, if you are so

disposed, we will conjure him away, and make a purgation of him, if we can

only find some priest or sophist who is skilled in purifications of this

sort.



HERMOGENES:  With all my heart; for am very curious to hear the rest of the

enquiry about names.



SOCRATES:  Then let us proceed; and where would you have us begin, now that

we have got a sort of outline of the enquiry?  Are there any names which

witness of themselves that they are not given arbitrarily, but have a

natural fitness?  The names of heroes and of men in general are apt to be

deceptive because they are often called after ancestors with whose names,

as we were saying, they may have no business; or they are the expression of

a wish like Eutychides (the son of good fortune), or Sosias (the Saviour),

or Theophilus (the beloved of God), and others.  But I think that we had

better leave these, for there will be more chance of finding correctness in

the names of immutable essences;--there ought to have been more care taken

about them when they were named, and perhaps there may have been some more

than human power at work occasionally in giving them names.



HERMOGENES:  I think so, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  Ought we not to begin with the consideration of the Gods, and

show that they are rightly named Gods?



HERMOGENES:  Yes, that will be well.



SOCRATES:  My notion would be something of this sort:--I suspect that the

sun, moon, earth, stars, and heaven, which are still the Gods of many

barbarians, were the only Gods known to the aboriginal Hellenes.  Seeing

that they were always moving and running, from their running nature they

were called Gods or runners (Theous, Theontas); and when men became

acquainted with the other Gods, they proceeded to apply the same name to

them all.  Do you think that likely?



HERMOGENES:  I think it very likely indeed.



SOCRATES:  What shall follow the Gods?



HERMOGENES:  Must not demons and heroes and men come next?



SOCRATES:  Demons!  And what do you consider to be the meaning of this

word?  Tell me if my view is right.



HERMOGENES:  Let me hear.



SOCRATES:  You know how Hesiod uses the word?



HERMOGENES:  I do not.



SOCRATES:  Do you not remember that he speaks of a golden race of men who

came first?



HERMOGENES:  Yes, I do.



SOCRATES:  He says of them--



'But now that fate has closed over this race

They are holy demons upon the earth,

Beneficent, averters of ills, guardians of mortal men.'  (Hesiod, Works and

Days.)



HERMOGENES:  What is the inference?



SOCRATES:  What is the inference!  Why, I suppose that he means by the

golden men, not men literally made of gold, but good and noble; and I am

convinced of this, because he further says that we are the iron race.



HERMOGENES:  That is true.



SOCRATES:  And do you not suppose that good men of our own day would by him

be said to be of golden race?



HERMOGENES:  Very likely.



SOCRATES:  And are not the good wise?



HERMOGENES:  Yes, they are wise.



SOCRATES:  And therefore I have the most entire conviction that he called

them demons, because they were daemones (knowing or wise), and in our older

Attic dialect the word itself occurs.  Now he and other poets say truly,

that when a good man dies he has honour and a mighty portion among the

dead, and becomes a demon; which is a name given to him signifying wisdom. 

And I say too, that every wise man who happens to be a good man is more

than human (daimonion) both in life and death, and is rightly called a

demon.



HERMOGENES:  Then I rather think that I am of one mind with you; but what

is the meaning of the word 'hero'?  (Eros with an eta, in the old writing

eros with an epsilon.)



SOCRATES:  I think that there is no difficulty in explaining, for the name

is not much altered, and signifies that they were born of love.



HERMOGENES:  What do you mean?



SOCRATES:  Do you not know that the heroes are demigods?



HERMOGENES:  What then?



SOCRATES:  All of them sprang either from the love of a God for a mortal

woman, or of a mortal man for a Goddess; think of the word in the old

Attic, and you will see better that the name heros is only a slight

alteration of Eros, from whom the heroes sprang:  either this is the

meaning, or, if not this, then they must have been skilful as rhetoricians

and dialecticians, and able to put the question (erotan), for eirein is

equivalent to legein.  And therefore, as I was saying, in the Attic dialect

the heroes turn out to be rhetoricians and questioners.  All this is easy

enough; the noble breed of heroes are a tribe of sophists and rhetors.  But

can you tell me why men are called anthropoi?--that is more difficult.



HERMOGENES:  No, I cannot; and I would not try even if I could, because I

think that you are the more likely to succeed.



SOCRATES:  That is to say, you trust to the inspiration of Euthyphro.



HERMOGENES:  Of course.



SOCRATES:  Your faith is not vain; for at this very moment a new and

ingenious thought strikes me, and, if I am not careful, before to-morrow's

dawn I shall be wiser than I ought to be.  Now, attend to me; and first,

remember that we often put in and pull out letters in words, and give names

as we please and change the accents.  Take, for example, the word Dii

Philos; in order to convert this from a sentence into a noun, we omit one

of the iotas and sound the middle syllable grave instead of acute; as, on

the other hand, letters are sometimes inserted in words instead of being

omitted, and the acute takes the place of the grave.



HERMOGENES:  That is true.



SOCRATES:  The name anthropos, which was once a sentence, and is now a

noun, appears to be a case just of this sort, for one letter, which is the

alpha, has been omitted, and the acute on the last syllable has been

changed to a grave.



HERMOGENES:  What do you mean?



SOCRATES:  I mean to say that the word 'man' implies that other animals

never examine, or consider, or look up at what they see, but that man not

only sees (opope) but considers and looks up at that which he sees, and

hence he alone of all animals is rightly anthropos, meaning anathron a

opopen.



HERMOGENES:  May I ask you to examine another word about which I am

curious?



SOCRATES:  Certainly.



HERMOGENES:  I will take that which appears to me to follow next in order. 

You know the distinction of soul and body?



SOCRATES:  Of course.



HERMOGENES:  Let us endeavour to analyze them like the previous words.



SOCRATES:  You want me first of all to examine the natural fitness of the

word psuche (soul), and then of the word soma (body)?



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  If I am to say what occurs to me at the moment, I should imagine

that those who first used the name psuche meant to express that the soul

when in the body is the source of life, and gives the power of breath and

revival (anapsuchon), and when this reviving power fails then the body

perishes and dies, and this, if I am not mistaken, they called psyche.  But

please stay a moment; I fancy that I can discover something which will be

more acceptable to the disciples of Euthyphro, for I am afraid that they

will scorn this explanation.  What do you say to another?



HERMOGENES:  Let me hear.



SOCRATES:  What is that which holds and carries and gives life and motion

to the entire nature of the body?  What else but the soul?



HERMOGENES:  Just that.



SOCRATES:  And do you not believe with Anaxagoras, that mind or soul is the

ordering and containing principle of all things?



HERMOGENES:  Yes; I do.



SOCRATES:  Then you may well call that power phuseche which carries and

holds nature (e phusin okei, kai ekei), and this may be refined away into

psuche.



HERMOGENES:  Certainly; and this derivation is, I think, more scientific

than the other.



SOCRATES:  It is so; but I cannot help laughing, if I am to suppose that

this was the true meaning of the name.



HERMOGENES:  But what shall we say of the next word?



SOCRATES:  You mean soma (the body).



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  That may be variously interpreted; and yet more variously if a

little permutation is allowed.  For some say that the body is the grave

(sema) of the soul which may be thought to be buried in our present life;

or again the index of the soul, because the soul gives indications to

(semainei) the body; probably the Orphic poets were the inventors of the

name, and they were under the impression that the soul is suffering the

punishment of sin, and that the body is an enclosure or prison in which the

soul is incarcerated, kept safe (soma, sozetai), as the name soma implies,

until the penalty is paid; according to this view, not even a letter of the

word need be changed.



HERMOGENES:  I think, Socrates, that we have said enough of this class of

words.  But have we any more explanations of the names of the Gods, like

that which you were giving of Zeus?  I should like to know whether any

similar principle of correctness is to be applied to them.



SOCRATES:  Yes, indeed, Hermogenes; and there is one excellent principle

which, as men of sense, we must acknowledge,--that of the Gods we know

nothing, either of their natures or of the names which they give

themselves; but we are sure that the names by which they call themselves,

whatever they may be, are true.  And this is the best of all principles;

and the next best is to say, as in prayers, that we will call them by any

sort or kind of names or patronymics which they like, because we do not

know of any other.  That also, I think, is a very good custom, and one

which I should much wish to observe.  Let us, then, if you please, in the

first place announce to them that we are not enquiring about them; we do

not presume that we are able to do so; but we are enquiring about the

meaning of men in giving them these names,--in this there can be small

blame.



HERMOGENES:  I think, Socrates, that you are quite right, and I would like

to do as you say.



SOCRATES:  Shall we begin, then, with Hestia, according to custom?



HERMOGENES:  Yes, that will be very proper.



SOCRATES:  What may we suppose him to have meant who gave the name Hestia?



HERMOGENES:  That is another and certainly a most difficult question.



SOCRATES:  My dear Hermogenes, the first imposers of names must surely have

been considerable persons; they were philosophers, and had a good deal to

say.



HERMOGENES:  Well, and what of them?



SOCRATES:  They are the men to whom I should attribute the imposition of

names.  Even in foreign names, if you analyze them, a meaning is still

discernible.  For example, that which we term ousia is by some called esia,

and by others again osia.  Now that the essence of things should be called

estia, which is akin to the first of these (esia = estia), is rational

enough.  And there is reason in the Athenians calling that estia which

participates in ousia.  For in ancient times we too seem to have said esia

for ousia, and this you may note to have been the idea of those who

appointed that sacrifices should be first offered to estia, which was

natural enough if they meant that estia was the essence of things.  Those

again who read osia seem to have inclined to the opinion of Heracleitus,

that all things flow and nothing stands; with them the pushing principle

(othoun) is the cause and ruling power of all things, and is therefore

rightly called osia.  Enough of this, which is all that we who know nothing

can affirm.  Next in order after Hestia we ought to consider Rhea and

Cronos, although the name of Cronos has been already discussed.  But I dare

say that I am talking great nonsense.



HERMOGENES:  Why, Socrates?



SOCRATES:  My good friend, I have discovered a hive of wisdom.



HERMOGENES:  Of what nature?



SOCRATES:  Well, rather ridiculous, and yet plausible.



HERMOGENES:  How plausible?



SOCRATES:  I fancy to myself Heracleitus repeating wise traditions of

antiquity as old as the days of Cronos and Rhea, and of which Homer also

spoke.



HERMOGENES:  How do you mean?



SOCRATES:  Heracleitus is supposed to say that all things are in motion and

nothing at rest; he compares them to the stream of a river, and says that

you cannot go into the same water twice.



HERMOGENES:  That is true.



SOCRATES:  Well, then, how can we avoid inferring that he who gave the

names of Cronos and Rhea to the ancestors of the Gods, agreed pretty much

in the doctrine of Heracleitus?  Is the giving of the names of streams to

both of them purely accidental?  Compare the line in which Homer, and, as I

believe, Hesiod also, tells of



'Ocean, the origin of Gods, and mother Tethys (Il.--the line is not found

in the extant works of Hesiod.).'



And again, Orpheus says, that



'The fair river of Ocean was the first to marry, and he espoused his sister

Tethys, who was his mother's daughter.'



You see that this is a remarkable coincidence, and all in the direction of

Heracleitus.



HERMOGENES:  I think that there is something in what you say, Socrates; but

I do not understand the meaning of the name Tethys.



SOCRATES:  Well, that is almost self-explained, being only the name of a

spring, a little disguised; for that which is strained and filtered

(diattomenon, ethoumenon) may be likened to a spring, and the name Tethys

is made up of these two words.



HERMOGENES:  The idea is ingenious, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  To be sure.  But what comes next?--of Zeus we have spoken.



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Then let us next take his two brothers, Poseidon and Pluto,

whether the latter is called by that or by his other name.



HERMOGENES:  By all means.



SOCRATES:  Poseidon is Posidesmos, the chain of the feet; the original

inventor of the name had been stopped by the watery element in his walks,

and not allowed to go on, and therefore he called the ruler of this element

Poseidon; the epsilon was probably inserted as an ornament.  Yet, perhaps,

not so; but the name may have been originally written with a double lamda

and not with a sigma, meaning that the God knew many things (Polla eidos). 

And perhaps also he being the shaker of the earth, has been named from

shaking (seiein), and then pi and delta have been added.  Pluto gives

wealth (Ploutos), and his name means the giver of wealth, which comes out

of the earth beneath.  People in general appear to imagine that the term

Hades is connected with the invisible (aeides) and so they are led by their

fears to call the God Pluto instead.



HERMOGENES:  And what is the true derivation?



SOCRATES:  In spite of the mistakes which are made about the power of this

deity, and the foolish fears which people have of him, such as the fear of

always being with him after death, and of the soul denuded of the body

going to him (compare Rep.), my belief is that all is quite consistent, and

that the office and name of the God really correspond.



HERMOGENES:  Why, how is that?



SOCRATES:  I will tell you my own opinion; but first, I should like to ask

you which chain does any animal feel to be the stronger? and which confines

him more to the same spot,--desire or necessity?



HERMOGENES:  Desire, Socrates, is stronger far.



SOCRATES:  And do you not think that many a one would escape from Hades, if

he did not bind those who depart to him by the strongest of chains?



HERMOGENES:  Assuredly they would.



SOCRATES:  And if by the greatest of chains, then by some desire, as I

should certainly infer, and not by necessity?



HERMOGENES:  That is clear.



SOCRATES:  And there are many desires?



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And therefore by the greatest desire, if the chain is to be the

greatest?



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And is any desire stronger than the thought that you will be

made better by associating with another?



HERMOGENES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  And is not that the reason, Hermogenes, why no one, who has been

to him, is willing to come back to us?  Even the Sirens, like all the rest

of the world, have been laid under his spells.  Such a charm, as I imagine,

is the God able to infuse into his words.  And, according to this view, he

is the perfect and accomplished Sophist, and the great benefactor of the

inhabitants of the other world; and even to us who are upon earth he sends

from below exceeding blessings.  For he has much more than he wants down

there; wherefore he is called Pluto (or the rich).  Note also, that he will

have nothing to do with men while they are in the body, but only when the

soul is liberated from the desires and evils of the body.  Now there is a

great deal of philosophy and reflection in that; for in their liberated

state he can bind them with the desire of virtue, but while they are

flustered and maddened by the body, not even father Cronos himself would

suffice to keep them with him in his own far-famed chains.



HERMOGENES:  There is a deal of truth in what you say.



SOCRATES:  Yes, Hermogenes, and the legislator called him Hades, not from

the unseen (aeides)--far otherwise, but from his knowledge (eidenai) of all

noble things.



HERMOGENES:  Very good; and what do we say of Demeter, and Here, and

Apollo, and Athene, and Hephaestus, and Ares, and the other deities?



SOCRATES:  Demeter is e didousa meter, who gives food like a mother; Here

is the lovely one (erate)--for Zeus, according to tradition, loved and

married her; possibly also the name may have been given when the legislator

was thinking of the heavens, and may be only a disguise of the air (aer),

putting the end in the place of the beginning.  You will recognize the

truth of this if you repeat the letters of Here several times over.  People

dread the name of Pherephatta as they dread the name of Apollo,--and with

as little reason; the fear, if I am not mistaken, only arises from their

ignorance of the nature of names.  But they go changing the name into

Phersephone, and they are terrified at this; whereas the new name means

only that the Goddess is wise (sophe); for seeing that all things in the

world are in motion (pheromenon), that principle which embraces and touches

and is able to follow them, is wisdom.  And therefore the Goddess may be

truly called Pherepaphe (Pherepapha), or some name like it, because she

touches that which is in motion (tou pheromenon ephaptomene), herein

showing her wisdom.  And Hades, who is wise, consorts with her, because she

is wise.  They alter her name into Pherephatta now-a-days, because the

present generation care for euphony more than truth.  There is the other

name, Apollo, which, as I was saying, is generally supposed to have some

terrible signification.  Have you remarked this fact?



HERMOGENES:  To be sure I have, and what you say is true.



SOCRATES:  But the name, in my opinion, is really most expressive of the

power of the God.



HERMOGENES:  How so?



SOCRATES:  I will endeavour to explain, for I do not believe that any

single name could have been better adapted to express the attributes of the

God, embracing and in a manner signifying all four of them,--music, and

prophecy, and medicine, and archery.



HERMOGENES:  That must be a strange name, and I should like to hear the

explanation.



SOCRATES:  Say rather an harmonious name, as beseems the God of Harmony. 

In the first place, the purgations and purifications which doctors and

diviners use, and their fumigations with drugs magical or medicinal, as

well as their washings and lustral sprinklings, have all one and the same

object, which is to make a man pure both in body and soul.



HERMOGENES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  And is not Apollo the purifier, and the washer, and the absolver

from all impurities?



HERMOGENES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  Then in reference to his ablutions and absolutions, as being the

physician who orders them, he may be rightly called Apolouon (purifier); or

in respect of his powers of divination, and his truth and sincerity, which

is the same as truth, he may be most fitly called Aplos, from aplous

(sincere), as in the Thessalian dialect, for all the Thessalians call him

Aplos; also he is aei Ballon (always shooting), because he is a master

archer who never misses; or again, the name may refer to his musical

attributes, and then, as in akolouthos, and akoitis, and in many other

words the alpha is supposed to mean 'together,' so the meaning of the name

Apollo will be 'moving together,' whether in the poles of heaven as they

are called, or in the harmony of song, which is termed concord, because he

moves all together by an harmonious power, as astronomers and musicians

ingeniously declare.  And he is the God who presides over harmony, and

makes all things move together, both among Gods and among men.  And as in

the words akolouthos and akoitis the alpha is substituted for an omicron,

so the name Apollon is equivalent to omopolon; only the second lambda is

added in order to avoid the ill-omened sound of destruction (apolon).  Now

the suspicion of this destructive power still haunts the minds of some who

do not consider the true value of the name, which, as I was saying just

now, has reference to all the powers of the God, who is the single one, the

everdarting, the purifier, the mover together (aplous, aei Ballon,

apolouon, omopolon).  The name of the Muses and of music would seem to be

derived from their making philosophical enquiries (mosthai); and Leto is

called by this name, because she is such a gentle Goddess, and so willing

(ethelemon) to grant our requests; or her name may be Letho, as she is

often called by strangers--they seem to imply by it her amiability, and her

smooth and easy-going way of behaving.  Artemis is named from her healthy

(artemes), well-ordered nature, and because of her love of virginity,

perhaps because she is a proficient in virtue (arete), and perhaps also as

hating intercourse of the sexes (ton aroton misesasa).  He who gave the

Goddess her name may have had any or all of these reasons.



HERMOGENES:  What is the meaning of Dionysus and Aphrodite?



SOCRATES:  Son of Hipponicus, you ask a solemn question; there is a serious

and also a facetious explanation of both these names; the serious

explanation is not to be had from me, but there is no objection to your

hearing the facetious one; for the Gods too love a joke.  Dionusos is

simply didous oinon (giver of wine), Didoinusos, as he might be called in

fun,--and oinos is properly oionous, because wine makes those who drink,

think (oiesthai) that they have a mind (noun) when they have none.  The

derivation of Aphrodite, born of the foam (aphros), may be fairly accepted

on the authority of Hesiod.



HERMOGENES:  Still there remains Athene, whom you, Socrates, as an

Athenian, will surely not forget; there are also Hephaestus and Ares.



SOCRATES:  I am not likely to forget them.



HERMOGENES:  No, indeed.



SOCRATES:  There is no difficulty in explaining the other appellation of

Athene.



HERMOGENES:  What other appellation?



SOCRATES:  We call her Pallas.



HERMOGENES:  To be sure.



SOCRATES:  And we cannot be wrong in supposing that this is derived from

armed dances.  For the elevation of oneself or anything else above the

earth, or by the use of the hands, we call shaking (pallein), or dancing.



HERMOGENES:  That is quite true.



SOCRATES:  Then that is the explanation of the name Pallas?



HERMOGENES:  Yes; but what do you say of the other name?



SOCRATES:  Athene?



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  That is a graver matter, and there, my friend, the modern

interpreters of Homer may, I think, assist in explaining the view of the

ancients.  For most of these in their explanations of the poet, assert that

he meant by Athene 'mind' (nous) and 'intelligence' (dianoia), and the

maker of names appears to have had a singular notion about her; and indeed

calls her by a still higher title, 'divine intelligence' (Thou noesis), as

though he would say:  This is she who has the mind of God (Theonoa);--using

alpha as a dialectical variety for eta, and taking away iota and sigma

(There seems to be some error in the MSS.  The meaning is that the word

theonoa = theounoa is a curtailed form of theou noesis, but the omitted

letters do not agree.).  Perhaps, however, the name Theonoe may mean 'she

who knows divine things' (Theia noousa) better than others.  Nor shall we

be far wrong in supposing that the author of it wished to identify this

Goddess with moral intelligence (en ethei noesin), and therefore gave her

the name ethonoe; which, however, either he or his successors have altered

into what they thought a nicer form, and called her Athene.



HERMOGENES:  But what do you say of Hephaestus?



SOCRATES:  Speak you of the princely lord of light (Phaeos istora)?



HERMOGENES:  Surely.



SOCRATES:  Ephaistos is Phaistos, and has added the eta by attraction; that

is obvious to anybody.



HERMOGENES:  That is very probable, until some more probable notion gets

into your head.



SOCRATES:  To prevent that, you had better ask what is the derivation of

Ares.



HERMOGENES:  What is Ares?



SOCRATES:  Ares may be called, if you will, from his manhood (arren) and

manliness, or if you please, from his hard and unchangeable nature, which

is the meaning of arratos:  the latter is a derivation in every way

appropriate to the God of war.



HERMOGENES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  And now, by the Gods, let us have no more of the Gods, for I am

afraid of them; ask about anything but them, and thou shalt see how the

steeds of Euthyphro can prance.



HERMOGENES:  Only one more God!  I should like to know about Hermes, of

whom I am said not to be a true son.  Let us make him out, and then I shall

know whether there is any meaning in what Cratylus says.



SOCRATES:  I should imagine that the name Hermes has to do with speech, and

signifies that he is the interpreter (ermeneus), or messenger, or thief, or

liar, or bargainer; all that sort of thing has a great deal to do with

language; as I was telling you, the word eirein is expressive of the use of

speech, and there is an often-recurring Homeric word emesato, which means

'he contrived'--out of these two words, eirein and mesasthai, the

legislator formed the name of the God who invented language and speech; and

we may imagine him dictating to us the use of this name:  'O my friends,'

says he to us, 'seeing that he is the contriver of tales or speeches, you

may rightly call him Eirhemes.'  And this has been improved by us, as we

think, into Hermes.  Iris also appears to have been called from the verb

'to tell' (eirein), because she was a messenger.



HERMOGENES:  Then I am very sure that Cratylus was quite right in saying

that I was no true son of Hermes (Ermogenes), for I am not a good hand at

speeches.



SOCRATES:  There is also reason, my friend, in Pan being the double-formed

son of Hermes.



HERMOGENES:  How do you make that out?



SOCRATES:  You are aware that speech signifies all things (pan), and is

always turning them round and round, and has two forms, true and false?



HERMOGENES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  Is not the truth that is in him the smooth or sacred form which

dwells above among the Gods, whereas falsehood dwells among men below, and

is rough like the goat of tragedy; for tales and falsehoods have generally

to do with the tragic or goatish life, and tragedy is the place of them?



HERMOGENES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  Then surely Pan, who is the declarer of all things (pan) and the

perpetual mover (aei polon) of all things, is rightly called aipolos (goat-

herd), he being the two-formed son of Hermes, smooth in his upper part, and

rough and goatlike in his lower regions.  And, as the son of Hermes, he is

speech or the brother of speech, and that brother should be like brother is

no marvel.  But, as I was saying, my dear Hermogenes, let us get away from

the Gods.



HERMOGENES:  From these sort of Gods, by all means, Socrates.  But why

should we not discuss another kind of Gods--the sun, moon, stars, earth,

aether, air, fire, water, the seasons, and the year?



SOCRATES:  You impose a great many tasks upon me.  Still, if you wish, I

will not refuse.



HERMOGENES:  You will oblige me.



SOCRATES:  How would you have me begin?  Shall I take first of all him whom

you mentioned first--the sun?



HERMOGENES:  Very good.



SOCRATES:  The origin of the sun will probably be clearer in the Doric

form, for the Dorians call him alios, and this name is given to him because

when he rises he gathers (alizoi) men together or because he is always

rolling in his course (aei eilein ion) about the earth; or from aiolein, of

which the meaning is the same as poikillein (to variegate), because he

variegates the productions of the earth.



HERMOGENES:  But what is selene (the moon)?



SOCRATES:  That name is rather unfortunate for Anaxagoras.



HERMOGENES:  How so?



SOCRATES:  The word seems to forestall his recent discovery, that the moon

receives her light from the sun.



HERMOGENES:  Why do you say so?



SOCRATES:  The two words selas (brightness) and phos (light) have much the

same meaning?



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  This light about the moon is always new (neon) and always old

(enon), if the disciples of Anaxagoras say truly.  For the sun in his

revolution always adds new light, and there is the old light of the

previous month.



HERMOGENES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  The moon is not unfrequently called selanaia.



HERMOGENES:  True.



SOCRATES:  And as she has a light which is always old and always new (enon

neon aei) she may very properly have the name selaenoneoaeia; and this when

hammered into shape becomes selanaia.



HERMOGENES:  A real dithyrambic sort of name that, Socrates.  But what do

you say of the month and the stars?



SOCRATES:  Meis (month) is called from meiousthai (to lessen), because

suffering diminution; the name of astra (stars) seems to be derived from

astrape, which is an improvement on anastrope, signifying the upsetting of

the eyes (anastrephein opa).



HERMOGENES:  What do you say of pur (fire) and udor (water)?



SOCRATES:  I am at a loss how to explain pur; either the muse of Euthyphro

has deserted me, or there is some very great difficulty in the word. 

Please, however, to note the contrivance which I adopt whenever I am in a

difficulty of this sort.



HERMOGENES:  What is it?



SOCRATES:  I will tell you; but I should like to know first whether you can

tell me what is the meaning of the pur?



HERMOGENES:  Indeed I cannot.



SOCRATES:  Shall I tell you what I suspect to be the true explanation of

this and several other words?--My belief is that they are of foreign

origin.  For the Hellenes, especially those who were under the dominion of

the barbarians, often borrowed from them.



HERMOGENES:  What is the inference?



SOCRATES:  Why, you know that any one who seeks to demonstrate the fitness

of these names according to the Hellenic language, and not according to the

language from which the words are derived, is rather likely to be at fault.



HERMOGENES:  Yes, certainly.



SOCRATES:  Well then, consider whether this pur is not foreign; for the

word is not easily brought into relation with the Hellenic tongue, and the

Phrygians may be observed to have the same word slightly changed, just as

they have udor (water) and kunes (dogs), and many other words.



HERMOGENES:  That is true.



SOCRATES:  Any violent interpretations of the words should be avoided; for

something to say about them may easily be found.  And thus I get rid of pur

and udor.  Aer (air), Hermogenes, may be explained as the element which

raises (airei) things from the earth, or as ever flowing (aei rei), or

because the flux of the air is wind, and the poets call the winds 'air-

blasts,' (aetai); he who uses the term may mean, so to speak, air-flux

(aetorroun), in the sense of wind-flux (pneumatorroun); and because this

moving wind may be expressed by either term he employs the word air (aer =

aetes rheo).  Aither (aether) I should interpret as aeitheer; this may be

correctly said, because this element is always running in a flux about the

air (aei thei peri tou aera reon).  The meaning of the word ge (earth)

comes out better when in the form of gaia, for the earth may be truly

called 'mother' (gaia, genneteira), as in the language of Homer (Od.)

gegaasi means gegennesthai.



HERMOGENES:  Good.



SOCRATES:  What shall we take next?



HERMOGENES:  There are orai (the seasons), and the two names of the year,

eniautos and etos.



SOCRATES:  The orai should be spelt in the old Attic way, if you desire to

know the probable truth about them; they are rightly called the orai

because they divide (orizousin) the summers and winters and winds and the

fruits of the earth.  The words eniautos and etos appear to be the same,--

'that which brings to light the plants and growths of the earth in their

turn, and passes them in review within itself (en eauto exetazei)':  this

is broken up into two words, eniautos from en eauto, and etos from etazei,

just as the original name of Zeus was divided into Zena and Dia; and the

whole proposition means that his power of reviewing from within is one, but

has two names, two words etos and eniautos being thus formed out of a

single proposition.



HERMOGENES:  Indeed, Socrates, you make surprising progress.



SOCRATES:  I am run away with.



HERMOGENES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  But am not yet at my utmost speed.



HERMOGENES:  I should like very much to know, in the next place, how you

would explain the virtues.  What principle of correctness is there in those

charming words--wisdom, understanding, justice, and the rest of them?



SOCRATES:  That is a tremendous class of names which you are disinterring;

still, as I have put on the lion's skin, I must not be faint of heart; and

I suppose that I must consider the meaning of wisdom (phronesis) and

understanding (sunesis), and judgment (gnome), and knowledge (episteme),

and all those other charming words, as you call them?



HERMOGENES:  Surely, we must not leave off until we find out their meaning.



SOCRATES:  By the dog of Egypt I have a not bad notion which came into my

head only this moment:  I believe that the primeval givers of names were

undoubtedly like too many of our modern philosophers, who, in their search

after the nature of things, are always getting dizzy from constantly going

round and round, and then they imagine that the world is going round and

round and moving in all directions; and this appearance, which arises out

of their own internal condition, they suppose to be a reality of nature;

they think that there is nothing stable or permanent, but only flux and

motion, and that the world is always full of every sort of motion and

change.  The consideration of the names which I mentioned has led me into

making this reflection.



HERMOGENES:  How is that, Socrates?



SOCRATES:  Perhaps you did not observe that in the names which have been

just cited, the motion or flux or generation of things is most surely

indicated.



HERMOGENES:  No, indeed, I never thought of it.



SOCRATES:  Take the first of those which you mentioned; clearly that is a

name indicative of motion.



HERMOGENES:  What was the name?



SOCRATES:  Phronesis (wisdom), which may signify phoras kai rhou noesis

(perception of motion and flux), or perhaps phoras onesis (the blessing of

motion), but is at any rate connected with pheresthai (motion); gnome

(judgment), again, certainly implies the ponderation or consideration

(nomesis) of generation, for to ponder is the same as to consider; or, if

you would rather, here is noesis, the very word just now mentioned, which

is neou esis (the desire of the new); the word neos implies that the world

is always in process of creation.  The giver of the name wanted to express

this longing of the soul, for the original name was neoesis, and not

noesis; but eta took the place of a double epsilon.  The word sophrosune is

the salvation (soteria) of that wisdom (phronesis) which we were just now

considering.  Epioteme (knowledge) is akin to this, and indicates that the

soul which is good for anything follows (epetai) the motion of things,

neither anticipating them nor falling behind them; wherefore the word

should rather be read as epistemene, inserting epsilon nu.  Sunesis

(understanding) may be regarded in like manner as a kind of conclusion; the

word is derived from sunienai (to go along with), and, like epistasthai (to

know), implies the progression of the soul in company with the nature of

things.  Sophia (wisdom) is very dark, and appears not to be of native

growth; the meaning is, touching the motion or stream of things.  You must

remember that the poets, when they speak of the commencement of any rapid

motion, often use the word esuthe (he rushed); and there was a famous

Lacedaemonian who was named Sous (Rush), for by this word the

Lacedaemonians signify rapid motion, and the touching (epaphe) of motion is

expressed by sophia, for all things are supposed to be in motion.  Good

(agathon) is the name which is given to the admirable (agasto) in nature;

for, although all things move, still there are degrees of motion; some are

swifter, some slower; but there are some things which are admirable for

their swiftness, and this admirable part of nature is called agathon. 

Dikaiosune (justice) is clearly dikaiou sunesis (understanding of the

just); but the actual word dikaion is more difficult:  men are only agreed

to a certain extent about justice, and then they begin to disagree.  For

those who suppose all things to be in motion conceive the greater part of

nature to be a mere receptacle; and they say that there is a penetrating

power which passes through all this, and is the instrument of creation in

all, and is the subtlest and swiftest element; for if it were not the

subtlest, and a power which none can keep out, and also the swiftest,

passing by other things as if they were standing still, it could not

penetrate through the moving universe.  And this element, which

superintends all things and pierces (diaion) all, is rightly called

dikaion; the letter k is only added for the sake of euphony.  Thus far, as

I was saying, there is a general agreement about the nature of justice; but

I, Hermogenes, being an enthusiastic disciple, have been told in a mystery

that the justice of which I am speaking is also the cause of the world: 

now a cause is that because of which anything is created; and some one

comes and whispers in my ear that justice is rightly so called because

partaking of the nature of the cause, and I begin, after hearing what he

has said, to interrogate him gently:  'Well, my excellent friend,' say I,

'but if all this be true, I still want to know what is justice.'  Thereupon

they think that I ask tiresome questions, and am leaping over the barriers,

and have been already sufficiently answered, and they try to satisfy me

with one derivation after another, and at length they quarrel.  For one of

them says that justice is the sun, and that he only is the piercing

(diaionta) and burning (kaonta) element which is the guardian of nature. 

And when I joyfully repeat this beautiful notion, I am answered by the

satirical remark, 'What, is there no justice in the world when the sun is

down?'  And when I earnestly beg my questioner to tell me his own honest

opinion, he says, 'Fire in the abstract'; but this is not very

intelligible.  Another says, 'No, not fire in the abstract, but the

abstraction of heat in the fire.'  Another man professes to laugh at all

this, and says, as Anaxagoras says, that justice is mind, for mind, as they

say, has absolute power, and mixes with nothing, and orders all things, and

passes through all things.  At last, my friend, I find myself in far

greater perplexity about the nature of justice than I was before I began to

learn.  But still I am of opinion that the name, which has led me into this

digression, was given to justice for the reasons which I have mentioned.



HERMOGENES:  I think, Socrates, that you are not improvising now; you must

have heard this from some one else.



SOCRATES:  And not the rest?



HERMOGENES:  Hardly.



SOCRATES:  Well, then, let me go on in the hope of making you believe in

the originality of the rest.  What remains after justice?  I do not think

that we have as yet discussed courage (andreia),--injustice (adikia), which

is obviously nothing more than a hindrance to the penetrating principle

(diaiontos), need not be considered.  Well, then, the name of andreia seems

to imply a battle;--this battle is in the world of existence, and according

to the doctrine of flux is only the counterflux (enantia rhon):  if you

extract the delta from andreia, the name at once signifies the thing, and

you may clearly understand that andreia is not the stream opposed to every

stream, but only to that which is contrary to justice, for otherwise

courage would not have been praised.  The words arren (male) and aner (man)

also contain a similar allusion to the same principle of the upward flux

(te ano rhon).  Gune (woman) I suspect to be the same word as goun (birth): 

thelu (female) appears to be partly derived from thele (the teat), because

the teat is like rain, and makes things flourish (tethelenai).



HERMOGENES:  That is surely probable.



SOCRATES:  Yes; and the very word thallein (to flourish) seems to figure

the growth of youth, which is swift and sudden ever.  And this is expressed

by the legislator in the name, which is a compound of thein (running), and

allesthai (leaping).  Pray observe how I gallop away when I get on smooth

ground.  There are a good many names generally thought to be of importance,

which have still to be explained.



HERMOGENES:  True.



SOCRATES:  There is the meaning of the word techne (art), for example.



HERMOGENES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  That may be identified with echonoe, and expresses the

possession of mind:  you have only to take away the tau and insert two

omichrons, one between the chi and nu, and another between the nu and eta.



HERMOGENES:  That is a very shabby etymology.



SOCRATES:  Yes, my dear friend; but then you know that the original names

have been long ago buried and disguised by people sticking on and stripping

off letters for the sake of euphony, and twisting and bedizening them in

all sorts of ways:  and time too may have had a share in the change.  Take,

for example, the word katoptron; why is the letter rho inserted?  This must

surely be the addition of some one who cares nothing about the truth, but

thinks only of putting the mouth into shape.  And the additions are often

such that at last no human being can possibly make out the original meaning

of the word.  Another example is the word sphigx, sphiggos, which ought

properly to be phigx, phiggos, and there are other examples.



HERMOGENES:  That is quite true, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  And yet, if you are permitted to put in and pull out any letters

which you please, names will be too easily made, and any name may be

adapted to any object.



HERMOGENES:  True.



SOCRATES:  Yes, that is true.  And therefore a wise dictator, like

yourself, should observe the laws of moderation and probability.



HERMOGENES:  Such is my desire.



SOCRATES:  And mine, too, Hermogenes.  But do not be too much of a

precisian, or 'you will unnerve me of my strength (Iliad.).'  When you have

allowed me to add mechane (contrivance) to techne (art) I shall be at the

top of my bent, for I conceive mechane to be a sign of great accomplishment

--anein; for mekos has the meaning of greatness, and these two, mekos and

anein, make up the word mechane.  But, as I was saying, being now at the

top of my bent, I should like to consider the meaning of the two words

arete (virtue) and kakia (vice); arete I do not as yet understand, but

kakia is transparent, and agrees with the principles which preceded, for

all things being in a flux (ionton), kakia is kakos ion (going badly); and

this evil motion when existing in the soul has the general name of kakia,

or vice, specially appropriated to it.  The meaning of kakos ienai may be

further illustrated by the use of deilia (cowardice), which ought to have

come after andreia, but was forgotten, and, as I fear, is not the only word

which has been passed over.  Deilia signifies that the soul is bound with a

strong chain (desmos), for lian means strength, and therefore deilia

expresses the greatest and strongest bond of the soul; and aporia

(difficulty) is an evil of the same nature (from a (alpha) not, and

poreuesthai to go), like anything else which is an impediment to motion and

movement.  Then the word kakia appears to mean kakos ienai, or going badly,

or limping and halting; of which the consequence is, that the soul becomes

filled with vice.  And if kakia is the name of this sort of thing, arete

will be the opposite of it, signifying in the first place ease of motion,


then that the stream of the good soul is unimpeded, and has therefore the

attribute of ever flowing without let or hindrance, and is therefore called

arete, or, more correctly, aeireite (ever-flowing), and may perhaps have

had another form, airete (eligible), indicating that nothing is more

eligible than virtue, and this has been hammered into arete.  I daresay

that you will deem this to be another invention of mine, but I think that

if the previous word kakia was right, then arete is also right.



HERMOGENES:  But what is the meaning of kakon, which has played so great a

part in your previous discourse?



SOCRATES:  That is a very singular word about which I can hardly form an

opinion, and therefore I must have recourse to my ingenious device.



HERMOGENES:  What device?



SOCRATES:  The device of a foreign origin, which I shall give to this word

also.



HERMOGENES:  Very likely you are right; but suppose that we leave these

words and endeavour to see the rationale of kalon and aischron.



SOCRATES:  The meaning of aischron is evident, being only aei ischon roes

(always preventing from flowing), and this is in accordance with our former

derivations.  For the name-giver was a great enemy to stagnation of all

sorts, and hence he gave the name aeischoroun to that which hindered the

flux (aei ischon roun), and that is now beaten together into aischron.



HERMOGENES:  But what do you say of kalon?



SOCRATES:  That is more obscure; yet the form is only due to the quantity,

and has been changed by altering omicron upsilon into omicron.



HERMOGENES:  What do you mean?



SOCRATES:  This name appears to denote mind.



HERMOGENES:  How so?



SOCRATES:  Let me ask you what is the cause why anything has a name; is not

the principle which imposes the name the cause?



HERMOGENES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And must not this be the mind of Gods, or of men, or of both?



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Is not mind that which called (kalesan) things by their names,

and is not mind the beautiful (kalon)?



HERMOGENES:  That is evident.



SOCRATES:  And are not the works of intelligence and mind worthy of praise,

and are not other works worthy of blame?



HERMOGENES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  Physic does the work of a physician, and carpentering does the

works of a carpenter?



HERMOGENES:  Exactly.



SOCRATES:  And the principle of beauty does the works of beauty?



HERMOGENES:  Of course.



SOCRATES:  And that principle we affirm to be mind?



HERMOGENES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  Then mind is rightly called beauty because she does the works

which we recognize and speak of as the beautiful?



HERMOGENES:  That is evident.



SOCRATES:  What more names remain to us?



HERMOGENES:  There are the words which are connected with agathon and

kalon, such as sumpheron and lusiteloun, ophelimon, kerdaleon, and their

opposites.



SOCRATES:  The meaning of sumpheron (expedient) I think that you may

discover for yourself by the light of the previous examples,--for it is a

sister word to episteme, meaning just the motion (pora) of the soul

accompanying the world, and things which are done upon this principle are

called sumphora or sumpheronta, because they are carried round with the

world.



HERMOGENES:  That is probable.



SOCRATES:  Again, cherdaleon (gainful) is called from cherdos (gain), but

you must alter the delta into nu if you want to get at the meaning; for

this word also signifies good, but in another way; he who gave the name

intended to express the power of admixture (kerannumenon) and universal

penetration in the good; in forming the word, however, he inserted a delta

instead of a nu, and so made kerdos.



HERMOGENES:  Well, but what is lusiteloun (profitable)?



SOCRATES:  I suppose, Hermogenes, that people do not mean by the profitable

the gainful or that which pays (luei) the retailer, but they use the word

in the sense of swift.  You regard the profitable (lusiteloun), as that

which being the swiftest thing in existence, allows of no stay in things

and no pause or end of motion, but always, if there begins to be any end,

lets things go again (luei), and makes motion immortal and unceasing:  and

in this point of view, as appears to me, the good is happily denominated

lusiteloun--being that which looses (luon) the end (telos) of motion. 

Ophelimon (the advantageous) is derived from ophellein, meaning that which

creates and increases; this latter is a common Homeric word, and has a

foreign character.



HERMOGENES:  And what do you say of their opposites?



SOCRATES:  Of such as are mere negatives I hardly think that I need speak.



HERMOGENES:  Which are they?



SOCRATES:  The words axumphoron (inexpedient), anopheles (unprofitable),

alusiteles (unadvantageous), akerdes (ungainful).



HERMOGENES:  True.



SOCRATES:  I would rather take the words blaberon (harmful), zemiodes

(hurtful).



HERMOGENES:  Good.



SOCRATES:  The word blaberon is that which is said to hinder or harm

(blaptein) the stream (roun); blapton is boulomenon aptein (seeking to hold

or bind); for aptein is the same as dein, and dein is always a term of

censure; boulomenon aptein roun (wanting to bind the stream) would properly

be boulapteroun, and this, as I imagine, is improved into blaberon.



HERMOGENES:  You bring out curious results, Socrates, in the use of names;

and when I hear the word boulapteroun I cannot help imagining that you are

making your mouth into a flute, and puffing away at some prelude to Athene.



SOCRATES:  That is the fault of the makers of the name, Hermogenes; not

mine.



HERMOGENES:  Very true; but what is the derivation of zemiodes?



SOCRATES:  What is the meaning of zemiodes?--let me remark, Hermogenes, how

right I was in saying that great changes are made in the meaning of words

by putting in and pulling out letters; even a very slight permutation will

sometimes give an entirely opposite sense; I may instance the word deon,

which occurs to me at the moment, and reminds me of what I was going to say

to you, that the fine fashionable language of modern times has twisted and

disguised and entirely altered the original meaning both of deon, and also

of zemiodes, which in the old language is clearly indicated.



HERMOGENES:  What do you mean?



SOCRATES:  I will try to explain.  You are aware that our forefathers loved

the sounds iota and delta, especially the women, who are most conservative

of the ancient language, but now they change iota into eta or epsilon, and

delta into zeta; this is supposed to increase the grandeur of the sound.



HERMOGENES:  How do you mean?



SOCRATES:  For example, in very ancient times they called the day either

imera or emera (short e), which is called by us emera (long e).



HERMOGENES:  That is true.



SOCRATES:  Do you observe that only the ancient form shows the intention of

the giver of the name? of which the reason is, that men long for

(imeirousi) and love the light which comes after the darkness, and is

therefore called imera, from imeros, desire.



HERMOGENES:  Clearly.



SOCRATES:  But now the name is so travestied that you cannot tell the

meaning, although there are some who imagine the day to be called emera

because it makes things gentle (emera different accents).



HERMOGENES:  Such is my view.



SOCRATES:  And do you know that the ancients said duogon and not zugon?



HERMOGENES:  They did so.



SOCRATES:  And zugon (yoke) has no meaning,--it ought to be duogon, which

word expresses the binding of two together (duein agoge) for the purpose of

drawing;--this has been changed into zugon, and there are many other

examples of similar changes.



HERMOGENES:  There are.



SOCRATES:  Proceeding in the same train of thought I may remark that the

word deon (obligation) has a meaning which is the opposite of all the other

appellations of good; for deon is here a species of good, and is,

nevertheless, the chain (desmos) or hinderer of motion, and therefore own

brother of blaberon.



HERMOGENES:  Yes, Socrates; that is quite plain.



SOCRATES:  Not if you restore the ancient form, which is more likely to be

the correct one, and read dion instead of deon; if you convert the epsilon

into an iota after the old fashion, this word will then agree with other

words meaning good; for dion, not deon, signifies the good, and is a term

of praise; and the author of names has not contradicted himself, but in all

these various appellations, deon (obligatory), ophelimon (advantageous),

lusiteloun (profitable), kerdaleon (gainful), agathon (good), sumpheron

(expedient), euporon (plenteous), the same conception is implied of the

ordering or all-pervading principle which is praised, and the restraining

and binding principle which is censured.  And this is further illustrated

by the word zemiodes (hurtful), which if the zeta is only changed into

delta as in the ancient language, becomes demiodes; and this name, as you

will perceive, is given to that which binds motion (dounti ion).



HERMOGENES:  What do you say of edone (pleasure), lupe (pain), epithumia

(desire), and the like, Socrates?



SOCRATES:  I do not think, Hermogenes, that there is any great difficulty

about them--edone is e (eta) onesis, the action which tends to advantage;

and the original form may be supposed to have been eone, but this has been

altered by the insertion of the delta.  Lupe appears to be derived from the

relaxation (luein) which the body feels when in sorrow; ania (trouble) is

the hindrance of motion (alpha and ienai); algedon (distress), if I am not

mistaken, is a foreign word, which is derived from aleinos (grievous);

odune (grief) is called from the putting on (endusis) sorrow; in achthedon

(vexation) 'the word too labours,' as any one may see; chara (joy) is the

very expression of the fluency and diffusion of the soul (cheo); terpsis

(delight) is so called from the pleasure creeping (erpon) through the soul,

which may be likened to a breath (pnoe) and is properly erpnoun, but has

been altered by time into terpnon; eupherosune (cheerfulness) and epithumia

explain themselves; the former, which ought to be eupherosune and has been

changed euphrosune, is named, as every one may see, from the soul moving

(pheresthai) in harmony with nature; epithumia is really e epi ton thumon

iousa dunamis, the power which enters into the soul; thumos (passion) is

called from the rushing (thuseos) and boiling of the soul; imeros (desire)

denotes the stream (rous) which most draws the soul dia ten esin tes roes--

because flowing with desire (iemenos), and expresses a longing after things

and violent attraction of the soul to them, and is termed imeros from

possessing this power; pothos (longing) is expressive of the desire of that

which is not present but absent, and in another place (pou); this is the

reason why the name pothos is applied to things absent, as imeros is to

things present; eros (love) is so called because flowing in (esron) from

without; the stream is not inherent, but is an influence introduced through

the eyes, and from flowing in was called esros (influx) in the old time

when they used omicron for omega, and is called eros, now that omega is

substituted for omicron.  But why do you not give me another word?



HERMOGENES:  What do you think of doxa (opinion), and that class of words?



SOCRATES:  Doxa is either derived from dioxis (pursuit), and expresses the

march of the soul in the pursuit of knowledge, or from the shooting of a

bow (toxon); the latter is more likely, and is confirmed by oiesis

(thinking), which is only oisis (moving), and implies the movement of the

soul to the essential nature of each thing--just as boule (counsel) has to

do with shooting (bole); and boulesthai (to wish) combines the notion of

aiming and deliberating--all these words seem to follow doxa, and all

involve the idea of shooting, just as aboulia, absence of counsel, on the

other hand, is a mishap, or missing, or mistaking of the mark, or aim, or

proposal, or object.



HERMOGENES:  You are quickening your pace now, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  Why yes, the end I now dedicate to God, not, however, until I

have explained anagke (necessity), which ought to come next, and ekousion

(the voluntary).  Ekousion is certainly the yielding (eikon) and

unresisting--the notion implied is yielding and not opposing, yielding, as

I was just now saying, to that motion which is in accordance with our will;

but the necessary and resistant being contrary to our will, implies error

and ignorance; the idea is taken from walking through a ravine which is

impassable, and rugged, and overgrown, and impedes motion--and this is the

derivation of the word anagkaion (necessary) an agke ion, going through a

ravine.  But while my strength lasts let us persevere, and I hope that you

will persevere with your questions.



HERMOGENES:  Well, then, let me ask about the greatest and noblest, such as

aletheia (truth) and pseudos (falsehood) and on (being), not forgetting to

enquire why the word onoma (name), which is the theme of our discussion,

has this name of onoma.



SOCRATES:  You know the word maiesthai (to seek)?



HERMOGENES:  Yes;--meaning the same as zetein (to enquire).



SOCRATES:  The word onoma seems to be a compressed sentence, signifying on

ou zetema (being for which there is a search); as is still more obvious in

onomaston (notable), which states in so many words that real existence is

that for which there is a seeking (on ou masma); aletheia is also an

agglomeration of theia ale (divine wandering), implying the divine motion

of existence; pseudos (falsehood) is the opposite of motion; here is

another ill name given by the legislator to stagnation and forced inaction,

which he compares to sleep (eudein); but the original meaning of the word

is disguised by the addition of psi; on and ousia are ion with an iota

broken off; this agrees with the true principle, for being (on) is also

moving (ion), and the same may be said of not being, which is likewise

called not going (oukion or ouki on = ouk ion).



HERMOGENES:  You have hammered away at them manfully; but suppose that some

one were to say to you, what is the word ion, and what are reon and doun?--

show me their fitness.



SOCRATES:  You mean to say, how should I answer him?



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  One way of giving the appearance of an answer has been already

suggested.



HERMOGENES:  What way?



SOCRATES:  To say that names which we do not understand are of foreign

origin; and this is very likely the right answer, and something of this

kind may be true of them; but also the original forms of words may have

been lost in the lapse of ages; names have been so twisted in all manner of

ways, that I should not be surprised if the old language when compared with

that now in use would appear to us to be a barbarous tongue.



HERMOGENES:  Very likely.



SOCRATES:  Yes, very likely.  But still the enquiry demands our earnest

attention and we must not flinch.  For we should remember, that if a person

go on analysing names into words, and enquiring also into the elements out

of which the words are formed, and keeps on always repeating this process,

he who has to answer him must at last give up the enquiry in despair.



HERMOGENES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  And at what point ought he to lose heart and give up the


enquiry?  Must he not stop when he comes to the names which are the

elements of all other names and sentences; for these cannot be supposed to

be made up of other names?  The word agathon (good), for example, is, as we

were saying, a compound of agastos (admirable) and thoos (swift).  And

probably thoos is made up of other elements, and these again of others. 

But if we take a word which is incapable of further resolution, then we

shall be right in saying that we have at last reached a primary element,

which need not be resolved any further.



HERMOGENES:  I believe you to be in the right.



SOCRATES:  And suppose the names about which you are now asking should turn

out to be primary elements, must not their truth or law be examined

according to some new method?



HERMOGENES:  Very likely.



SOCRATES:  Quite so, Hermogenes; all that has preceded would lead to this

conclusion.  And if, as I think, the conclusion is true, then I shall again

say to you, come and help me, that I may not fall into some absurdity in

stating the principle of primary names.



HERMOGENES:  Let me hear, and I will do my best to assist you.



SOCRATES:  I think that you will acknowledge with me, that one principle is

applicable to all names, primary as well as secondary--when they are

regarded simply as names, there is no difference in them.



HERMOGENES:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  All the names that we have been explaining were intended to

indicate the nature of things.



HERMOGENES:  Of course.



SOCRATES:  And that this is true of the primary quite as much as of the

secondary names, is implied in their being names.



HERMOGENES:  Surely.



SOCRATES:  But the secondary, as I conceive, derive their significance from

the primary.



HERMOGENES:  That is evident.



SOCRATES:  Very good; but then how do the primary names which precede

analysis show the natures of things, as far as they can be shown; which

they must do, if they are to be real names?  And here I will ask you a

question:  Suppose that we had no voice or tongue, and wanted to

communicate with one another, should we not, like the deaf and dumb, make

signs with the hands and head and the rest of the body?



HERMOGENES:  There would be no choice, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  We should imitate the nature of the thing; the elevation of our

hands to heaven would mean lightness and upwardness; heaviness and

downwardness would be expressed by letting them drop to the ground; if we

were describing the running of a horse, or any other animal, we should make

our bodies and their gestures as like as we could to them.



HERMOGENES:  I do not see that we could do anything else.



SOCRATES:  We could not; for by bodily imitation only can the body ever

express anything.



HERMOGENES:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  And when we want to express ourselves, either with the voice, or

tongue, or mouth, the expression is simply their imitation of that which we

want to express.



HERMOGENES:  It must be so, I think.



SOCRATES:  Then a name is a vocal imitation of that which the vocal

imitator names or imitates?



HERMOGENES:  I think so.



SOCRATES:  Nay, my friend, I am disposed to think that we have not reached

the truth as yet.



HERMOGENES:  Why not?



SOCRATES:  Because if we have we shall be obliged to admit that the people

who imitate sheep, or cocks, or other animals, name that which they

imitate.



HERMOGENES:  Quite true.



SOCRATES:  Then could I have been right in what I was saying?



HERMOGENES:  In my opinion, no.  But I wish that you would tell me,

Socrates, what sort of an imitation is a name?



SOCRATES:  In the first place, I should reply, not a musical imitation,

although that is also vocal; nor, again, an imitation of what music

imitates; these, in my judgment, would not be naming.  Let me put the

matter as follows:  All objects have sound and figure, and many have

colour?



HERMOGENES:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  But the art of naming appears not to be concerned with

imitations of this kind; the arts which have to do with them are music and

drawing?



HERMOGENES:  True.



SOCRATES:  Again, is there not an essence of each thing, just as there is a

colour, or sound?  And is there not an essence of colour and sound as well

as of anything else which may be said to have an essence?



HERMOGENES:  I should think so.



SOCRATES:  Well, and if any one could express the essence of each thing in

letters and syllables, would he not express the nature of each thing?



HERMOGENES:  Quite so.



SOCRATES:  The musician and the painter were the two names which you gave

to the two other imitators.  What will this imitator be called?



HERMOGENES:  I imagine, Socrates, that he must be the namer, or name-giver,

of whom we are in search.



SOCRATES:  If this is true, then I think that we are in a condition to

consider the names ron (stream), ienai (to go), schesis (retention), about

which you were asking; and we may see whether the namer has grasped the

nature of them in letters and syllables in such a manner as to imitate the

essence or not.



HERMOGENES:  Very good.



SOCRATES:  But are these the only primary names, or are there others?



HERMOGENES:  There must be others.



SOCRATES:  So I should expect.  But how shall we further analyse them, and

where does the imitator begin?  Imitation of the essence is made by

syllables and letters; ought we not, therefore, first to separate the

letters, just as those who are beginning rhythm first distinguish the

powers of elementary, and then of compound sounds, and when they have done

so, but not before, they proceed to the consideration of rhythms?



HERMOGENES:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Must we not begin in the same way with letters; first separating

the vowels, and then the consonants and mutes (letters which are neither

vowels nor semivowels), into classes, according to the received

distinctions of the learned; also the semivowels, which are neither vowels,

nor yet mutes; and distinguishing into classes the vowels themselves?  And

when we have perfected the classification of things, we shall give them

names, and see whether, as in the case of letters, there are any classes to

which they may be all referred (cf. Phaedrus); and hence we shall see their

natures, and see, too, whether they have in them classes as there are in

the letters; and when we have well considered all this, we shall know how

to apply them to what they resemble--whether one letter is used to denote

one thing, or whether there is to be an admixture of several of them; just,

as in painting, the painter who wants to depict anything sometimes uses

purple only, or any other colour, and sometimes mixes up several colours,

as his method is when he has to paint flesh colour or anything of that

kind--he uses his colours as his figures appear to require them; and so,

too, we shall apply letters to the expression of objects, either single

letters when required, or several letters; and so we shall form syllables,

as they are called, and from syllables make nouns and verbs; and thus, at

last, from the combinations of nouns and verbs arrive at language, large

and fair and whole; and as the painter made a figure, even so shall we make

speech by the art of the namer or the rhetorician, or by some other art. 

Not that I am literally speaking of ourselves, but I was carried away--

meaning to say that this was the way in which (not we but) the ancients

formed language, and what they put together we must take to pieces in like

manner, if we are to attain a scientific view of the whole subject, and we

must see whether the primary, and also whether the secondary elements are

rightly given or not, for if they are not, the composition of them, my dear

Hermogenes, will be a sorry piece of work, and in the wrong direction.



HERMOGENES:  That, Socrates, I can quite believe.



SOCRATES:  Well, but do you suppose that you will be able to analyse them

in this way? for I am certain that I should not.



HERMOGENES:  Much less am I likely to be able.



SOCRATES:  Shall we leave them, then? or shall we seek to discover, if we

can, something about them, according to the measure of our ability, saying

by way of preface, as I said before of the Gods, that of the truth about

them we know nothing, and do but entertain human notions of them.  And in

this present enquiry, let us say to ourselves, before we proceed, that the

higher method is the one which we or others who would analyse language to

any good purpose must follow; but under the circumstances, as men say, we

must do as well as we can.  What do you think?



HERMOGENES:  I very much approve.



SOCRATES:  That objects should be imitated in letters and syllables, and so

find expression, may appear ridiculous, Hermogenes, but it cannot be

avoided--there is no better principle to which we can look for the truth of

first names.  Deprived of this, we must have recourse to divine help, like

the tragic poets, who in any perplexity have their gods waiting in the air;

and must get out of our difficulty in like fashion, by saying that 'the

Gods gave the first names, and therefore they are right.'  This will be the

best contrivance, or perhaps that other notion may be even better still, of

deriving them from some barbarous people, for the barbarians are older than

we are; or we may say that antiquity has cast a veil over them, which is

the same sort of excuse as the last; for all these are not reasons but only

ingenious excuses for having no reasons concerning the truth of words.  And

yet any sort of ignorance of first or primitive names involves an ignorance

of secondary words; for they can only be explained by the primary.  Clearly

then the professor of languages should be able to give a very lucid

explanation of first names, or let him be assured he will only talk

nonsense about the rest.  Do you not suppose this to be true?



HERMOGENES:  Certainly, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  My first notions of original names are truly wild and

ridiculous, though I have no objection to impart them to you if you desire,

and I hope that you will communicate to me in return anything better which

you may have.



HERMOGENES:  Fear not; I will do my best.



SOCRATES:  In the first place, the letter rho appears to me to be the

general instrument expressing all motion (kinesis).  But I have not yet

explained the meaning of this latter word, which is just iesis (going); for

the letter eta was not in use among the ancients, who only employed

epsilon; and the root is kiein, which is a foreign form, the same as ienai. 

And the old word kinesis will be correctly given as iesis in corresponding

modern letters.  Assuming this foreign root kiein, and allowing for the

change of the eta and the insertion of the nu, we have kinesis, which

should have been kieinsis or eisis; and stasis is the negative of ienai (or

eisis), and has been improved into stasis.  Now the letter rho, as I was

saying, appeared to the imposer of names an excellent instrument for the

expression of motion; and he frequently uses the letter for this purpose: 

for example, in the actual words rein and roe he represents motion by rho;

also in the words tromos (trembling), trachus (rugged); and again, in words

such as krouein (strike), thrauein (crush), ereikein (bruise), thruptein

(break), kermatixein (crumble), rumbein (whirl):  of all these sorts of

movements he generally finds an expression in the letter R, because, as I

imagine, he had observed that the tongue was most agitated and least at

rest in the pronunciation of this letter, which he therefore used in order

to express motion, just as by the letter iota he expresses the subtle

elements which pass through all things.  This is why he uses the letter

iota as imitative of motion, ienai, iesthai.  And there is another class of

letters, phi, psi, sigma, and xi, of which the pronunciation is accompanied

by great expenditure of breath; these are used in the imitation of such

notions as psuchron (shivering), xeon (seething), seiesthai, (to be

shaken), seismos (shock), and are always introduced by the giver of names

when he wants to imitate what is phusodes (windy).  He seems to have

thought that the closing and pressure of the tongue in the utterance of

delta and tau was expressive of binding and rest in a place:  he further

observed the liquid movement of lambda, in the pronunciation of which the

tongue slips, and in this he found the expression of smoothness, as in

leios (level), and in the word oliothanein (to slip) itself, liparon

(sleek), in the word kollodes (gluey), and the like:  the heavier sound of

gamma detained the slipping tongue, and the union of the two gave the

notion of a glutinous clammy nature, as in glischros, glukus, gloiodes. 

The nu he observed to be sounded from within, and therefore to have a

notion of inwardness; hence he introduced the sound in endos and entos: 

alpha he assigned to the expression of size, and nu of length, because they

are great letters:  omicron was the sign of roundness, and therefore there

is plenty of omicron mixed up in the word goggulon (round).  Thus did the

legislator, reducing all things into letters and syllables, and impressing

on them names and signs, and out of them by imitation compounding other

signs.  That is my view, Hermogenes, of the truth of names; but I should

like to hear what Cratylus has more to say.



HERMOGENES:  But, Socrates, as I was telling you before, Cratylus mystifies

me; he says that there is a fitness of names, but he never explains what is

this fitness, so that I cannot tell whether his obscurity is intended or

not.  Tell me now, Cratylus, here in the presence of Socrates, do you agree

in what Socrates has been saying about names, or have you something better

of your own? and if you have, tell me what your view is, and then you will

either learn of Socrates, or Socrates and I will learn of you.



CRATYLUS:  Well, but surely, Hermogenes, you do not suppose that you can

learn, or I explain, any subject of importance all in a moment; at any

rate, not such a subject as language, which is, perhaps, the very greatest

of all.



HERMOGENES:  No, indeed; but, as Hesiod says, and I agree with him, 'to add

little to little' is worth while.  And, therefore, if you think that you

can add anything at all, however small, to our knowledge, take a little

trouble and oblige Socrates, and me too, who certainly have a claim upon

you.



SOCRATES:  I am by no means positive, Cratylus, in the view which

Hermogenes and myself have worked out; and therefore do not hesitate to say

what you think, which if it be better than my own view I shall gladly

accept.  And I should not be at all surprized to find that you have found

some better notion.  For you have evidently reflected on these matters and

have had teachers, and if you have really a better theory of the truth of

names, you may count me in the number of your disciples.



CRATYLUS:  You are right, Socrates, in saying that I have made a study of

these matters, and I might possibly convert you into a disciple.  But I

fear that the opposite is more probable, and I already find myself moved to

say to you what Achilles in the 'Prayers' says to Ajax,--



'Illustrious Ajax, son of Telamon, lord of the people,

You appear to have spoken in all things much to my mind.'



And you, Socrates, appear to me to be an oracle, and to give answers much

to my mind, whether you are inspired by Euthyphro, or whether some Muse may

have long been an inhabitant of your breast, unconsciously to yourself.



SOCRATES:  Excellent Cratylus, I have long been wondering at my own wisdom;

I cannot trust myself.  And I think that I ought to stop and ask myself

What am I saying? for there is nothing worse than self-deception--when the

deceiver is always at home and always with you--it is quite terrible, and

therefore I ought often to retrace my steps and endeavour to 'look fore and

aft,' in the words of the aforesaid Homer.  And now let me see; where are

we?  Have we not been saying that the correct name indicates the nature of

the thing:--has this proposition been sufficiently proven?



CRATYLUS:  Yes, Socrates, what you say, as I am disposed to think, is quite

true.



SOCRATES:  Names, then, are given in order to instruct?



CRATYLUS:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And naming is an art, and has artificers?



CRATYLUS:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And who are they?



CRATYLUS:  The legislators, of whom you spoke at first.



SOCRATES:  And does this art grow up among men like other arts?  Let me

explain what I mean:  of painters, some are better and some worse?



CRATYLUS:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  The better painters execute their works, I mean their figures,

better, and the worse execute them worse; and of builders also, the better

sort build fairer houses, and the worse build them worse.



CRATYLUS:  True.



SOCRATES:  And among legislators, there are some who do their work better

and some worse?



CRATYLUS:  No; there I do not agree with you.



SOCRATES:  Then you do not think that some laws are better and others

worse?



CRATYLUS:  No, indeed.



SOCRATES:  Or that one name is better than another?



CRATYLUS:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  Then all names are rightly imposed?



CRATYLUS:  Yes, if they are names at all.



SOCRATES:  Well, what do you say to the name of our friend Hermogenes,

which was mentioned before:--assuming that he has nothing of the nature of

Hermes in him, shall we say that this is a wrong name, or not his name at

all?



CRATYLUS:  I should reply that Hermogenes is not his name at all, but only

appears to be his, and is really the name of somebody else, who has the

nature which corresponds to it.



SOCRATES:  And if a man were to call him Hermogenes, would he not be even

speaking falsely?  For there may be a doubt whether you can call him

Hermogenes, if he is not.



CRATYLUS:  What do you mean?



SOCRATES:  Are you maintaining that falsehood is impossible?  For if this

is your meaning I should answer, that there have been plenty of liars in

all ages.



CRATYLUS:  Why, Socrates, how can a man say that which is not?--say

something and yet say nothing?  For is not falsehood saying the thing which

is not?



SOCRATES:  Your argument, friend, is too subtle for a man of my age.  But I

should like to know whether you are one of those philosophers who think

that falsehood may be spoken but not said?



CRATYLUS:  Neither spoken nor said.



SOCRATES:  Nor uttered nor addressed?  For example:  If a person, saluting

you in a foreign country, were to take your hand and say:  'Hail, Athenian

stranger, Hermogenes, son of Smicrion'--these words, whether spoken, said,

uttered, or addressed, would have no application to you but only to our

friend Hermogenes, or perhaps to nobody at all?



CRATYLUS:  In my opinion, Socrates, the speaker would only be talking

nonsense.



SOCRATES:  Well, but that will be quite enough for me, if you will tell me

whether the nonsense would be true or false, or partly true and partly

false:--which is all that I want to know.



CRATYLUS:  I should say that he would be putting himself in motion to no

purpose; and that his words would be an unmeaning sound like the noise of

hammering at a brazen pot.



SOCRATES:  But let us see, Cratylus, whether we cannot find a meeting-

point, for you would admit that the name is not the same with the thing

named?



CRATYLUS:  I should.



SOCRATES:  And would you further acknowledge that the name is an imitation

of the thing?



CRATYLUS:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And you would say that pictures are also imitations of things,

but in another way?



CRATYLUS:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  I believe you may be right, but I do not rightly understand you. 

Please to say, then, whether both sorts of imitation (I mean both pictures

or words) are not equally attributable and applicable to the things of

which they are the imitation.



CRATYLUS:  They are.



SOCRATES:  First look at the matter thus:  you may attribute the likeness

of the man to the man, and of the woman to the woman; and so on?



CRATYLUS:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And conversely you may attribute the likeness of the man to the

woman, and of the woman to the man?



CRATYLUS:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  And are both modes of assigning them right, or only the first?



CRATYLUS:  Only the first.



SOCRATES:  That is to say, the mode of assignment which attributes to each

that which belongs to them and is like them?



CRATYLUS:  That is my view.



SOCRATES:  Now then, as I am desirous that we being friends should have a

good understanding about the argument, let me state my view to you:  the

first mode of assignment, whether applied to figures or to names, I call

right, and when applied to names only, true as well as right; and the other

mode of giving and assigning the name which is unlike, I call wrong, and in

the case of names, false as well as wrong.



CRATYLUS:  That may be true, Socrates, in the case of pictures; they may be

wrongly assigned; but not in the case of names--they must be always right.



SOCRATES:  Why, what is the difference?  May I not go to a man and say to

him, 'This is your picture,' showing him his own likeness, or perhaps the

likeness of a woman; and when I say 'show,' I mean bring before the sense

of sight.



CRATYLUS:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And may I not go to him again, and say, 'This is your name'?--

for the name, like the picture, is an imitation.  May I not say to him--

'This is your name'? and may I not then bring to his sense of hearing the

imitation of himself, when I say, 'This is a man'; or of a female of the

human species, when I say, 'This is a woman,' as the case may be?  Is not

all that quite possible?



CRATYLUS:  I would fain agree with you, Socrates; and therefore I say,

Granted.



SOCRATES:  That is very good of you, if I am right, which need hardly be

disputed at present.  But if I can assign names as well as pictures to

objects, the right assignment of them we may call truth, and the wrong

assignment of them falsehood.  Now if there be such a wrong assignment of

names, there may also be a wrong or inappropriate assignment of verbs; and

if of names and verbs then of the sentences, which are made up of them. 

What do you say, Cratylus?



CRATYLUS:  I agree; and think that what you say is very true.



SOCRATES:  And further, primitive nouns may be compared to pictures, and in

pictures you may either give all the appropriate colours and figures, or

you may not give them all--some may be wanting; or there may be too many or

too much of them--may there not?



CRATYLUS:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  And he who gives all gives a perfect picture or figure; and he

who takes away or adds also gives a picture or figure, but not a good one.



CRATYLUS:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  In like manner, he who by syllables and letters imitates the

nature of things, if he gives all that is appropriate will produce a good

image, or in other words a name; but if he subtracts or perhaps adds a

little, he will make an image but not a good one; whence I infer that some

names are well and others ill made.



CRATYLUS:  That is true.



SOCRATES:  Then the artist of names may be sometimes good, or he may be

bad?



CRATYLUS:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And this artist of names is called the legislator?



CRATYLUS:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Then like other artists the legislator may be good or he may be

bad; it must surely be so if our former admissions hold good?



CRATYLUS:  Very true, Socrates; but the case of language, you see, is

different; for when by the help of grammar we assign the letters alpha or

beta, or any other letters to a certain name, then, if we add, or subtract,

or misplace a letter, the name which is written is not only written

wrongly, but not written at all; and in any of these cases becomes other

than a name.



SOCRATES:  But I doubt whether your view is altogether correct, Cratylus.



CRATYLUS:  How so?



SOCRATES:  I believe that what you say may be true about numbers, which

must be just what they are, or not be at all; for example, the number ten

at once becomes other than ten if a unit be added or subtracted, and so of

any other number:  but this does not apply to that which is qualitative or

to anything which is represented under an image.  I should say rather that

the image, if expressing in every point the entire reality, would no longer

be an image.  Let us suppose the existence of two objects:  one of them

shall be Cratylus, and the other the image of Cratylus; and we will

suppose, further, that some God makes not only a representation such as a

painter would make of your outward form and colour, but also creates an

inward organization like yours, having the same warmth and softness; and

into this infuses motion, and soul, and mind, such as you have, and in a

word copies all your qualities, and places them by you in another form;

would you say that this was Cratylus and the image of Cratylus, or that

there were two Cratyluses?



CRATYLUS:  I should say that there were two Cratyluses.



SOCRATES:  Then you see, my friend, that we must find some other principle

of truth in images, and also in names; and not insist that an image is no

longer an image when something is added or subtracted.  Do you not perceive

that images are very far from having qualities which are the exact

counterpart of the realities which they represent?



CRATYLUS:  Yes, I see.



SOCRATES:  But then how ridiculous would be the effect of names on things,

if they were exactly the same with them!  For they would be the doubles of

them, and no one would be able to determine which were the names and which

were the realities.



CRATYLUS:  Quite true.



SOCRATES:  Then fear not, but have the courage to admit that one name may

be correctly and another incorrectly given; and do not insist that the name

shall be exactly the same with the thing; but allow the occasional

substitution of a wrong letter, and if of a letter also of a noun in a

sentence, and if of a noun in a sentence also of a sentence which is not

appropriate to the matter, and acknowledge that the thing may be named, and

described, so long as the general character of the thing which you are

describing is retained; and this, as you will remember, was remarked by

Hermogenes and myself in the particular instance of the names of the

letters.



CRATYLUS:  Yes, I remember.



SOCRATES:  Good; and when the general character is preserved, even if some

of the proper letters are wanting, still the thing is signified;--well, if

all the letters are given; not well, when only a few of them are given.  I

think that we had better admit this, lest we be punished like travellers in

Aegina who wander about the street late at night:  and be likewise told by

truth herself that we have arrived too late; or if not, you must find out

some new notion of correctness of names, and no longer maintain that a name

is the expression of a thing in letters or syllables; for if you say both,

you will be inconsistent with yourself.



CRATYLUS:  I quite acknowledge, Socrates, what you say to be very

reasonable.



SOCRATES:  Then as we are agreed thus far, let us ask ourselves whether a

name rightly imposed ought not to have the proper letters.



CRATYLUS:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And the proper letters are those which are like the things?



CRATYLUS:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Enough then of names which are rightly given.  And in names

which are incorrectly given, the greater part may be supposed to be made up

of proper and similar letters, or there would be no likeness; but there

will be likewise a part which is improper and spoils the beauty and

formation of the word:  you would admit that?



CRATYLUS:  There would be no use, Socrates, in my quarrelling with you,

since I cannot be satisfied that a name which is incorrectly given is a

name at all.



SOCRATES:  Do you admit a name to be the representation of a thing?



CRATYLUS:  Yes, I do.



SOCRATES:  But do you not allow that some nouns are primitive, and some

derived?



CRATYLUS:  Yes, I do.



SOCRATES:  Then if you admit that primitive or first nouns are

representations of things, is there any better way of framing

representations than by assimilating them to the objects as much as you

can; or do you prefer the notion of Hermogenes and of many others, who say

that names are conventional, and have a meaning to those who have agreed

about them, and who have previous knowledge of the things intended by them,

and that convention is the only principle; and whether you abide by our

present convention, or make a new and opposite one, according to which you

call small great and great small--that, they would say, makes no

difference, if you are only agreed.  Which of these two notions do you

prefer?



CRATYLUS:  Representation by likeness, Socrates, is infinitely better than

representation by any chance sign.



SOCRATES:  Very good:  but if the name is to be like the thing, the letters

out of which the first names are composed must also be like things.

Returning to the image of the picture, I would ask, How could any one ever

compose a picture which would be like anything at all, if there were not

pigments in nature which resembled the things imitated, and out of which

the picture is composed?



CRATYLUS:  Impossible.



SOCRATES:  No more could names ever resemble any actually existing thing,

unless the original elements of which they are compounded bore some degree

of resemblance to the objects of which the names are the imitation:  And

the original elements are letters?



CRATYLUS:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Let me now invite you to consider what Hermogenes and I were

saying about sounds.  Do you agree with me that the letter rho is

expressive of rapidity, motion, and hardness?  Were we right or wrong in

saying so?



CRATYLUS:  I should say that you were right.



SOCRATES:  And that lamda was expressive of smoothness, and softness, and

the like?



CRATYLUS:  There again you were right.



SOCRATES:  And yet, as you are aware, that which is called by us sklerotes,

is by the Eretrians called skleroter.



CRATYLUS:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  But are the letters rho and sigma equivalents; and is there the

same significance to them in the termination rho, which there is to us in

sigma, or is there no significance to one of us?



CRATYLUS:  Nay, surely there is a significance to both of us.



SOCRATES:  In as far as they are like, or in as far as they are unlike?



CRATYLUS:  In as far as they are like.



SOCRATES:  Are they altogether alike?



CRATYLUS:  Yes; for the purpose of expressing motion.



SOCRATES:  And what do you say of the insertion of the lamda? for that is

expressive not of hardness but of softness.



CRATYLUS:  Why, perhaps the letter lamda is wrongly inserted, Socrates, and

should be altered into rho, as you were saying to Hermogenes and in my

opinion rightly, when you spoke of adding and subtracting letters upon

occasion.



SOCRATES:  Good.  But still the word is intelligible to both of us; when I

say skleros (hard), you know what I mean.



CRATYLUS:  Yes, my dear friend, and the explanation of that is custom.



SOCRATES:  And what is custom but convention?  I utter a sound which I

understand, and you know that I understand the meaning of the sound:  this

is what you are saying?



CRATYLUS:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And if when I speak you know my meaning, there is an indication

given by me to you?



CRATYLUS:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  This indication of my meaning may proceed from unlike as well as

from like, for example in the lamda of sklerotes.  But if this is true,

then you have made a convention with yourself, and the correctness of a

name turns out to be convention, since letters which are unlike are

indicative equally with those which are like, if they are sanctioned by

custom and convention.  And even supposing that you distinguish custom from

convention ever so much, still you must say that the signification of words

is given by custom and not by likeness, for custom may indicate by the

unlike as well as by the like.  But as we are agreed thus far, Cratylus

(for I shall assume that your silence gives consent), then custom and

convention must be supposed to contribute to the indication of our

thoughts; for suppose we take the instance of number, how can you ever

imagine, my good friend, that you will find names resembling every

individual number, unless you allow that which you term convention and

agreement to have authority in determining the correctness of names?  I

quite agree with you that words should as far as possible resemble things;

but I fear that this dragging in of resemblance, as Hermogenes says, is a

shabby thing, which has to be supplemented by the mechanical aid of

convention with a view to correctness; for I believe that if we could

always, or almost always, use likenesses, which are perfectly appropriate,

this would be the most perfect state of language; as the opposite is the

most imperfect.  But let me ask you, what is the force of names, and what

is the use of them?



CRATYLUS:  The use of names, Socrates, as I should imagine, is to inform: 

the simple truth is, that he who knows names knows also the things which

are expressed by them.



SOCRATES:  I suppose you mean to say, Cratylus, that as the name is, so

also is the thing; and that he who knows the one will also know the other,

because they are similars, and all similars fall under the same art or

science; and therefore you would say that he who knows names will also know

things.



CRATYLUS:  That is precisely what I mean.



SOCRATES:  But let us consider what is the nature of this information about

things which, according to you, is given us by names.  Is it the best sort

of information? or is there any other?  What do you say?



CRATYLUS:  I believe that to be both the only and the best sort of

information about them; there can be no other.



SOCRATES:  But do you believe that in the discovery of them, he who

discovers the names discovers also the things; or is this only the method

of instruction, and is there some other method of enquiry and discovery.



CRATYLUS:  I certainly believe that the methods of enquiry and discovery

are of the same nature as instruction.



SOCRATES:  Well, but do you not see, Cratylus, that he who follows names in

the search after things, and analyses their meaning, is in great danger of

being deceived?



CRATYLUS:  How so?



SOCRATES:  Why clearly he who first gave names gave them according to his

conception of the things which they signified--did he not?



CRATYLUS:  True.



SOCRATES:  And if his conception was erroneous, and he gave names according

to his conception, in what position shall we who are his followers find

ourselves?  Shall we not be deceived by him?



CRATYLUS:  But, Socrates, am I not right in thinking that he must surely

have known; or else, as I was saying, his names would not be names at all? 

And you have a clear proof that he has not missed the truth, and the proof

is--that he is perfectly consistent.  Did you ever observe in speaking that

all the words which you utter have a common character and purpose?



SOCRATES:  But that, friend Cratylus, is no answer.  For if he did begin in

error, he may have forced the remainder into agreement with the original

error and with himself; there would be nothing strange in this, any more

than in geometrical diagrams, which have often a slight and invisible flaw

in the first part of the process, and are consistently mistaken in the long

deductions which follow.  And this is the reason why every man should

expend his chief thought and attention on the consideration of his first

principles:--are they or are they not rightly laid down? and when he has

duly sifted them, all the rest will follow.  Now I should be astonished to

find that names are really consistent.  And here let us revert to our

former discussion:  Were we not saying that all things are in motion and

progress and flux, and that this idea of motion is expressed by names?  Do

you not conceive that to be the meaning of them?



CRATYLUS:  Yes; that is assuredly their meaning, and the true meaning.



SOCRATES:  Let us revert to episteme (knowledge) and observe how ambiguous

this word is, seeming rather to signify stopping the soul at things than

going round with them; and therefore we should leave the beginning as at

present, and not reject the epsilon, but make an insertion of an iota

instead of an epsilon (not pioteme, but epiisteme).  Take another example: 

bebaion (sure) is clearly the expression of station and position, and not

of motion.  Again, the word istoria (enquiry) bears upon the face of it the

stopping (istanai) of the stream; and the word piston (faithful) certainly

indicates cessation of motion; then, again, mneme (memory), as any one may

see, expresses rest in the soul, and not motion.  Moreover, words such as

amartia and sumphora, which have a bad sense, viewed in the light of their

etymologies will be the same as sunesis and episteme and other words which

have a good sense (compare omartein, sunienai, epesthai, sumpheresthai);

and much the same may be said of amathia and akolasia, for amathia may be

explained as e ama theo iontos poreia, and akolasia as e akolouthia tois

pragmasin.  Thus the names which in these instances we find to have the

worst sense, will turn out to be framed on the same principle as those

which have the best.  And any one I believe who would take the trouble

might find many other examples in which the giver of names indicates, not

that things are in motion or progress, but that they are at rest; which is

the opposite of motion.



CRATYLUS:  Yes, Socrates, but observe; the greater number express motion.



SOCRATES:  What of that, Cratylus?  Are we to count them like votes? and is

correctness of names the voice of the majority?  Are we to say of whichever

sort there are most, those are the true ones?



CRATYLUS:  No; that is not reasonable.



SOCRATES:  Certainly not.  But let us have done with this question and

proceed to another, about which I should like to know whether you think

with me.  Were we not lately acknowledging that the first givers of names

in states, both Hellenic and barbarous, were the legislators, and that the

art which gave names was the art of the legislator?



CRATYLUS:  Quite true.



SOCRATES:  Tell me, then, did the first legislators, who were the givers of

the first names, know or not know the things which they named?



CRATYLUS:  They must have known, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  Why, yes, friend Cratylus, they could hardly have been ignorant.



CRATYLUS:  I should say not.



SOCRATES:  Let us return to the point from which we digressed.  You were

saying, if you remember, that he who gave names must have known the things

which he named; are you still of that opinion?



CRATYLUS:  I am.



SOCRATES:  And would you say that the giver of the first names had also a

knowledge of the things which he named?



CRATYLUS:  I should.



SOCRATES:  But how could he have learned or discovered things from names if

the primitive names were not yet given?  For, if we are correct in our

view, the only way of learning and discovering things, is either to

discover names for ourselves or to learn them from others.



CRATYLUS:  I think that there is a good deal in what you say, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  But if things are only to be known through names, how can we

suppose that the givers of names had knowledge, or were legislators before

there were names at all, and therefore before they could have known them?



CRATYLUS:  I believe, Socrates, the true account of the matter to be, that

a power more than human gave things their first names, and that the names

which are thus given are necessarily their true names.



SOCRATES:  Then how came the giver of the names, if he was an inspired

being or God, to contradict himself?  For were we not saying just now that

he made some names expressive of rest and others of motion?  Were we

mistaken?



CRATYLUS:  But I suppose one of the two not to be names at all.



SOCRATES:  And which, then, did he make, my good friend; those which are

expressive of rest, or those which are expressive of motion?  This is a

point which, as I said before, cannot be determined by counting them.



CRATYLUS:  No; not in that way, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  But if this is a battle of names, some of them asserting that

they are like the truth, others contending that THEY are, how or by what

criterion are we to decide between them?  For there are no other names to

which appeal can be made, but obviously recourse must be had to another

standard which, without employing names, will make clear which of the two

are right; and this must be a standard which shows the truth of things.



CRATYLUS:  I agree.



SOCRATES:  But if that is true, Cratylus, then I suppose that things may be

known without names?



CRATYLUS:  Clearly.



SOCRATES:  But how would you expect to know them?  What other way can there

be of knowing them, except the true and natural way, through their

affinities, when they are akin to each other, and through themselves?  For

that which is other and different from them must signify something other

and different from them.



CRATYLUS:  What you are saying is, I think, true.



SOCRATES:  Well, but reflect; have we not several times acknowledged that

names rightly given are the likenesses and images of the things which they

name?



CRATYLUS:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Let us suppose that to any extent you please you can learn

things through the medium of names, and suppose also that you can learn

them from the things themselves--which is likely to be the nobler and

clearer way; to learn of the image, whether the image and the truth of

which the image is the expression have been rightly conceived, or to learn

of the truth whether the truth and the image of it have been duly executed?



CRATYLUS:  I should say that we must learn of the truth.



SOCRATES:  How real existence is to be studied or discovered is, I suspect,

beyond you and me.  But we may admit so much, that the knowledge of things

is not to be derived from names.  No; they must be studied and investigated

in themselves.



CRATYLUS:  Clearly, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  There is another point.  I should not like us to be imposed upon

by the appearance of such a multitude of names, all tending in the same

direction.  I myself do not deny that the givers of names did really give

them under the idea that all things were in motion and flux; which was

their sincere but, I think, mistaken opinion.  And having fallen into a

kind of whirlpool themselves, they are carried round, and want to drag us

in after them.  There is a matter, master Cratylus, about which I often

dream, and should like to ask your opinion:  Tell me, whether there is or

is not any absolute beauty or good, or any other absolute existence?



CRATYLUS:  Certainly, Socrates, I think so.



SOCRATES:  Then let us seek the true beauty:  not asking whether a face is

fair, or anything of that sort, for all such things appear to be in a flux;

but let us ask whether the true beauty is not always beautiful.



CRATYLUS:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And can we rightly speak of a beauty which is always passing

away, and is first this and then that; must not the same thing be born and

retire and vanish while the word is in our mouths?



CRATYLUS:  Undoubtedly.



SOCRATES:  Then how can that be a real thing which is never in the same

state? for obviously things which are the same cannot change while they

remain the same; and if they are always the same and in the same state, and

never depart from their original form, they can never change or be moved.



CRATYLUS:  Certainly they cannot.



SOCRATES:  Nor yet can they be known by any one; for at the moment that the

observer approaches, then they become other and of another nature, so that

you cannot get any further in knowing their nature or state, for you cannot

know that which has no state.



CRATYLUS:  True.



SOCRATES:  Nor can we reasonably say, Cratylus, that there is knowledge at

all, if everything is in a state of transition and there is nothing

abiding; for knowledge too cannot continue to be knowledge unless

continuing always to abide and exist.  But if the very nature of knowledge

changes, at the time when the change occurs there will be no knowledge; and

if the transition is always going on, there will always be no knowledge,

and, according to this view, there will be no one to know and nothing to be

known:  but if that which knows and that which is known exists ever, and

the beautiful and the good and every other thing also exist, then I do not

think that they can resemble a process or flux, as we were just now

supposing.  Whether there is this eternal nature in things, or whether the

truth is what Heracleitus and his followers and many others say, is a

question hard to determine; and no man of sense will like to put himself or

the education of his mind in the power of names:  neither will he so far

trust names or the givers of names as to be confident in any knowledge

which condemns himself and other existences to an unhealthy state of

unreality; he will not believe that all things leak like a pot, or imagine

that the world is a man who has a running at the nose.  This may be true,

Cratylus, but is also very likely to be untrue; and therefore I would not

have you be too easily persuaded of it.  Reflect well and like a man, and

do not easily accept such a doctrine; for you are young and of an age to

learn.  And when you have found the truth, come and tell me.



CRATYLUS:  I will do as you say, though I can assure you, Socrates, that I

have been considering the matter already, and the result of a great deal of

trouble and consideration is that I incline to Heracleitus.



SOCRATES:  Then, another day, my friend, when you come back, you shall give

me a lesson; but at present, go into the country, as you are intending, and

Hermogenes shall set you on your way.



CRATYLUS:  Very good, Socrates; I hope, however, that you will continue to

think about these things yourself.









End 


Critias



by Plato



Translated by Benjamin Jowett





INTRODUCTION AND ANALYSIS.



The Critias is a fragment which breaks off in the middle of a sentence.  It

was designed to be the second part of a trilogy, which, like the other

great Platonic trilogy of the Sophist, Statesman, Philosopher, was never

completed.  Timaeus had brought down the origin of the world to the

creation of man, and the dawn of history was now to succeed the philosophy

of nature.  The Critias is also connected with the Republic.  Plato, as he

has already told us (Tim.), intended to represent the ideal state engaged

in a patriotic conflict.  This mythical conflict is prophetic or symbolical

of the struggle of Athens and Persia, perhaps in some degree also of the

wars of the Greeks and Carthaginians, in the same way that the Persian is

prefigured by the Trojan war to the mind of Herodotus, or as the narrative

of the first part of the Aeneid is intended by Virgil to foreshadow the

wars of Carthage and Rome.  The small number of the primitive Athenian

citizens (20,000), 'which is about their present number' (Crit.), is

evidently designed to contrast with the myriads and barbaric array of the

Atlantic hosts.  The passing remark in the Timaeus that Athens was left

alone in the struggle, in which she conquered and became the liberator of

Greece, is also an allusion to the later history.  Hence we may safely

conclude that the entire narrative is due to the imagination of Plato, who

has used the name of Solon and introduced the Egyptian priests to give

verisimilitude to his story.  To the Greek such a tale, like that of the

earth-born men, would have seemed perfectly accordant with the character of

his mythology, and not more marvellous than the wonders of the East

narrated by Herodotus and others:  he might have been deceived into

believing it.  But it appears strange that later ages should have been

imposed upon by the fiction.  As many attempts have been made to find the

great island of Atlantis, as to discover the country of the lost tribes. 

Without regard to the description of Plato, and without a suspicion that

the whole narrative is a fabrication, interpreters have looked for the spot

in every part of the globe, America, Arabia Felix, Ceylon, Palestine,

Sardinia, Sweden.



Timaeus concludes with a prayer that his words may be acceptable to the God

whom he has revealed, and Critias, whose turn follows, begs that a larger

measure of indulgence may be conceded to him, because he has to speak of

men whom we know and not of gods whom we do not know.  Socrates readily

grants his request, and anticipating that Hermocrates will make a similar

petition, extends by anticipation a like indulgence to him.



Critias returns to his story, professing only to repeat what Solon was told

by the priests.  The war of which he was about to speak had occurred 9000

years ago.  One of the combatants was the city of Athens, the other was the

great island of Atlantis.  Critias proposes to speak of these rival powers

first of all, giving to Athens the precedence; the various tribes of Greeks

and barbarians who took part in the war will be dealt with as they

successively appear on the scene.



In the beginning the gods agreed to divide the earth by lot in a friendly

manner, and when they had made the allotment they settled their several

countries, and were the shepherds or rather the pilots of mankind, whom

they guided by persuasion, and not by force.  Hephaestus and Athena,

brother and sister deities, in mind and art united, obtained as their lot

the land of Attica, a land suited to the growth of virtue and wisdom; and

there they settled a brave race of children of the soil, and taught them

how to order the state.  Some of their names, such as Cecrops, Erechtheus,

Erichthonius, and Erysichthon, were preserved and adopted in later times,

but the memory of their deeds has passed away; for there have since been

many deluges, and the remnant who survived in the mountains were ignorant

of the art of writing, and during many generations were wholly devoted to

acquiring the means of life...And the armed image of the goddess which was

dedicated by the ancient Athenians is an evidence to other ages that men

and women had in those days, as they ought always to have, common virtues

and pursuits.  There were various classes of citizens, including

handicraftsmen and husbandmen and a superior class of warriors who dwelt

apart, and were educated, and had all things in common, like our guardians.

Attica in those days extended southwards to the Isthmus, and inland to the

heights of Parnes and Cithaeron, and between them and the sea included the

district of Oropus.  The country was then, as what remains of it still is,

the most fertile in the world, and abounded in rich plains and pastures. 

But in the course of ages much of the soil was washed away and disappeared

in the deep sea.  And the inhabitants of this fair land were endowed with

intelligence and the love of beauty.



The Acropolis of the ancient Athens extended to the Ilissus and Eridanus,

and included the Pnyx, and the Lycabettus on the opposite side to the Pnyx,

having a level surface and deep soil.  The side of the hill was inhabited

by craftsmen and husbandmen; and the warriors dwelt by themselves on the

summit, around the temples of Hephaestus and Athene, in an enclosure which

was like the garden of a single house.  In winter they retired into houses

on the north of the hill, in which they held their syssitia.  These were

modest dwellings, which they bequeathed unaltered to their children's

children.  In summer time the south side was inhabited by them, and then

they left their gardens and dining-halls.  In the midst of the Acropolis

was a fountain, which gave an abundant supply of cool water in summer and

warm in winter; of this there are still some traces.  They were careful to

preserve the number of fighting men and women at 20,000, which is equal to

that of the present military force.  And so they passed their lives as

guardians of the citizens and leaders of the Hellenes.  They were a just

and famous race, celebrated for their beauty and virtue all over Europe and

Asia.



And now I will speak to you of their adversaries, but first I ought to

explain that the Greek names were given to Solon in an Egyptian form, and

he enquired their meaning and translated them.  His manuscript was left

with my grandfather Dropides, and is now in my possession...In the division

of the earth Poseidon obtained as his portion the island of Atlantis, and

there he begat children whose mother was a mortal.  Towards the sea and in

the centre of the island there was a very fair and fertile plain, and near

the centre, about fifty stadia from the plain, there was a low mountain in

which dwelt a man named Evenor and his wife Leucippe, and their daughter

Cleito, of whom Poseidon became enamoured.  He to secure his love enclosed

the mountain with rings or zones varying in size, two of land and three of

sea, which his divine power readily enabled him to excavate and fashion,

and, as there was no shipping in those days, no man could get into the

place.  To the interior island he conveyed under the earth springs of water

hot and cold, and supplied the land with all things needed for the life of

man.  Here he begat a family consisting of five pairs of twin male

children.  The eldest was Atlas, and him he made king of the centre island,

while to his twin brother, Eumelus, or Gadeirus, he assigned that part of

the country which was nearest the Straits.  The other brothers he made

chiefs over the rest of the island.  And their kingdom extended as far as

Egypt and Tyrrhenia.  Now Atlas had a fair posterity, and great treasures

derived from mines--among them that precious metal orichalcum; and there

was abundance of wood, and herds of elephants, and pastures for animals of

all kinds, and fragrant herbs, and grasses, and trees bearing fruit.  These

they used, and employed themselves in constructing their temples, and

palaces, and harbours, and docks, in the following manner:--First, they

bridged over the zones of sea, and made a way to and from the royal palace

which they built in the centre island.  This ancient palace was ornamented

by successive generations; and they dug a canal which passed through the

zones of land from the island to the sea.  The zones of earth were

surrounded by walls made of stone of divers colours, black and white and

red, which they sometimes intermingled for the sake of ornament; and as

they quarried they hollowed out beneath the edges of the zones double docks

having roofs of rock.  The outermost of the walls was coated with brass,

the second with tin, and the third, which was the wall of the citadel,

flashed with the red light of orichalcum.  In the interior of the citadel

was a holy temple, dedicated to Cleito and Poseidon, and surrounded by an

enclosure of gold, and there was Poseidon's own temple, which was covered

with silver, and the pinnacles with gold.  The roof was of ivory, adorned

with gold and silver and orichalcum, and the rest of the interior was lined

with orichalcum.  Within was an image of the god standing in a chariot

drawn by six winged horses, and touching the roof with his head; around him

were a hundred Nereids, riding on dolphins.  Outside the temple were placed

golden statues of all the descendants of the ten kings and of their wives;

there was an altar too, and there were palaces, corresponding to the

greatness and glory both of the kingdom and of the temple.



Also there were fountains of hot and cold water, and suitable buildings

surrounding them, and trees, and there were baths both of the kings and of

private individuals, and separate baths for women, and also for cattle. 

The water from the baths was carried to the grove of Poseidon, and by

aqueducts over the bridges to the outer circles.  And there were temples in

the zones, and in the larger of the two there was a racecourse for horses,

which ran all round the island.  The guards were distributed in the zones

according to the trust reposed in them; the most trusted of them were

stationed in the citadel.  The docks were full of triremes and stores. The

land between the harbour and the sea was surrounded by a wall, and was

crowded with dwellings, and the harbour and canal resounded with the din of

human voices.



The plain around the city was highly cultivated and sheltered from the

north by mountains; it was oblong, and where falling out of the straight

line followed the circular ditch, which was of an incredible depth.  This

depth received the streams which came down from the mountains, as well as

the canals of the interior, and found a way to the sea.  The entire country

was divided into sixty thousand lots, each of which was a square of ten

stadia; and the owner of a lot was bound to furnish the sixth part of a

war-chariot, so as to make up ten thousand chariots, two horses and riders

upon them, a pair of chariot-horses without a seat, and an attendant and

charioteer, two hoplites, two archers, two slingers, three stone-shooters,

three javelin-men, and four sailors to make up the complement of twelve

hundred ships.



Each of the ten kings was absolute in his own city and kingdom.  The

relations of the different governments to one another were determined by

the injunctions of Poseidon, which had been inscribed by the first kings on

a column of orichalcum in the temple of Poseidon, at which the kings and

princes gathered together and held a festival every fifth and every sixth

year alternately.  Around the temple ranged the bulls of Poseidon, one of

which the ten kings caught and sacrificed, shedding the blood of the victim

over the inscription, and vowing not to transgress the laws of their father

Poseidon.  When night came, they put on azure robes and gave judgment

against offenders.  The most important of their laws related to their

dealings with one another.  They were not to take up arms against one

another, and were to come to the rescue if any of their brethren were

attacked.  They were to deliberate in common about war, and the king was

not to have the power of life and death over his kinsmen, unless he had the

assent of the majority.



For many generations, as tradition tells, the people of Atlantis were

obedient to the laws and to the gods, and practised gentleness and wisdom

in their intercourse with one another.  They knew that they could only have

the true use of riches by not caring about them.  But gradually the divine

portion of their souls became diluted with too much of the mortal

admixture, and they began to degenerate, though to the outward eye they

appeared glorious as ever at the very time when they were filled with all

iniquity.  The all-seeing Zeus, wanting to punish them, held a council of

the gods, and when he had called them together, he spoke as follows:--



No one knew better than Plato how to invent 'a noble lie.'  Observe (1) the

innocent declaration of Socrates, that the truth of the story is a great

advantage:  (2) the manner in which traditional names and indications of

geography are intermingled ('Why, here be truths!'):  (3) the extreme

minuteness with which the numbers are given, as in the Old Epic poetry: 

(4) the ingenious reason assigned for the Greek names occurring in the

Egyptian tale:  (5) the remark that the armed statue of Athena indicated

the common warrior life of men and women:  (6) the particularity with which

the third deluge before that of Deucalion is affirmed to have been the

great destruction:  (7) the happy guess that great geological changes have

been effected by water:  (8) the indulgence of the prejudice against

sailing beyond the Columns, and the popular belief of the shallowness of

the ocean in that part:  (9) the confession that the depth of the ditch in

the Island of Atlantis was not to be believed, and 'yet he could only

repeat what he had heard', compared with the statement made in an earlier

passage that Poseidon, being a God, found no difficulty in contriving the

water-supply of the centre island:  (10) the mention of the old rivalry of

Poseidon and Athene, and the creation of the first inhabitants out of the

soil.  Plato here, as elsewhere, ingeniously gives the impression that he

is telling the truth which mythology had corrupted.



The world, like a child, has readily, and for the most part unhesitatingly,

accepted the tale of the Island of Atlantis.  In modern times we hardly

seek for traces of the submerged continent; but even Mr. Grote is inclined

to believe in the Egyptian poem of Solon of which there is no evidence in

antiquity; while others, like Martin, discuss the Egyptian origin of the

legend, or like M. de Humboldt, whom he quotes, are disposed to find in it

a vestige of a widely-spread tradition.  Others, adopting a different vein

of reflection, regard the Island of Atlantis as the anticipation of a still

greater island--the Continent of America.  'The tale,' says M. Martin,

'rests upon the authority of the Egyptian priests; and the Egyptian priests

took a pleasure in deceiving the Greeks.'  He never appears to suspect that

there is a greater deceiver or magician than the Egyptian priests, that is

to say, Plato himself, from the dominion of whose genius the critic and

natural philosopher of modern times are not wholly emancipated.  Although

worthless in respect of any result which can be attained by them,

discussions like those of M. Martin (Timee) have an interest of their own,

and may be compared to the similar discussions regarding the Lost Tribes (2

Esdras), as showing how the chance word of some poet or philosopher has

given birth to endless religious or historical enquiries.  (See

Introduction to the Timaeus.)



In contrasting the small Greek city numbering about twenty thousand

inhabitants with the barbaric greatness of the island of Atlantis, Plato

probably intended to show that a state, such as the ideal Athens, was

invincible, though matched against any number of opponents (cp. Rep.). 

Even in a great empire there might be a degree of virtue and justice, such

as the Greeks believed to have existed under the sway of the first Persian

kings.  But all such empires were liable to degenerate, and soon incurred

the anger of the gods.  Their Oriental wealth, and splendour of gold and

silver, and variety of colours, seemed also to be at variance with the

simplicity of Greek notions.  In the island of Atlantis, Plato is

describing a sort of Babylonian or Egyptian city, to which he opposes the

frugal life of the true Hellenic citizen.  It is remarkable that in his

brief sketch of them, he idealizes the husbandmen 'who are lovers of honour

and true husbandmen,' as well as the warriors who are his sole concern in

the Republic; and that though he speaks of the common pursuits of men and

women, he says nothing of the community of wives and children.



It is singular that Plato should have prefixed the most detested of

Athenian names to this dialogue, and even more singular that he should have

put into the mouth of Socrates a panegyric on him (Tim.).  Yet we know that

his character was accounted infamous by Xenophon, and that the mere

acquaintance with him was made a subject of accusation against Socrates. 

We can only infer that in this, and perhaps in some other cases, Plato's

characters have no reference to the actual facts.  The desire to do honour

to his own family, and the connection with Solon, may have suggested the

introduction of his name.  Why the Critias was never completed, whether

from accident, or from advancing age, or from a sense of the artistic

difficulty of the design, cannot be determined.







CRITIAS.





PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE:  Critias, Hermocrates, Timaeus, Socrates.





TIMAEUS:  How thankful I am, Socrates, that I have arrived at last, and,

like a weary traveller after a long journey, may be at rest!  And I pray

the being who always was of old, and has now been by me revealed, to grant

that my words may endure in so far as they have been spoken truly and

acceptably to him; but if unintentionally I have said anything wrong, I

pray that he will impose upon me a just retribution, and the just

retribution of him who errs is that he should be set right.  Wishing, then,

to speak truly in future concerning the generation of the gods, I pray him

to give me knowledge, which of all medicines is the most perfect and best. 

And now having offered my prayer I deliver up the argument to Critias, who

is to speak next according to our agreement.  (Tim.)



CRITIAS:  And I, Timaeus, accept the trust, and as you at first said that

you were going to speak of high matters, and begged that some forbearance

might be shown to you, I too ask the same or greater forbearance for what I

am about to say.  And although I very well know that my request may appear

to be somewhat ambitious and discourteous, I must make it nevertheless. 

For will any man of sense deny that you have spoken well?  I can only

attempt to show that I ought to have more indulgence than you, because my

theme is more difficult; and I shall argue that to seem to speak well of

the gods to men is far easier than to speak well of men to men:  for the

inexperience and utter ignorance of his hearers about any subject is a

great assistance to him who has to speak of it, and we know how ignorant we

are concerning the gods.  But I should like to make my meaning clearer, if

you will follow me.  All that is said by any of us can only be imitation

and representation.  For if we consider the likenesses which painters make

of bodies divine and heavenly, and the different degrees of gratification

with which the eye of the spectator receives them, we shall see that we are

satisfied with the artist who is able in any degree to imitate the earth

and its mountains, and the rivers, and the woods, and the universe, and the

things that are and move therein, and further, that knowing nothing precise

about such matters, we do not examine or analyze the painting; all that is

required is a sort of indistinct and deceptive mode of shadowing them

forth.  But when a person endeavours to paint the human form we are quick

at finding out defects, and our familiar knowledge makes us severe judges

of any one who does not render every point of similarity.  And we may

observe the same thing to happen in discourse; we are satisfied with a

picture of divine and heavenly things which has very little likeness to

them; but we are more precise in our criticism of mortal and human things. 

Wherefore if at the moment of speaking I cannot suitably express my

meaning, you must excuse me, considering that to form approved likenesses

of human things is the reverse of easy.  This is what I want to suggest to

you, and at the same time to beg, Socrates, that I may have not less, but

more indulgence conceded to me in what I am about to say.  Which favour, if

I am right in asking, I hope that you will be ready to grant.



SOCRATES:  Certainly, Critias, we will grant your request, and we will

grant the same by anticipation to Hermocrates, as well as to you and

Timaeus; for I have no doubt that when his turn comes a little while hence,

he will make the same request which you have made.  In order, then, that he

may provide himself with a fresh beginning, and not be compelled to say the

same things over again, let him understand that the indulgence is already

extended by anticipation to him.  And now, friend Critias, I will announce

to you the judgment of the theatre.  They are of opinion that the last

performer was wonderfully successful, and that you will need a great deal

of indulgence before you will be able to take his place.



HERMOCRATES:  The warning, Socrates, which you have addressed to him, I

must also take to myself.  But remember, Critias, that faint heart never

yet raised a trophy; and therefore you must go and attack the argument like

a man.  First invoke Apollo and the Muses, and then let us hear you sound

the praises and show forth the virtues of your ancient citizens.



CRITIAS:  Friend Hermocrates, you, who are stationed last and have another

in front of you, have not lost heart as yet; the gravity of the situation

will soon be revealed to you; meanwhile I accept your exhortations and

encouragements.  But besides the gods and goddesses whom you have

mentioned, I would specially invoke Mnemosyne; for all the important part

of my discourse is dependent on her favour, and if I can recollect and

recite enough of what was said by the priests and brought hither by Solon,

I doubt not that I shall satisfy the requirements of this theatre.  And

now, making no more excuses, I will proceed.



Let me begin by observing first of all, that nine thousand was the sum of

years which had elapsed since the war which was said to have taken place

between those who dwelt outside the pillars of Heracles and all who dwelt

within them; this war I am going to describe.  Of the combatants on the one

side, the city of Athens was reported to have been the leader and to have

fought out the war; the combatants on the other side were commanded by the

kings of Atlantis, which, as I was saying, was an island greater in extent

than Libya and Asia, and when afterwards sunk by an earthquake, became an

impassable barrier of mud to voyagers sailing from hence to any part of the

ocean.  The progress of the history will unfold the various nations of

barbarians and families of Hellenes which then existed, as they

successively appear on the scene; but I must describe first of all the

Athenians of that day, and their enemies who fought with them, and then the

respective powers and governments of the two kingdoms.  Let us give the

precedence to Athens.



In the days of old, the gods had the whole earth distributed among them by

allotment (Cp. Polit.)  There was no quarrelling; for you cannot rightly

suppose that the gods did not know what was proper for each of them to

have, or, knowing this, that they would seek to procure for themselves by

contention that which more properly belonged to others.  They all of them

by just apportionment obtained what they wanted, and peopled their own

districts; and when they had peopled them they tended us, their nurselings

and possessions, as shepherds tend their flocks, excepting only that they

did not use blows or bodily force, as shepherds do, but governed us like

pilots from the stern of the vessel, which is an easy way of guiding

animals, holding our souls by the rudder of persuasion according to their

own pleasure;--thus did they guide all mortal creatures.  Now different

gods had their allotments in different places which they set in order. 

Hephaestus and Athene, who were brother and sister, and sprang from the

same father, having a common nature, and being united also in the love of

philosophy and art, both obtained as their common portion this land, which

was naturally adapted for wisdom and virtue; and there they implanted brave

children of the soil, and put into their minds the order of government;

their names are preserved, but their actions have disappeared by reason of

the destruction of those who received the tradition, and the lapse of ages. 

For when there were any survivors, as I have already said, they were men

who dwelt in the mountains; and they were ignorant of the art of writing,

and had heard only the names of the chiefs of the land, but very little

about their actions.  The names they were willing enough to give to their

children; but the virtues and the laws of their predecessors, they knew

only by obscure traditions; and as they themselves and their children

lacked for many generations the necessaries of life, they directed their

attention to the supply of their wants, and of them they conversed, to the

neglect of events that had happened in times long past; for mythology and

the enquiry into antiquity are first introduced into cities when they begin

to have leisure (Cp. Arist. Metaphys.), and when they see that the

necessaries of life have already been provided, but not before.  And this

is the reason why the names of the ancients have been preserved to us and

not their actions.  This I infer because Solon said that the priests in

their narrative of that war mentioned most of the names which are recorded

prior to the time of Theseus, such as Cecrops, and Erechtheus, and

Erichthonius, and Erysichthon, and the names of the women in like manner. 

Moreover, since military pursuits were then common to men and women, the

men of those days in accordance with the custom of the time set up a figure

and image of the goddess in full armour, to be a testimony that all animals

which associate together, male as well as female, may, if they please,

practise in common the virtue which belongs to them without distinction of

sex.



Now the country was inhabited in those days by various classes of

citizens;--there were artisans, and there were husbandmen, and there was

also a warrior class originally set apart by divine men.  The latter dwelt

by themselves, and had all things suitable for nurture and education;

neither had any of them anything of their own, but they regarded all that

they had as common property; nor did they claim to receive of the other

citizens anything more than their necessary food.  And they practised all

the pursuits which we yesterday described as those of our imaginary

guardians.  Concerning the country the Egyptian priests said what is not

only probable but manifestly true, that the boundaries were in those days

fixed by the Isthmus, and that in the direction of the continent they

extended as far as the heights of Cithaeron and Parnes; the boundary line

came down in the direction of the sea, having the district of Oropus on the

right, and with the river Asopus as the limit on the left.  The land was

the best in the world, and was therefore able in those days to support a

vast army, raised from the surrounding people.  Even the remnant of Attica

which now exists may compare with any region in the world for the variety

and excellence of its fruits and the suitableness of its pastures to every

sort of animal, which proves what I am saying; but in those days the

country was fair as now and yielded far more abundant produce.  How shall I

establish my words? and what part of it can be truly called a remnant of

the land that then was?  The whole country is only a long promontory

extending far into the sea away from the rest of the continent, while the

surrounding basin of the sea is everywhere deep in the neighbourhood of the

shore.  Many great deluges have taken place during the nine thousand years,

for that is the number of years which have elapsed since the time of which

I am speaking; and during all this time and through so many changes, there

has never been any considerable accumulation of the soil coming down from

the mountains, as in other places, but the earth has fallen away all round

and sunk out of sight.  The consequence is, that in comparison of what then

was, there are remaining only the bones of the wasted body, as they may be

called, as in the case of small islands, all the richer and softer parts of

the soil having fallen away, and the mere skeleton of the land being left. 

But in the primitive state of the country, its mountains were high hills

covered with soil, and the plains, as they are termed by us, of Phelleus

were full of rich earth, and there was abundance of wood in the mountains. 

Of this last the traces still remain, for although some of the mountains

now only afford sustenance to bees, not so very long ago there were still

to be seen roofs of timber cut from trees growing there, which were of a

size sufficient to cover the largest houses; and there were many other high

trees, cultivated by man and bearing abundance of food for cattle. 

Moreover, the land reaped the benefit of the annual rainfall, not as now

losing the water which flows off the bare earth into the sea, but, having

an abundant supply in all places, and receiving it into herself and

treasuring it up in the close clay soil, it let off into the hollows the

streams which it absorbed from the heights, providing everywhere abundant

fountains and rivers, of which there may still be observed sacred memorials

in places where fountains once existed; and this proves the truth of what I

am saying.



Such was the natural state of the country, which was cultivated, as we may

well believe, by true husbandmen, who made husbandry their business, and

were lovers of honour, and of a noble nature, and had a soil the best in

the world, and abundance of water, and in the heaven above an excellently

attempered climate.  Now the city in those days was arranged on this wise. 

In the first place the Acropolis was not as now.  For the fact is that a

single night of excessive rain washed away the earth and laid bare the

rock; at the same time there were earthquakes, and then occurred the

extraordinary inundation, which was the third before the great destruction

of Deucalion.  But in primitive times the hill of the Acropolis extended to

the Eridanus and Ilissus, and included the Pnyx on one side, and the

Lycabettus as a boundary on the opposite side to the Pnyx, and was all well

covered with soil, and level at the top, except in one or two places. 

Outside the Acropolis and under the sides of the hill there dwelt artisans,

and such of the husbandmen as were tilling the ground near; the warrior

class dwelt by themselves around the temples of Athene and Hephaestus at

the summit, which moreover they had enclosed with a single fence like the

garden of a single house.  On the north side they had dwellings in common

and had erected halls for dining in winter, and had all the buildings which

they needed for their common life, besides temples, but there was no

adorning of them with gold and silver, for they made no use of these for

any purpose; they took a middle course between meanness and ostentation,

and built modest houses in which they and their children's children grew

old, and they handed them down to others who were like themselves, always

the same.  But in summer-time they left their gardens and gymnasia and

dining halls, and then the southern side of the hill was made use of by

them for the same purpose.  Where the Acropolis now is there was a

fountain, which was choked by the earthquake, and has left only the few

small streams which still exist in the vicinity, but in those days the

fountain gave an abundant supply of water for all and of suitable

temperature in summer and in winter.  This is how they dwelt, being the

guardians of their own citizens and the leaders of the Hellenes, who were

their willing followers.  And they took care to preserve the same number of

men and women through all time, being so many as were required for warlike

purposes, then as now--that is to say, about twenty thousand.  Such were

the ancient Athenians, and after this manner they righteously administered

their own land and the rest of Hellas; they were renowned all over Europe

and Asia for the beauty of their persons and for the many virtues of their

souls, and of all men who lived in those days they were the most

illustrious.  And next, if I have not forgotten what I heard when I was a

child, I will impart to you the character and origin of their adversaries. 

For friends should not keep their stories to themselves, but have them in

common.



Yet, before proceeding further in the narrative, I ought to warn you, that

you must not be surprised if you should perhaps hear Hellenic names given

to foreigners.  I will tell you the reason of this:  Solon, who was

intending to use the tale for his poem, enquired into the meaning of the

names, and found that the early Egyptians in writing them down had

translated them into their own language, and he recovered the meaning of

the several names and when copying them out again translated them into our

language.  My great-grandfather, Dropides, had the original writing, which

is still in my possession, and was carefully studied by me when I was a

child.  Therefore if you hear names such as are used in this country, you

must not be surprised, for I have told how they came to be introduced.  The

tale, which was of great length, began as follows:--



I have before remarked in speaking of the allotments of the gods, that they

distributed the whole earth into portions differing in extent, and made for

themselves temples and instituted sacrifices.  And Poseidon, receiving for

his lot the island of Atlantis, begat children by a mortal woman, and

settled them in a part of the island, which I will describe.  Looking

towards the sea, but in the centre of the whole island, there was a plain

which is said to have been the fairest of all plains and very fertile. 

Near the plain again, and also in the centre of the island at a distance of

about fifty stadia, there was a mountain not very high on any side.  In

this mountain there dwelt one of the earth-born primeval men of that

country, whose name was Evenor, and he had a wife named Leucippe, and they

had an only daughter who was called Cleito.  The maiden had already reached

womanhood, when her father and mother died; Poseidon fell in love with her

and had intercourse with her, and breaking the ground, inclosed the hill in

which she dwelt all round, making alternate zones of sea and land larger

and smaller, encircling one another; there were two of land and three of

water, which he turned as with a lathe, each having its circumference

equidistant every way from the centre, so that no man could get to the

island, for ships and voyages were not as yet.  He himself, being a god,

found no difficulty in making special arrangements for the centre island,

bringing up two springs of water from beneath the earth, one of warm water

and the other of cold, and making every variety of food to spring up

abundantly from the soil.  He also begat and brought up five pairs of twin

male children; and dividing the island of Atlantis into ten portions, he

gave to the first-born of the eldest pair his mother's dwelling and the

surrounding allotment, which was the largest and best, and made him king

over the rest; the others he made princes, and gave them rule over many

men, and a large territory.  And he named them all; the eldest, who was the

first king, he named Atlas, and after him the whole island and the ocean

were called Atlantic.  To his twin brother, who was born after him, and

obtained as his lot the extremity of the island towards the pillars of

Heracles, facing the country which is now called the region of Gades in

that part of the world, he gave the name which in the Hellenic language is

Eumelus, in the language of the country which is named after him, Gadeirus. 

Of the second pair of twins he called one Ampheres, and the other Evaemon. 

To the elder of the third pair of twins he gave the name Mneseus, and

Autochthon to the one who followed him.  Of the fourth pair of twins he

called the elder Elasippus, and the younger Mestor.  And of the fifth pair

he gave to the elder the name of Azaes, and to the younger that of

Diaprepes.  All these and their descendants for many generations were the

inhabitants and rulers of divers islands in the open sea; and also, as has

been already said, they held sway in our direction over the country within

the pillars as far as Egypt and Tyrrhenia.  Now Atlas had a numerous and

honourable family, and they retained the kingdom, the eldest son handing it

on to his eldest for many generations; and they had such an amount of

wealth as was never before possessed by kings and potentates, and is not

likely ever to be again, and they were furnished with everything which they

needed, both in the city and country.  For because of the greatness of

their empire many things were brought to them from foreign countries, and

the island itself provided most of what was required by them for the uses

of life.  In the first place, they dug out of the earth whatever was to be

found there, solid as well as fusile, and that which is now only a name and

was then something more than a name, orichalcum, was dug out of the earth

in many parts of the island, being more precious in those days than

anything except gold.  There was an abundance of wood for carpenter's work,

and sufficient maintenance for tame and wild animals.  Moreover, there were

a great number of elephants in the island; for as there was provision for

all other sorts of animals, both for those which live in lakes and marshes

and rivers, and also for those which live in mountains and on plains, so

there was for the animal which is the largest and most voracious of all. 

Also whatever fragrant things there now are in the earth, whether roots, or

herbage, or woods, or essences which distil from fruit and flower, grew and

thrived in that land; also the fruit which admits of cultivation, both the

dry sort, which is given us for nourishment and any other which we use for

food--we call them all by the common name of pulse, and the fruits having a

hard rind, affording drinks and meats and ointments, and good store of

chestnuts and the like, which furnish pleasure and amusement, and are

fruits which spoil with keeping, and the pleasant kinds of dessert, with

which we console ourselves after dinner, when we are tired of eating--all

these that sacred island which then beheld the light of the sun, brought

forth fair and wondrous and in infinite abundance.  With such blessings the

earth freely furnished them; meanwhile they went on constructing their

temples and palaces and harbours and docks.  And they arranged the whole

country in the following manner:--



First of all they bridged over the zones of sea which surrounded the

ancient metropolis, making a road to and from the royal palace.  And at the

very beginning they built the palace in the habitation of the god and of

their ancestors, which they continued to ornament in successive

generations, every king surpassing the one who went before him to the

utmost of his power, until they made the building a marvel to behold for

size and for beauty.  And beginning from the sea they bored a canal of

three hundred feet in width and one hundred feet in depth and fifty stadia

in length, which they carried through to the outermost zone, making a

passage from the sea up to this, which became a harbour, and leaving an

opening sufficient to enable the largest vessels to find ingress. 

Moreover, they divided at the bridges the zones of land which parted the

zones of sea, leaving room for a single trireme to pass out of one zone

into another, and they covered over the channels so as to leave a way

underneath for the ships; for the banks were raised considerably above the

water.  Now the largest of the zones into which a passage was cut from the

sea was three stadia in breadth, and the zone of land which came next of

equal breadth; but the next two zones, the one of water, the other of land,

were two stadia, and the one which surrounded the central island was a

stadium only in width.  The island in which the palace was situated had a

diameter of five stadia.  All this including the zones and the bridge,

which was the sixth part of a stadium in width, they surrounded by a stone

wall on every side, placing towers and gates on the bridges where the sea

passed in.  The stone which was used in the work they quarried from

underneath the centre island, and from underneath the zones, on the outer

as well as the inner side.  One kind was white, another black, and a third

red, and as they quarried, they at the same time hollowed out double docks,

having roofs formed out of the native rock.  Some of their buildings were

simple, but in others they put together different stones, varying the

colour to please the eye, and to be a natural source of delight.  The

entire circuit of the wall, which went round the outermost zone, they

covered with a coating of brass, and the circuit of the next wall they

coated with tin, and the third, which encompassed the citadel, flashed with

the red light of orichalcum.  The palaces in the interior of the citadel

were constructed on this wise:--In the centre was a holy temple dedicated

to Cleito and Poseidon, which remained inaccessible, and was surrounded by

an enclosure of gold; this was the spot where the family of the ten princes

first saw the light, and thither the people annually brought the fruits of

the earth in their season from all the ten portions, to be an offering to

each of the ten.  Here was Poseidon's own temple which was a stadium in

length, and half a stadium in width, and of a proportionate height, having

a strange barbaric appearance.  All the outside of the temple, with the

exception of the pinnacles, they covered with silver, and the pinnacles

with gold.  In the interior of the temple the roof was of ivory, curiously

wrought everywhere with gold and silver and orichalcum; and all the other

parts, the walls and pillars and floor, they coated with orichalcum.  In

the temple they placed statues of gold:  there was the god himself standing

in a chariot--the charioteer of six winged horses--and of such a size that

he touched the roof of the building with his head; around him there were a

hundred Nereids riding on dolphins, for such was thought to be the number

of them by the men of those days.  There were also in the interior of the

temple other images which had been dedicated by private persons.  And

around the temple on the outside were placed statues of gold of all the

descendants of the ten kings and of their wives, and there were many other

great offerings of kings and of private persons, coming both from the city

itself and from the foreign cities over which they held sway.  There was an

altar too, which in size and workmanship corresponded to this magnificence,

and the palaces, in like manner, answered to the greatness of the kingdom

and the glory of the temple.



In the next place, they had fountains, one of cold and another of hot

water, in gracious plenty flowing; and they were wonderfully adapted for

use by reason of the pleasantness and excellence of their waters.  They

constructed buildings about them and planted suitable trees, also they made

cisterns, some open to the heaven, others roofed over, to be used in winter

as warm baths; there were the kings' baths, and the baths of private

persons, which were kept apart; and there were separate baths for women,

and for horses and cattle, and to each of them they gave as much adornment

as was suitable.  Of the water which ran off they carried some to the grove

of Poseidon, where were growing all manner of trees of wonderful height and

beauty, owing to the excellence of the soil, while the remainder was

conveyed by aqueducts along the bridges to the outer circles; and there

were many temples built and dedicated to many gods; also gardens and places

of exercise, some for men, and others for horses in both of the two islands

formed by the zones; and in the centre of the larger of the two there was

set apart a race-course of a stadium in width, and in length allowed to

extend all round the island, for horses to race in.  Also there were guard-

houses at intervals for the guards, the more trusted of whom were appointed

to keep watch in the lesser zone, which was nearer the Acropolis; while the

most trusted of all had houses given them within the citadel, near the

persons of the kings.  The docks were full of triremes and naval stores,

and all things were quite ready for use.  Enough of the plan of the royal

palace.



Leaving the palace and passing out across the three harbours, you came to a

wall which began at the sea and went all round:  this was everywhere

distant fifty stadia from the largest zone or harbour, and enclosed the

whole, the ends meeting at the mouth of the channel which led to the sea. 

The entire area was densely crowded with habitations; and the canal and the

largest of the harbours were full of vessels and merchants coming from all

parts, who, from their numbers, kept up a multitudinous sound of human

voices, and din and clatter of all sorts night and day.



I have described the city and the environs of the ancient palace nearly in

the words of Solon, and now I must endeavour to represent to you the nature

and arrangement of the rest of the land.  The whole country was said by him

to be very lofty and precipitous on the side of the sea, but the country

immediately about and surrounding the city was a level plain, itself

surrounded by mountains which descended towards the sea; it was smooth and

even, and of an oblong shape, extending in one direction three thousand

stadia, but across the centre inland it was two thousand stadia.  This part

of the island looked towards the south, and was sheltered from the north. 

The surrounding mountains were celebrated for their number and size and

beauty, far beyond any which still exist, having in them also many wealthy

villages of country folk, and rivers, and lakes, and meadows supplying food

enough for every animal, wild or tame, and much wood of various sorts,

abundant for each and every kind of work.



I will now describe the plain, as it was fashioned by nature and by the

labours of many generations of kings through long ages.  It was for the

most part rectangular and oblong, and where falling out of the straight

line followed the circular ditch.  The depth, and width, and length of this

ditch were incredible, and gave the impression that a work of such extent,

in addition to so many others, could never have been artificial.

Nevertheless I must say what I was told.  It was excavated to the depth of

a hundred feet, and its breadth was a stadium everywhere; it was carried

round the whole of the plain, and was ten thousand stadia in length.  It

received the streams which came down from the mountains, and winding round

the plain and meeting at the city, was there let off into the sea.  Further

inland, likewise, straight canals of a hundred feet in width were cut from

it through the plain, and again let off into the ditch leading to the sea: 

these canals were at intervals of a hundred stadia, and by them they

brought down the wood from the mountains to the city, and conveyed the

fruits of the earth in ships, cutting transverse passages from one canal

into another, and to the city.  Twice in the year they gathered the fruits

of the earth--in winter having the benefit of the rains of heaven, and in

summer the water which the land supplied by introducing streams from the

canals.



As to the population, each of the lots in the plain had to find a leader

for the men who were fit for military service, and the size of a lot was a

square of ten stadia each way, and the total number of all the lots was

sixty thousand.  And of the inhabitants of the mountains and of the rest of

the country there was also a vast multitude, which was distributed among

the lots and had leaders assigned to them according to their districts and

villages.  The leader was required to furnish for the war the sixth portion

of a war-chariot, so as to make up a total of ten thousand chariots; also

two horses and riders for them, and a pair of chariot-horses without a

seat, accompanied by a horseman who could fight on foot carrying a small

shield, and having a charioteer who stood behind the man-at-arms to guide

the two horses; also, he was bound to furnish two heavy-armed soldiers, two

archers, two slingers, three stone-shooters and three javelin-men, who were

light-armed, and four sailors to make up the complement of twelve hundred

ships.  Such was the military order of the royal city--the order of the

other nine governments varied, and it would be wearisome to recount their

several differences.



As to offices and honours, the following was the arrangement from the

first.  Each of the ten kings in his own division and in his own city had

the absolute control of the citizens, and, in most cases, of the laws,

punishing and slaying whomsoever he would.  Now the order of precedence

among them and their mutual relations were regulated by the commands of

Poseidon which the law had handed down.  These were inscribed by the first

kings on a pillar of orichalcum, which was situated in the middle of the

island, at the temple of Poseidon, whither the kings were gathered together

every fifth and every sixth year alternately, thus giving equal honour to

the odd and to the even number.  And when they were gathered together they

consulted about their common interests, and enquired if any one had

transgressed in anything, and passed judgment, and before they passed

judgment they gave their pledges to one another on this wise:--There were

bulls who had the range of the temple of Poseidon; and the ten kings, being

left alone in the temple, after they had offered prayers to the god that

they might capture the victim which was acceptable to him, hunted the

bulls, without weapons, but with staves and nooses; and the bull which they

caught they led up to the pillar and cut its throat over the top of it so

that the blood fell upon the sacred inscription.  Now on the pillar,

besides the laws, there was inscribed an oath invoking mighty curses on the

disobedient.  When therefore, after slaying the bull in the accustomed

manner, they had burnt its limbs, they filled a bowl of wine and cast in a

clot of blood for each of them; the rest of the victim they put in the

fire, after having purified the column all round.  Then they drew from the

bowl in golden cups, and pouring a libation on the fire, they swore that

they would judge according to the laws on the pillar, and would punish him

who in any point had already transgressed them, and that for the future

they would not, if they could help, offend against the writing on the

pillar, and would neither command others, nor obey any ruler who commanded

them, to act otherwise than according to the laws of their father Poseidon. 

This was the prayer which each of them offered up for himself and for his

descendants, at the same time drinking and dedicating the cup out of which

he drank in the temple of the god; and after they had supped and satisfied

their needs, when darkness came on, and the fire about the sacrifice was

cool, all of them put on most beautiful azure robes, and, sitting on the

ground, at night, over the embers of the sacrifices by which they had

sworn, and extinguishing all the fire about the temple, they received and

gave judgment, if any of them had an accusation to bring against any one;

and when they had given judgment, at daybreak they wrote down their

sentences on a golden tablet, and dedicated it together with their robes to

be a memorial.



There were many special laws affecting the several kings inscribed about

the temples, but the most important was the following:  They were not to

take up arms against one another, and they were all to come to the rescue

if any one in any of their cities attempted to overthrow the royal house;

like their ancestors, they were to deliberate in common about war and other

matters, giving the supremacy to the descendants of Atlas.  And the king

was not to have the power of life and death over any of his kinsmen unless

he had the assent of the majority of the ten.



Such was the vast power which the god settled in the lost island of

Atlantis; and this he afterwards directed against our land for the

following reasons, as tradition tells:  For many generations, as long as

the divine nature lasted in them, they were obedient to the laws, and

well-affectioned towards the god, whose seed they were; for they possessed

true and in every way great spirits, uniting gentleness with wisdom in the

various chances of life, and in their intercourse with one another.  They

despised everything but virtue, caring little for their present state of

life, and thinking lightly of the possession of gold and other property,

which seemed only a burden to them; neither were they intoxicated by

luxury; nor did wealth deprive them of their self-control; but they were

sober, and saw clearly that all these goods are increased by virtue and

friendship with one another, whereas by too great regard and respect for

them, they are lost and friendship with them.  By such reflections and by

the continuance in them of a divine nature, the qualities which we have

described grew and increased among them; but when the divine portion began

to fade away, and became diluted too often and too much with the mortal

admixture, and the human nature got the upper hand, they then, being unable

to bear their fortune, behaved unseemly, and to him who had an eye to see

grew visibly debased, for they were losing the fairest of their precious

gifts; but to those who had no eye to see the true happiness, they appeared

glorious and blessed at the very time when they were full of avarice and

unrighteous power.  Zeus, the god of gods, who rules according to law, and

is able to see into such things, perceiving that an honourable race was in

a woeful plight, and wanting to inflict punishment on them, that they might

be chastened and improve, collected all the gods into their most holy

habitation, which, being placed in the centre of the world, beholds all

created things.  And when he had called them together, he spake as

follows--*



* The rest of the Dialogue of Critias has been lost.











End 



Crito

by Plato

Translated by Benjamin Jowett






INTRODUCTION.



The Crito seems intended to exhibit the character of Socrates in one light

only, not as the philosopher, fulfilling a divine mission and trusting in

the will of heaven, but simply as the good citizen, who having been

unjustly condemned is willing to give up his life in obedience to the laws

of the state...



The days of Socrates are drawing to a close; the fatal ship has been seen

off Sunium, as he is informed by his aged friend and contemporary Crito,

who visits him before the dawn has broken; he himself has been warned in a

dream that on the third day he must depart.  Time is precious, and Crito

has come early in order to gain his consent to a plan of escape.  This can

be easily accomplished by his friends, who will incur no danger in making

the attempt to save him, but will be disgraced for ever if they allow him

to perish.  He should think of his duty to his children, and not play into

the hands of his enemies.  Money is already provided by Crito as well as by

Simmias and others, and he will have no difficulty in finding friends in

Thessaly and other places.



Socrates is afraid that Crito is but pressing upon him the opinions of the

many:  whereas, all his life long he has followed the dictates of reason

only and the opinion of the one wise or skilled man.  There was a time when

Crito himself had allowed the propriety of this.  And although some one

will say 'the many can kill us,' that makes no difference; but a good life,

in other words, a just and honourable life, is alone to be valued.  All

considerations of loss of reputation or injury to his children should be

dismissed:  the only question is whether he would be right in attempting to

escape.  Crito, who is a disinterested person not having the fear of death

before his eyes, shall answer this for him.  Before he was condemned they

had often held discussions, in which they agreed that no man should either

do evil, or return evil for evil, or betray the right.  Are these

principles to be altered because the circumstances of Socrates are altered?

Crito admits that they remain the same.  Then is his escape consistent with

the maintenance of them?  To this Crito is unable or unwilling to reply.



Socrates proceeds:--Suppose the Laws of Athens to come and remonstrate with

him:  they will ask 'Why does he seek to overturn them?' and if he replies,

'they have injured him,' will not the Laws answer, 'Yes, but was that the

agreement?  Has he any objection to make to them which would justify him in 

overturning them?  Was he not brought into the world and educated by their

help, and are they not his parents?  He might have left Athens and gone

where he pleased, but he has lived there for seventy years more constantly

than any other citizen.'  Thus he has clearly shown that he acknowledged

the agreement, which he cannot now break without dishonour to himself and

danger to his friends.  Even in the course of the trial he might have

proposed exile as the penalty, but then he declared that he preferred death

to exile.  And whither will he direct his footsteps?  In any well-ordered

state the Laws will consider him as an enemy.  Possibly in a land of

misrule like Thessaly he may be welcomed at first, and the unseemly

narrative of his escape will be regarded by the inhabitants as an amusing

tale.  But if he offends them he will have to learn another sort of lesson.

Will he continue to give lectures in virtue?  That would hardly be decent.

And how will his children be the gainers if he takes them into Thessaly,

and deprives them of Athenian citizenship?  Or if he leaves them behind,

does he expect that they will be better taken care of by his friends

because he is in Thessaly?  Will not true friends care for them equally

whether he is alive or dead?



Finally, they exhort him to think of justice first, and of life and

children afterwards.  He may now depart in peace and innocence, a sufferer

and not a doer of evil.  But if he breaks agreements, and returns evil for

evil, they will be angry with him while he lives; and their brethren the

Laws of the world below will receive him as an enemy.  Such is the mystic

voice which is always murmuring in his ears.



That Socrates was not a good citizen was a charge made against him during

his lifetime, which has been often repeated in later ages.  The crimes of

Alcibiades, Critias, and Charmides, who had been his pupils, were still

recent in the memory of the now restored democracy.  The fact that he had

been neutral in the death-struggle of Athens was not likely to conciliate

popular good-will.  Plato, writing probably in the next generation,

undertakes the defence of his friend and master in this particular, not to

the Athenians of his day, but to posterity and the world at large.



Whether such an incident ever really occurred as the visit of Crito and the

proposal of escape is uncertain:  Plato could easily have invented far more

than that (Phaedr.); and in the selection of Crito, the aged friend, as the

fittest person to make the proposal to Socrates, we seem to recognize the

hand of the artist.  Whether any one who has been subjected by the laws of

his country to an unjust judgment is right in attempting to escape, is a

thesis about which casuists might disagree.  Shelley (Prose Works) is of

opinion that Socrates 'did well to die,' but not for the 'sophistical'

reasons which Plato has put into his mouth.  And there would be no

difficulty in arguing that Socrates should have lived and preferred to a

glorious death the good which he might still be able to perform.  'A

rhetorician would have had much to say upon that point.'  It may be

observed however that Plato never intended to answer the question of

casuistry, but only to exhibit the ideal of patient virtue which refuses to

do the least evil in order to avoid the greatest, and to show his master

maintaining in death the opinions which he had professed in his life.  Not

'the world,' but the 'one wise man,' is still the paradox of Socrates in

his last hours.  He must be guided by reason, although her conclusions may

be fatal to him.  The remarkable sentiment that the wicked can do neither

good nor evil is true, if taken in the sense, which he means, of moral

evil; in his own words, 'they cannot make a man wise or foolish.'



This little dialogue is a perfect piece of dialectic, in which granting the

'common principle,' there is no escaping from the conclusion.  It is

anticipated at the beginning by the dream of Socrates and the parody of

Homer.  The personification of the Laws, and of their brethren the Laws in

the world below, is one of the noblest and boldest figures of speech which

occur in Plato.





CRITO



by



Plato



Translated by Benjamin Jowett





PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE:  Socrates, Crito.



SCENE:  The Prison of Socrates.





SOCRATES:  Why have you come at this hour, Crito? it must be quite early.



CRITO:  Yes, certainly.



SOCRATES:  What is the exact time?



CRITO:  The dawn is breaking.



SOCRATES:  I wonder that the keeper of the prison would let you in.



CRITO:  He knows me because I often come, Socrates; moreover.  I have done

him a kindness.



SOCRATES:  And are you only just arrived?



CRITO:  No, I came some time ago.



SOCRATES:  Then why did you sit and say nothing, instead of at once

awakening me?



CRITO:  I should not have liked myself, Socrates, to be in such great

trouble and unrest as you are--indeed I should not:  I have been watching

with amazement your peaceful slumbers; and for that reason I did not awake

you, because I wished to minimize the pain.  I have always thought you to

be of a happy disposition; but never did I see anything like the easy,

tranquil manner in which you bear this calamity.



SOCRATES:  Why, Crito, when a man has reached my age he ought not to be

repining at the approach of death.



CRITO:  And yet other old men find themselves in similar misfortunes, and

age does not prevent them from repining.



SOCRATES:  That is true.  But you have not told me why you come at this

early hour.



CRITO:  I come to bring you a message which is sad and painful; not, as I

believe, to yourself, but to all of us who are your friends, and saddest of

all to me.



SOCRATES:  What?  Has the ship come from Delos, on the arrival of which I

am to die?



CRITO:  No, the ship has not actually arrived, but she will probably be

here to-day, as persons who have come from Sunium tell me that they have

left her there; and therefore to-morrow, Socrates, will be the last day of

your life.



SOCRATES:  Very well, Crito; if such is the will of God, I am willing; but

my belief is that there will be a delay of a day.



CRITO:  Why do you think so?



SOCRATES:  I will tell you.  I am to die on the day after the arrival of

the ship?



CRITO:  Yes; that is what the authorities say.



SOCRATES:  But I do not think that the ship will be here until to-morrow;

this I infer from a vision which I had last night, or rather only just now,

when you fortunately allowed me to sleep.



CRITO:  And what was the nature of the vision?



SOCRATES:  There appeared to me the likeness of a woman, fair and comely,

clothed in bright raiment, who called to me and said:  O Socrates,



'The third day hence to fertile Phthia shalt thou go.'  (Homer, Il.)



CRITO:  What a singular dream, Socrates!



SOCRATES:  There can be no doubt about the meaning, Crito, I think.



CRITO:  Yes; the meaning is only too clear.  But, oh! my beloved Socrates,

let me entreat you once more to take my advice and escape.  For if you die

I shall not only lose a friend who can never be replaced, but there is

another evil:  people who do not know you and me will believe that I might

have saved you if I had been willing to give money, but that I did not

care.  Now, can there be a worse disgrace than this--that I should be

thought to value money more than the life of a friend?  For the many will

not be persuaded that I wanted you to escape, and that you refused.



SOCRATES:  But why, my dear Crito, should we care about the opinion of the

many?  Good men, and they are the only persons who are worth considering,

will think of these things truly as they occurred.



CRITO:  But you see, Socrates, that the opinion of the many must be

regarded, for what is now happening shows that they can do the greatest

evil to any one who has lost their good opinion.



SOCRATES:  I only wish it were so, Crito; and that the many could do the

greatest evil; for then they would also be able to do the greatest good--

and what a fine thing this would be!  But in reality they can do neither;

for they cannot make a man either wise or foolish; and whatever they do is

the result of chance.



CRITO:  Well, I will not dispute with you; but please to tell me, Socrates,

whether you are not acting out of regard to me and your other friends:  are

you not afraid that if you escape from prison we may get into trouble with

the informers for having stolen you away, and lose either the whole or a

great part of our property; or that even a worse evil may happen to us? 

Now, if you fear on our account, be at ease; for in order to save you, we

ought surely to run this, or even a greater risk; be persuaded, then, and

do as I say.



SOCRATES:  Yes, Crito, that is one fear which you mention, but by no means

the only one.



CRITO:  Fear not--there are persons who are willing to get you out of

prison at no great cost; and as for the informers they are far from being

exorbitant in their demands--a little money will satisfy them.  My means,

which are certainly ample, are at your service, and if you have a scruple

about spending all mine, here are strangers who will give you the use of

theirs; and one of them, Simmias the Theban, has brought a large sum of

money for this very purpose; and Cebes and many others are prepared to

spend their money in helping you to escape.  I say, therefore, do not

hesitate on our account, and do not say, as you did in the court (compare

Apol.), that you will have a difficulty in knowing what to do with yourself

anywhere else.  For men will love you in other places to which you may go,

and not in Athens only; there are friends of mine in Thessaly, if you like

to go to them, who will value and protect you, and no Thessalian will give

you any trouble.  Nor can I think that you are at all justified, Socrates,

in betraying your own life when you might be saved; in acting thus you are

playing into the hands of your enemies, who are hurrying on your

destruction.  And further I should say that you are deserting your own

children; for you might bring them up and educate them; instead of which

you go away and leave them, and they will have to take their chance; and if

they do not meet with the usual fate of orphans, there will be small thanks

to you.  No man should bring children into the world who is unwilling to

persevere to the end in their nurture and education.  But you appear to be

choosing the easier part, not the better and manlier, which would have been

more becoming in one who professes to care for virtue in all his actions,

like yourself.  And indeed, I am ashamed not only of you, but of us who are

your friends, when I reflect that the whole business will be attributed

entirely to our want of courage.  The trial need never have come on, or

might have been managed differently; and this last act, or crowning folly,

will seem to have occurred through our negligence and cowardice, who might

have saved you, if we had been good for anything; and you might have saved

yourself, for there was no difficulty at all.  See now, Socrates, how sad

and discreditable are the consequences, both to us and you.  Make up your

mind then, or rather have your mind already made up, for the time of

deliberation is over, and there is only one thing to be done, which must be

done this very night, and if we delay at all will be no longer practicable

or possible; I beseech you therefore, Socrates, be persuaded by me, and do

as I say.



SOCRATES:  Dear Crito, your zeal is invaluable, if a right one; but if

wrong, the greater the zeal the greater the danger; and therefore we ought

to consider whether I shall or shall not do as you say.  For I am and

always have been one of those natures who must be guided by reason,

whatever the reason may be which upon reflection appears to me to be the

best; and now that this chance has befallen me, I cannot repudiate my own

words:  the principles which I have hitherto honoured and revered I still

honour, and unless we can at once find other and better principles, I am

certain not to agree with you; no, not even if the power of the multitude

could inflict many more imprisonments, confiscations, deaths, frightening

us like children with hobgoblin terrors (compare Apol.).  What will be the

fairest way of considering the question?  Shall I return to your old

argument about the opinions of men?--we were saying that some of them are

to be regarded, and others not.  Now were we right in maintaining this

before I was condemned?  And has the argument which was once good now

proved to be talk for the sake of talking--mere childish nonsense?  That is

what I want to consider with your help, Crito:--whether, under my present

circumstances, the argument appears to be in any way different or not; and

is to be allowed by me or disallowed.  That argument, which, as I believe,

is maintained by many persons of authority, was to the effect, as I was

saying, that the opinions of some men are to be regarded, and of other men

not to be regarded.  Now you, Crito, are not going to die to-morrow--at

least, there is no human probability of this, and therefore you are

disinterested and not liable to be deceived by the circumstances in which

you are placed.  Tell me then, whether I am right in saying that some

opinions, and the opinions of some men only, are to be valued, and that

other opinions, and the opinions of other men, are not to be valued.  I ask

you whether I was right in maintaining this?



CRITO:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  The good are to be regarded, and not the bad?



CRITO:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And the opinions of the wise are good, and the opinions of the

unwise are evil?



CRITO:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And what was said about another matter?  Is the pupil who

devotes himself to the practice of gymnastics supposed to attend to the

praise and blame and opinion of every man, or of one man only--his

physician or trainer, whoever he may be?



CRITO:  Of one man only.



SOCRATES:  And he ought to fear the censure and welcome the praise of that

one only, and not of the many?



CRITO:  Clearly so.



SOCRATES:  And he ought to act and train, and eat and drink in the way

which seems good to his single master who has understanding, rather than

according to the opinion of all other men put together?



CRITO:  True.



SOCRATES:  And if he disobeys and disregards the opinion and approval of

the one, and regards the opinion of the many who have no understanding,

will he not suffer evil?



CRITO:  Certainly he will.



SOCRATES:  And what will the evil be, whither tending and what affecting,

in the disobedient person?



CRITO:  Clearly, affecting the body; that is what is destroyed by the evil.



SOCRATES:  Very good; and is not this true, Crito, of other things which we

need not separately enumerate?  In questions of just and unjust, fair and

foul, good and evil, which are the subjects of our present consultation,

ought we to follow the opinion of the many and to fear them; or the opinion

of the one man who has understanding? ought we not to fear and reverence

him more than all the rest of the world:  and if we desert him shall we not

destroy and injure that principle in us which may be assumed to be improved

by justice and deteriorated by injustice;--there is such a principle?



CRITO:  Certainly there is, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  Take a parallel instance:--if, acting under the advice of those

who have no understanding, we destroy that which is improved by health and

is deteriorated by disease, would life be worth having?  And that which has

been destroyed is--the body?



CRITO:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Could we live, having an evil and corrupted body?



CRITO:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  And will life be worth having, if that higher part of man be

destroyed, which is improved by justice and depraved by injustice?  Do we

suppose that principle, whatever it may be in man, which has to do with

justice and injustice, to be inferior to the body?



CRITO:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  More honourable than the body?



CRITO:  Far more.



SOCRATES:  Then, my friend, we must not regard what the many say of us: 

but what he, the one man who has understanding of just and unjust, will

say, and what the truth will say.  And therefore you begin in error when

you advise that we should regard the opinion of the many about just and

unjust, good and evil, honorable and dishonorable.--'Well,' some one will

say, 'but the many can kill us.'



CRITO:  Yes, Socrates; that will clearly be the answer.



SOCRATES:  And it is true; but still I find with surprise that the old

argument is unshaken as ever.  And I should like to know whether I may say

the same of another proposition--that not life, but a good life, is to be

chiefly valued?



CRITO:  Yes, that also remains unshaken.



SOCRATES:  And a good life is equivalent to a just and honorable one--that

holds also?



CRITO:  Yes, it does.



SOCRATES:  From these premisses I proceed to argue the question whether I

ought or ought not to try and escape without the consent of the Athenians: 

and if I am clearly right in escaping, then I will make the attempt; but if

not, I will abstain.  The other considerations which you mention, of money

and loss of character and the duty of educating one's children, are, I

fear, only the doctrines of the multitude, who would be as ready to restore

people to life, if they were able, as they are to put them to death--and

with as little reason.  But now, since the argument has thus far prevailed,

the only question which remains to be considered is, whether we shall do

rightly either in escaping or in suffering others to aid in our escape and

paying them in money and thanks, or whether in reality we shall not do

rightly; and if the latter, then death or any other calamity which may

ensue on my remaining here must not be allowed to enter into the

calculation.



CRITO:  I think that you are right, Socrates; how then shall we proceed?



SOCRATES:  Let us consider the matter together, and do you either refute me

if you can, and I will be convinced; or else cease, my dear friend, from

repeating to me that I ought to escape against the wishes of the Athenians: 

for I highly value your attempts to persuade me to do so, but I may not be

persuaded against my own better judgment.  And now please to consider my

first position, and try how you can best answer me.



CRITO:  I will.



SOCRATES:  Are we to say that we are never intentionally to do wrong, or

that in one way we ought and in another way we ought not to do wrong, or is

doing wrong always evil and dishonorable, as I was just now saying, and as

has been already acknowledged by us?  Are all our former admissions which

were made within a few days to be thrown away?  And have we, at our age,

been earnestly discoursing with one another all our life long only to

discover that we are no better than children?  Or, in spite of the opinion

of the many, and in spite of consequences whether better or worse, shall we

insist on the truth of what was then said, that injustice is always an evil

and dishonour to him who acts unjustly?  Shall we say so or not?



CRITO:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Then we must do no wrong?



CRITO:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  Nor when injured injure in return, as the many imagine; for we

must injure no one at all?  (E.g. compare Rep.)



CRITO:  Clearly not.



SOCRATES:  Again, Crito, may we do evil?



CRITO:  Surely not, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  And what of doing evil in return for evil, which is the morality

of the many--is that just or not?



CRITO:  Not just.



SOCRATES:  For doing evil to another is the same as injuring him?



CRITO:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  Then we ought not to retaliate or render evil for evil to any

one, whatever evil we may have suffered from him.  But I would have you

consider, Crito, whether you really mean what you are saying.  For this

opinion has never been held, and never will be held, by any considerable

number of persons; and those who are agreed and those who are not agreed

upon this point have no common ground, and can only despise one another

when they see how widely they differ.  Tell me, then, whether you agree

with and assent to my first principle, that neither injury nor retaliation

nor warding off evil by evil is ever right.  And shall that be the premiss

of our argument?  Or do you decline and dissent from this?  For so I have

ever thought, and continue to think; but, if you are of another opinion,

let me hear what you have to say.  If, however, you remain of the same mind

as formerly, I will proceed to the next step.



CRITO:  You may proceed, for I have not changed my mind.



SOCRATES:  Then I will go on to the next point, which may be put in the

form of a question:--Ought a man to do what he admits to be right, or ought

he to betray the right?



CRITO:  He ought to do what he thinks right.



SOCRATES:  But if this is true, what is the application?  In leaving the

prison against the will of the Athenians, do I wrong any? or rather do I

not wrong those whom I ought least to wrong?  Do I not desert the

principles which were acknowledged by us to be just--what do you say?



CRITO:  I cannot tell, Socrates, for I do not know.



SOCRATES:  Then consider the matter in this way:--Imagine that I am about

to play truant (you may call the proceeding by any name which you like),

and the laws and the government come and interrogate me:  'Tell us,

Socrates,' they say; 'what are you about? are you not going by an act of

yours to overturn us--the laws, and the whole state, as far as in you lies? 

Do you imagine that a state can subsist and not be overthrown, in which the

decisions of law have no power, but are set aside and trampled upon by

individuals?'  What will be our answer, Crito, to these and the like words? 

Any one, and especially a rhetorician, will have a good deal to say on

behalf of the law which requires a sentence to be carried out.  He will

argue that this law should not be set aside; and shall we reply, 'Yes; but

the state has injured us and given an unjust sentence.'  Suppose I say

that?



CRITO:  Very good, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  'And was that our agreement with you?' the law would answer; 'or

were you to abide by the sentence of the state?'  And if I were to express

my astonishment at their words, the law would probably add:  'Answer,

Socrates, instead of opening your eyes--you are in the habit of asking and

answering questions.  Tell us,--What complaint have you to make against us

which justifies you in attempting to destroy us and the state?  In the

first place did we not bring you into existence?  Your father married your

mother by our aid and begat you.  Say whether you have any objection to

urge against those of us who regulate marriage?'  None, I should reply. 

'Or against those of us who after birth regulate the nurture and education

of children, in which you also were trained?  Were not the laws, which have

the charge of education, right in commanding your father to train you in

music and gymnastic?'  Right, I should reply.  'Well then, since you were

brought into the world and nurtured and educated by us, can you deny in the

first place that you are our child and slave, as your fathers were before

you?  And if this is true you are not on equal terms with us; nor can you

think that you have a right to do to us what we are doing to you.  Would

you have any right to strike or revile or do any other evil to your father

or your master, if you had one, because you have been struck or reviled by

him, or received some other evil at his hands?--you would not say this? 

And because we think right to destroy you, do you think that you have any

right to destroy us in return, and your country as far as in you lies? 

Will you, O professor of true virtue, pretend that you are justified in

this?  Has a philosopher like you failed to discover that our country is

more to be valued and higher and holier far than mother or father or any

ancestor, and more to be regarded in the eyes of the gods and of men of

understanding? also to be soothed, and gently and reverently entreated when

angry, even more than a father, and either to be persuaded, or if not

persuaded, to be obeyed?  And when we are punished by her, whether with

imprisonment or stripes, the punishment is to be endured in silence; and if

she lead us to wounds or death in battle, thither we follow as is right;

neither may any one yield or retreat or leave his rank, but whether in

battle or in a court of law, or in any other place, he must do what his

city and his country order him; or he must change their view of what is

just:  and if he may do no violence to his father or mother, much less may

he do violence to his country.'  What answer shall we make to this, Crito? 

Do the laws speak truly, or do they not?



CRITO:  I think that they do.



SOCRATES:  Then the laws will say:  'Consider, Socrates, if we are speaking

truly that in your present attempt you are going to do us an injury.  For,

having brought you into the world, and nurtured and educated you, and given

you and every other citizen a share in every good which we had to give, we

further proclaim to any Athenian by the liberty which we allow him, that if

he does not like us when he has become of age and has seen the ways of the

city, and made our acquaintance, he may go where he pleases and take his

goods with him.  None of us laws will forbid him or interfere with him. 

Any one who does not like us and the city, and who wants to emigrate to a

colony or to any other city, may go where he likes, retaining his property. 

But he who has experience of the manner in which we order justice and

administer the state, and still remains, has entered into an implied

contract that he will do as we command him.  And he who disobeys us is, as

we maintain, thrice wrong:  first, because in disobeying us he is

disobeying his parents; secondly, because we are the authors of his

education; thirdly, because he has made an agreement with us that he will

duly obey our commands; and he neither obeys them nor convinces us that our

commands are unjust; and we do not rudely impose them, but give him the

alternative of obeying or convincing us;--that is what we offer, and he

does neither.



'These are the sort of accusations to which, as we were saying, you,

Socrates, will be exposed if you accomplish your intentions; you, above all

other Athenians.'  Suppose now I ask, why I rather than anybody else? they

will justly retort upon me that I above all other men have acknowledged the

agreement.  'There is clear proof,' they will say, 'Socrates, that we and

the city were not displeasing to you.  Of all Athenians you have been the

most constant resident in the city, which, as you never leave, you may be

supposed to love (compare Phaedr.).  For you never went out of the city

either to see the games, except once when you went to the Isthmus, or to

any other place unless when you were on military service; nor did you

travel as other men do.  Nor had you any curiosity to know other states or

their laws:  your affections did not go beyond us and our state; we were

your especial favourites, and you acquiesced in our government of you; and

here in this city you begat your children, which is a proof of your

satisfaction.  Moreover, you might in the course of the trial, if you had

liked, have fixed the penalty at banishment; the state which refuses to let

you go now would have let you go then.  But you pretended that you

preferred death to exile (compare Apol.), and that you were not unwilling

to die.  And now you have forgotten these fine sentiments, and pay no

respect to us the laws, of whom you are the destroyer; and are doing what

only a miserable slave would do, running away and turning your back upon

the compacts and agreements which you made as a citizen.  And first of all

answer this very question:  Are we right in saying that you agreed to be

governed according to us in deed, and not in word only?  Is that true or

not?'  How shall we answer, Crito?  Must we not assent?



CRITO:  We cannot help it, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  Then will they not say:  'You, Socrates, are breaking the

covenants and agreements which you made with us at your leisure, not in any

haste or under any compulsion or deception, but after you have had seventy

years to think of them, during which time you were at liberty to leave the

city, if we were not to your mind, or if our covenants appeared to you to

be unfair.  You had your choice, and might have gone either to Lacedaemon

or Crete, both which states are often praised by you for their good

government, or to some other Hellenic or foreign state.  Whereas you, above

all other Athenians, seemed to be so fond of the state, or, in other words,

of us her laws (and who would care about a state which has no laws?), that

you never stirred out of her; the halt, the blind, the maimed, were not

more stationary in her than you were.  And now you run away and forsake

your agreements.  Not so, Socrates, if you will take our advice; do not

make yourself ridiculous by escaping out of the city.



'For just consider, if you transgress and err in this sort of way, what

good will you do either to yourself or to your friends?  That your friends

will be driven into exile and deprived of citizenship, or will lose their

property, is tolerably certain; and you yourself, if you fly to one of the

neighbouring cities, as, for example, Thebes or Megara, both of which are

well governed, will come to them as an enemy, Socrates, and their

government will be against you, and all patriotic citizens will cast an

evil eye upon you as a subverter of the laws, and you will confirm in the

minds of the judges the justice of their own condemnation of you.  For he

who is a corrupter of the laws is more than likely to be a corrupter of the

young and foolish portion of mankind.  Will you then flee from well-ordered

cities and virtuous men? and is existence worth having on these terms?  Or

will you go to them without shame, and talk to them, Socrates?  And what

will you say to them?  What you say here about virtue and justice and

institutions and laws being the best things among men?  Would that be

decent of you?  Surely not.  But if you go away from well-governed states

to Crito's friends in Thessaly, where there is great disorder and licence,

they will be charmed to hear the tale of your escape from prison, set off

with ludicrous particulars of the manner in which you were wrapped in a

goatskin or some other disguise, and metamorphosed as the manner is of

runaways; but will there be no one to remind you that in your old age you

were not ashamed to violate the most sacred laws from a miserable desire of

a little more life?  Perhaps not, if you keep them in a good temper; but if

they are out of temper you will hear many degrading things; you will live,

but how?--as the flatterer of all men, and the servant of all men; and

doing what?--eating and drinking in Thessaly, having gone abroad in order

that you may get a dinner.  And where will be your fine sentiments about

justice and virtue?  Say that you wish to live for the sake of your

children--you want to bring them up and educate them--will you take them

into Thessaly and deprive them of Athenian citizenship?  Is this the

benefit which you will confer upon them?  Or are you under the impression

that they will be better cared for and educated here if you are still

alive, although absent from them; for your friends will take care of them? 

Do you fancy that if you are an inhabitant of Thessaly they will take care

of them, and if you are an inhabitant of the other world that they will not

take care of them?  Nay; but if they who call themselves friends are good

for anything, they will--to be sure they will.



'Listen, then, Socrates, to us who have brought you up.  Think not of life

and children first, and of justice afterwards, but of justice first, that

you may be justified before the princes of the world below.  For neither

will you nor any that belong to you be happier or holier or juster in this

life, or happier in another, if you do as Crito bids.  Now you depart in

innocence, a sufferer and not a doer of evil; a victim, not of the laws,

but of men.  But if you go forth, returning evil for evil, and injury for

injury, breaking the covenants and agreements which you have made with us,

and wronging those whom you ought least of all to wrong, that is to say,

yourself, your friends, your country, and us, we shall be angry with you

while you live, and our brethren, the laws in the world below, will receive

you as an enemy; for they will know that you have done your best to destroy

us.  Listen, then, to us and not to Crito.'



This, dear Crito, is the voice which I seem to hear murmuring in my ears,

like the sound of the flute in the ears of the mystic; that voice, I say,

is humming in my ears, and prevents me from hearing any other.  And I know

that anything more which you may say will be vain.  Yet speak, if you have

anything to say.



CRITO:  I have nothing to say, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  Leave me then, Crito, to fulfil the will of God, and to follow

whither he leads.







End 





Eryxias

by a Platonic Imitator (see Appendix II)

Translated by Benjamin Jowett






APPENDIX II.



The two dialogues which are translated in the second appendix are not

mentioned by Aristotle, or by any early authority, and have no claim to be

ascribed to Plato.  They are examples of Platonic dialogues to be assigned

probably to the second or third generation after Plato, when his writings

were well known at Athens and Alexandria.  They exhibit considerable

originality, and are remarkable for containing several thoughts of the sort

which we suppose to be modern rather than ancient, and which therefore have

a peculiar interest for us.  The Second Alcibiades shows that the

difficulties about prayer which have perplexed Christian theologians were

not unknown among the followers of Plato.  The Eryxias was doubted by the

ancients themselves:  yet it may claim the distinction of being, among all

Greek or Roman writings, the one which anticipates in the most striking

manner the modern science of political economy and gives an abstract form

to some of its principal doctrines.



For the translation of these two dialogues I am indebted to my friend and

secretary, Mr. Knight.



That the Dialogue which goes by the name of the Second Alcibiades is a

genuine writing of Plato will not be maintained by any modern critic, and

was hardly believed by the ancients themselves.  The dialectic is poor and

weak.  There is no power over language, or beauty of style; and there is a

certain abruptness and agroikia in the conversation, which is very un-

Platonic.  The best passage is probably that about the poets:--the remark

that the poet, who is of a reserved disposition, is uncommonly difficult to

understand, and the ridiculous interpretation of Homer, are entirely in the

spirit of Plato (compare Protag; Ion; Apol.).  The characters are ill-

drawn.  Socrates assumes the 'superior person' and preaches too much, while

Alcibiades is stupid and heavy-in-hand.  There are traces of Stoic

influence in the general tone and phraseology of the Dialogue (compare opos

melesei tis...kaka:  oti pas aphron mainetai):  and the writer seems to

have been acquainted with the 'Laws' of Plato (compare Laws).  An incident

from the Symposium is rather clumsily introduced, and two somewhat

hackneyed quotations (Symp., Gorg.) recur.  The reference to the death of

Archelaus as having occurred 'quite lately' is only a fiction, probably

suggested by the Gorgias, where the story of Archelaus is told, and a

similar phrase occurs;--ta gar echthes kai proen gegonota tauta, k.t.l. 

There are several passages which are either corrupt or extremely ill-

expressed.  But there is a modern interest in the subject of the dialogue;

and it is a good example of a short spurious work, which may be attributed

to the second or third century before Christ.





ERYXIAS



by



Platonic Imitator (see Appendix II above)



Translated by Benjamin Jowett





INTRODUCTION.



Much cannot be said in praise of the style or conception of the Eryxias. 

It is frequently obscure; like the exercise of a student, it is full of

small imitations of Plato:--Phaeax returning from an expedition to Sicily

(compare Socrates in the Charmides from the army at Potidaea), the figure

of the game at draughts, borrowed from the Republic, etc.  It has also in

many passages the ring of sophistry.  On the other hand, the rather

unhandsome treatment which is exhibited towards Prodicus is quite unlike

the urbanity of Plato.



Yet there are some points in the argument which are deserving of attention.

(1) That wealth depends upon the need of it or demand for it, is the first

anticipation in an abstract form of one of the great principles of modern

political economy, and the nearest approach to it to be found in an ancient

writer.  (2) The resolution of wealth into its simplest implements going on

to infinity is a subtle and refined thought.  (3) That wealth is relative

to circumstances is a sound conception.  (4) That the arts and sciences

which receive payment are likewise to be comprehended under the notion of

wealth, also touches a question of modern political economy.  (5) The

distinction of post hoc and propter hoc, often lost sight of in modern as

well as in ancient times.  These metaphysical conceptions and distinctions

show considerable power of thought in the writer, whatever we may think of

his merits as an imitator of Plato.





ERYXIAS



by



Platonic Imitator (see Appendix II above)



Translated by Benjamin Jowett





PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE:  Socrates, Eryxias, Erasistratus, Critias.



SCENE:  The portico of a temple of Zeus.





It happened by chance that Eryxias the Steirian was walking with me in the

Portico of Zeus the Deliverer, when there came up to us Critias and

Erasistratus, the latter the son of Phaeax, who was the nephew of

Erasistratus.  Now Erasistratus had just arrived from Sicily and that part

of the world.  As they approached, he said, Hail, Socrates!



SOCRATES:  The same to you, I said; have you any good news from Sicily to

tell us?



ERASISTRATUS:  Most excellent.  But, if you please, let us first sit down;

for I am tired with my yesterday's journey from Megara.



SOCRATES:  Gladly, if that is your desire.



ERASISTRATUS:  What would you wish to hear first? he said.  What the

Sicilians are doing, or how they are disposed towards our city?  To my

mind, they are very like wasps:  so long as you only cause them a little

annoyance they are quite unmanageable; you must destroy their nests if you

wish to get the better of them.  And in a similar way, the Syracusans,

unless we set to work in earnest, and go against them with a great

expedition, will never submit to our rule.  The petty injuries which we at

present inflict merely irritate them enough to make them utterly

intractable.  And now they have sent ambassadors to Athens, and intend, I

suspect, to play us some trick.--While we were talking, the Syracusan

envoys chanced to go by, and Erasistratus, pointing to one of them, said to

me, That, Socrates, is the richest man in all Italy and Sicily.  For who

has larger estates or more land at his disposal to cultivate if he please? 

And they are of a quality, too, finer than any other land in Hellas. 

Moreover, he has all the things which go to make up wealth, slaves and

horses innumerable, gold and silver without end.



I saw that he was inclined to expatiate on the riches of the man; so I

asked him, Well, Erasistratus, and what sort of character does he bear in

Sicily?



ERASISTRATUS:  He is esteemed to be, and really is, the wickedest of all

the Sicilians and Italians, and even more wicked than he is rich; indeed,

if you were to ask any Sicilian whom he thought to be the worst and the

richest of mankind, you would never hear any one else named.



I reflected that we were speaking, not of trivial matters, but about wealth

and virtue, which are deemed to be of the greatest moment, and I asked

Erasistratus whom he considered the wealthier,--he who was the possessor of

a talent of silver or he who had a field worth two talents?



ERASISTRATUS:  The owner of the field.



SOCRATES:  And on the same principle he who had robes and bedding and such

things which are of greater value to him than to a stranger would be richer

than the stranger?



ERASISTRATUS:  True.



SOCRATES:  And if any one gave you a choice, which of these would you

prefer?



ERASISTRATUS:  That which was most valuable.



SOCRATES:  In which way do you think you would be the richer?



ERASISTRATUS:  By choosing as I said.



SOCRATES:  And he appears to you to be the richest who has goods of the

greatest value?



ERASISTRATUS:  He does.



SOCRATES:  And are not the healthy richer than the sick, since health is a

possession more valuable than riches to the sick?  Surely there is no one

who would not prefer to be poor and well, rather than to have all the King

of Persia's wealth and to be ill.  And this proves that men set health

above wealth, else they would never choose the one in preference to the

other.



ERASISTRATUS:  True.



SOCRATES:  And if anything appeared to be more valuable than health, he

would be the richest who possessed it?



ERASISTRATUS:  He would.



SOCRATES:  Suppose that some one came to us at this moment and were to ask,

Well, Socrates and Eryxias and Erasistratus, can you tell me what is of the

greatest value to men?  Is it not that of which the possession will best

enable a man to advise how his own and his friend's affairs should be

administered?--What will be our reply?



ERASISTRATUS:  I should say, Socrates, that happiness was the most precious

of human possessions.



SOCRATES:  Not a bad answer.  But do we not deem those men who are most

prosperous to be the happiest?



ERASISTRATUS:  That is my opinion.



SOCRATES:  And are they not most prosperous who commit the fewest errors in

respect either of themselves or of other men?



ERASISTRATUS:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And they who know what is evil and what is good; what should be

done and what should be left undone;--these behave the most wisely and make

the fewest mistakes?



Erasistratus agreed to this.



SOCRATES:  Then the wisest and those who do best and the most fortunate and

the richest would appear to be all one and the same, if wisdom is really

the most valuable of our possessions?



Yes, said Eryxias, interposing, but what use would it be if a man had the

wisdom of Nestor and wanted the necessaries of life, food and drink and

clothes and the like?  Where would be the advantage of wisdom then?  Or how

could he be the richest of men who might even have to go begging, because

he had not wherewithal to live?



I thought that what Eryxias was saying had some weight, and I replied,

Would the wise man really suffer in this way, if he were so ill-provided;

whereas if he had the house of Polytion, and the house were full of gold

and silver, he would lack nothing?



ERYXIAS:  Yes; for then he might dispose of his property and obtain in

exchange what he needed, or he might sell it for money with which he could

supply his wants and in a moment procure abundance of everything.



SOCRATES:  True, if he could find some one who preferred such a house to

the wisdom of Nestor.  But if there are persons who set great store by

wisdom like Nestor's and the advantages accruing from it, to sell these, if

he were so disposed, would be easier still.  Or is a house a most useful

and necessary possession, and does it make a great difference in the

comfort of life to have a mansion like Polytion's instead of living in a

shabby little cottage, whereas wisdom is of small use and it is of no

importance whether a man is wise or ignorant about the highest matters?  Or

is wisdom despised of men and can find no buyers, although cypress wood and

marble of Pentelicus are eagerly bought by numerous purchasers?  Surely the

prudent pilot or the skilful physician, or the artist of any kind who is

proficient in his art, is more worth than the things which are especially

reckoned among riches; and he who can advise well and prudently for himself

and others is able also to sell the product of his art, if he so desire.



Eryxias looked askance, as if he had received some unfair treatment, and

said, I believe, Socrates, that if you were forced to speak the truth, you

would declare that you were richer than Callias the son of Hipponicus.  And

yet, although you claimed to be wiser about things of real importance, you

would not any the more be richer than he.



I dare say, Eryxias, I said, that you may regard these arguments of ours as

a kind of game; you think that they have no relation to facts, but are like

the pieces in the game of draughts which the player can move in such a way

that his opponents are unable to make any countermove.  (Compare Republic.) 

And perhaps, too, as regards riches you are of opinion that while facts

remain the same, there are arguments, no matter whether true or false,

which enable the user of them to prove that the wisest and the richest are

one and the same, although he is in the wrong and his opponents are in the

right.  There would be nothing strange in this; it would be as if two

persons were to dispute about letters, one declaring that the word Socrates

began with an S, the other that it began with an A, and the latter could

gain the victory over the former.



Eryxias glanced at the audience, laughing and blushing at once, as if he

had had nothing to do with what had just been said, and replied,--No,

indeed, Socrates, I never supposed that our arguments should be of a kind

which would never convince any one of those here present or be of advantage

to them.  For what man of sense could ever be persuaded that the wisest and

the richest are the same?  The truth is that we are discussing the subject

of riches, and my notion is that we should argue respecting the honest and

dishonest means of acquiring them, and, generally, whether they are a good

thing or a bad.



Very good, I said, and I am obliged to you for the hint:  in future we will

be more careful.  But why do not you yourself, as you introduced the

argument, and do not think that the former discussion touched the point at

issue, tell us whether you consider riches to be a good or an evil?



I am of opinion, he said, that they are a good.  He was about to add

something more, when Critias interrupted him:--Do you really suppose so,

Eryxias?



Certainly, replied Eryxias; I should be mad if I did not:  and I do not

fancy that you would find any one else of a contrary opinion.



And I, retorted Critias, should say that there is no one whom I could not

compel to admit that riches are bad for some men.  But surely, if they were

a good, they could not appear bad for any one?



Here I interposed and said to them:  If you two were having an argument

about equitation and what was the best way of riding, supposing that I knew

the art myself, I should try to bring you to an agreement.  For I should be

ashamed if I were present and did not do what I could to prevent your

difference.  And I should do the same if you were quarrelling about any

other art and were likely, unless you agreed on the point in dispute, to

part as enemies instead of as friends.  But now, when we are contending

about a thing of which the usefulness continues during the whole of life,

and it makes an enormous difference whether we are to regard it as

beneficial or not,--a thing, too, which is esteemed of the highest

importance by the Hellenes:--(for parents, as soon as their children are,

as they think, come to years of discretion, urge them to consider how

wealth may be acquired, since by riches the value of a man is judged):--

When, I say, we are thus in earnest, and you, who agree in other respects,

fall to disputing about a matter of such moment, that is, about wealth, and

not merely whether it is black or white, light or heavy, but whether it is

a good or an evil, whereby, although you are now the dearest of friends and

kinsmen, the most bitter hatred may arise betwixt you, I must hinder your

dissension to the best of my power.  If I could, I would tell you the

truth, and so put an end to the dispute; but as I cannot do this, and each

of you supposes that you can bring the other to an agreement, I am

prepared, as far as my capacity admits, to help you in solving the

question.  Please, therefore, Critias, try to make us accept the doctrines

which you yourself entertain.



CRITIAS:  I should like to follow up the argument, and will ask Eryxias

whether he thinks that there are just and unjust men?



ERYXIAS:  Most decidedly.



CRITIAS:  And does injustice seem to you an evil or a good?



ERYXIAS:  An evil.



CRITIAS:  Do you consider that he who bribes his neighbour's wife and

commits adultery with her, acts justly or unjustly, and this although both

the state and the laws forbid?



ERYXIAS:  Unjustly.



CRITIAS:  And if the wicked man has wealth and is willing to spend it, he

will carry out his evil purposes? whereas he who is short of means cannot

do what he fain would, and therefore does not sin?  In such a case, surely,

it is better that a person should not be wealthy, if his poverty prevents

the accomplishment of his desires, and his desires are evil?  Or, again,

should you call sickness a good or an evil?



ERYXIAS:  An evil.



CRITIAS:  Well, and do you think that some men are intemperate?



ERYXIAS:  Yes.



CRITIAS:  Then, if it is better for his health that the intemperate man

should refrain from meat and drink and other pleasant things, but he cannot

owing to his intemperance, will it not also be better that he should be too

poor to gratify his lust rather than that he should have a superabundance

of means?  For thus he will not be able to sin, although he desire never so

much.



Critias appeared to be arguing so admirably that Eryxias, if he had not

been ashamed of the bystanders, would probably have got up and struck him. 

For he thought that he had been robbed of a great possession when it became

obvious to him that he had been wrong in his former opinion about wealth. 

I observed his vexation, and feared that they would proceed to abuse and

quarrelling:  so I said,--I heard that very argument used in the Lyceum

yesterday by a wise man, Prodicus of Ceos; but the audience thought that he

was talking mere nonsense, and no one could be persuaded that he was

speaking the truth.  And when at last a certain talkative young gentleman

came in, and, taking his seat, began to laugh and jeer at Prodicus,

tormenting him and demanding an explanation of his argument, he gained the

ear of the audience far more than Prodicus.



Can you repeat the discourse to us?  Said Erasistratus.



SOCRATES:  If I can only remember it, I will.  The youth began by asking

Prodicus, In what way did he think that riches were a good and in what an

evil?  Prodicus answered, as you did just now, that they were a good to

good men and to those who knew in what way they should be employed, while

to the bad and the ignorant they were an evil.  The same is true, he went

on to say, of all other things; men make them to be what they are

themselves.  The saying of Archilochus is true:--



'Men's thoughts correspond to the things which they meet with.'



Well, then, replied the youth, if any one makes me wise in that wisdom

whereby good men become wise, he must also make everything else good to me.

Not that he concerns himself at all with these other things, but he has

converted my ignorance into wisdom.  If, for example, a person teach me

grammar or music, he will at the same time teach me all that relates to

grammar or music, and so when he makes me good, he makes things good to me.



Prodicus did not altogether agree:  still he consented to what was said.



And do you think, said the youth, that doing good things is like building a

house,--the work of human agency; or do things remain what they were at

first, good or bad, for all time?



Prodicus began to suspect, I fancy, the direction which the argument was

likely to take, and did not wish to be put down by a mere stripling before

all those present:--(if they two had been alone, he would not have

minded):--so he answered, cleverly enough:  I think that doing good things

is a work of human agency.



And is virtue in your opinion, Prodicus, innate or acquired by instruction?



The latter, said Prodicus.



Then you would consider him a simpleton who supposed that he could obtain

by praying to the Gods the knowledge of grammar or music or any other art,

which he must either learn from another or find out for himself?



Prodicus agreed to this also.



And when you pray to the Gods that you may do well and receive good, you

mean by your prayer nothing else than that you desire to become good and

wise:--if, at least, things are good to the good and wise and evil to the

evil.  But in that case, if virtue is acquired by instruction, it would

appear that you only pray to be taught what you do not know.



Hereupon I said to Prodicus that it was no misfortune to him if he had been

proved to be in error in supposing that the Gods immediately granted to us

whatever we asked:--if, I added, whenever you go up to the Acropolis you

earnestly entreat the Gods to grant you good things, although you know not

whether they can yield your request, it is as though you went to the doors

of the grammarian and begged him, although you had never made a study of

the art, to give you a knowledge of grammar which would enable you

forthwith to do the business of a grammarian.



While I was speaking, Prodicus was preparing to retaliate upon his youthful

assailant, intending to employ the argument of which you have just made

use; for he was annoyed to have it supposed that he offered a vain prayer

to the Gods.  But the master of the gymnasium came to him and begged him to

leave because he was teaching the youths doctrines which were unsuited to

them, and therefore bad for them.



I have told you this because I want you to understand how men are

circumstanced in regard to philosophy.  Had Prodicus been present and said

what you have said, the audience would have thought him raving, and he

would have been ejected from the gymnasium.  But you have argued so

excellently well that you have not only persuaded your hearers, but have

brought your opponent to an agreement.  For just as in the law courts, if

two witnesses testify to the same fact, one of whom seems to be an honest

fellow and the other a rogue, the testimony of the rogue often has the

contrary effect on the judges' minds to what he intended, while the same

evidence if given by the honest man at once strikes them as perfectly true.

And probably the audience have something of the same feeling about yourself

and Prodicus; they think him a Sophist and a braggart, and regard you as a

gentleman of courtesy and worth.  For they do not pay attention to the

argument so much as to the character of the speaker.



But truly, Socrates, said Erasistratus, though you may be joking, Critias

does seem to me to be saying something which is of weight.



SOCRATES:  I am in profound earnest, I assure you.  But why, as you have

begun your argument so prettily, do you not go on with the rest?  There is

still something lacking, now you have agreed that (wealth) is a good to

some and an evil to others.  It remains to enquire what constitutes wealth;

for unless you know this, you cannot possibly come to an understanding as

to whether it is a good or an evil.  I am ready to assist you in the

enquiry to the utmost of my power:  but first let him who affirms that

riches are a good, tell us what, in his opinion, is wealth.



ERASISTRATUS:  Indeed, Socrates, I have no notion about wealth beyond that

which men commonly have.  I suppose that wealth is a quantity of money

(compare Arist. Pol.); and this, I imagine, would also be Critias'

definition.



SOCRATES:  Then now we have to consider, What is money?  Or else later on

we shall be found to differ about the question.  For instance, the

Carthaginians use money of this sort.  Something which is about the size of

a stater is tied up in a small piece of leather:  what it is, no one knows

but the makers.  A seal is next set upon the leather, which then passes

into circulation, and he who has the largest number of such pieces is

esteemed the richest and best off.  And yet if any one among us had a mass

of such coins he would be no wealthier than if he had so many pebbles from

the mountain.  At Lacedaemon, again, they use iron by weight which has been

rendered useless:  and he who has the greatest mass of such iron is thought

to be the richest, although elsewhere it has no value.  In Ethiopia

engraved stones are employed, of which a Lacedaemonian could make no use. 

Once more, among the Nomad Scythians a man who owned the house of Polytion

would not be thought richer than one who possessed Mount Lycabettus among

ourselves.  And clearly those things cannot all be regarded as possessions;

for in some cases the possessors would appear none the richer thereby: 

but, as I was saying, some one of them is thought in one place to be money,

and the possessors of it are the wealthy, whereas in some other place it is

not money, and the ownership of it does not confer wealth; just as the

standard of morals varies, and what is honourable to some men is

dishonourable to others.  And if we wish to enquire why a house is valuable

to us but not to the Scythians, or why the Carthaginians value leather

which is worthless to us, or the Lacedaemonians find wealth in iron and we

do not, can we not get an answer in some such way as this:  Would an

Athenian, who had a thousand talents weight of the stones which lie about

in the Agora and which we do not employ for any purpose, be thought to be

any the richer?



ERASISTRATUS:  He certainly would not appear so to me.



SOCRATES:  But if he possessed a thousand talents weight of some precious

stone, we should say that he was very rich?



ERASISTRATUS:  Of course.



SOCRATES:  The reason is that the one is useless and the other useful?



ERASISTRATUS:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And in the same way among the Scythians a house has no value

because they have no use for a house, nor would a Scythian set so much

store on the finest house in the world as on a leather coat, because he

could use the one and not the other.  Or again, the Carthaginian coinage is

not wealth in our eyes, for we could not employ it, as we can silver, to

procure what we need, and therefore it is of no use to us.



ERASISTRATUS:  True.



SOCRATES:  What is useful to us, then, is wealth, and what is useless to us

is not wealth?



But how do you mean, Socrates? said Eryxias, interrupting.  Do we not

employ in our intercourse with one another speech and violence (?) and

various other things?  These are useful and yet they are not wealth.



SOCRATES:  Clearly we have not yet answered the question, What is wealth? 

That wealth must be useful, to be wealth at all,--thus much is acknowledged

by every one.  But what particular thing is wealth, if not all things?  Let

us pursue the argument in another way; and then we may perhaps find what we

are seeking.  What is the use of wealth, and for what purpose has the

possession of riches been invented,--in the sense, I mean, in which drugs

have been discovered for the cure of disease?  Perhaps in this way we may

throw some light on the question.  It appears to be clear that whatever

constitutes wealth must be useful, and that wealth is one class of useful

things; and now we have to enquire, What is the use of those useful things

which constitute wealth?  For all things probably may be said to be useful

which we use in production, just as all things which have life are animals,

but there is a special kind of animal which we call 'man.'  Now if any one

were to ask us, What is that of which, if we were rid, we should not want

medicine and the instruments of medicine, we might reply that this would be

the case if disease were absent from our bodies and either never came to

them at all or went away again as soon as it appeared; and we may therefore

conclude that medicine is the science which is useful for getting rid of

disease.  But if we are further asked, What is that from which, if we were

free, we should have no need of wealth? can we give an answer?  If we have

none, suppose that we restate the question thus:--If a man could live

without food or drink, and yet suffer neither hunger nor thirst, would he

want either money or anything else in order to supply his needs?



ERYXIAS:  He would not.



SOCRATES:  And does not this apply in other cases?  If we did not want for

the service of the body the things of which we now stand in need, and heat

and cold and the other bodily sensations were unperceived by us, there

would be no use in this so-called wealth, if no one, that is, had any

necessity for those things which now make us wish for wealth in order that

we may satisfy the desires and needs of the body in respect of our various

wants.  And therefore if the possession of wealth is useful in ministering

to our bodily wants, and bodily wants were unknown to us, we should not

need wealth, and possibly there would be no such thing as wealth.



ERYXIAS:  Clearly not.



SOCRATES:  Then our conclusion is, as would appear, that wealth is what is

useful to this end?



Eryxias once more gave his assent, but the small argument considerably

troubled him.



SOCRATES:  And what is your opinion about another question:--Would you say

that the same thing can be at one time useful and at another useless for

the production of the same result?



ERYXIAS:  I cannot say more than that if we require the same thing to

produce the same result, then it seems to me to be useful; if not, not.



SOCRATES:  Then if without the aid of fire we could make a brazen statue,

we should not want fire for that purpose; and if we did not want it, it

would be useless to us?  And the argument applies equally in other cases.



ERYXIAS:  Clearly.



SOCRATES:  And therefore conditions which are not required for the

existence of a thing are not useful for the production of it?



ERYXIAS:  Of course not.



SOCRATES:  And if without gold or silver or anything else which we do not

use directly for the body in the way that we do food and drink and bedding

and houses,--if without these we could satisfy the wants of the body, they

would be of no use to us for that purpose?



ERYXIAS:  They would not.



SOCRATES:  They would no longer be regarded as wealth, because they are

useless, whereas that would be wealth which enabled us to obtain what was

useful to us?



ERYXIAS:  O Socrates, you will never be able to persuade me that gold and

silver and similar things are not wealth.  But I am very strongly of

opinion that things which are useless to us are not wealth, and that the

money which is useful for this purpose is of the greatest use; not that

these things are not useful towards life, if by them we can procure wealth.



SOCRATES:  And how would you answer another question?  There are persons,

are there not, who teach music and grammar and other arts for pay, and thus

procure those things of which they stand in need?



ERYXIAS:  There are.



SOCRATES:  And these men by the arts which they profess, and in exchange

for them, obtain the necessities of life just as we do by means of gold and

silver?



ERYXIAS:  True.



SOCRATES:  Then if they procure by this means what they want for the

purposes of life, that art will be useful towards life?  For do we not say

that silver is useful because it enables us to supply our bodily needs?



ERYXIAS:  We do.



SOCRATES:  Then if these arts are reckoned among things useful, the arts

are wealth for the same reason as gold and silver are, for, clearly, the

possession of them gives wealth.  Yet a little while ago we found it

difficult to accept the argument which proved that the wisest are the

wealthiest.  But now there seems no escape from this conclusion.  Suppose

that we are asked, 'Is a horse useful to everybody?' will not our reply be,

'No, but only to those who know how to use a horse?'



ERYXIAS:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And so, too, physic is not useful to every one, but only to him

who knows how to use it?



ERYXIAS:  True.



SOCRATES:  And the same is the case with everything else?



ERYXIAS:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Then gold and silver and all the other elements which are

supposed to make up wealth are only useful to the person who knows how to

use them?



ERYXIAS:  Exactly.



SOCRATES:  And were we not saying before that it was the business of a good

man and a gentleman to know where and how anything should be used?



ERYXIAS:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  The good and gentle, therefore will alone have profit from these

things, supposing at least that they know how to use them.  But if so, to

them only will they seem to be wealth.  It appears, however, that where a

person is ignorant of riding, and has horses which are useless to him, if

some one teaches him that art, he makes him also richer, for what was

before useless has now become useful to him, and in giving him knowledge he

has also conferred riches upon him.



ERYXIAS:  That is the case.



SOCRATES:  Yet I dare be sworn that Critias will not be moved a whit by the

argument.



CRITIAS:  No, by heaven, I should be a madman if I were.  But why do you

not finish the argument which proves that gold and silver and other things

which seem to be wealth are not real wealth?  For I have been exceedingly

delighted to hear the discourses which you have just been holding.



SOCRATES:  My argument, Critias (I said), appears to have given you the

same kind of pleasure which you might have derived from some rhapsode's

recitation of Homer; for you do not believe a word of what has been said. 

But come now, give me an answer to this question.  Are not certain things

useful to the builder when he is building a house?



CRITIAS:  They are.



SOCRATES:  And would you say that those things are useful which are

employed in house building,--stones and bricks and beams and the like, and

also the instruments with which the builder built the house, the beams and

stones which they provided, and again the instruments by which these were

obtained?



CRITIAS:  It seems to me that they are all useful for building.



SOCRATES:  And is it not true of every art, that not only the materials but

the instruments by which we procure them and without which the work could

not go on, are useful for that art?



CRITIAS:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And further, the instruments by which the instruments are

procured, and so on, going back from stage to stage ad infinitum,--are not

all these, in your opinion, necessary in order to carry out the work?



CRITIAS:  We may fairly suppose such to be the case.



SOCRATES:  And if a man has food and drink and clothes and the other things

which are useful to the body, would he need gold or silver or any other

means by which he could procure that which he now has?



CRITIAS:  I do not think so.



SOCRATES:  Then you consider that a man never wants any of these things for

the use of the body?



CRITIAS:  Certainly not.



SOCRATES:  And if they appear useless to this end, ought they not always to

appear useless?  For we have already laid down the principle that things


cannot be at one time useful and at another time not, in the same process.



CRITIAS:  But in that respect your argument and mine are the same.  For you

maintain if they are useful to a certain end, they can never become

useless; whereas I say that in order to accomplish some results bad things

are needed, and good for others.



SOCRATES:  But can a bad thing be used to carry out a good purpose?



CRITIAS:  I should say not.



SOCRATES:  And we call those actions good which a man does for the sake of

virtue?




CRITIAS:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  But can a man learn any kind of knowledge which is imparted by

word of mouth if he is wholly deprived of the sense of hearing?



CRITIAS:  Certainly not, I think.



SOCRATES:  And will not hearing be useful for virtue, if virtue is taught

by hearing and we use the sense of hearing in giving instruction?



CRITIAS:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And since medicine frees the sick man from his disease, that art

too may sometimes appear useful in the acquisition of virtue, e.g. when

hearing is procured by the aid of medicine.



CRITIAS:  Very likely.



SOCRATES:  But if, again, we obtain by wealth the aid of medicine, shall we

not regard wealth as useful for virtue?



CRITIAS:  True.



SOCRATES:  And also the instruments by which wealth is procured?



CRITIAS:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  Then you think that a man may gain wealth by bad and disgraceful

means, and, having obtained the aid of medicine which enables him to

acquire the power of hearing, may use that very faculty for the acquisition

of virtue?



CRITIAS:  Yes, I do.



SOCRATES:  But can that which is evil be useful for virtue?



CRITIAS:  No.



SOCRATES:  It is not therefore necessary that the means by which we obtain

what is useful for a certain object should always be useful for the same

object:  for it seems that bad actions may sometimes serve good purposes? 

The matter will be still plainer if we look at it in this way:--If things

are useful towards the several ends for which they exist, which ends would

not come into existence without them, how would you regard them?  Can

ignorance, for instance, be useful for knowledge, or disease for health, or

vice for virtue?



CRITIAS:  Never.



SOCRATES:  And yet we have already agreed--have we not?--that there can be

no knowledge where there has not previously been ignorance, nor health

where there has not been disease, nor virtue where there has not been vice?



CRITIAS:  I think that we have.



SOCRATES:  But then it would seem that the antecedents without which a

thing cannot exist are not necessarily useful to it.  Otherwise ignorance

would appear useful for knowledge, disease for health, and vice for virtue.



Critias still showed great reluctance to accept any argument which went to

prove that all these things were useless.  I saw that it was as difficult

to persuade him as (according to the proverb) it is to boil a stone, so I

said:  Let us bid 'good-bye' to the discussion, since we cannot agree

whether these things are useful and a part of wealth or not.  But what

shall we say to another question:  Which is the happier and better man,--he

who requires the greatest quantity of necessaries for body and diet, or he

who requires only the fewest and least?  The answer will perhaps become

more obvious if we suppose some one, comparing the man himself at different

times, to consider whether his condition is better when he is sick or when

he is well?



CRITIAS:  That is not a question which needs much consideration.



SOCRATES:  Probably, I said, every one can understand that health is a

better condition than disease.  But when have we the greatest and the most

various needs, when we are sick or when we are well?



CRITIAS:  When we are sick.



SOCRATES:  And when we are in the worst state we have the greatest and most

especial need and desire of bodily pleasures?



CRITIAS:  True.



SOCRATES:  And seeing that a man is best off when he is least in need of

such things, does not the same reasoning apply to the case of any two

persons, of whom one has many and great wants and desires, and the other

few and moderate?  For instance, some men are gamblers, some drunkards, and

some gluttons:  and gambling and the love of drink and greediness are all

desires?



CRITIAS:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  But desires are only the lack of something:  and those who have

the greatest desires are in a worse condition than those who have none or

very slight ones?



CRITIAS:  Certainly I consider that those who have such wants are bad, and

that the greater their wants the worse they are.



SOCRATES:  And do we think it possible that a thing should be useful for a

purpose unless we have need of it for that purpose?



CRITIAS:  No.



SOCRATES:  Then if these things are useful for supplying the needs of the

body, we must want them for that purpose?



CRITIAS:  That is my opinion.



SOCRATES:  And he to whom the greatest number of things are useful for his

purpose, will also want the greatest number of means of accomplishing it,

supposing that we necessarily feel the want of all useful things?



CRITIAS:  It seems so.



SOCRATES:  The argument proves then that he who has great riches has

likewise need of many things for the supply of the wants of the body; for

wealth appears useful towards that end.  And the richest must be in the

worst condition, since they seem to be most in want of such things.








End 



Euthydemus

by Plato

Translated by Benjamin Jowett






INTRODUCTION.



The Euthydemus, though apt to be regarded by us only as an elaborate jest,

has also a very serious purpose.  It may fairly claim to be the oldest

treatise on logic; for that science originates in the misunderstandings

which necessarily accompany the first efforts of speculation.  Several of

the fallacies which are satirized in it reappear in the Sophistici Elenchi

of Aristotle and are retained at the end of our manuals of logic.  But if

the order of history were followed, they should be placed not at the end

but at the beginning of them; for they belong to the age in which the human

mind was first making the attempt to distinguish thought from sense, and to

separate the universal from the particular or individual.  How to put

together words or ideas, how to escape ambiguities in the meaning of terms

or in the structure of propositions, how to resist the fixed impression of

an 'eternal being' or 'perpetual flux,' how to distinguish between words

and things--these were problems not easy of solution in the infancy of

philosophy.  They presented the same kind of difficulty to the half-

educated man which spelling or arithmetic do to the mind of a child.  It

was long before the new world of ideas which had been sought after with

such passionate yearning was set in order and made ready for use.  To us

the fallacies which arise in the pre-Socratic philosophy are trivial and

obsolete because we are no longer liable to fall into the errors which are

expressed by them.  The intellectual world has become better assured to us,

and we are less likely to be imposed upon by illusions of words.



The logic of Aristotle is for the most part latent in the dialogues of

Plato.  The nature of definition is explained not by rules but by examples

in the Charmides, Lysis, Laches, Protagoras, Meno, Euthyphro, Theaetetus,

Gorgias, Republic; the nature of division is likewise illustrated by

examples in the Sophist and Statesman; a scheme of categories is found in

the Philebus; the true doctrine of contradiction is taught, and the fallacy

of arguing in a circle is exposed in the Republic; the nature of synthesis

and analysis is graphically described in the Phaedrus; the nature of words

is analysed in the Cratylus; the form of the syllogism is indicated in the

genealogical trees of the Sophist and Statesman; a true doctrine of

predication and an analysis of the sentence are given in the Sophist; the

different meanings of one and being are worked out in the Parmenides.  Here

we have most of the important elements of logic, not yet systematized or

reduced to an art or science, but scattered up and down as they would

naturally occur in ordinary discourse.  They are of little or no use or

significance to us; but because we have grown out of the need of them we

should not therefore despise them.  They are still interesting and

instructive for the light which they shed on the history of the human mind.



There are indeed many old fallacies which linger among us, and new ones are

constantly springing up.  But they are not of the kind to which ancient

logic can be usefully applied.  The weapons of common sense, not the

analytics of Aristotle, are needed for their overthrow.  Nor is the use of

the Aristotelian logic any longer natural to us.  We no longer put

arguments into the form of syllogisms like the schoolmen; the simple use of

language has been, happily, restored to us.  Neither do we discuss the

nature of the proposition, nor extract hidden truths from the copula, nor

dispute any longer about nominalism and realism.  We do not confuse the

form with the matter of knowledge, or invent laws of thought, or imagine

that any single science furnishes a principle of reasoning to all the rest. 

Neither do we require categories or heads of argument to be invented for

our use.  Those who have no knowledge of logic, like some of our great

physical philosophers, seem to be quite as good reasoners as those who

have.  Most of the ancient puzzles have been settled on the basis of usage

and common sense; there is no need to reopen them.  No science should raise

problems or invent forms of thought which add nothing to knowledge and are

of no use in assisting the acquisition of it.  This seems to be the natural

limit of logic and metaphysics; if they give us a more comprehensive or a

more definite view of the different spheres of knowledge they are to be

studied; if not, not.  The better part of ancient logic appears hardly in

our own day to have a separate existence; it is absorbed in two other

sciences:  (1) rhetoric, if indeed this ancient art be not also fading away

into literary criticism; (2) the science of language, under which all

questions relating to words and propositions and the combinations of them

may properly be included.



To continue dead or imaginary sciences, which make no signs of progress and

have no definite sphere, tends to interfere with the prosecution of living

ones.  The study of them is apt to blind the judgment and to render men

incapable of seeing the value of evidence, and even of appreciating the

nature of truth.  Nor should we allow the living science to become confused

with the dead by an ambiguity of language.  The term logic has two

different meanings, an ancient and a modern one, and we vainly try to

bridge the gulf between them.  Many perplexities are avoided by keeping

them apart.  There might certainly be a new science of logic; it would not

however be built up out of the fragments of the old, but would be distinct

from them--relative to the state of knowledge which exists at the present

time, and based chiefly on the methods of Modern Inductive philosophy. 

Such a science might have two legitimate fields:  first, the refutation and

explanation of false philosophies still hovering in the air as they appear

from the point of view of later experience or are comprehended in the

history of the human mind, as in a larger horizon:  secondly, it might

furnish new forms of thought more adequate to the expression of all the

diversities and oppositions of knowledge which have grown up in these

latter days; it might also suggest new methods of enquiry derived from the

comparison of the sciences.  Few will deny that the introduction of the

words 'subject' and 'object' and the Hegelian reconciliation of opposites

have been 'most gracious aids' to psychology, or that the methods of Bacon

and Mill have shed a light far and wide on the realms of knowledge.  These

two great studies, the one destructive and corrective of error, the other

conservative and constructive of truth, might be a first and second part of

logic.  Ancient logic would be the propaedeutic or gate of approach to

logical science,--nothing more.  But to pursue such speculations further,

though not irrelevant, might lead us too far away from the argument of the

dialogue.



The Euthydemus is, of all the Dialogues of Plato, that in which he

approaches most nearly to the comic poet.  The mirth is broader, the irony

more sustained, the contrast between Socrates and the two Sophists,

although veiled, penetrates deeper than in any other of his writings.  Even

Thrasymachus, in the Republic, is at last pacified, and becomes a friendly

and interested auditor of the great discourse.  But in the Euthydemus the

mask is never dropped; the accustomed irony of Socrates continues to the

end...



Socrates narrates to Crito a remarkable scene in which he has himself taken

part, and in which the two brothers, Dionysodorus and Euthydemus, are the

chief performers.  They are natives of Chios, who had settled at Thurii,

but were driven out, and in former days had been known at Athens as

professors of rhetoric and of the art of fighting in armour.  To this they

have now added a new accomplishment--the art of Eristic, or fighting with

words, which they are likewise willing to teach 'for a consideration.'  But

they can also teach virtue in a very short time and in the very best

manner.  Socrates, who is always on the look-out for teachers of virtue, is

interested in the youth Cleinias, the grandson of the great Alcibiades, and

is desirous that he should have the benefit of their instructions.  He is

ready to fall down and worship them; although the greatness of their

professions does arouse in his mind a temporary incredulity.



A circle gathers round them, in the midst of which are Socrates, the two

brothers, the youth Cleinias, who is watched by the eager eyes of his lover

Ctesippus, and others.  The performance begins; and such a performance as

might well seem to require an invocation of Memory and the Muses.  It is

agreed that the brothers shall question Cleinias.  'Cleinias,' says

Euthydemus, 'who learn, the wise or the unwise?'  'The wise,' is the reply;

given with blushing and hesitation.  'And yet when you learned you did not

know and were not wise.'  Then Dionysodorus takes up the ball:  'Who are

they who learn dictation of the grammar-master; the wise or the foolish

boys?'  'The wise.'  'Then, after all, the wise learn.'  'And do they

learn,' said Euthydemus, 'what they know or what they do not know?'  'The

latter.'  'And dictation is a dictation of letters?'  'Yes.'  'And you know

letters?'  'Yes.'  'Then you learn what you know.'  'But,' retorts

Dionysodorus, 'is not learning acquiring knowledge?'  'Yes.'  'And you

acquire that which you have not got already?'  'Yes.'  'Then you learn that

which you do not know.'



Socrates is afraid that the youth Cleinias may be discouraged at these

repeated overthrows.  He therefore explains to him the nature of the

process to which he is being subjected.  The two strangers are not serious;

there are jests at the mysteries which precede the enthronement, and he is

being initiated into the mysteries of the sophistical ritual.  This is all

a sort of horse-play, which is now ended.  The exhortation to virtue will

follow, and Socrates himself (if the wise men will not laugh at him) is

desirous of showing the way in which such an exhortation should be carried

on, according to his own poor notion.  He proceeds to question Cleinias. 

The result of the investigation may be summed up as follows:--



All men desire good; and good means the possession of goods, such as

wealth, health, beauty, birth, power, honour; not forgetting the virtues

and wisdom.  And yet in this enumeration the greatest good of all is

omitted.  What is that?  Good fortune.  But what need is there of good

fortune when we have wisdom already:--in every art and business are not the

wise also the fortunate?  This is admitted.  And again, the possession of

goods is not enough; there must also be a right use of them which can only

be given by knowledge:  in themselves they are neither good nor evil--

knowledge and wisdom are the only good, and ignorance and folly the only

evil.  The conclusion is that we must get 'wisdom.'  But can wisdom be

taught?  'Yes,' says Cleinias.  The ingenuousness of the youth delights

Socrates, who is at once relieved from the necessity of discussing one of

his great puzzles.  'Since wisdom is the only good, he must become a

philosopher, or lover of wisdom.'  'That I will,' says Cleinias.



After Socrates has given this specimen of his own mode of instruction, the

two brothers recommence their exhortation to virtue, which is of quite

another sort.



'You want Cleinias to be wise?'  'Yes.'  'And he is not wise yet?'  'No.' 

'Then you want him to be what he is not, and not to be what he is?--not to

be--that is, to perish.  Pretty lovers and friends you must all be!'



Here Ctesippus, the lover of Cleinias, interposes in great excitement,

thinking that he will teach the two Sophists a lesson of good manners.  But

he is quickly entangled in the meshes of their sophistry; and as a storm

seems to be gathering Socrates pacifies him with a joke, and Ctesippus then

says that he is not reviling the two Sophists, he is only contradicting

them.  'But,' says Dionysodorus, 'there is no such thing as contradiction.

When you and I describe the same thing, or you describe one thing and I

describe another, how can there be a contradiction?'  Ctesippus is unable

to reply.



Socrates has already heard of the denial of contradiction, and would like

to be informed by the great master of the art, 'What is the meaning of this

paradox?  Is there no such thing as error, ignorance, falsehood?  Then what

are they professing to teach?'  The two Sophists complain that Socrates is

ready to answer what they said a year ago, but is 'non-plussed' at what

they are saying now.  'What does the word "non-plussed" mean?'  Socrates is

informed, in reply, that words are lifeless things, and lifeless things

have no sense or meaning.  Ctesippus again breaks out, and again has to be

pacified by Socrates, who renews the conversation with Cleinias.  The two

Sophists are like Proteus in the variety of their transformations, and he,

like Menelaus in the Odyssey, hopes to restore them to their natural form.



He had arrived at the conclusion that Cleinias must become a philosopher. 

And philosophy is the possession of knowledge; and knowledge must be of a

kind which is profitable and may be used.  What knowledge is there which

has such a nature?  Not the knowledge which is required in any particular

art; nor again the art of the composer of speeches, who knows how to write

them, but cannot speak them, although he too must be admitted to be a kind

of enchanter of wild animals.  Neither is the knowledge which we are

seeking the knowledge of the general.  For the general makes over his prey

to the statesman, as the huntsman does to the cook, or the taker of quails

to the keeper of quails; he has not the use of that which he acquires.  The

two enquirers, Cleinias and Socrates, are described as wandering about in a

wilderness, vainly searching after the art of life and happiness.  At last

they fix upon the kingly art, as having the desired sort of knowledge.  But

the kingly art only gives men those goods which are neither good nor evil: 

and if we say further that it makes us wise, in what does it make us wise?

Not in special arts, such as cobbling or carpentering, but only in itself: 

or say again that it makes us good, there is no answer to the question,

'good in what?'  At length in despair Cleinias and Socrates turn to the

'Dioscuri' and request their aid.



Euthydemus argues that Socrates knows something; and as he cannot know and

not know, he cannot know some things and not know others, and therefore he

knows all things:  he and Dionysodorus and all other men know all things. 

'Do they know shoemaking, etc?'  'Yes.'  The sceptical Ctesippus would like

to have some evidence of this extraordinary statement:  he will believe if

Euthydemus will tell him how many teeth Dionysodorus has, and if

Dionysodorus will give him a like piece of information about Euthydemus. 

Even Socrates is incredulous, and indulges in a little raillery at the

expense of the brothers.  But he restrains himself, remembering that if the

men who are to be his teachers think him stupid they will take no pains

with him.  Another fallacy is produced which turns on the absoluteness of

the verb 'to know.'  And here Dionysodorus is caught 'napping,' and is

induced by Socrates to confess that 'he does not know the good to be

unjust.'  Socrates appeals to his brother Euthydemus; at the same time he

acknowledges that he cannot, like Heracles, fight against a Hydra, and even

Heracles, on the approach of a second monster, called upon his nephew

Iolaus to help.  Dionysodorus rejoins that Iolaus was no more the nephew of

Heracles than of Socrates.  For a nephew is a nephew, and a brother is a

brother, and a father is a father, not of one man only, but of all; nor of

men only, but of dogs and sea-monsters.  Ctesippus makes merry with the

consequences which follow:  'Much good has your father got out of the

wisdom of his puppies.'



'But,' says Euthydemus, unabashed, 'nobody wants much good.'  Medicine is a

good, arms are a good, money is a good, and yet there may be too much of

them in wrong places.  'No,' says Ctesippus, 'there cannot be too much

gold.'  And would you be happy if you had three talents of gold in your

belly, a talent in your pate, and a stater in either eye?'  Ctesippus,

imitating the new wisdom, replies, 'And do not the Scythians reckon those

to be the happiest of men who have their skulls gilded and see the inside

of them?'  'Do you see,' retorts Euthydemus, 'what has the quality of

vision or what has not the quality of vision?'  'What has the quality of

vision.'  'And you see our garments?'  'Yes.'  'Then our garments have the

quality of vision.'  A similar play of words follows, which is successfully

retorted by Ctesippus, to the great delight of Cleinias, who is rebuked by

Socrates for laughing at such solemn and beautiful things.



'But are there any beautiful things?  And if there are such, are they the

same or not the same as absolute beauty?'  Socrates replies that they are

not the same, but each of them has some beauty present with it. 'And are

you an ox because you have an ox present with you?'  After a few more

amphiboliae, in which Socrates, like Ctesippus, in self-defence borrows the

weapons of the brothers, they both confess that the two heroes are

invincible; and the scene concludes with a grand chorus of shouting and

laughing, and a panegyrical oration from Socrates:--



First, he praises the indifference of Dionysodorus and Euthydemus to public

opinion; for most persons would rather be refuted by such arguments than

use them in the refutation of others.  Secondly, he remarks upon their

impartiality; for they stop their own mouths, as well as those of other

people.  Thirdly, he notes their liberality, which makes them give away

their secret to all the world:  they should be more reserved, and let no

one be present at this exhibition who does not pay them a handsome fee; or

better still they might practise on one another only.  He concludes with a

respectful request that they will receive him and Cleinias among their

disciples.



Crito tells Socrates that he has heard one of the audience criticise

severely this wisdom,--not sparing Socrates himself for countenancing such

an exhibition.  Socrates asks what manner of man was this censorious

critic.  'Not an orator, but a great composer of speeches.'  Socrates

understands that he is an amphibious animal, half philosopher, half

politician; one of a class who have the highest opinion of themselves and a

spite against philosophers, whom they imagine to be their rivals.  They are

a class who are very likely to get mauled by Euthydemus and his friends,

and have a great notion of their own wisdom; for they imagine themselves to

have all the advantages and none of the drawbacks both of politics and of

philosophy.  They do not understand the principles of combination, and

hence are ignorant that the union of two good things which have different

ends produces a compound inferior to either of them taken separately.



Crito is anxious about the education of his children, one of whom is

growing up.  The description of Dionysodorus and Euthydemus suggests to him

the reflection that the professors of education are strange beings. 

Socrates consoles him with the remark that the good in all professions are

few, and recommends that 'he and his house' should continue to serve

philosophy, and not mind about its professors.



...



There is a stage in the history of philosophy in which the old is dying

out, and the new has not yet come into full life.  Great philosophies like

the Eleatic or Heraclitean, which have enlarged the boundaries of the human

mind, begin to pass away in words.  They subsist only as forms which have

rooted themselves in language--as troublesome elements of thought which

cannot be either used or explained away.  The same absoluteness which was

once attributed to abstractions is now attached to the words which are the

signs of them.  The philosophy which in the first and second generation was

a great and inspiring effort of reflection, in the third becomes

sophistical, verbal, eristic.



It is this stage of philosophy which Plato satirises in the Euthydemus. 

The fallacies which are noted by him appear trifling to us now, but they

were not trifling in the age before logic, in the decline of the earlier

Greek philosophies, at a time when language was first beginning to perplex

human thought.  Besides he is caricaturing them; they probably received

more subtle forms at the hands of those who seriously maintained them. 

They are patent to us in Plato, and we are inclined to wonder how any one

could ever have been deceived by them; but we must remember also that there

was a time when the human mind was only with great difficulty disentangled

from such fallacies.



To appreciate fully the drift of the Euthydemus, we should imagine a mental

state in which not individuals only, but whole schools during more than one

generation, were animated by the desire to exclude the conception of rest,

and therefore the very word 'this' (Theaet.) from language; in which the

ideas of space, time, matter, motion, were proved to be contradictory and

imaginary; in which the nature of qualitative change was a puzzle, and even

differences of degree, when applied to abstract notions, were not

understood; in which there was no analysis of grammar, and mere puns or

plays of words received serious attention; in which contradiction itself

was denied, and, on the one hand, every predicate was affirmed to be true

of every subject, and on the other, it was held that no predicate was true

of any subject, and that nothing was, or was known, or could be spoken. 

Let us imagine disputes carried on with religious earnestness and more than

scholastic subtlety, in which the catchwords of philosophy are completely

detached from their context.  (Compare Theaet.)  To such disputes the

humour, whether of Plato in the ancient, or of Pope and Swift in the modern

world, is the natural enemy.  Nor must we forget that in modern times also

there is no fallacy so gross, no trick of language so transparent, no

abstraction so barren and unmeaning, no form of thought so contradictory to

experience, which has not been found to satisfy the minds of philosophical

enquirers at a certain stage, or when regarded from a certain point of view

only.  The peculiarity of the fallacies of our own age is that we live

within them, and are therefore generally unconscious of them.



Aristotle has analysed several of the same fallacies in his book 'De

Sophisticis Elenchis,' which Plato, with equal command of their true

nature, has preferred to bring to the test of ridicule.  At first we are

only struck with the broad humour of this 'reductio ad absurdum:' gradually

we perceive that some important questions begin to emerge.  Here, as

everywhere else, Plato is making war against the philosophers who put words

in the place of things, who tear arguments to tatters, who deny

predication, and thus make knowledge impossible, to whom ideas and objects

of sense have no fixedness, but are in a state of perpetual oscillation and

transition.  Two great truths seem to be indirectly taught through these

fallacies:  (1) The uncertainty of language, which allows the same words to

be used in different meanings, or with different degrees of meaning:  (2)

The necessary limitation or relative nature of all phenomena.  Plato is

aware that his own doctrine of ideas, as well as the Eleatic Being and Not-

being, alike admit of being regarded as verbal fallacies.  The sophism

advanced in the Meno, 'that you cannot enquire either into what you know or

do not know,' is lightly touched upon at the commencement of the Dialogue;

the thesis of Protagoras, that everything is true to him to whom it seems

to be true, is satirized.  In contrast with these fallacies is maintained

the Socratic doctrine that happiness is gained by knowledge.  The

grammatical puzzles with which the Dialogue concludes probably contain

allusions to tricks of language which may have been practised by the

disciples of Prodicus or Antisthenes.  They would have had more point, if

we were acquainted with the writings against which Plato's humour is

directed.  Most of the jests appear to have a serious meaning; but we have

lost the clue to some of them, and cannot determine whether, as in the

Cratylus, Plato has or has not mixed up purely unmeaning fun with his

satire.



The two discourses of Socrates may be contrasted in several respects with

the exhibition of the Sophists:  (1) In their perfect relevancy to the

subject of discussion, whereas the Sophistical discourses are wholly

irrelevant:  (2) In their enquiring sympathetic tone, which encourages the

youth, instead of 'knocking him down,' after the manner of the two

Sophists:  (3) In the absence of any definite conclusion--for while

Socrates and the youth are agreed that philosophy is to be studied, they

are not able to arrive at any certain result about the art which is to

teach it.  This is a question which will hereafter be answered in the

Republic; as the conception of the kingly art is more fully developed in

the Politicus, and the caricature of rhetoric in the Gorgias.



The characters of the Dialogue are easily intelligible.  There is Socrates

once more in the character of an old man; and his equal in years, Crito,

the father of Critobulus, like Lysimachus in the Laches, his fellow

demesman (Apol.), to whom the scene is narrated, and who once or twice

interrupts with a remark after the manner of the interlocutor in the

Phaedo, and adds his commentary at the end; Socrates makes a playful

allusion to his money-getting habits.  There is the youth Cleinias, the

grandson of Alcibiades, who may be compared with Lysis, Charmides,

Menexenus, and other ingenuous youths out of whose mouths Socrates draws

his own lessons, and to whom he always seems to stand in a kindly and

sympathetic relation.  Crito will not believe that Socrates has not

improved or perhaps invented the answers of Cleinias (compare Phaedrus). 

The name of the grandson of Alcibiades, who is described as long dead,

(Greek), and who died at the age of forty-four, in the year 404 B.C.,

suggests not only that the intended scene of the Euthydemus could not have

been earlier than 404, but that as a fact this Dialogue could not have been

composed before 390 at the soonest.  Ctesippus, who is the lover of

Cleinias, has been already introduced to us in the Lysis, and seems there

too to deserve the character which is here given him, of a somewhat

uproarious young man.  But the chief study of all is the picture of the two

brothers, who are unapproachable in their effrontery, equally careless of

what they say to others and of what is said to them, and never at a loss. 

They are 'Arcades ambo et cantare pares et respondere parati.'  Some

superior degree of wit or subtlety is attributed to Euthydemus, who sees

the trap in which Socrates catches Dionysodorus.



The epilogue or conclusion of the Dialogue has been criticised as

inconsistent with the general scheme.  Such a criticism is like similar

criticisms on Shakespeare, and proceeds upon a narrow notion of the variety

which the Dialogue, like the drama, seems to admit.  Plato in the abundance

of his dramatic power has chosen to write a play upon a play, just as he

often gives us an argument within an argument.  At the same time he takes

the opportunity of assailing another class of persons who are as alien from

the spirit of philosophy as Euthydemus and Dionysodorus.  The Eclectic, the

Syncretist, the Doctrinaire, have been apt to have a bad name both in

ancient and modern times.  The persons whom Plato ridicules in the epilogue

to the Euthydemus are of this class.  They occupy a border-ground between

philosophy and politics; they keep out of the dangers of politics, and at

the same time use philosophy as a means of serving their own interests. 

Plato quaintly describes them as making two good things, philosophy and

politics, a little worse by perverting the objects of both.  Men like

Antiphon or Lysias would be types of the class.  Out of a regard to the

respectabilities of life, they are disposed to censure the interest which

Socrates takes in the exhibition of the two brothers.  They do not

understand, any more than Crito, that he is pursuing his vocation of

detecting the follies of mankind, which he finds 'not unpleasant.' 

(Compare Apol.)



Education is the common subject of all Plato's earlier Dialogues.  The

concluding remark of Crito, that he has a difficulty in educating his two

sons, and the advice of Socrates to him that he should not give up

philosophy because he has no faith in philosophers, seems to be a

preparation for the more peremptory declaration of the Meno that 'Virtue

cannot be taught because there are no teachers.'



The reasons for placing the Euthydemus early in the series are:  (1) the

similarity in plan and style to the Protagoras, Charmides, and Lysis;--the

relation of Socrates to the Sophists is still that of humorous antagonism,

not, as in the later Dialogues of Plato, of embittered hatred; and the

places and persons have a considerable family likeness; (2) the Euthydemus

belongs to the Socratic period in which Socrates is represented as willing

to learn, but unable to teach; and in the spirit of Xenophon's Memorabilia,

philosophy is defined as 'the knowledge which will make us happy;' (3) we

seem to have passed the stage arrived at in the Protagoras, for Socrates is

no longer discussing whether virtue can be taught--from this question he is

relieved by the ingenuous declaration of the youth Cleinias; and (4) not

yet to have reached the point at which he asserts 'that there are no

teachers.'  Such grounds are precarious, as arguments from style and plan

are apt to be (Greek).  But no arguments equally strong can be urged in

favour of assigning to the Euthydemus any other position in the series.





EUTHYDEMUS



by



Plato



Translated by Benjamin Jowett





PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE:

Socrates, who is the narrator of the Dialogue.

Crito, Cleinias, Euthydemus, Dionysodorus, Ctesippus.



SCENE:  The Lyceum.





CRITO:  Who was the person, Socrates, with whom you were talking yesterday

at the Lyceum?  There was such a crowd around you that I could not get

within hearing, but I caught a sight of him over their heads, and I made

out, as I thought, that he was a stranger with whom you were talking:  who

was he?



SOCRATES:  There were two, Crito; which of them do you mean?



CRITO:  The one whom I mean was seated second from you on the right-hand

side.  In the middle was Cleinias the young son of Axiochus, who has

wonderfully grown; he is only about the age of my own Critobulus, but he is

much forwarder and very good-looking:  the other is thin and looks younger

than he is.



SOCRATES:  He whom you mean, Crito, is Euthydemus; and on my left hand

there was his brother Dionysodorus, who also took part in the conversation.



CRITO:  Neither of them are known to me, Socrates; they are a new

importation of Sophists, as I should imagine.  Of what country are they,

and what is their line of wisdom?



SOCRATES:  As to their origin, I believe that they are natives of this part

of the world, and have migrated from Chios to Thurii; they were driven out

of Thurii, and have been living for many years past in these regions.  As

to their wisdom, about which you ask, Crito, they are wonderful--

consummate!  I never knew what the true pancratiast was before; they are

simply made up of fighting, not like the two Acarnanian brothers who fight

with their bodies only, but this pair of heroes, besides being perfect in

the use of their bodies, are invincible in every sort of warfare; for they

are capital at fighting in armour, and will teach the art to any one who

pays them; and also they are most skilful in legal warfare; they will plead

themselves and teach others to speak and to compose speeches which will

have an effect upon the courts.  And this was only the beginning of their

wisdom, but they have at last carried out the pancratiastic art to the very

end, and have mastered the only mode of fighting which had been hitherto

neglected by them; and now no one dares even to stand up against them: 

such is their skill in the war of words, that they can refute any

proposition whether true or false.  Now I am thinking, Crito, of placing

myself in their hands; for they say that in a short time they can impart

their skill to any one.



CRITO:  But, Socrates, are you not too old? there may be reason to fear

that.



SOCRATES:  Certainly not, Crito; as I will prove to you, for I have the

consolation of knowing that they began this art of disputation which I

covet, quite, as I may say, in old age; last year, or the year before, they

had none of their new wisdom.  I am only apprehensive that I may bring the

two strangers into disrepute, as I have done Connus the son of Metrobius,

the harp-player, who is still my music-master; for when the boys who go to

him see me going with them, they laugh at me and call him grandpapa's

master.  Now I should not like the strangers to experience similar

treatment; the fear of ridicule may make them unwilling to receive me; and

therefore, Crito, I shall try and persuade some old men to accompany me to

them, as I persuaded them to go with me to Connus, and I hope that you will

make one:  and perhaps we had better take your sons as a bait; they will

want to have them as pupils, and for the sake of them willing to receive

us.



CRITO:  I see no objection, Socrates, if you like; but first I wish that

you would give me a description of their wisdom, that I may know beforehand

what we are going to learn.



SOCRATES:  In less than no time you shall hear; for I cannot say that I did

not attend--I paid great attention to them, and I remember and will

endeavour to repeat the whole story.  Providentially I was sitting alone in

the dressing-room of the Lyceum where you saw me, and was about to depart;

when I was getting up I recognized the familiar divine sign:  so I sat down

again, and in a little while the two brothers Euthydemus and Dionysodorus

came in, and several others with them, whom I believe to be their

disciples, and they walked about in the covered court; they had not taken

more than two or three turns when Cleinias entered, who, as you truly say,

is very much improved:  he was followed by a host of lovers, one of whom

was Ctesippus the Paeanian, a well-bred youth, but also having the wildness

of youth.  Cleinias saw me from the entrance as I was sitting alone, and at

once came and sat down on the right hand of me, as you describe; and

Dionysodorus and Euthydemus, when they saw him, at first stopped and talked

with one another, now and then glancing at us, for I particularly watched

them; and then Euthydemus came and sat down by the youth, and the other by

me on the left hand; the rest anywhere.  I saluted the brothers, whom I had

not seen for a long time; and then I said to Cleinias:  Here are two wise

men, Euthydemus and Dionysodorus, Cleinias, wise not in a small but in a

large way of wisdom, for they know all about war,--all that a good general

ought to know about the array and command of an army, and the whole art of

fighting in armour:  and they know about law too, and can teach a man how

to use the weapons of the courts when he is injured.



They heard me say this, but only despised me.  I observed that they looked

at one another, and both of them laughed; and then Euthydemus said:  Those,

Socrates, are matters which we no longer pursue seriously; to us they are

secondary occupations.



Indeed, I said, if such occupations are regarded by you as secondary, what

must the principal one be; tell me, I beseech you, what that noble study

is?



The teaching of virtue, Socrates, he replied, is our principal occupation;

and we believe that we can impart it better and quicker than any man.



My God! I said, and where did you learn that?  I always thought, as I was

saying just now, that your chief accomplishment was the art of fighting in

armour; and I used to say as much of you, for I remember that you professed

this when you were here before.  But now if you really have the other

knowledge, O forgive me:  I address you as I would superior beings, and ask

you to pardon the impiety of my former expressions.  But are you quite sure

about this, Dionysodorus and Euthydemus? the promise is so vast, that a

feeling of incredulity steals over me.



You may take our word, Socrates, for the fact.



Then I think you happier in having such a treasure than the great king is

in the possession of his kingdom.  And please to tell me whether you intend

to exhibit your wisdom; or what will you do?



That is why we have come hither, Socrates; and our purpose is not only to

exhibit, but also to teach any one who likes to learn.



But I can promise you, I said, that every unvirtuous person will want to

learn.  I shall be the first; and there is the youth Cleinias, and

Ctesippus:  and here are several others, I said, pointing to the lovers of

Cleinias, who were beginning to gather round us.  Now Ctesippus was sitting

at some distance from Cleinias; and when Euthydemus leaned forward in

talking with me, he was prevented from seeing Cleinias, who was between us;

and so, partly because he wanted to look at his love, and also because he

was interested, he jumped up and stood opposite to us:  and all the other

admirers of Cleinias, as well as the disciples of Euthydemus and

Dionysodorus, followed his example.  And these were the persons whom I

showed to Euthydemus, telling him that they were all eager to learn:  to

which Ctesippus and all of them with one voice vehemently assented, and bid

him exhibit the power of his wisdom.  Then I said:  O Euthydemus and

Dionysodorus, I earnestly request you to do myself and the company the

favour to exhibit.  There may be some trouble in giving the whole

exhibition; but tell me one thing,--can you make a good man of him only who

is already convinced that he ought to learn of you, or of him also who is

not convinced, either because he imagines that virtue is a thing which

cannot be taught at all, or that you are not the teachers of it?  Has your

art power to persuade him, who is of the latter temper of mind, that virtue

can be taught; and that you are the men from whom he will best learn it?



Certainly, Socrates, said Dionysodorus; our art will do both.



And you and your brother, Dionysodorus, I said, of all men who are now

living are the most likely to stimulate him to philosophy and to the study

of virtue?



Yes, Socrates, I rather think that we are.



Then I wish that you would be so good as to defer the other part of the

exhibition, and only try to persuade the youth whom you see here that he

ought to be a philosopher and study virtue.  Exhibit that, and you will

confer a great favour on me and on every one present; for the fact is I and

all of us are extremely anxious that he should become truly good.  His name

is Cleinias, and he is the son of Axiochus, and grandson of the old

Alcibiades, cousin of the Alcibiades that now is.  He is quite young, and

we are naturally afraid that some one may get the start of us, and turn his

mind in a wrong direction, and he may be ruined.  Your visit, therefore, is

most happily timed; and I hope that you will make a trial of the young man,

and converse with him in our presence, if you have no objection.



These were pretty nearly the expressions which I used; and Euthydemus, in a

manly and at the same time encouraging tone, replied:  There can be no

objection, Socrates, if the young man is only willing to answer questions.



He is quite accustomed to do so, I replied; for his friends often come and

ask him questions and argue with him; and therefore he is quite at home in

answering.



What followed, Crito, how can I rightly narrate?  For not slight is the

task of rehearsing infinite wisdom, and therefore, like the poets, I ought

to commence my relation with an invocation to Memory and the Muses.  Now

Euthydemus, if I remember rightly, began nearly as follows:  O Cleinias,

are those who learn the wise or the ignorant?



The youth, overpowered by the question blushed, and in his perplexity

looked at me for help; and I, knowing that he was disconcerted, said:  Take

courage, Cleinias, and answer like a man whichever you think; for my belief

is that you will derive the greatest benefit from their questions.



Whichever he answers, said Dionysodorus, leaning forward so as to catch my

ear, his face beaming with laughter, I prophesy that he will be refuted,

Socrates.



While he was speaking to me, Cleinias gave his answer:  and therefore I had

no time to warn him of the predicament in which he was placed, and he

answered that those who learned were the wise.



Euthydemus proceeded:  There are some whom you would call teachers, are

there not?



The boy assented.



And they are the teachers of those who learn--the grammar-master and the

lyre-master used to teach you and other boys; and you were the learners?



Yes.



And when you were learners you did not as yet know the things which you

were learning?



No, he said.



And were you wise then?



No, indeed, he said.



But if you were not wise you were unlearned?



Certainly.



You then, learning what you did not know, were unlearned when you were

learning?



The youth nodded assent.



Then the unlearned learn, and not the wise, Cleinias, as you imagine.



At these words the followers of Euthydemus, of whom I spoke, like a chorus

at the bidding of their director, laughed and cheered.  Then, before the

youth had time to recover his breath, Dionysodorus cleverly took him in

hand, and said:  Yes, Cleinias; and when the grammar-master dictated

anything to you, were they the wise boys or the unlearned who learned the

dictation?



The wise, replied Cleinias.



Then after all the wise are the learners and not the unlearned; and your

last answer to Euthydemus was wrong.



Then once more the admirers of the two heroes, in an ecstasy at their

wisdom, gave vent to another peal of laughter, while the rest of us were

silent and amazed.  Euthydemus, observing this, determined to persevere

with the youth; and in order to heighten the effect went on asking another

similar question, which might be compared to the double turn of an expert

dancer.  Do those, said he, who learn, learn what they know, or what they

do not know?



Again Dionysodorus whispered to me:  That, Socrates, is just another of the

same sort.



Good heavens, I said; and your last question was so good!



Like all our other questions, Socrates, he replied--inevitable.



I see the reason, I said, why you are in such reputation among your

disciples.



Meanwhile Cleinias had answered Euthydemus that those who learned learn

what they do not know; and he put him through a series of questions the

same as before.



Do you not know letters?



He assented.



All letters?



Yes.



But when the teacher dictates to you, does he not dictate letters?



To this also he assented.



Then if you know all letters, he dictates that which you know?



This again was admitted by him.



Then, said the other, you do not learn that which he dictates; but he only

who does not know letters learns?



Nay, said Cleinias; but I do learn.



Then, said he, you learn what you know, if you know all the letters?



He admitted that.



Then, he said, you were wrong in your answer.



The word was hardly out of his mouth when Dionysodorus took up the

argument, like a ball which he caught, and had another throw at the youth. 

Cleinias, he said, Euthydemus is deceiving you.  For tell me now, is not

learning acquiring knowledge of that which one learns?



Cleinias assented.



And knowing is having knowledge at the time?



He agreed.



And not knowing is not having knowledge at the time?



He admitted that.



And are those who acquire those who have or have not a thing?



Those who have not.



And have you not admitted that those who do not know are of the number of

those who have not?



He nodded assent.



Then those who learn are of the class of those who acquire, and not of

those who have?



He agreed.



Then, Cleinias, he said, those who do not know learn, and not those who

know.



Euthydemus was proceeding to give the youth a third fall; but I knew that

he was in deep water, and therefore, as I wanted to give him a respite lest

he should be disheartened, I said to him consolingly:  You must not be

surprised, Cleinias, at the singularity of their mode of speech:  this I

say because you may not understand what the two strangers are doing with

you; they are only initiating you after the manner of the Corybantes in the

mysteries; and this answers to the enthronement, which, if you have ever

been initiated, is, as you will know, accompanied by dancing and sport; and

now they are just prancing and dancing about you, and will next proceed to

initiate you; imagine then that you have gone through the first part of the

sophistical ritual, which, as Prodicus says, begins with initiation into

the correct use of terms.  The two foreign gentlemen, perceiving that you

did not know, wanted to explain to you that the word 'to learn' has two

meanings, and is used, first, in the sense of acquiring knowledge of some

matter of which you previously have no knowledge, and also, when you have

the knowledge, in the sense of reviewing this matter, whether something

done or spoken by the light of this newly-acquired knowledge; the latter is

generally called 'knowing' rather than 'learning,' but the word 'learning'

is also used; and you did not see, as they explained to you, that the term

is employed of two opposite sorts of men, of those who know, and of those

who do not know.  There was a similar trick in the second question, when

they asked you whether men learn what they know or what they do not know. 

These parts of learning are not serious, and therefore I say that the

gentlemen are not serious, but are only playing with you.  For if a man had

all that sort of knowledge that ever was, he would not be at all the wiser;

he would only be able to play with men, tripping them up and oversetting

them with distinctions of words.  He would be like a person who pulls away

a stool from some one when he is about to sit down, and then laughs and

makes merry at the sight of his friend overturned and laid on his back. 

And you must regard all that has hitherto passed between you and them as

merely play.  But in what is to follow I am certain that they will exhibit

to you their serious purpose, and keep their promise (I will show them

how); for they promised to give me a sample of the hortatory philosophy,

but I suppose that they wanted to have a game with you first.  And now,

Euthydemus and Dionysodorus, I think that we have had enough of this.  Will

you let me see you explaining to the young man how he is to apply himself

to the study of virtue and wisdom?  And I will first show you what I

conceive to be the nature of the task, and what sort of a discourse I

desire to hear; and if I do this in a very inartistic and ridiculous

manner, do not laugh at me, for I only venture to improvise before you

because I am eager to hear your wisdom:  and I must therefore ask you and

your disciples to refrain from laughing.  And now, O son of Axiochus, let

me put a question to you:  Do not all men desire happiness?  And yet,

perhaps, this is one of those ridiculous questions which I am afraid to

ask, and which ought not to be asked by a sensible man:  for what human

being is there who does not desire happiness?



There is no one, said Cleinias, who does not.



Well, then, I said, since we all of us desire happiness, how can we be

happy?--that is the next question.  Shall we not be happy if we have many

good things?  And this, perhaps, is even a more simple question than the

first, for there can be no doubt of the answer.



He assented.



And what things do we esteem good?  No solemn sage is required to tell us

this, which may be easily answered; for every one will say that wealth is a

good.



Certainly, he said.



And are not health and beauty goods, and other personal gifts?



He agreed.



Can there be any doubt that good birth, and power, and honours in one's own

land, are goods?



He assented.



And what other goods are there? I said.  What do you say of temperance,

justice, courage:  do you not verily and indeed think, Cleinias, that we

shall be more right in ranking them as goods than in not ranking them as

goods?  For a dispute might possibly arise about this.  What then do you

say?



They are goods, said Cleinias.



Very well, I said; and where in the company shall we find a place for

wisdom--among the goods or not?



Among the goods.



And now, I said, think whether we have left out any considerable goods.



I do not think that we have, said Cleinias.



Upon recollection, I said, indeed I am afraid that we have left out the

greatest of them all.



What is that? he asked.



Fortune, Cleinias, I replied; which all, even the most foolish, admit to be

the greatest of goods.



True, he said.



On second thoughts, I added, how narrowly, O son of Axiochus, have you and

I escaped making a laughing-stock of ourselves to the strangers.



Why do you say so?



Why, because we have already spoken of good-fortune, and are but repeating

ourselves.



What do you mean?



I mean that there is something ridiculous in again putting forward good-

fortune, which has a place in the list already, and saying the same thing

twice over.



He asked what was the meaning of this, and I replied:  Surely wisdom is

good-fortune; even a child may know that.



The simple-minded youth was amazed; and, observing his surprise, I said to

him:  Do you not know, Cleinias, that flute-players are most fortunate and

successful in performing on the flute?



He assented.



And are not the scribes most fortunate in writing and reading letters?



Certainly.



Amid the dangers of the sea, again, are any more fortunate on the whole

than wise pilots?



None, certainly.



And if you were engaged in war, in whose company would you rather take the

risk--in company with a wise general, or with a foolish one?



With a wise one.



And if you were ill, whom would you rather have as a companion in a

dangerous illness--a wise physician, or an ignorant one?



A wise one.



You think, I said, that to act with a wise man is more fortunate than to

act with an ignorant one?



He assented.



Then wisdom always makes men fortunate:  for by wisdom no man would ever

err, and therefore he must act rightly and succeed, or his wisdom would be

wisdom no longer.



We contrived at last, somehow or other, to agree in a general conclusion,

that he who had wisdom had no need of fortune.  I then recalled to his mind

the previous state of the question.  You remember, I said, our making the

admission that we should be happy and fortunate if many good things were

present with us?



He assented.



And should we be happy by reason of the presence of good things, if they

profited us not, or if they profited us?



If they profited us, he said.



And would they profit us, if we only had them and did not use them?  For

example, if we had a great deal of food and did not eat, or a great deal of

drink and did not drink, should we be profited?



Certainly not, he said.



Or would an artisan, who had all the implements necessary for his work, and

did not use them, be any the better for the possession of them?  For

example, would a carpenter be any the better for having all his tools and

plenty of wood, if he never worked?



Certainly not, he said.



And if a person had wealth and all the goods of which we were just now

speaking, and did not use them, would he be happy because he possessed

them?



No indeed, Socrates.



Then, I said, a man who would be happy must not only have the good things,

but he must also use them; there is no advantage in merely having them?



True.



Well, Cleinias, but if you have the use as well as the possession of good

things, is that sufficient to confer happiness?



Yes, in my opinion.



And may a person use them either rightly or wrongly?



He must use them rightly.



That is quite true, I said.  And the wrong use of a thing is far worse than

the non-use; for the one is an evil, and the other is neither a good nor an

evil.  You admit that?



He assented.



Now in the working and use of wood, is not that which gives the right use

simply the knowledge of the carpenter?



Nothing else, he said.



And surely, in the manufacture of vessels, knowledge is that which gives

the right way of making them?



He agreed.



And in the use of the goods of which we spoke at first--wealth and health

and beauty, is not knowledge that which directs us to the right use of

them, and regulates our practice about them?



He assented.



Then in every possession and every use of a thing, knowledge is that which

gives a man not only good-fortune but success?



He again assented.



And tell me, I said, O tell me, what do possessions profit a man, if he

have neither good sense nor wisdom?  Would a man be better off, having and

doing many things without wisdom, or a few things with wisdom?  Look at the

matter thus:  If he did fewer things would he not make fewer mistakes? if

he made fewer mistakes would he not have fewer misfortunes? and if he had

fewer misfortunes would he not be less miserable?



Certainly, he said.



And who would do least--a poor man or a rich man?



A poor man.



A weak man or a strong man?



A weak man.



A noble man or a mean man?



A mean man.



And a coward would do less than a courageous and temperate man?



Yes.



And an indolent man less than an active man?



He assented.



And a slow man less than a quick; and one who had dull perceptions of

seeing and hearing less than one who had keen ones?



All this was mutually allowed by us.



Then, I said, Cleinias, the sum of the matter appears to be that the goods

of which we spoke before are not to be regarded as goods in themselves, but

the degree of good and evil in them depends on whether they are or are not

under the guidance of knowledge:  under the guidance of ignorance, they are

greater evils than their opposites, inasmuch as they are more able to

minister to the evil principle which rules them; and when under the

guidance of wisdom and prudence, they are greater goods:  but in themselves

they are nothing?



That, he replied, is obvious.



What then is the result of what has been said?  Is not this the result--

that other things are indifferent, and that wisdom is the only good, and

ignorance the only evil?



He assented.



Let us consider a further point, I said:  Seeing that all men desire

happiness, and happiness, as has been shown, is gained by a use, and a

right use, of the things of life, and the right use of them, and good-

fortune in the use of them, is given by knowledge,--the inference is that

everybody ought by all means to try and make himself as wise as he can?



Yes, he said.



And when a man thinks that he ought to obtain this treasure, far more than

money, from a father or a guardian or a friend or a suitor, whether citizen

or stranger--the eager desire and prayer to them that they would impart

wisdom to you, is not at all dishonourable, Cleinias; nor is any one to be

blamed for doing any honourable service or ministration to any man, whether

a lover or not, if his aim is to get wisdom.  Do you agree? I said.



Yes, he said, I quite agree, and think that you are right.



Yes, I said, Cleinias, if only wisdom can be taught, and does not come to

man spontaneously; for this is a point which has still to be considered,

and is not yet agreed upon by you and me--



But I think, Socrates, that wisdom can be taught, he said.



Best of men, I said, I am delighted to hear you say so; and I am also

grateful to you for having saved me from a long and tiresome investigation

as to whether wisdom can be taught or not.  But now, as you think that

wisdom can be taught, and that wisdom only can make a man happy and

fortunate, will you not acknowledge that all of us ought to love wisdom,

and you individually will try to love her?



Certainly, Socrates, he said; I will do my best.



I was pleased at hearing this; and I turned to Dionysodorus and Euthydemus

and said:  That is an example, clumsy and tedious I admit, of the sort of

exhortations which I would have you give; and I hope that one of you will

set forth what I have been saying in a more artistic style:  or at least

take up the enquiry where I left off, and proceed to show the youth whether

he should have all knowledge; or whether there is one sort of knowledge

only which will make him good and happy, and what that is.  For, as I was

saying at first, the improvement of this young man in virtue and wisdom is

a matter which we have very much at heart.



Thus I spoke, Crito, and was all attention to what was coming.  I wanted to

see how they would approach the question, and where they would start in

their exhortation to the young man that he should practise wisdom and

virtue.  Dionysodorus, who was the elder, spoke first.  Everybody's eyes

were directed towards him, perceiving that something wonderful might

shortly be expected.  And certainly they were not far wrong; for the man,

Crito, began a remarkable discourse well worth hearing, and wonderfully

persuasive regarded as an exhortation to virtue.



Tell me, he said, Socrates and the rest of you who say that you want this

young man to become wise, are you in jest or in real earnest?



I was led by this to imagine that they fancied us to have been jesting when

we asked them to converse with the youth, and that this made them jest and

play, and being under this impression, I was the more decided in saying

that we were in profound earnest.  Dionysodorus said:



Reflect, Socrates; you may have to deny your words.



I have reflected, I said; and I shall never deny my words.



Well, said he, and so you say that you wish Cleinias to become wise?



Undoubtedly.



And he is not wise as yet?



At least his modesty will not allow him to say that he is.



You wish him, he said, to become wise and not, to be ignorant?



That we do.



You wish him to be what he is not, and no longer to be what he is?



I was thrown into consternation at this.



Taking advantage of my consternation he added:  You wish him no longer to

be what he is, which can only mean that you wish him to perish.  Pretty

lovers and friends they must be who want their favourite not to be, or to

perish!



When Ctesippus heard this he got very angry (as a lover well might) and

said:  Stranger of Thurii--if politeness would allow me I should say, A

plague upon you!  What can make you tell such a lie about me and the

others, which I hardly like to repeat, as that I wish Cleinias to perish?



Euthydemus replied:  And do you think, Ctesippus, that it is possible to

tell a lie?



Yes, said Ctesippus; I should be mad to say anything else.



And in telling a lie, do you tell the thing of which you speak or not?



You tell the thing of which you speak.



And he who tells, tells that thing which he tells, and no other?



Yes, said Ctesippus.



And that is a distinct thing apart from other things?



Certainly.



And he who says that thing says that which is?



Yes.



And he who says that which is, says the truth.  And therefore Dionysodorus,

if he says that which is, says the truth of you and no lie.



Yes, Euthydemus, said Ctesippus; but in saying this, he says what is not.



Euthydemus answered:  And that which is not is not?



True.



And that which is not is nowhere?



Nowhere.



And can any one do anything about that which has no existence, or do to

Cleinias that which is not and is nowhere?



I think not, said Ctesippus.



Well, but do rhetoricians, when they speak in the assembly, do nothing?



Nay, he said, they do something.



And doing is making?



Yes.



And speaking is doing and making?



He agreed.



Then no one says that which is not, for in saying what is not he would be

doing something; and you have already acknowledged that no one can do what

is not.  And therefore, upon your own showing, no one says what is false;

but if Dionysodorus says anything, he says what is true and what is.



Yes, Euthydemus, said Ctesippus; but he speaks of things in a certain way

and manner, and not as they really are.



Why, Ctesippus, said Dionysodorus, do you mean to say that any one speaks

of things as they are?



Yes, he said--all gentlemen and truth-speaking persons.



And are not good things good, and evil things evil?



He assented.



And you say that gentlemen speak of things as they are?



Yes.



Then the good speak evil of evil things, if they speak of them as they are?



Yes, indeed, he said; and they speak evil of evil men.  And if I may give

you a piece of advice, you had better take care that they do not speak evil

of you, since I can tell you that the good speak evil of the evil.



And do they speak great things of the great, rejoined Euthydemus, and warm

things of the warm?



To be sure they do, said Ctesippus; and they speak coldly of the insipid

and cold dialectician.



You are abusive, Ctesippus, said Dionysodorus, you are abusive!



Indeed, I am not, Dionysodorus, he replied; for I love you and am giving

you friendly advice, and, if I could, would persuade you not like a boor to

say in my presence that I desire my beloved, whom I value above all men, to

perish.



I saw that they were getting exasperated with one another, so I made a joke

with him and said:  O Ctesippus, I think that we must allow the strangers

to use language in their own way, and not quarrel with them about words,

but be thankful for what they give us.  If they know how to destroy men in

such a way as to make good and sensible men out of bad and foolish ones--

whether this is a discovery of their own, or whether they have learned from

some one else this new sort of death and destruction which enables them to

get rid of a bad man and turn him into a good one--if they know this (and

they do know this--at any rate they said just now that this was the secret

of their newly-discovered art)--let them, in their phraseology, destroy the

youth and make him wise, and all of us with him.  But if you young men do

not like to trust yourselves with them, then fiat experimentum in corpore

senis; I will be the Carian on whom they shall operate.  And here I offer

my old person to Dionysodorus; he may put me into the pot, like Medea the

Colchian, kill me, boil me, if he will only make me good.



Ctesippus said:  And I, Socrates, am ready to commit myself to the

strangers; they may skin me alive, if they please (and I am pretty well

skinned by them already), if only my skin is made at last, not like that of

Marsyas, into a leathern bottle, but into a piece of virtue.  And here is

Dionysodorus fancying that I am angry with him, when really I am not angry

at all; I do but contradict him when I think that he is speaking improperly

to me:  and you must not confound abuse and contradiction, O illustrious

Dionysodorus; for they are quite different things.



Contradiction! said Dionysodorus; why, there never was such a thing.



Certainly there is, he replied; there can be no question of that.  Do you,

Dionysodorus, maintain that there is not?



You will never prove to me, he said, that you have heard any one

contradicting any one else.



Indeed, said Ctesippus; then now you may hear me contradicting

Dionysodorus.



Are you prepared to make that good?



Certainly, he said.



Well, have not all things words expressive of them?



Yes.



Of their existence or of their non-existence?



Of their existence.



Yes, Ctesippus, and we just now proved, as you may remember, that no man

could affirm a negative; for no one could affirm that which is not.



And what does that signify? said Ctesippus; you and I may contradict all

the same for that.



But can we contradict one another, said Dionysodorus, when both of us are

describing the same thing?  Then we must surely be speaking the same thing?



He assented.



Or when neither of us is speaking of the same thing?  For then neither of

us says a word about the thing at all?



He granted that proposition also.



But when I describe something and you describe another thing, or I say

something and you say nothing--is there any contradiction?  How can he who

speaks contradict him who speaks not?



Here Ctesippus was silent; and I in my astonishment said:  What do you

mean, Dionysodorus?  I have often heard, and have been amazed to hear, this

thesis of yours, which is maintained and employed by the disciples of

Protagoras, and others before them, and which to me appears to be quite

wonderful, and suicidal as well as destructive, and I think that I am most

likely to hear the truth about it from you.  The dictum is that there is no

such thing as falsehood; a man must either say what is true or say nothing. 

Is not that your position?



He assented.



But if he cannot speak falsely, may he not think falsely?



No, he cannot, he said.



Then there is no such thing as false opinion?



No, he said.



Then there is no such thing as ignorance, or men who are ignorant; for is

not ignorance, if there be such a thing, a mistake of fact?



Certainly, he said.



And that is impossible?



Impossible, he replied.



Are you saying this as a paradox, Dionysodorus; or do you seriously

maintain no man to be ignorant?



Refute me, he said.



But how can I refute you, if, as you say, to tell a falsehood is

impossible?



Very true, said Euthydemus.



Neither did I tell you just now to refute me, said Dionysodorus; for how

can I tell you to do that which is not?



O Euthydemus, I said, I have but a dull conception of these subtleties and

excellent devices of wisdom; I am afraid that I hardly understand them, and

you must forgive me therefore if I ask a very stupid question:  if there be

no falsehood or false opinion or ignorance, there can be no such thing as

erroneous action, for a man cannot fail of acting as he is acting--that is

what you mean?



Yes, he replied.



And now, I said, I will ask my stupid question:  If there is no such thing

as error in deed, word, or thought, then what, in the name of goodness, do

you come hither to teach?  And were you not just now saying that you could

teach virtue best of all men, to any one who was willing to learn?



And are you such an old fool, Socrates, rejoined Dionysodorus, that you

bring up now what I said at first--and if I had said anything last year, I

suppose that you would bring that up too--but are non-plussed at the words

which I have just uttered?



Why, I said, they are not easy to answer; for they are the words of wise

men:  and indeed I know not what to make of this word 'nonplussed,' which

you used last:  what do you mean by it, Dionysodorus?  You must mean that I

cannot refute your argument.  Tell me if the words have any other sense.



No, he replied, they mean what you say.  And now answer.



What, before you, Dionysodorus? I said.



Answer, said he.



And is that fair?



Yes, quite fair, he said.



Upon what principle? I said.  I can only suppose that you are a very wise

man who comes to us in the character of a great logician, and who knows

when to answer and when not to answer--and now you will not open your mouth

at all, because you know that you ought not.



You prate, he said, instead of answering.  But if, my good sir, you admit

that I am wise, answer as I tell you.



I suppose that I must obey, for you are master.  Put the question.



Are the things which have sense alive or lifeless?



They are alive.



And do you know of any word which is alive?



I cannot say that I do.



Then why did you ask me what sense my words had?



Why, because I was stupid and made a mistake.  And yet, perhaps, I was

right after all in saying that words have a sense;--what do you say, wise

man?  If I was not in error, even you will not refute me, and all your

wisdom will be non-plussed; but if I did fall into error, then again you

are wrong in saying that there is no error,--and this remark was made by

you not quite a year ago.  I am inclined to think, however, Dionysodorus

and Euthydemus, that this argument lies where it was and is not very likely

to advance:  even your skill in the subtleties of logic, which is really

amazing, has not found out the way of throwing another and not falling

yourself, now any more than of old.



Ctesippus said:  Men of Chios, Thurii, or however and whatever you call

yourselves, I wonder at you, for you seem to have no objection to talking

nonsense.



Fearing that there would be high words, I again endeavoured to soothe

Ctesippus, and said to him:  To you, Ctesippus, I must repeat what I said

before to Cleinias--that you do not understand the ways of these

philosophers from abroad.  They are not serious, but, like the Egyptian

wizard, Proteus, they take different forms and deceive us by their

enchantments:  and let us, like Menelaus, refuse to let them go until they

show themselves to us in earnest.  When they begin to be in earnest their

full beauty will appear:  let us then beg and entreat and beseech them to

shine forth.  And I think that I had better once more exhibit the form in

which I pray to behold them; it might be a guide to them.  I will go on

therefore where I left off, as well as I can, in the hope that I may touch

their hearts and move them to pity, and that when they see me deeply

serious and interested, they also may be serious.  You, Cleinias, I said,

shall remind me at what point we left off.  Did we not agree that

philosophy should be studied? and was not that our conclusion?



Yes, he replied.



And philosophy is the acquisition of knowledge?



Yes, he said.



And what knowledge ought we to acquire?  May we not answer with absolute

truth--A knowledge which will do us good?



Certainly, he said.



And should we be any the better if we went about having a knowledge of the

places where most gold was hidden in the earth?



Perhaps we should, he said.



But have we not already proved, I said, that we should be none the better

off, even if without trouble and digging all the gold which there is in the

earth were ours?  And if we knew how to convert stones into gold, the

knowledge would be of no value to us, unless we also knew how to use the

gold?  Do you not remember? I said.



I quite remember, he said.



Nor would any other knowledge, whether of money-making, or of medicine, or

of any other art which knows only how to make a thing, and not to use it

when made, be of any good to us.  Am I not right?



He agreed.



And if there were a knowledge which was able to make men immortal, without

giving them the knowledge of the way to use the immortality, neither would

there be any use in that, if we may argue from the analogy of the previous

instances?



To all this he agreed.



Then, my dear boy, I said, the knowledge which we want is one that uses as

well as makes?



True, he said.



And our desire is not to be skilful lyre-makers, or artists of that sort--

far otherwise; for with them the art which makes is one, and the art which

uses is another.  Although they have to do with the same, they are divided: 

for the art which makes and the art which plays on the lyre differ widely

from one another.  Am I not right?



He agreed.



And clearly we do not want the art of the flute-maker; this is only another

of the same sort?



He assented.



But suppose, I said, that we were to learn the art of making speeches--

would that be the art which would make us happy?



I should say, no, rejoined Cleinias.



And why should you say so? I asked.



I see, he replied, that there are some composers of speeches who do not

know how to use the speeches which they make, just as the makers of lyres

do not know how to use the lyres; and also some who are of themselves

unable to compose speeches, but are able to use the speeches which the

others make for them; and this proves that the art of making speeches is

not the same as the art of using them.



Yes, I said; and I take your words to be a sufficient proof that the art of

making speeches is not one which will make a man happy.  And yet I did

think that the art which we have so long been seeking might be discovered

in that direction; for the composers of speeches, whenever I meet them,

always appear to me to be very extraordinary men, Cleinias, and their art

is lofty and divine, and no wonder.  For their art is a part of the great

art of enchantment, and hardly, if at all, inferior to it:  and whereas the

art of the enchanter is a mode of charming snakes and spiders and

scorpions, and other monsters and pests, this art of their's acts upon

dicasts and ecclesiasts and bodies of men, for the charming and pacifying

of them.  Do you agree with me?



Yes, he said, I think that you are quite right.



Whither then shall we go, I said, and to what art shall we have recourse?



I do not see my way, he said.



But I think that I do, I replied.



And what is your notion? asked Cleinias.



I think that the art of the general is above all others the one of which

the possession is most likely to make a man happy.



I do not think so, he said.



Why not? I said.



The art of the general is surely an art of hunting mankind.



What of that? I said.



Why, he said, no art of hunting extends beyond hunting and capturing; and

when the prey is taken the huntsman or fisherman cannot use it; but they

hand it over to the cook, and the geometricians and astronomers and

calculators (who all belong to the hunting class, for they do not make

their diagrams, but only find out that which was previously contained in

them)--they, I say, not being able to use but only to catch their prey,

hand over their inventions to the dialectician to be applied by him, if

they have any sense in them.



Good, I said, fairest and wisest Cleinias.  And is this true?



Certainly, he said; just as a general when he takes a city or a camp hands

over his new acquisition to the statesman, for he does not know how to use

them himself; or as the quail-taker transfers the quails to the keeper of

them.  If we are looking for the art which is to make us blessed, and which

is able to use that which it makes or takes, the art of the general is not

the one, and some other must be found.



CRITO:  And do you mean, Socrates, that the youngster said all this?



SOCRATES:  Are you incredulous, Crito?



CRITO:  Indeed, I am; for if he did say so, then in my opinion he needs

neither Euthydemus nor any one else to be his instructor.



SOCRATES:  Perhaps I may have forgotten, and Ctesippus was the real

answerer.



CRITO:  Ctesippus! nonsense.



SOCRATES:  All I know is that I heard these words, and that they were not

spoken either by Euthydemus or Dionysodorus.  I dare say, my good Crito,

that they may have been spoken by some superior person:  that I heard them

I am certain.



CRITO:  Yes, indeed, Socrates, by some one a good deal superior, as I

should be disposed to think.  But did you carry the search any further, and

did you find the art which you were seeking?



SOCRATES:  Find! my dear sir, no indeed.  And we cut a poor figure; we were

like children after larks, always on the point of catching the art, which

was always getting away from us.  But why should I repeat the whole story? 

At last we came to the kingly art, and enquired whether that gave and

caused happiness, and then we got into a labyrinth, and when we thought we

were at the end, came out again at the beginning, having still to seek as

much as ever.



CRITO:  How did that happen, Socrates?



SOCRATES:  I will tell you; the kingly art was identified by us with the

political.



CRITO:  Well, and what came of that?



SOCRATES:  To this royal or political art all the arts, including the art

of the general, seemed to render up the supremacy, that being the only one

which knew how to use what they produce.  Here obviously was the very art

which we were seeking--the art which is the source of good government, and

which may be described, in the language of Aeschylus, as alone sitting at

the helm of the vessel of state, piloting and governing all things, and

utilizing them.



CRITO:  And were you not right, Socrates?



SOCRATES:  You shall judge, Crito, if you are willing to hear what

followed; for we resumed the enquiry, and a question of this sort was

asked:  Does the kingly art, having this supreme authority, do anything for

us?  To be sure, was the answer.  And would not you, Crito, say the same?



CRITO:  Yes, I should.



SOCRATES:  And what would you say that the kingly art does?  If medicine

were supposed to have supreme authority over the subordinate arts, and I

were to ask you a similar question about that, you would say--it produces

health?



CRITO:  I should.



SOCRATES:  And what of your own art of husbandry, supposing that to have

supreme authority over the subject arts--what does that do?  Does it not

supply us with the fruits of the earth?



CRITO:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And what does the kingly art do when invested with supreme

power?  Perhaps you may not be ready with an answer?



CRITO:  Indeed I am not, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  No more were we, Crito.  But at any rate you know that if this

is the art which we were seeking, it ought to be useful.



CRITO:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And surely it ought to do us some good?



CRITO:  Certainly, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  And Cleinias and I had arrived at the conclusion that knowledge

of some kind is the only good.



CRITO:  Yes, that was what you were saying.



SOCRATES:  All the other results of politics, and they are many, as for

example, wealth, freedom, tranquillity, were neither good nor evil in

themselves; but the political science ought to make us wise, and impart

knowledge to us, if that is the science which is likely to do us good, and

make us happy.



CRITO:  Yes; that was the conclusion at which you had arrived, according to

your report of the conversation.



SOCRATES:  And does the kingly art make men wise and good?



CRITO:  Why not, Socrates?



SOCRATES:  What, all men, and in every respect? and teach them all the

arts,--carpentering, and cobbling, and the rest of them?



CRITO:  I think not, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  But then what is this knowledge, and what are we to do with it?

For it is not the source of any works which are neither good nor evil, and

gives no knowledge, but the knowledge of itself; what then can it be, and

what are we to do with it?  Shall we say, Crito, that it is the knowledge

by which we are to make other men good?



CRITO:  By all means.



SOCRATES:  And in what will they be good and useful?  Shall we repeat that

they will make others good, and that these others will make others again,

without ever determining in what they are to be good; for we have put aside

the results of politics, as they are called.  This is the old, old song

over again; and we are just as far as ever, if not farther, from the

knowledge of the art or science of happiness.



CRITO:  Indeed, Socrates, you do appear to have got into a great

perplexity.



SOCRATES:  Thereupon, Crito, seeing that I was on the point of shipwreck, I

lifted up my voice, and earnestly entreated and called upon the strangers

to save me and the youth from the whirlpool of the argument; they were our

Castor and Pollux, I said, and they should be serious, and show us in sober

earnest what that knowledge was which would enable us to pass the rest of

our lives in happiness.



CRITO:  And did Euthydemus show you this knowledge?



SOCRATES:  Yes, indeed; he proceeded in a lofty strain to the following

effect:  Would you rather, Socrates, said he, that I should show you this

knowledge about which you have been doubting, or shall I prove that you

already have it?



What, I said, are you blessed with such a power as this?



Indeed I am.



Then I would much rather that you should prove me to have such a knowledge;

at my time of life that will be more agreeable than having to learn.



Then tell me, he said, do you know anything?



Yes, I said, I know many things, but not anything of much importance.



That will do, he said:  And would you admit that anything is what it is,

and at the same time is not what it is?



Certainly not.



And did you not say that you knew something?



I did.



If you know, you are knowing.



Certainly, of the knowledge which I have.



That makes no difference;--and must you not, if you are knowing, know all

things?



Certainly not, I said, for there are many other things which I do not know.



And if you do not know, you are not knowing.



Yes, friend, of that which I do not know.



Still you are not knowing, and you said just now that you were knowing; and

therefore you are and are not at the same time, and in reference to the

same things.



A pretty clatter, as men say, Euthydemus, this of yours! and will you

explain how I possess that knowledge for which we were seeking?  Do you

mean to say that the same thing cannot be and also not be; and therefore,

since I know one thing, that I know all, for I cannot be knowing and not

knowing at the same time, and if I know all things, then I must have the

knowledge for which we are seeking--May I assume this to be your ingenious

notion?



Out of your own mouth, Socrates, you are convicted, he said.



Well, but, Euthydemus, I said, has that never happened to you? for if I am

only in the same case with you and our beloved Dionysodorus, I cannot

complain.  Tell me, then, you two, do you not know some things, and not

know others?



Certainly not, Socrates, said Dionysodorus.



What do you mean, I said; do you know nothing?



Nay, he replied, we do know something.



Then, I said, you know all things, if you know anything?



Yes, all things, he said; and that is as true of you as of us.



O, indeed, I said, what a wonderful thing, and what a great blessing!  And

do all other men know all things or nothing?



Certainly, he replied; they cannot know some things, and not know others,

and be at the same time knowing and not knowing.



Then what is the inference?  I said.



They all know all things, he replied, if they know one thing.



O heavens, Dionysodorus, I said, I see now that you are in earnest; hardly

have I got you to that point.  And do you really and truly know all things,

including carpentering and leather-cutting?



Certainly, he said.



And do you know stitching?



Yes, by the gods, we do, and cobbling, too.



And do you know things such as the numbers of the stars and of the sand?



Certainly; did you think we should say No to that?



By Zeus, said Ctesippus, interrupting, I only wish that you would give me

some proof which would enable me to know whether you speak truly.



What proof shall I give you? he said.



Will you tell me how many teeth Euthydemus has? and Euthydemus shall tell

how many teeth you have.



Will you not take our word that we know all things?



Certainly not, said Ctesippus:  you must further tell us this one thing,

and then we shall know that you are speak the truth; if you tell us the

number, and we count them, and you are found to be right, we will believe

the rest.  They fancied that Ctesippus was making game of them, and they

refused, and they would only say in answer to each of his questions, that

they knew all things.  For at last Ctesippus began to throw off all

restraint; no question in fact was too bad for him; he would ask them if

they knew the foulest things, and they, like wild boars, came rushing on

his blows, and fearlessly replied that they did.  At last, Crito, I too was

carried away by my incredulity, and asked Euthydemus whether Dionysodorus

could dance.



Certainly, he replied.



And can he vault among swords, and turn upon a wheel, at his age? has he

got to such a height of skill as that?



He can do anything, he said.



And did you always know this?



Always, he said.



When you were children, and at your birth?



They both said that they did.



This we could not believe.  And Euthydemus said:  You are incredulous,

Socrates.



Yes, I said, and I might well be incredulous, if I did not know you to be

wise men.



But if you will answer, he said, I will make you confess to similar

marvels.



Well, I said, there is nothing that I should like better than to be self-

convicted of this, for if I am really a wise man, which I never knew

before, and you will prove to me that I know and have always known all

things, nothing in life would be a greater gain to me.



Answer then, he said.



Ask, I said, and I will answer.



Do you know something, Socrates, or nothing?



Something, I said.



And do you know with what you know, or with something else?



With what I know; and I suppose that you mean with my soul?



Are you not ashamed, Socrates, of asking a question when you are asked one?



Well, I said; but then what am I to do? for I will do whatever you bid;

when I do not know what you are asking, you tell me to answer nevertheless,

and not to ask again.



Why, you surely have some notion of my meaning, he said.



Yes, I replied.



Well, then, answer according to your notion of my meaning.



Yes, I said; but if the question which you ask in one sense is understood

and answered by me in another, will that please you--if I answer what is

not to the point?



That will please me very well; but will not please you equally well, as I

imagine.



I certainly will not answer unless I understand you, I said.



You will not answer, he said, according to your view of the meaning,

because you will be prating, and are an ancient.



Now I saw that he was getting angry with me for drawing distinctions, when

he wanted to catch me in his springes of words.  And I remembered that

Connus was always angry with me when I opposed him, and then he neglected

me, because he thought that I was stupid; and as I was intending to go to

Euthydemus as a pupil, I reflected that I had better let him have his way,

as he might think me a blockhead, and refuse to take me.  So I said:  You

are a far better dialectician than myself, Euthydemus, for I have never

made a profession of the art, and therefore do as you say; ask your

questions once more, and I will answer.



Answer then, he said, again, whether you know what you know with something,

or with nothing.



Yes, I said; I know with my soul.



The man will answer more than the question; for I did not ask you, he said,

with what you know, but whether you know with something.



Again I replied, Through ignorance I have answered too much, but I hope

that you will forgive me.  And now I will answer simply that I always know

what I know with something.



And is that something, he rejoined, always the same, or sometimes one

thing, and sometimes another thing?



Always, I replied, when I know, I know with this.



Will you not cease adding to your answers?



My fear is that this word 'always' may get us into trouble.



You, perhaps, but certainly not us.  And now answer:  Do you always know

with this?



Always; since I am required to withdraw the words 'when I know.'



You always know with this, or, always knowing, do you know some things with

this, and some things with something else, or do you know all things with

this?



All that I know, I replied, I know with this.



There again, Socrates, he said, the addition is superfluous.



Well, then, I said, I will take away the words 'that I know.'



Nay, take nothing away; I desire no favours of you; but let me ask:  Would

you be able to know all things, if you did not know all things?



Quite impossible.



And now, he said, you may add on whatever you like, for you confess that

you know all things.



I suppose that is true, I said, if my qualification implied in the words

'that I know' is not allowed to stand; and so I do know all things.



And have you not admitted that you always know all things with that which

you know, whether you make the addition of 'when you know them' or not? for

you have acknowledged that you have always and at once known all things,

that is to say, when you were a child, and at your birth, and when you were

growing up, and before you were born, and before the heaven and earth

existed, you knew all things, if you always know them; and I swear that you

shall always continue to know all things, if I am of the mind to make you.



But I hope that you will be of that mind, reverend Euthydemus, I said, if

you are really speaking the truth, and yet I a little doubt your power to

make good your words unless you have the help of your brother Dionysodorus;

then you may do it.  Tell me now, both of you, for although in the main I

cannot doubt that I really do know all things, when I am told so by men of

your prodigious wisdom--how can I say that I know such things, Euthydemus,

as that the good are unjust; come, do I know that or not?



Certainly, you know that.



What do I know?



That the good are not unjust.



Quite true, I said; and that I have always known; but the question is,

where did I learn that the good are unjust?



Nowhere, said Dionysodorus.



Then, I said, I do not know this.



You are ruining the argument, said Euthydemus to Dionysodorus; he will be

proved not to know, and then after all he will be knowing and not knowing

at the same time.



Dionysodorus blushed.



I turned to the other, and said, What do you think, Euthydemus?  Does not

your omniscient brother appear to you to have made a mistake?



What, replied Dionysodorus in a moment; am I the brother of Euthydemus?



Thereupon I said, Please not to interrupt, my good friend, or prevent

Euthydemus from proving to me that I know the good to be unjust; such a

lesson you might at least allow me to learn.



You are running away, Socrates, said Dionysodorus, and refusing to answer.



No wonder, I said, for I am not a match for one of you, and a fortiori I

must run away from two.  I am no Heracles; and even Heracles could not

fight against the Hydra, who was a she-Sophist, and had the wit to shoot up

many new heads when one of them was cut off; especially when he saw a

second monster of a sea-crab, who was also a Sophist, and appeared to have

newly arrived from a sea-voyage, bearing down upon him from the left,

opening his mouth and biting.  When the monster was growing troublesome he

called Iolaus, his nephew, to his help, who ably succoured him; but if my

Iolaus, who is my brother Patrocles (the statuary), were to come, he would

only make a bad business worse.



And now that you have delivered yourself of this strain, said Dionysodorus,

will you inform me whether Iolaus was the nephew of Heracles any more than

he is yours?



I suppose that I had best answer you, Dionysodorus, I said, for you will

insist on asking--that I pretty well know--out of envy, in order to prevent

me from learning the wisdom of Euthydemus.



Then answer me, he said.



Well then, I said, I can only reply that Iolaus was not my nephew at all,

but the nephew of Heracles; and his father was not my brother Patrocles,

but Iphicles, who has a name rather like his, and was the brother of

Heracles.



And is Patrocles, he said, your brother?



Yes, I said, he is my half-brother, the son of my mother, but not of my

father.



Then he is and is not your brother.



Not by the same father, my good man, I said, for Chaeredemus was his

father, and mine was Sophroniscus.



And was Sophroniscus a father, and Chaeredemus also?



Yes, I said; the former was my father, and the latter his.



Then, he said, Chaeredemus is not a father.



He is not my father, I said.



But can a father be other than a father? or are you the same as a stone?



I certainly do not think that I am a stone, I said, though I am afraid that

you may prove me to be one.



Are you not other than a stone?



I am.



And being other than a stone, you are not a stone; and being other than

gold, you are not gold?



Very true.



And so Chaeredemus, he said, being other than a father, is not a father?



I suppose that he is not a father, I replied.



For if, said Euthydemus, taking up the argument, Chaeredemus is a father,

then Sophroniscus, being other than a father, is not a father; and you,

Socrates, are without a father.



Ctesippus, here taking up the argument, said:  And is not your father in

the same case, for he is other than my father?



Assuredly not, said Euthydemus.



Then he is the same?



He is the same.



I cannot say that I like the connection; but is he only my father,

Euthydemus, or is he the father of all other men?



Of all other men, he replied.  Do you suppose the same person to be a

father and not a father?



Certainly, I did so imagine, said Ctesippus.



And do you suppose that gold is not gold, or that a man is not a man?



They are not 'in pari materia,' Euthydemus, said Ctesippus, and you had

better take care, for it is monstrous to suppose that your father is the

father of all.



But he is, he replied.



What, of men only, said Ctesippus, or of horses and of all other animals?



Of all, he said.



And your mother, too, is the mother of all?



Yes, our mother too.



Yes; and your mother has a progeny of sea-urchins then?



Yes; and yours, he said.



And gudgeons and puppies and pigs are your brothers?



And yours too.



And your papa is a dog?



And so is yours, he said.



If you will answer my questions, said Dionysodorus, I will soon extract the

same admissions from you, Ctesippus.  You say that you have a dog.



Yes, a villain of a one, said Ctesippus.



And he has puppies?



Yes, and they are very like himself.



And the dog is the father of them?



Yes, he said, I certainly saw him and the mother of the puppies come

together.



And is he not yours?



To be sure he is.



Then he is a father, and he is yours; ergo, he is your father, and the

puppies are your brothers.



Let me ask you one little question more, said Dionysodorus, quickly

interposing, in order that Ctesippus might not get in his word:  You beat

this dog?



Ctesippus said, laughing, Indeed I do; and I only wish that I could beat

you instead of him.



Then you beat your father, he said.



I should have far more reason to beat yours, said Ctesippus; what could he

have been thinking of when he begat such wise sons? much good has this

father of you and your brethren the puppies got out of this wisdom of

yours.



But neither he nor you, Ctesippus, have any need of much good.



And have you no need, Euthydemus? he said.



Neither I nor any other man; for tell me now, Ctesippus, if you think it

good or evil for a man who is sick to drink medicine when he wants it; or

to go to war armed rather than unarmed.



Good, I say.  And yet I know that I am going to be caught in one of your

charming puzzles.



That, he replied, you will discover, if you answer; since you admit

medicine to be good for a man to drink, when wanted, must it not be good

for him to drink as much as possible; when he takes his medicine, a

cartload of hellebore will not be too much for him?



Ctesippus said:  Quite so, Euthydemus, that is to say, if he who drinks is

as big as the statue of Delphi.



And seeing that in war to have arms is a good thing, he ought to have as

many spears and shields as possible?



Very true, said Ctesippus; and do you think, Euthydemus, that he ought to

have one shield only, and one spear?



I do.



And would you arm Geryon and Briareus in that way?  Considering that you

and your companion fight in armour, I thought that you would have known

better...Here Euthydemus held his peace, but Dionysodorus returned to the

previous answer of Ctesippus and said:--



Do you not think that the possession of gold is a good thing?



Yes, said Ctesippus, and the more the better.



And to have money everywhere and always is a good?



Certainly, a great good, he said.



And you admit gold to be a good?



Certainly, he replied.



And ought not a man then to have gold everywhere and always, and as much as

possible in himself, and may he not be deemed the happiest of men who has

three talents of gold in his belly, and a talent in his pate, and a stater

of gold in either eye?



Yes, Euthydemus, said Ctesippus; and the Scythians reckon those who have

gold in their own skulls to be the happiest and bravest of men (that is

only another instance of your manner of speaking about the dog and father),

and what is still more extraordinary, they drink out of their own skulls

gilt, and see the inside of them, and hold their own head in their hands.



And do the Scythians and others see that which has the quality of vision,

or that which has not? said Euthydemus.



That which has the quality of vision clearly.



And you also see that which has the quality of vision? he said.  (Note: 

the ambiguity of (Greek), 'things visible and able to see,' (Greek), 'the

speaking of the silent,' the silent denoting either the speaker or the

subject of the speech, cannot be perfectly rendered in English.  Compare

Aristot. Soph. Elenchi (Poste's translation):--



'Of ambiguous propositions the following are instances:--



'I hope that you the enemy may slay.



'Whom one knows, he knows.  Either the person knowing or the person known

is here affirmed to know.



'What one sees, that one sees:  one sees a pillar:  ergo, that one pillar

sees.



'What you ARE holding, that you are:  you are holding a stone:  ergo, a

stone you are.



'Is a speaking of the silent possible?  "The silent" denotes either the

speaker are the subject of speech.



'There are three kinds of ambiguity of term or proposition.  The first is

when there is an equal linguistic propriety in several interpretations; the

second when one is improper but customary; the third when the ambiguity

arises in the combination of elements that are in themselves unambiguous,

as in "knowing letters."  "Knowing" and "letters" are perhaps separately

unambiguous, but in combination may imply either that the letters are

known, or that they themselves have knowledge.  Such are the modes in which

propositions and terms may be ambiguous.'



Yes, I do.



Then do you see our garments?



Yes.



Then our garments have the quality of vision.



They can see to any extent, said Ctesippus.



What can they see?



Nothing; but you, my sweet man, may perhaps imagine that they do not see;

and certainly, Euthydemus, you do seem to me to have been caught napping

when you were not asleep, and that if it be possible to speak and say

nothing--you are doing so.



And may there not be a silence of the speaker? said Dionysodorus.



Impossible, said Ctesippus.



Or a speaking of the silent?



That is still more impossible, he said.



But when you speak of stones, wood, iron bars, do you not speak of the

silent?



Not when I pass a smithy; for then the iron bars make a tremendous noise

and outcry if they are touched:  so that here your wisdom is strangely

mistaken; please, however, to tell me how you can be silent when speaking

(I thought that Ctesippus was put upon his mettle because Cleinias was

present).



When you are silent, said Euthydemus, is there not a silence of all things?



Yes, he said.



But if speaking things are included in all things, then the speaking are

silent.



What, said Ctesippus; then all things are not silent?



Certainly not, said Euthydemus.



Then, my good friend, do they all speak?



Yes; those which speak.



Nay, said Ctesippus, but the question which I ask is whether all things are

silent or speak?



Neither and both, said Dionysodorus, quickly interposing; I am sure that

you will be 'non-plussed' at that answer.



Here Ctesippus, as his manner was, burst into a roar of laughter; he said,

That brother of yours, Euthydemus, has got into a dilemma; all is over with

him.  This delighted Cleinias, whose laughter made Ctesippus ten times as

uproarious; but I cannot help thinking that the rogue must have picked up

this answer from them; for there has been no wisdom like theirs in our

time.  Why do you laugh, Cleinias, I said, at such solemn and beautiful

things?



Why, Socrates, said Dionysodorus, did you ever see a beautiful thing?



Yes, Dionysodorus, I replied, I have seen many.



Were they other than the beautiful, or the same as the beautiful?



Now I was in a great quandary at having to answer this question, and I

thought that I was rightly served for having opened my mouth at all:  I

said however, They are not the same as absolute beauty, but they have

beauty present with each of them.



And are you an ox because an ox is present with you, or are you

Dionysodorus, because Dionysodorus is present with you?



God forbid, I replied.



But how, he said, by reason of one thing being present with another, will

one thing be another?



Is that your difficulty? I said.  For I was beginning to imitate their

skill, on which my heart was set.



Of course, he replied, I and all the world are in a difficulty about the

non-existent.



What do you mean, Dionysodorus? I said.  Is not the honourable honourable

and the base base?



That, he said, is as I please.



And do you please?



Yes, he said.



And you will admit that the same is the same, and the other other; for

surely the other is not the same; I should imagine that even a child will

hardly deny the other to be other.  But I think, Dionysodorus, that you

must have intentionally missed the last question; for in general you and

your brother seem to me to be good workmen in your own department, and to

do the dialectician's business excellently well.



What, said he, is the business of a good workman? tell me, in the first

place, whose business is hammering?



The smith's.



And whose the making of pots?



The potter's.



And who has to kill and skin and mince and boil and roast?



The cook, I said.



And if a man does his business he does rightly?



Certainly.



And the business of the cook is to cut up and skin; you have admitted that?



Yes, I have admitted that, but you must not be too hard upon me.



Then if some one were to kill, mince, boil, roast the cook, he would do his

business, and if he were to hammer the smith, and make a pot of the potter,

he would do their business.



Poseidon, I said, this is the crown of wisdom; can I ever hope to have such

wisdom of my own?



And would you be able, Socrates, to recognize this wisdom when it has

become your own?



Certainly, I said, if you will allow me.



What, he said, do you think that you know what is your own?



Yes, I do, subject to your correction; for you are the bottom, and

Euthydemus is the top, of all my wisdom.



Is not that which you would deem your own, he said, that which you have in

your own power, and which you are able to use as you would desire, for

example, an ox or a sheep--would you not think that which you could sell

and give and sacrifice to any god whom you pleased, to be your own, and

that which you could not give or sell or sacrifice you would think not to

be in your own power?



Yes, I said (for I was certain that something good would come out of the

questions, which I was impatient to hear); yes, such things, and such

things only are mine.



Yes, he said, and you would mean by animals living beings?



Yes, I said.



You agree then, that those animals only are yours with which you have the

power to do all these things which I was just naming?



I agree.



Then, after a pause, in which he seemed to be lost in the contemplation of

something great, he said:  Tell me, Socrates, have you an ancestral Zeus? 

Here, anticipating the final move, like a person caught in a net, who gives

a desperate twist that he may get away, I said:  No, Dionysodorus, I have

not.



What a miserable man you must be then, he said; you are not an Athenian at

all if you have no ancestral gods or temples, or any other mark of

gentility.



Nay, Dionysodorus, I said, do not be rough; good words, if you please; in

the way of religion I have altars and temples, domestic and ancestral, and

all that other Athenians have.



And have not other Athenians, he said, an ancestral Zeus?



That name, I said, is not to be found among the Ionians, whether colonists

or citizens of Athens; an ancestral Apollo there is, who is the father of

Ion, and a family Zeus, and a Zeus guardian of the phratry, and an Athene

guardian of the phratry.  But the name of ancestral Zeus is unknown to us.



No matter, said Dionysodorus, for you admit that you have Apollo, Zeus, and

Athene.



Certainly, I said.



And they are your gods, he said.



Yes, I said, my lords and ancestors.



At any rate they are yours, he said, did you not admit that?



I did, I said; what is going to happen to me?



And are not these gods animals? for you admit that all things which have

life are animals; and have not these gods life?



They have life, I said.



Then are they not animals?



They are animals, I said.



And you admitted that of animals those are yours which you could give away

or sell or offer in sacrifice, as you pleased?



I did admit that, Euthydemus, and I have no way of escape.



Well then, said he, if you admit that Zeus and the other gods are yours,

can you sell them or give them away or do what you will with them, as you

would with other animals?



At this I was quite struck dumb, Crito, and lay prostrate.  Ctesippus came

to the rescue.



Bravo, Heracles, brave words, said he.



Bravo Heracles, or is Heracles a Bravo? said Dionysodorus.



Poseidon, said Ctesippus, what awful distinctions.  I will have no more of

them; the pair are invincible.



Then, my dear Crito, there was universal applause of the speakers and their

words, and what with laughing and clapping of hands and rejoicings the two

men were quite overpowered; for hitherto their partisans only had cheered

at each successive hit, but now the whole company shouted with delight

until the columns of the Lyceum returned the sound, seeming to sympathize

in their joy.  To such a pitch was I affected myself, that I made a speech,

in which I acknowledged that I had never seen the like of their wisdom; I

was their devoted servant, and fell to praising and admiring of them.  What

marvellous dexterity of wit, I said, enabled you to acquire this great

perfection in such a short time?  There is much, indeed, to admire in your

words, Euthydemus and Dionysodorus, but there is nothing that I admire more

than your magnanimous disregard of any opinion--whether of the many, or of

the grave and reverend seigniors--you regard only those who are like

yourselves.  And I do verily believe that there are few who are like you,

and who would approve of such arguments; the majority of mankind are so

ignorant of their value, that they would be more ashamed of employing them

in the refutation of others than of being refuted by them.  I must further

express my approval of your kind and public-spirited denial of all

differences, whether of good and evil, white or black, or any other; the

result of which is that, as you say, every mouth is sewn up, not excepting

your own, which graciously follows the example of others; and thus all

ground of offence is taken away.  But what appears to me to be more than

all is, that this art and invention of yours has been so admirably

contrived by you, that in a very short time it can be imparted to any one. 

I observed that Ctesippus learned to imitate you in no time.  Now this

quickness of attainment is an excellent thing; but at the same time I would

advise you not to have any more public entertainments; there is a danger

that men may undervalue an art which they have so easy an opportunity of

acquiring; the exhibition would be best of all, if the discussion were

confined to your two selves; but if there must be an audience, let him only

be present who is willing to pay a handsome fee;--you should be careful of

this;--and if you are wise, you will also bid your disciples discourse with

no man but you and themselves.  For only what is rare is valuable; and

'water,' which, as Pindar says, is the 'best of all things,' is also the

cheapest.  And now I have only to request that you will receive Cleinias

and me among your pupils.



Such was the discussion, Crito; and after a few more words had passed

between us we went away.  I hope that you will come to them with me, since

they say that they are able to teach any one who will give them money; no

age or want of capacity is an impediment.  And I must repeat one thing

which they said, for your especial benefit,--that the learning of their art

did not at all interfere with the business of money-making.



CRITO:  Truly, Socrates, though I am curious and ready to learn, yet I fear

that I am not like-minded with Euthydemus, but one of the other sort, who,

as you were saying, would rather be refuted by such arguments than use them

in refutation of others.  And though I may appear ridiculous in venturing

to advise you, I think that you may as well hear what was said to me by a

man of very considerable pretensions--he was a professor of legal oratory--

who came away from you while I was walking up and down.  'Crito,' said he

to me, 'are you giving no attention to these wise men?'  'No, indeed,' I

said to him; 'I could not get within hearing of them--there was such a

crowd.'  'You would have heard something worth hearing if you had.'  'What

was that?' I said.  'You would have heard the greatest masters of the art

of rhetoric discoursing.'  'And what did you think of them?' I said.  'What

did I think of them?' he said:--'theirs was the sort of discourse which

anybody might hear from men who were playing the fool, and making much ado

about nothing.'  That was the expression which he used.  'Surely,' I said,

'philosophy is a charming thing.'  'Charming!' he said; 'what simplicity!

philosophy is nought; and I think that if you had been present you would

have been ashamed of your friend--his conduct was so very strange in

placing himself at the mercy of men who care not what they say, and fasten

upon every word.  And these, as I was telling you, are supposed to be the

most eminent professors of their time.  But the truth is, Crito, that the

study itself and the men themselves are utterly mean and ridiculous.'  Now

censure of the pursuit, Socrates, whether coming from him or from others,

appears to me to be undeserved; but as to the impropriety of holding a

public discussion with such men, there, I confess that, in my opinion, he

was in the right.



SOCRATES:  O Crito, they are marvellous men; but what was I going to say? 

First of all let me know;--What manner of man was he who came up to you and

censured philosophy; was he an orator who himself practises in the courts,

or an instructor of orators, who makes the speeches with which they do

battle?



CRITO:  He was certainly not an orator, and I doubt whether he had ever

been into court; but they say that he knows the business, and is a clever

man, and composes wonderful speeches.



SOCRATES:  Now I understand, Crito; he is one of an amphibious class, whom

I was on the point of mentioning--one of those whom Prodicus describes as

on the border-ground between philosophers and statesmen--they think that

they are the wisest of all men, and that they are generally esteemed the

wisest; nothing but the rivalry of the philosophers stands in their way;

and they are of the opinion that if they can prove the philosophers to be

good for nothing, no one will dispute their title to the palm of wisdom,

for that they are themselves really the wisest, although they are apt to be

mauled by Euthydemus and his friends, when they get hold of them in

conversation.  This opinion which they entertain of their own wisdom is

very natural; for they have a certain amount of philosophy, and a certain

amount of political wisdom; there is reason in what they say, for they

argue that they have just enough of both, and so they keep out of the way

of all risks and conflicts and reap the fruits of their wisdom.



CRITO:  What do you say of them, Socrates?  There is certainly something

specious in that notion of theirs.



SOCRATES:  Yes, Crito, there is more speciousness than truth; they cannot

be made to understand the nature of intermediates.  For all persons or

things, which are intermediate between two other things, and participate in

both of them--if one of these two things is good and the other evil, are

better than the one and worse than the other; but if they are in a mean

between two good things which do not tend to the same end, they fall short

of either of their component elements in the attainment of their ends. 

Only in the case when the two component elements which do not tend to the

same end are evil is the participant better than either.  Now, if

philosophy and political action are both good, but tend to different ends,

and they participate in both, and are in a mean between them, then they are

talking nonsense, for they are worse than either; or, if the one be good

and the other evil, they are better than the one and worse than the other;

only on the supposition that they are both evil could there be any truth in

what they say.  I do not think that they will admit that their two pursuits

are either wholly or partly evil; but the truth is, that these philosopher-

politicians who aim at both fall short of both in the attainment of their

respective ends, and are really third, although they would like to stand

first.  There is no need, however, to be angry at this ambition of theirs--

which may be forgiven; for every man ought to be loved who says and

manfully pursues and works out anything which is at all like wisdom:  at

the same time we shall do well to see them as they really are.



CRITO:  I have often told you, Socrates, that I am in a constant difficulty

about my two sons.  What am I to do with them?  There is no hurry about the

younger one, who is only a child; but the other, Critobulus, is getting on,

and needs some one who will improve him.  I cannot help thinking, when I

hear you talk, that there is a sort of madness in many of our anxieties

about our children:--in the first place, about marrying a wife of good

family to be the mother of them, and then about heaping up money for them--

and yet taking no care about their education.  But then again, when I

contemplate any of those who pretend to educate others, I am amazed.  To

me, if I am to confess the truth, they all seem to be such outrageous

beings:  so that I do not know how I can advise the youth to study

philosophy.



SOCRATES:  Dear Crito, do you not know that in every profession the

inferior sort are numerous and good for nothing, and the good are few and

beyond all price:  for example, are not gymnastic and rhetoric and money-

making and the art of the general, noble arts?



CRITO:  Certainly they are, in my judgment.



SOCRATES:  Well, and do you not see that in each of these arts the many are

ridiculous performers?



CRITO:  Yes, indeed, that is very true.



SOCRATES:  And will you on this account shun all these pursuits yourself

and refuse to allow them to your son?



CRITO:  That would not be reasonable, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  Do you then be reasonable, Crito, and do not mind whether the

teachers of philosophy are good or bad, but think only of philosophy

herself.  Try and examine her well and truly, and if she be evil seek to

turn away all men from her, and not your sons only; but if she be what I

believe that she is, then follow her and serve her, you and your house, as

the saying is, and be of good cheer.







End 



Euthyphro

by Plato

Translated by Benjamin Jowett






INTRODUCTION.



In the Meno, Anytus had parted from Socrates with the significant words: 

'That in any city, and particularly in the city of Athens, it is easier to

do men harm than to do them good;' and Socrates was anticipating another

opportunity of talking with him.  In the Euthyphro, Socrates is awaiting

his trial for impiety.  But before the trial begins, Plato would like to

put the world on their trial, and convince them of ignorance in that very

matter touching which Socrates is accused.  An incident which may perhaps

really have occurred in the family of Euthyphro, a learned Athenian diviner

and soothsayer, furnishes the occasion of the discussion.



This Euthyphro and Socrates are represented as meeting in the porch of the

King Archon.  (Compare Theaet.)  Both have legal business in hand. 

Socrates is defendant in a suit for impiety which Meletus has brought

against him (it is remarked by the way that he is not a likely man himself

to have brought a suit against another); and Euthyphro too is plaintiff in

an action for murder, which he has brought against his own father.  The

latter has originated in the following manner:--A poor dependant of the

family had slain one of their domestic slaves in Naxos.  The guilty person

was bound and thrown into a ditch by the command of Euthyphro's father, who

sent to the interpreters of religion at Athens to ask what should be done

with him.  Before the messenger came back the criminal had died from hunger

and exposure.



This is the origin of the charge of murder which Euthyphro brings against

his father.  Socrates is confident that before he could have undertaken the

responsibility of such a prosecution, he must have been perfectly informed

of the nature of piety and impiety; and as he is going to be tried for

impiety himself, he thinks that he cannot do better than learn of Euthyphro

(who will be admitted by everybody, including the judges, to be an

unimpeachable authority) what piety is, and what is impiety.  What then is

piety?



Euthyphro, who, in the abundance of his knowledge, is very willing to

undertake all the responsibility, replies:  That piety is doing as I do,

prosecuting your father (if he is guilty) on a charge of murder; doing as

the gods do--as Zeus did to Cronos, and Cronos to Uranus.



Socrates has a dislike to these tales of mythology, and he fancies that

this dislike of his may be the reason why he is charged with impiety.  'Are

they really true?'  'Yes, they are;' and Euthyphro will gladly tell

Socrates some more of them.  But Socrates would like first of all to have a

more satisfactory answer to the question, 'What is piety?'  'Doing as I do,

charging a father with murder,' may be a single instance of piety, but can

hardly be regarded as a general definition.



Euthyphro replies, that 'Piety is what is dear to the gods, and impiety is

what is not dear to them.'  But may there not be differences of opinion, as

among men, so also among the gods?  Especially, about good and evil, which

have no fixed rule; and these are precisely the sort of differences which

give rise to quarrels.  And therefore what may be dear to one god may not

be dear to another, and the same action may be both pious and impious; e.g.

your chastisement of your father, Euthyphro, may be dear or pleasing to

Zeus (who inflicted a similar chastisement on his own father), but not

equally pleasing to Cronos or Uranus (who suffered at the hands of their

sons).



Euthyphro answers that there is no difference of opinion, either among gods

or men, as to the propriety of punishing a murderer.  Yes, rejoins

Socrates, when they know him to be a murderer; but you are assuming the

point at issue.  If all the circumstances of the case are considered, are

you able to show that your father was guilty of murder, or that all the

gods are agreed in approving of our prosecution of him?  And must you not

allow that what is hated by one god may be liked by another?  Waiving this

last, however, Socrates proposes to amend the definition, and say that

'what all the gods love is pious, and what they all hate is impious.'  To

this Euthyphro agrees.



Socrates proceeds to analyze the new form of the definition.  He shows that

in other cases the act precedes the state; e.g. the act of being carried,

loved, etc. precedes the state of being carried, loved, etc., and therefore

that which is dear to the gods is dear to the gods because it is first

loved of them, not loved of them because it is dear to them.  But the pious

or holy is loved by the gods because it is pious or holy, which is

equivalent to saying, that it is loved by them because it is dear to them.

Here then appears to be a contradiction,--Euthyphro has been giving an

attribute or accident of piety only, and not the essence.  Euthyphro

acknowledges himself that his explanations seem to walk away or go round in

a circle, like the moving figures of Daedalus, the ancestor of Socrates,

who has communicated his art to his descendants.



Socrates, who is desirous of stimulating the indolent intelligence of

Euthyphro, raises the question in another manner:  'Is all the pious just?' 

'Yes.'  'Is all the just pious?'  'No.'  'Then what part of justice is

piety?'  Euthyphro replies that piety is that part of justice which

'attends' to the gods, as there is another part of justice which 'attends'

to men.  But what is the meaning of 'attending' to the gods?  The word

'attending,' when applied to dogs, horses, and men, implies that in some

way they are made better.  But how do pious or holy acts make the gods any

better?  Euthyphro explains that he means by pious acts, acts of service or

ministration.  Yes; but the ministrations of the husbandman, the physician,

and the builder have an end.  To what end do we serve the gods, and what do

we help them to accomplish?  Euthyphro replies, that all these difficult

questions cannot be resolved in a short time; and he would rather say

simply that piety is knowing how to please the gods in word and deed, by

prayers and sacrifices.  In other words, says Socrates, piety is 'a science

of asking and giving'--asking what we want and giving what they want; in

short, a mode of doing business between gods and men.  But although they

are the givers of all good, how can we give them any good in return?  'Nay,

but we give them honour.'  Then we give them not what is beneficial, but

what is pleasing or dear to them; and this is the point which has been

already disproved.



Socrates, although weary of the subterfuges and evasions of Euthyphro,

remains unshaken in his conviction that he must know the nature of piety,

or he would never have prosecuted his old father.  He is still hoping that

he will condescend to instruct him.  But Euthyphro is in a hurry and cannot

stay.  And Socrates' last hope of knowing the nature of piety before he is

prosecuted for impiety has disappeared.  As in the Euthydemus the irony is

carried on to the end.



The Euthyphro is manifestly designed to contrast the real nature of piety

and impiety with the popular conceptions of them.  But when the popular

conceptions of them have been overthrown, Socrates does not offer any

definition of his own:  as in the Laches and Lysis, he prepares the way for

an answer to the question which he has raised; but true to his own

character, refuses to answer himself.



Euthyphro is a religionist, and is elsewhere spoken of, if he be the same

person, as the author of a philosophy of names, by whose 'prancing steeds'

Socrates in the Cratylus is carried away.  He has the conceit and self-

confidence of a Sophist; no doubt that he is right in prosecuting his

father has ever entered into his mind.  Like a Sophist too, he is incapable

either of framing a general definition or of following the course of an

argument.  His wrong-headedness, one-sidedness, narrowness, positiveness,

are characteristic of his priestly office.  His failure to apprehend an

argument may be compared to a similar defect which is observable in the

rhapsode Ion.  But he is not a bad man, and he is friendly to Socrates,

whose familiar sign he recognizes with interest.  Though unable to follow

him he is very willing to be led by him, and eagerly catches at any

suggestion which saves him from the trouble of thinking.  Moreover he is

the enemy of Meletus, who, as he says, is availing himself of the popular

dislike to innovations in religion in order to injure Socrates; at the same

time he is amusingly confident that he has weapons in his own armoury which

would be more than a match for him.  He is quite sincere in his prosecution

of his father, who has accidentally been guilty of homicide, and is not

wholly free from blame.  To purge away the crime appears to him in the

light of a duty, whoever may be the criminal.



Thus begins the contrast between the religion of the letter, or of the

narrow and unenlightened conscience, and the higher notion of religion

which Socrates vainly endeavours to elicit from him.  'Piety is doing as I

do' is the idea of religion which first occurs to him, and to many others

who do not say what they think with equal frankness.  For men are not

easily persuaded that any other religion is better than their own; or that

other nations, e.g. the Greeks in the time of Socrates, were equally

serious in their religious beliefs and difficulties.  The chief difference

between us and them is, that they were slowly learning what we are in

process of forgetting.  Greek mythology hardly admitted of the distinction

between accidental homicide and murder:  that the pollution of blood was

the same in both cases is also the feeling of the Athenian diviner.  He had

not as yet learned the lesson, which philosophy was teaching, that Homer

and Hesiod, if not banished from the state, or whipped out of the assembly,

as Heracleitus more rudely proposed, at any rate were not to be appealed to

as authorities in religion; and he is ready to defend his conduct by the

examples of the gods.  These are the very tales which Socrates cannot

abide; and his dislike of them, as he suspects, has branded him with the

reputation of impiety.  Here is one answer to the question, 'Why Socrates

was put to death,' suggested by the way.  Another is conveyed in the words,

'The Athenians do not care about any man being thought wise until he begins

to make other men wise; and then for some reason or other they are angry:' 

which may be said to be the rule of popular toleration in most other

countries, and not at Athens only.  In the course of the argument Socrates

remarks that the controversial nature of morals and religion arises out of

the difficulty of verifying them.  There is no measure or standard to which

they can be referred.



The next definition, 'Piety is that which is loved of the gods,' is

shipwrecked on a refined distinction between the state and the act,

corresponding respectively to the adjective (philon) and the participle

(philoumenon), or rather perhaps to the participle and the verb

(philoumenon and phileitai).  The act is prior to the state (as in

Aristotle the energeia precedes the dunamis); and the state of being loved

is preceded by the act of being loved.  But piety or holiness is preceded

by the act of being pious, not by the act of being loved; and therefore

piety and the state of being loved are different.  Through such subtleties

of dialectic Socrates is working his way into a deeper region of thought

and feeling.  He means to say that the words 'loved of the gods' express an

attribute only, and not the essence of piety.



Then follows the third and last definition, 'Piety is a part of justice.' 

Thus far Socrates has proceeded in placing religion on a moral foundation.

He is seeking to realize the harmony of religion and morality, which the

great poets Aeschylus, Sophocles, and Pindar had unconsciously anticipated,

and which is the universal want of all men.  To this the soothsayer adds

the ceremonial element, 'attending upon the gods.'  When further

interrogated by Socrates as to the nature of this 'attention to the gods,'

he replies, that piety is an affair of business, a science of giving and

asking, and the like.  Socrates points out the anthropomorphism of these

notions, (compare Symp.; Republic; Politicus.)  But when we expect him to

go on and show that the true service of the gods is the service of the

spirit and the co-operation with them in all things true and good, he stops

short; this was a lesson which the soothsayer could not have been made to

understand, and which every one must learn for himself.



There seem to be altogether three aims or interests in this little

Dialogue:  (1) the dialectical development of the idea of piety; (2) the

antithesis of true and false religion, which is carried to a certain extent

only; (3) the defence of Socrates.



The subtle connection with the Apology and the Crito; the holding back of

the conclusion, as in the Charmides, Lysis, Laches, Protagoras, and other

Dialogues; the deep insight into the religious world; the dramatic power

and play of the two characters; the inimitable irony, are reasons for

believing that the Euthyphro is a genuine Platonic writing.  The spirit in

which the popular representations of mythology are denounced recalls

Republic II.  The virtue of piety has been already mentioned as one of five

in the Protagoras, but is not reckoned among the four cardinal virtues of

Republic IV.  The figure of Daedalus has occurred in the Meno; that of

Proteus in the Euthydemus and Io.  The kingly science has already appeared

in the Euthydemus, and will reappear in the Republic and Statesman.  But

neither from these nor any other indications of similarity or difference,

and still less from arguments respecting the suitableness of this little

work to aid Socrates at the time of his trial or the reverse, can any

evidence of the date be obtained.





EUTHYPHRO



by



Plato



Translated by Benjamin Jowett





PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE:  Socrates, Euthyphro.



SCENE:  The Porch of the King Archon.





EUTHYPHRO:  Why have you left the Lyceum, Socrates? and what are you doing

in the Porch of the King Archon?  Surely you cannot be concerned in a suit

before the King, like myself?



SOCRATES:  Not in a suit, Euthyphro; impeachment is the word which the

Athenians use.



EUTHYPHRO:  What!  I suppose that some one has been prosecuting you, for I

cannot believe that you are the prosecutor of another.



SOCRATES:  Certainly not.



EUTHYPHRO:  Then some one else has been prosecuting you?



SOCRATES:  Yes.



EUTHYPHRO:  And who is he?



SOCRATES:  A young man who is little known, Euthyphro; and I hardly know

him:  his name is Meletus, and he is of the deme of Pitthis.  Perhaps you

may remember his appearance; he has a beak, and long straight hair, and a

beard which is ill grown.



EUTHYPHRO:  No, I do not remember him, Socrates.  But what is the charge

which he brings against you?



SOCRATES:  What is the charge?  Well, a very serious charge, which shows a

good deal of character in the young man, and for which he is certainly not

to be despised.  He says he knows how the youth are corrupted and who are

their corruptors.  I fancy that he must be a wise man, and seeing that I am

the reverse of a wise man, he has found me out, and is going to accuse me

of corrupting his young friends.  And of this our mother the state is to be

the judge.  Of all our political men he is the only one who seems to me to

begin in the right way, with the cultivation of virtue in youth; like a

good husbandman, he makes the young shoots his first care, and clears away

us who are the destroyers of them.  This is only the first step; he will

afterwards attend to the elder branches; and if he goes on as he has begun,

he will be a very great public benefactor.



EUTHYPHRO:  I hope that he may; but I rather fear, Socrates, that the

opposite will turn out to be the truth.  My opinion is that in attacking

you he is simply aiming a blow at the foundation of the state.  But in what

way does he say that you corrupt the young?



SOCRATES:  He brings a wonderful accusation against me, which at first

hearing excites surprise:  he says that I am a poet or maker of gods, and

that I invent new gods and deny the existence of old ones; this is the

ground of his indictment.



EUTHYPHRO:  I understand, Socrates; he means to attack you about the

familiar sign which occasionally, as you say, comes to you.  He thinks that

you are a neologian, and he is going to have you up before the court for

this.  He knows that such a charge is readily received by the world, as I

myself know too well; for when I speak in the assembly about divine things,

and foretell the future to them, they laugh at me and think me a madman. 

Yet every word that I say is true.  But they are jealous of us all; and we

must be brave and go at them.



SOCRATES:  Their laughter, friend Euthyphro, is not a matter of much

consequence.  For a man may be thought wise; but the Athenians, I suspect,

do not much trouble themselves about him until he begins to impart his

wisdom to others, and then for some reason or other, perhaps, as you say,

from jealousy, they are angry.



EUTHYPHRO:  I am never likely to try their temper in this way.



SOCRATES:  I dare say not, for you are reserved in your behaviour, and

seldom impart your wisdom.  But I have a benevolent habit of pouring out

myself to everybody, and would even pay for a listener, and I am afraid

that the Athenians may think me too talkative.  Now if, as I was saying,

they would only laugh at me, as you say that they laugh at you, the time

might pass gaily enough in the court; but perhaps they may be in earnest,

and then what the end will be you soothsayers only can predict.



EUTHYPHRO:  I dare say that the affair will end in nothing, Socrates, and

that you will win your cause; and I think that I shall win my own.



SOCRATES:  And what is your suit, Euthyphro? are you the pursuer or the

defendant?



EUTHYPHRO:  I am the pursuer.



SOCRATES:  Of whom?



EUTHYPHRO:  You will think me mad when I tell you.



SOCRATES:  Why, has the fugitive wings?



EUTHYPHRO:  Nay, he is not very volatile at his time of life.



SOCRATES:  Who is he?



EUTHYPHRO:  My father.



SOCRATES:  Your father! my good man?



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And of what is he accused?



EUTHYPHRO:  Of murder, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  By the powers, Euthyphro! how little does the common herd know

of the nature of right and truth.  A man must be an extraordinary man, and

have made great strides in wisdom, before he could have seen his way to

bring such an action.



EUTHYPHRO:  Indeed, Socrates, he must.



SOCRATES:  I suppose that the man whom your father murdered was one of your

relatives--clearly he was; for if he had been a stranger you would never

have thought of prosecuting him.



EUTHYPHRO:  I am amused, Socrates, at your making a distinction between one

who is a relation and one who is not a relation; for surely the pollution

is the same in either case, if you knowingly associate with the murderer

when you ought to clear yourself and him by proceeding against him.  The

real question is whether the murdered man has been justly slain.  If

justly, then your duty is to let the matter alone; but if unjustly, then

even if the murderer lives under the same roof with you and eats at the

same table, proceed against him.  Now the man who is dead was a poor

dependant of mine who worked for us as a field labourer on our farm in

Naxos, and one day in a fit of drunken passion he got into a quarrel with

one of our domestic servants and slew him.  My father bound him hand and

foot and threw him into a ditch, and then sent to Athens to ask of a

diviner what he should do with him.  Meanwhile he never attended to him and

took no care about him, for he regarded him as a murderer; and thought that

no great harm would be done even if he did die.  Now this was just what

happened.  For such was the effect of cold and hunger and chains upon him,

that before the messenger returned from the diviner, he was dead.  And my

father and family are angry with me for taking the part of the murderer and

prosecuting my father.  They say that he did not kill him, and that if he

did, the dead man was but a murderer, and I ought not to take any notice,

for that a son is impious who prosecutes a father.  Which shows, Socrates,

how little they know what the gods think about piety and impiety.



SOCRATES:  Good heavens, Euthyphro! and is your knowledge of religion and

of things pious and impious so very exact, that, supposing the

circumstances to be as you state them, you are not afraid lest you too may

be doing an impious thing in bringing an action against your father?



EUTHYPHRO:  The best of Euthyphro, and that which distinguishes him,

Socrates, from other men, is his exact knowledge of all such matters.  What

should I be good for without it?



SOCRATES:  Rare friend!  I think that I cannot do better than be your

disciple.  Then before the trial with Meletus comes on I shall challenge

him, and say that I have always had a great interest in religious

questions, and now, as he charges me with rash imaginations and innovations

in religion, I have become your disciple.  You, Meletus, as I shall say to

him, acknowledge Euthyphro to be a great theologian, and sound in his

opinions; and if you approve of him you ought to approve of me, and not

have me into court; but if you disapprove, you should begin by indicting

him who is my teacher, and who will be the ruin, not of the young, but of

the old; that is to say, of myself whom he instructs, and of his old father

whom he admonishes and chastises.  And if Meletus refuses to listen to me,

but will go on, and will not shift the indictment from me to you, I cannot

do better than repeat this challenge in the court.



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes, indeed, Socrates; and if he attempts to indict me I am

mistaken if I do not find a flaw in him; the court shall have a great deal

more to say to him than to me.



SOCRATES:  And I, my dear friend, knowing this, am desirous of becoming

your disciple.  For I observe that no one appears to notice you--not even

this Meletus; but his sharp eyes have found me out at once, and he has

indicted me for impiety.  And therefore, I adjure you to tell me the nature

of piety and impiety, which you said that you knew so well, and of murder,

and of other offences against the gods.  What are they?  Is not piety in

every action always the same? and impiety, again--is it not always the

opposite of piety, and also the same with itself, having, as impiety, one

notion which includes whatever is impious?



EUTHYPHRO:  To be sure, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  And what is piety, and what is impiety?



EUTHYPHRO:  Piety is doing as I am doing; that is to say, prosecuting any

one who is guilty of murder, sacrilege, or of any similar crime--whether he

be your father or mother, or whoever he may be--that makes no difference;

and not to prosecute them is impiety.  And please to consider, Socrates,

what a notable proof I will give you of the truth of my words, a proof

which I have already given to others:--of the principle, I mean, that the

impious, whoever he may be, ought not to go unpunished.  For do not men

regard Zeus as the best and most righteous of the gods?--and yet they admit

that he bound his father (Cronos) because he wickedly devoured his sons,

and that he too had punished his own father (Uranus) for a similar reason,

in a nameless manner.  And yet when I proceed against my father, they are

angry with me.  So inconsistent are they in their way of talking when the

gods are concerned, and when I am concerned.



SOCRATES:  May not this be the reason, Euthyphro, why I am charged with

impiety--that I cannot away with these stories about the gods? and

therefore I suppose that people think me wrong.  But, as you who are

well informed about them approve of them, I cannot do better than

assent to your superior wisdom.  What else can I say, confessing as I

do, that I know nothing about them?  Tell me, for the love of Zeus,

whether you really believe that they are true.



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes, Socrates; and things more wonderful still, of which the

world is in ignorance.



SOCRATES:  And do you really believe that the gods fought with one

another, and had dire quarrels, battles, and the like, as the poets

say, and as you may see represented in the works of great artists?  The

temples are full of them; and notably the robe of Athene, which is

carried up to the Acropolis at the great Panathenaea, is embroidered

with them.  Are all these tales of the gods true, Euthyphro?



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes, Socrates; and, as I was saying, I can tell you, if you

would like to hear them, many other things about the gods which

would quite amaze you.



SOCRATES:  I dare say; and you shall tell me them at some other time when I

have leisure.  But just at present I would rather hear from you a more

precise answer, which you have not as yet given, my friend, to the

question, What is 'piety'?  When asked, you only replied, Doing as you do,

charging your father with murder.



EUTHYPHRO:  And what I said was true, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  No doubt, Euthyphro; but you would admit that there are many

other pious acts?



EUTHYPHRO:  There are.



SOCRATES:  Remember that I did not ask you to give me two or three examples

of piety, but to explain the general idea which makes all pious things to

be pious.  Do you not recollect that there was one idea which made the

impious impious, and the pious pious?



EUTHYPHRO:  I remember.



SOCRATES:  Tell me what is the nature of this idea, and then I shall have a

standard to which I may look, and by which I may measure actions, whether

yours or those of any one else, and then I shall be able to say that such

and such an action is pious, such another impious.



EUTHYPHRO:  I will tell you, if you like.



SOCRATES:  I should very much like.



EUTHYPHRO:  Piety, then, is that which is dear to the gods, and impiety is

that which is not dear to them.



SOCRATES:  Very good, Euthyphro; you have now given me the sort of answer

which I wanted.  But whether what you say is true or not I cannot as yet

tell, although I make no doubt that you will prove the truth of your words.



EUTHYPHRO:  Of course.



SOCRATES:  Come, then, and let us examine what we are saying.  That thing

or person which is dear to the gods is pious, and that thing or person

which is hateful to the gods is impious, these two being the extreme

opposites of one another.  Was not that said?



EUTHYPHRO:  It was.



SOCRATES:  And well said?



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes, Socrates, I thought so; it was certainly said.



SOCRATES:  And further, Euthyphro, the gods were admitted to have enmities

and hatreds and differences?



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes, that was also said.



SOCRATES:  And what sort of difference creates enmity and anger?  Suppose

for example that you and I, my good friend, differ about a number; do

differences of this sort make us enemies and set us at variance with one

another?  Do we not go at once to arithmetic, and put an end to them by a

sum?



EUTHYPHRO:  True.



SOCRATES:  Or suppose that we differ about magnitudes, do we not quickly

end the differences by measuring?



EUTHYPHRO:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  And we end a controversy about heavy and light by resorting to a

weighing machine?



EUTHYPHRO:  To be sure.



SOCRATES:  But what differences are there which cannot be thus decided, and

which therefore make us angry and set us at enmity with one another?  I

dare say the answer does not occur to you at the moment, and therefore I

will suggest that these enmities arise when the matters of difference are

the just and unjust, good and evil, honourable and dishonourable.  Are not

these the points about which men differ, and about which when we are unable

satisfactorily to decide our differences, you and I and all of us quarrel,

when we do quarrel?  (Compare Alcib.)



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes, Socrates, the nature of the differences about which we

quarrel is such as you describe.



SOCRATES:  And the quarrels of the gods, noble Euthyphro, when they occur,

are of a like nature?



EUTHYPHRO:  Certainly they are.



SOCRATES:  They have differences of opinion, as you say, about good and

evil, just and unjust, honourable and dishonourable:  there would have been

no quarrels among them, if there had been no such differences--would there

now?



EUTHYPHRO:  You are quite right.



SOCRATES:  Does not every man love that which he deems noble and just and

good, and hate the opposite of them?



EUTHYPHRO:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  But, as you say, people regard the same things, some as just and

others as unjust,--about these they dispute; and so there arise wars and

fightings among them.



EUTHYPHRO:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  Then the same things are hated by the gods and loved by the

gods, and are both hateful and dear to them?



EUTHYPHRO:  True.



SOCRATES:  And upon this view the same things, Euthyphro, will be pious and

also impious?



EUTHYPHRO:  So I should suppose.



SOCRATES:  Then, my friend, I remark with surprise that you have not

answered the question which I asked.  For I certainly did not ask you to

tell me what action is both pious and impious:  but now it would seem that

what is loved by the gods is also hated by them.  And therefore, Euthyphro,

in thus chastising your father you may very likely be doing what is

agreeable to Zeus but disagreeable to Cronos or Uranus, and what is

acceptable to Hephaestus but unacceptable to Here, and there may be other

gods who have similar differences of opinion.



EUTHYPHRO:  But I believe, Socrates, that all the gods would be agreed as

to the propriety of punishing a murderer:  there would be no difference of

opinion about that.



SOCRATES:  Well, but speaking of men, Euthyphro, did you ever hear any one

arguing that a murderer or any sort of evil-doer ought to be let off?



EUTHYPHRO:  I should rather say that these are the questions which they are

always arguing, especially in courts of law:  they commit all sorts of

crimes, and there is nothing which they will not do or say in their own

defence.



SOCRATES:  But do they admit their guilt, Euthyphro, and yet say that they

ought not to be punished?



EUTHYPHRO:  No; they do not.



SOCRATES:  Then there are some things which they do not venture to say and

do:  for they do not venture to argue that the guilty are to be unpunished,

but they deny their guilt, do they not?



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Then they do not argue that the evil-doer should not be

punished, but they argue about the fact of who the evil-doer is, and what

he did and when?



EUTHYPHRO:  True.



SOCRATES:  And the gods are in the same case, if as you assert they quarrel

about just and unjust, and some of them say while others deny that

injustice is done among them.  For surely neither God nor man will ever

venture to say that the doer of injustice is not to be punished?



EUTHYPHRO:  That is true, Socrates, in the main.




SOCRATES:  But they join issue about the particulars--gods and men alike;

and, if they dispute at all, they dispute about some act which is called in

question, and which by some is affirmed to be just, by others to be unjust. 

Is not that true?



EUTHYPHRO:  Quite true.



SOCRATES:  Well then, my dear friend Euthyphro, do tell me, for my better

instruction and information, what proof have you that in the opinion of all

the gods a servant who is guilty of murder, and is put in chains by the

master of the dead man, and dies because he is put in chains before he who

bound him can learn from the interpreters of the gods what he ought to do

with him, dies unjustly; and that on behalf of such an one a son ought to

proceed against his father and accuse him of murder.  How would you show

that all the gods absolutely agree in approving of his act?  Prove to me

that they do, and I will applaud your wisdom as long as I live.



EUTHYPHRO:  It will be a difficult task; but I could make the matter very

clear indeed to you.



SOCRATES:  I understand; you mean to say that I am not so quick of

apprehension as the judges:  for to them you will be sure to prove that the

act is unjust, and hateful to the gods.



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes indeed, Socrates; at least if they will listen to me.



SOCRATES:  But they will be sure to listen if they find that you are a good

speaker.  There was a notion that came into my mind while you were

speaking; I said to myself:  'Well, and what if Euthyphro does prove to me

that all the gods regarded the death of the serf as unjust, how do I know

anything more of the nature of piety and impiety? for granting that this

action may be hateful to the gods, still piety and impiety are not

adequately defined by these distinctions, for that which is hateful to the

gods has been shown to be also pleasing and dear to them.'  And therefore,

Euthyphro, I do not ask you to prove this; I will suppose, if you like,

that all the gods condemn and abominate such an action.  But I will amend

the definition so far as to say that what all the gods hate is impious, and

what they love pious or holy; and what some of them love and others hate is

both or neither.  Shall this be our definition of piety and impiety?



EUTHYPHRO:  Why not, Socrates?



SOCRATES:  Why not! certainly, as far as I am concerned, Euthyphro, there

is no reason why not.  But whether this admission will greatly assist you

in the task of instructing me as you promised, is a matter for you to

consider.



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes, I should say that what all the gods love is pious and

holy, and the opposite which they all hate, impious.



SOCRATES:  Ought we to enquire into the truth of this, Euthyphro, or simply

to accept the mere statement on our own authority and that of others?  What

do you say?



EUTHYPHRO:  We should enquire; and I believe that the statement will stand

the test of enquiry.



SOCRATES:  We shall know better, my good friend, in a little while.  The

point which I should first wish to understand is whether the pious or holy

is beloved by the gods because it is holy, or holy because it is beloved of

the gods.



EUTHYPHRO:  I do not understand your meaning, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  I will endeavour to explain:  we, speak of carrying and we speak

of being carried, of leading and being led, seeing and being seen.  You

know that in all such cases there is a difference, and you know also in

what the difference lies?



EUTHYPHRO:  I think that I understand.



SOCRATES:  And is not that which is beloved distinct from that which loves?



EUTHYPHRO:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  Well; and now tell me, is that which is carried in this state of

carrying because it is carried, or for some other reason?



EUTHYPHRO:  No; that is the reason.



SOCRATES:  And the same is true of what is led and of what is seen?



EUTHYPHRO:  True.



SOCRATES:  And a thing is not seen because it is visible, but conversely,

visible because it is seen; nor is a thing led because it is in the state

of being led, or carried because it is in the state of being carried, but

the converse of this.  And now I think, Euthyphro, that my meaning will be

intelligible; and my meaning is, that any state of action or passion

implies previous action or passion.  It does not become because it is

becoming, but it is in a state of becoming because it becomes; neither does

it suffer because it is in a state of suffering, but it is in a state of

suffering because it suffers.  Do you not agree?



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Is not that which is loved in some state either of becoming or

suffering?



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And the same holds as in the previous instances; the state of

being loved follows the act of being loved, and not the act the state.



EUTHYPHRO:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And what do you say of piety, Euthyphro:  is not piety,

according to your definition, loved by all the gods?



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Because it is pious or holy, or for some other reason?



EUTHYPHRO:  No, that is the reason.



SOCRATES:  It is loved because it is holy, not holy because it is loved?



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And that which is dear to the gods is loved by them, and is in a

state to be loved of them because it is loved of them?



EUTHYPHRO:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  Then that which is dear to the gods, Euthyphro, is not holy, nor

is that which is holy loved of God, as you affirm; but they are two

different things.



EUTHYPHRO:  How do you mean, Socrates?



SOCRATES:  I mean to say that the holy has been acknowledged by us to be

loved of God because it is holy, not to be holy because it is loved.



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  But that which is dear to the gods is dear to them because it is

loved by them, not loved by them because it is dear to them.



EUTHYPHRO:  True.



SOCRATES:  But, friend Euthyphro, if that which is holy is the same with

that which is dear to God, and is loved because it is holy, then that which

is dear to God would have been loved as being dear to God; but if that

which is dear to God is dear to him because loved by him, then that which

is holy would have been holy because loved by him.  But now you see that

the reverse is the case, and that they are quite different from one

another.  For one (theophiles) is of a kind to be loved cause it is loved,

and the other (osion) is loved because it is of a kind to be loved.  Thus

you appear to me, Euthyphro, when I ask you what is the essence of

holiness, to offer an attribute only, and not the essence--the attribute of

being loved by all the gods.  But you still refuse to explain to me the

nature of holiness.  And therefore, if you please, I will ask you not to

hide your treasure, but to tell me once more what holiness or piety really

is, whether dear to the gods or not (for that is a matter about which we

will not quarrel); and what is impiety?



EUTHYPHRO:  I really do not know, Socrates, how to express what I mean. 

For somehow or other our arguments, on whatever ground we rest them, seem

to turn round and walk away from us.



SOCRATES:  Your words, Euthyphro, are like the handiwork of my ancestor

Daedalus; and if I were the sayer or propounder of them, you might say that

my arguments walk away and will not remain fixed where they are placed

because I am a descendant of his.  But now, since these notions are your

own, you must find some other gibe, for they certainly, as you yourself

allow, show an inclination to be on the move.



EUTHYPHRO:  Nay, Socrates, I shall still say that you are the Daedalus who

sets arguments in motion; not I, certainly, but you make them move or go

round, for they would never have stirred, as far as I am concerned.



SOCRATES:  Then I must be a greater than Daedalus:  for whereas he only

made his own inventions to move, I move those of other people as well.  And

the beauty of it is, that I would rather not.  For I would give the wisdom

of Daedalus, and the wealth of Tantalus, to be able to detain them and keep

them fixed.  But enough of this.  As I perceive that you are lazy, I will

myself endeavour to show you how you might instruct me in the nature of

piety; and I hope that you will not grudge your labour.  Tell me, then--Is

not that which is pious necessarily just?



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And is, then, all which is just pious? or, is that which is

pious all just, but that which is just, only in part and not all, pious?



EUTHYPHRO:  I do not understand you, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  And yet I know that you are as much wiser than I am, as you are

younger.  But, as I was saying, revered friend, the abundance of your

wisdom makes you lazy.  Please to exert yourself, for there is no real

difficulty in understanding me.  What I mean I may explain by an

illustration of what I do not mean.  The poet (Stasinus) sings--



'Of Zeus, the author and creator of all these things,

You will not tell:  for where there is fear there is also reverence.'



Now I disagree with this poet.  Shall I tell you in what respect?



EUTHYPHRO:  By all means.



SOCRATES:  I should not say that where there is fear there is also

reverence; for I am sure that many persons fear poverty and disease, and

the like evils, but I do not perceive that they reverence the objects of

their fear.



EUTHYPHRO:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  But where reverence is, there is fear; for he who has a feeling

of reverence and shame about the commission of any action, fears and is

afraid of an ill reputation.



EUTHYPHRO:  No doubt.



SOCRATES:  Then we are wrong in saying that where there is fear there is

also reverence; and we should say, where there is reverence there is also

fear.  But there is not always reverence where there is fear; for fear is a

more extended notion, and reverence is a part of fear, just as the odd is a

part of number, and number is a more extended notion than the odd.  I

suppose that you follow me now?



EUTHYPHRO:  Quite well.



SOCRATES:  That was the sort of question which I meant to raise when I

asked whether the just is always the pious, or the pious always the just;

and whether there may not be justice where there is not piety; for justice

is the more extended notion of which piety is only a part.  Do you dissent?



EUTHYPHRO:  No, I think that you are quite right.



SOCRATES:  Then, if piety is a part of justice, I suppose that we should

enquire what part?  If you had pursued the enquiry in the previous cases;

for instance, if you had asked me what is an even number, and what part of

number the even is, I should have had no difficulty in replying, a number

which represents a figure having two equal sides.  Do you not agree?



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes, I quite agree.



SOCRATES:  In like manner, I want you to tell me what part of justice is

piety or holiness, that I may be able to tell Meletus not to do me

injustice, or indict me for impiety, as I am now adequately instructed by

you in the nature of piety or holiness, and their opposites.



EUTHYPHRO:  Piety or holiness, Socrates, appears to me to be that part of

justice which attends to the gods, as there is the other part of justice

which attends to men.



SOCRATES:  That is good, Euthyphro; yet still there is a little point about

which I should like to have further information, What is the meaning of

'attention'?  For attention can hardly be used in the same sense when

applied to the gods as when applied to other things.  For instance, horses

are said to require attention, and not every person is able to attend to

them, but only a person skilled in horsemanship.  Is it not so?



EUTHYPHRO:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  I should suppose that the art of horsemanship is the art of

attending to horses?



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  Nor is every one qualified to attend to dogs, but only the

huntsman?



EUTHYPHRO:  True.



SOCRATES:  And I should also conceive that the art of the huntsman is the

art of attending to dogs?



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  As the art of the oxherd is the art of attending to oxen?



EUTHYPHRO:  Very true.



SOCRATES:  In like manner holiness or piety is the art of attending to the

gods?--that would be your meaning, Euthyphro?



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And is not attention always designed for the good or benefit of

that to which the attention is given?  As in the case of horses, you may

observe that when attended to by the horseman's art they are benefited and

improved, are they not?



EUTHYPHRO:  True.



SOCRATES:  As the dogs are benefited by the huntsman's art, and the oxen by

the art of the oxherd, and all other things are tended or attended for

their good and not for their hurt?



EUTHYPHRO:  Certainly, not for their hurt.



SOCRATES:  But for their good?



EUTHYPHRO:  Of course.



SOCRATES:  And does piety or holiness, which has been defined to be the art

of attending to the gods, benefit or improve them?  Would you say that when

you do a holy act you make any of the gods better?



EUTHYPHRO:  No, no; that was certainly not what I meant.



SOCRATES:  And I, Euthyphro, never supposed that you did.  I asked you the

question about the nature of the attention, because I thought that you did

not.



EUTHYPHRO:  You do me justice, Socrates; that is not the sort of attention

which I mean.



SOCRATES:  Good:  but I must still ask what is this attention to the gods

which is called piety?



EUTHYPHRO:  It is such, Socrates, as servants show to their masters.



SOCRATES:  I understand--a sort of ministration to the gods.



EUTHYPHRO:  Exactly.



SOCRATES:  Medicine is also a sort of ministration or service, having in

view the attainment of some object--would you not say of health?



EUTHYPHRO:  I should.



SOCRATES:  Again, there is an art which ministers to the ship-builder with

a view to the attainment of some result?



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes, Socrates, with a view to the building of a ship.



SOCRATES:  As there is an art which ministers to the house-builder with a

view to the building of a house?



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes.



SOCRATES:  And now tell me, my good friend, about the art which ministers

to the gods:  what work does that help to accomplish?  For you must surely

know if, as you say, you are of all men living the one who is best

instructed in religion.



EUTHYPHRO:  And I speak the truth, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  Tell me then, oh tell me--what is that fair work which the gods

do by the help of our ministrations?



EUTHYPHRO:  Many and fair, Socrates, are the works which they do.



SOCRATES:  Why, my friend, and so are those of a general.  But the chief of

them is easily told.  Would you not say that victory in war is the chief of

them?



EUTHYPHRO:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  Many and fair, too, are the works of the husbandman, if I am not

mistaken; but his chief work is the production of food from the earth?



EUTHYPHRO:  Exactly.



SOCRATES:  And of the many and fair things done by the gods, which is the

chief or principal one?



EUTHYPHRO:  I have told you already, Socrates, that to learn all these

things accurately will be very tiresome.  Let me simply say that piety or

holiness is learning how to please the gods in word and deed, by prayers

and sacrifices.  Such piety is the salvation of families and states, just

as the impious, which is unpleasing to the gods, is their ruin and

destruction.



SOCRATES:  I think that you could have answered in much fewer words the

chief question which I asked, Euthyphro, if you had chosen.  But I see

plainly that you are not disposed to instruct me--clearly not:  else why,

when we reached the point, did you turn aside?  Had you only answered me I

should have truly learned of you by this time the nature of piety.  Now, as

the asker of a question is necessarily dependent on the answerer, whither

he leads I must follow; and can only ask again, what is the pious, and what

is piety?  Do you mean that they are a sort of science of praying and

sacrificing?



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes, I do.



SOCRATES:  And sacrificing is giving to the gods, and prayer is asking of

the gods?



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  Upon this view, then, piety is a science of asking and giving?



EUTHYPHRO:  You understand me capitally, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  Yes, my friend; the reason is that I am a votary of your

science, and give my mind to it, and therefore nothing which you say will

be thrown away upon me.  Please then to tell me, what is the nature of this

service to the gods?  Do you mean that we prefer requests and give gifts to

them?



EUTHYPHRO:  Yes, I do.



SOCRATES:  Is not the right way of asking to ask of them what we want?



EUTHYPHRO:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And the right way of giving is to give to them in return what

they want of us.  There would be no meaning in an art which gives to any

one that which he does not want.



EUTHYPHRO:  Very true, Socrates.



SOCRATES:  Then piety, Euthyphro, is an art which gods and men have of

doing business with one another?



EUTHYPHRO:  That is an expression which you may use, if you like.



SOCRATES:  But I have no particular liking for anything but the truth.  I

wish, however, that you would tell me what benefit accrues to the gods from

our gifts.  There is no doubt about what they give to us; for there is no

good thing which they do not give; but how we can give any good thing to

them in return is far from being equally clear.  If they give everything

and we give nothing, that must be an affair of business in which we have

very greatly the advantage of them.



EUTHYPHRO:  And do you imagine, Socrates, that any benefit accrues to the

gods from our gifts?



SOCRATES:  But if not, Euthyphro, what is the meaning of gifts which are

conferred by us upon the gods?



EUTHYPHRO:  What else, but tributes of honour; and, as I was just now

saying, what pleases them?



SOCRATES:  Piety, then, is pleasing to the gods, but not beneficial or dear

to them?



EUTHYPHRO:  I should say that nothing could be dearer.



SOCRATES:  Then once more the assertion is repeated that piety is dear to

the gods?



EUTHYPHRO:  Certainly.



SOCRATES:  And when you say this, can you wonder at your words not standing

firm, but walking away?  Will you accuse me of being the Daedalus who makes

them walk away, not perceiving that there is another and far greater artist

than Daedalus who makes them go round in a circle, and he is yourself; for

the argument, as you will perceive, comes round to the same point.  Were we

not saying that the holy or pious was not the same with that which is loved

of the gods?  Have you forgotten?



EUTHYPHRO:  I quite remember.



SOCRATES:  And are you not saying that what is loved of the gods is holy;

and is not this the same as what is dear to them--do you see?



EUTHYPHRO:  True.



SOCRATES:  Then either we were wrong in our former assertion; or, if we

were right then, we are wrong now.



EUTHYPHRO:  One of the two must be true.



SOCRATES:  Then we must begin again and ask, What is piety?  That is an

enquiry which I shall never be weary of pursuing as far as in me lies; and

I entreat you not to scorn me, but to apply your mind to the utmost, and

tell me the truth.  For, if any man knows, you are he; and therefore I must

detain you, like Proteus, until you tell.  If you had not certainly known

the nature of piety and impiety, I am confident that you would never, on

behalf of a serf, have charged your aged father with murder.  You would not

have run such a risk of doing wrong in the sight of the gods, and you would

have had too much respect for the opinions of men.  I am sure, therefore,

that you know the nature of piety and impiety.  Speak out then, my dear

Euthyphro, and do not hide your knowledge.



EUTHYPHRO:  Another time, Socrates; for I am in a hurry, and must go now.



SOCRATES:  Alas! my companion, and will you leave me in despair?  I was

hoping that you would instruct me in the nature of piety and impiety; and

then I might have cleared myself of Meletus and his indictment.  I would

have told him that I had been enlightened by Euthyphro, and had given up

rash innovations and speculations, in which I indulged only through

ignorance, and that now I am about to lead a better life.








End 
